This is - and I promise you I am not joking - one of the 10 points in Boris Johnson's 10-point plan for a successful Brexit.  
Boris re-promises 100% of UK's Brexit cheque to NHS the day after Gove promises 40% of it for farm subsidies. 
White House statement on the proposed Kurdistan Regional Government's referendum.  
Boris Johnson has exposed the Tories' real Brexit agenda  
Boris Johnson: we WILL claw back £350m a week post-Brexit after all  
Apparently people really don't have a stomach for another referendum. They prefer to be poorer instead. Brexit logic. 
Leavers... You like a drink? I do too. If so, then pray brexit doesn't happen.  
Tell the government to release the hidden Brexit studies! Nothing to hide, no reason not to publish. Sign here:  
One Tory MP on Boris Johnson’s Brexit intervention in the Telegraph:“This is the most extraordinarily selfish act I’ve seen...” 1/2 
Correct. EU trusted Cameron to achieve a remain vote & didn't plan for #Brexit (neither did Cameron) so now desperate to plug gap in budget.  
Or trade deals found by rambling roundThen Brexit would be doneBut places on the wide world's stageAre not maintainéd so, /2 
Burning bucket of mayonnaise in Lidl carrier bag "actually just Brexit" say Met Bomb Squad 
Director of EU Affairs at @KRGEuro, @ZanaKurda, speaks about the upcoming referendum in Kurdistan. pic.twitter.com/kISREVEPp0 
The US does not support the timing of the Kurdistan Regional Government's referendum. First we must focus on defeating ISIS.  
15 months of Brexit uncertainty has brought Britain nothing much other than gloom, doom & global embarrassment, oh and lost us many friends.  
Take back control: UK WILL use Brexit £350m per week to fund NHS, Boris Johnson suggests  
#EXCLUSIVE: My vision for a bold, thriving Britain enabled by Brexit - #premium 
Iraq's Kurdish parliament backs Sept 25 independence referendum  
.Ireland Says No.....?"Leo Varadkar set to block next stage of Brexit talks". 
Out of curiosity, why you are so against an entire nation to have a vote/say..it's only a referendum, surely that's democracy?#TwitterKurds  
The pitfalls of Catalonia's independence referendum  
What a lovely, lovely evening I've just had. Then walked home arm in arm with the tremendous octogenarian Polish neighbour. FU Brexit. 
Wonderful to be in Italy speaking in language of Dante advising centre right politicians not to follow Brexit which is a historical mistake  
.@PaulWilliamsDC - @Kurdistan's holding an independence referendum is consistent w/ international law  
Theresa May's reckless Brexit plans threaten millions in EU investment for schools and hospitals - @VinceCable 
Reuters: Spanish Police hunt for hidden ballot boxes in bid to foil #referendum in #Catalonia. ☛ #Erdoganisation  
In an apparent challenge to Theresa May's leadership, Boris Johnson has outlined his vision for Brexit Britain.  
Coalition of chaos reigns, Brexit parties continue sleepwalk into dark unknown; economics don't make sense, the humanity even more reckless.  
Catalonia referendum: Spanish state poised to seize Catalan finances - BBC News  
My next book will now be performed as a rolling art installation where cabinet ministers turn up and speak on Brexit between chapters 
Friends/strangers: Plebiscite polls suggest that the YES vote is down. Do NOT be complacent. This could be Brexit all over again. Srsly. 
Brexit did not happen yet.EU national status did not changed yet.It does mean that their Immigration status did not change yet either. /1  
Here’s the @FT report: Boris Johnson outburst challenges Theresa May’s Brexit leadership  
Those who oppose #Kurdistan independence referendum are anxious because they realise that it will likely receive overwhelming support. 
Iraq Kurd MPs approve independence referendum  
My 4,000 word vision for a bold, thriving Britain enabled by Brexit  
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign 7% would now vote #remain #stopbrexit 
Festival "Colors" to support the referendum #Independence of Kurdistan in Erbil. 
Not reassuring with 18 mths to goInquiry launched into state of Brexit negotiations as talks descend into disarray  
Boris power grab/leadership play ahead of May's Florence speech on Brexit. He's been reading too much Machiavelli ..  
Why the EU sucks! Sir James Dyson reveals that after wrangling with Eurocrats for 25 years he can't wait for Brexit  
I hereby hand down the Foreign Sec 100 lines: "I must not destabilise the PM while Brexit is merely a work in progress."  
Let's hold "independence" referendum in Gaza, Jerusalem, West Bank, and Golan Heights  
Cat finally out of the bag - Boris wants a bargain-basement race to the bottom #Brexit #Britain - no, no, no 
Absolutely endorse Austin Petersen for Senator, he's the GOP's candidate for a Post Brexit United Kingdom, whilst working hard for Missouri  
Imagine how totally &utterly screwed we are as a country that they're trying to pass Boris off as our Brexit saviour  
All options are on Turkey and Iran's table, literally all options, to confront Kurdistan's referendum  
"Spain's home affairs ministry: The @GuardiaCivil confiscated 100,000 posters of the illegal [sic] referendum..." and they're proud of it.  
Foreign Secretary outlines visions of UK foreign and trade policy after Brexit. Pundits see it thru prism of leadership bids. Crap pundits 
Johnson shows Gov has no foreign policy, only short-term domestic:  Hard Brexit (regardless of what then happens) & strike tough poses.  
Brexit will break our NHS not boost it with the IFS forecasting a £58bn black hole in the budget, which means less money for the NHS 
Boris should be apologising for his disgraceful conduct in the referendum, not continually making the same impossible promises  
White House calls on Kurdistan Regional Gov to Call Off Referendum on 25th. Maybe too little too late... #Iraq 
Europe is starting to fear a 'no deal' Brexit – Michel Barnier best not push Britain too far, says @asabenn 
an extremely detailed analysis, based on real historical text, of whether and how brexit would affect Irish fairies:  
You can't have "Brexit will be a success" as one of the points in your "10-point plan for a successful Brexit"  
Just now: Trump administration calls on Iraqi Kurds to halt independence referendum, calling it "distracting" from ISIS war  
Absolutely brilliant article in @Telegraph by @BorisJohnson on our vision for Britain post Brexit. An optimistic and global future 
7: Brexit will be a success“This country will succeed in our new national enterprise, and will succeed mightily.”(That's it. No joke)  
Boris cuts through gloom surrounding Brexit to give inspiring view of UK's future #borisbrexitbritain #premium 
Labour need to demand release of the Brexit impact studies @Keir_Starmer. We're ill informed. it blights democracy. 
Much of the folly of Brexit is captured in BoJo's use of "bottle it" in the first paragraph here. He thinks it's a game of chicken.  
An absolute must read - Brexit’s Irish Question | by Fintan O’Toole | The New York Review of Books  
#EXCLUSIVE: My vision for a bold, thriving Britain enabled by Brexit - @BorisJohnson #borisbrexitbritain #premium 
So shocking! EU citizens not allowed to adopt! Are we criminals? Have we no right to a family life since the referendum? Disgusting #InLimbo 
Erdogan says Turkey may review its policy on the KRG as Iraqi Kurdish lawmakers approve an independence referendum  
 Spanish government has ordered banks to disclose all accounts and transactions related to Catalan referendum.  
Shortly, @BorisJohnson will break his silence on Brexit Britain exclusively on @Telegraph #borisbrexitbritain 
.@Elenauk received this from one of the members of Our Brexit Testimonies. What do you call this?We call it discrimination.Is this ok?  
No. Not leaflets, not other such twaddle. In the law of the referendum, it was advisory. How is this hard?  
Pls Sign & RT: Petition: Hold a referendum on the final #Brexit deal  
#Kurdistan parliament just approved independence #referendum on Sept 25. Yes to an independent Kurdistan !  
#KRGs' Parliament's ratification of #Referendum is a step closer to #KurdistanIndependence. #kurdtwitter 
A peshmerga celebrates the upcoming independence referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan #kurdistanreferendum #peshmerga #kurdistan #TwitterKurds 
Brexit: UK Gov. launches plea for 'valued' EU citizens to stay in Britain.What does 'valued' mean? Who are they? 
Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal - 70,000 signatures and counting!  
BBC News - Airbus may quit Filton if hard Brexit happens, MP fears  
Sir Vince Cable says Scotland's concerns over Brexit must be respected  
Meanwhile, if there are any referendum supporters currently in Vancouver that would like to appeal to his majesty...  
I've had a #Brexit of a day, nothing seems to go right  
Billionaire who claimed “Brexit would make us richer” creates hundreds of jobs – in Asia  via @LondonEconomic #BBCAQ 
Now It's not about independence or referendum  now we fight for our civil rights and against repression of the Spanish state 
We welcome tonight's historic session of #Kurdistan Parliament and the approval of the independence referendum by lawmakers. 
Good piece from @JamieJBartlett Brexit is trivial: Prepare for the tech revolution  
Is there an exit from Brexit? Vince Cable tells us his thoughts on our latest The Economist Asks podcast  
Good for Barzani. I'm not the biggest fan, but I support him in going forward with this referendum despite the world being against it.  
BBC News - Catalonia referendum: Spanish state poised to seize Catalan finances  
Absolutely.The "relationship papers" are not directly relevant to current Brexit negotiations.Government pamphleteering.  
You know I said months ago that Brexit was nothing but a massive con job by a bunch of backstreet shysters?Well, I was right. 
Armed police order the editorial staff of the El Natcional newspaper in Catalonia to censor independence referendum  
1. This Tory is Minister for Intl. Trade.2. Romania is in the EU.3. Think about it.#ledbyidiots #brexit #EU 
15-Sept-17 TV News: 'Spanish police seize 100,000 referendum posters' #FreePressCatalonia  via @catalannews 
Dr Chukwuemeka Ezeife Spits Fire, Says Nnamdi Kanu Is Not A Secessionist, He Is Only Calling For Referendum, -  
These relationship papers have nothing to do with the current Brexit negotiations, and everything to do with trying to win over UK press. 
Yay! Another "strict embargo" of midnight on a Saturday for news of a @DExEUgov Brexit relationship paper, just for benefit of Sunday press. 
Whilst stopping Brexit must remain priority, I'm pleased @vincecable aims for @LibDems to lead in other areas too. 
Kurdish MPs say yes to independence referendum  
Iraqi Kurdish parliament approves referendum on independence despite objections in Baghdad and abroad  
Kurdish parliament in Iraqi Kurdistan met for the 1st time in 2 years, and decided to do an Independence referendum. Israel is with you!  
 #BREAKING - Iraq’s Kurdish parliament approves the holding of an independence referendum on September 25  
Academics 'SCARED' to go public on Brexit. What sort of country are we living in?  
You Brexit, You Fixit.  
#BREAKING : Kurdistan Parliament approves holding independence referendum on Sept. 25#TwitterKurds #Iraq 
I congratulate the people of Kurdistan for today's historic parliamentary session approving the independence referendum on Sept 25- MB. 
Kurdistan parliament approves independence referendum for September 25  
Pleased to hear that after Brexit, we'll have our own currency, our own legislature, and our own border agency. I missed those things.  
Dennis Skinner being called The Scab of Bolsover is proof that Brexit is turning this country into a madhouse... 
"Scotland's Brexit concerns" are that Scotland doesn't want to Brexit. We're all ears as to how you plan to respect that, champ.  
Do not buy Dyson products this flag waver for #Brexit manufactures in Malaysia not in the UK. 
Brexit is forcing us to pay another £170 million a week in interest – or ~1/2 the money Boris promised the NHS.  
All UK residents angry at brexit should sign this important petition stand up and make your voice heard.  
Killing unarmed civilians is not terrorism, but singing for a referendum is. 
Asayish sniper protecting today referendum celebration in Qamishlo. #TwitterKurds 
Catalan Govt releases the instructions video explaining how to vote on the #1Oct #Referendum  
Burberry latest company to declare potential for post-Brexit Britain is “enormous” & its manufacturing is to stay in UK 
BREAKING: Spanish police seizes 100,000 posters in favor of the Catalan independence referendum in Barcelona. 
BREAKING: Spain threatens to send Catalonia to bed without its tea unless it agrees to give up independence referendum plan. 
Freedom of the Press continues to be threatened by the Spanish Government: now they summon newspapers that INFORM about the referendum!  
Long Live Catalonia , Long Live Khalistan - India wants to stop the 2020 referendum in Panjab for freedom also @sikhsforjustice 
Brexit Secretary: EU divorce bill now '£60bn and falling'  
Rally to support Kurdistan referendum in western Kurdistan.#Qamishlo Proud of my hometown. 
“Brexit is like leaping off a cliff without a parachute.”  
Brexit is costing the UK £9 billion more in debt interest – enough money to give every government worker a 5% bonus. 
Irish PM Varadkar 'not optimistic' on Brexit talks  
Denmark says it wants Theresa May to be clearer on how Britain plans to deal with the exit bill  
Spanish govt gives Catalan govt 48 hours to abandon referendum plans or lose budgetary powers, its finances seized 
British people were delusional to think #Trump would be Britain's best ally post-#Brexit. Today's insulting tweet is what they got in return 
Pleased to hand over Scottish fishing industry paper with key Brexit demands today to @michaelgove and @IanDuncanHMG #seaofopportunity 
Damn that Brexit thing  
Also. With don't knows stripped out that would be Yes 46% to No 54%. Closer than at referendum.  
Bexit Undefined - new tee from People's March for Europe. Show the world what you th8ink of Brexit #rethinkbrexit  
If the rich and powerful weren't benefitting from Brexit, Brexit wouldn't be happening. 
They want you to give more 
Unbelievable but true. Civil Guard arrive at @elnacionalcat offices to warn against referendum advertising and "criminal responsibility"..  
Parliament voted for the Ref, Parliament voted to uphold the Ref result. People then voted for MPs whose Party supported Brexit. Game Over.  
The right wing pact between the Tories & the DUP is a blank cheque for the disastrous Tory Brexit agenda- Michelle Gildernew MP @gildernewm 
I defeated last year’s attempts to repeal DC’s budget autonomy referendum & its anti-discrimination law & intend to do it again. #HandsOffDC 
Ahead of Brexit, tax perks tempt Italian bankers back to la dolce vita:  via @pamela_msg @StephenJewkes 
Actually our government's already doing that #brexit. 
On Monday: Get your hands on our special 8-page pullout marking the anniversary of the independence referendum. Only in The National.  
"the Bay of Pigs disaster" now that was a real #brexit  
This week's lesson: The upcoming abortion referendum will be absolute poison and will wreck careers and lives. 
'Referendum is a tool... not the objective. Independence is our objective,' Barzani told a rally in Amedi.   
This is not about #Brexit - it is corruption, pure and simple.  
'Opposing Brexit does damage to the anti-Brexit cause' is my favourite opinion of the week. Thank you. 
Excellent article by @MrRBourne for @CatoUnbound: #Brexit Is the Start!  #UK #BrexitBill #EUWithdrawalBill #FreeTrade 
If the fate of the Vauxhall plants at Luton and Ellesmere rests on Brexit they are probably lost. Brexiteers can congratulate themselves. 
Fears Toyota could leave Derbyshire. Another #Brexit own goal by the #Leave camp. Idiots 
Remoaner SKEWERED on Question Time as proud Leavers proclaim 'I don't regret Brexit'  
The same madness as Turkey & Iraq bullying the Kurds. What on earth has Spain to lose by granting the Catalans a referendum? 
Burberry boss hails the 'enormous' trade opportunities for post-Brexit Britain as London Fashion Week starts  
CATALONIA |Spanish police raids two printing firms in #Barcelona area in search of Oct 1 referendum material  
Spanish police has entered another printing company looking for referendum material, this time in Badalona  
Catalonia referendum: Spanish state poised to seize Catalan finances  
Best headline today about Brexit causing sandwich shop staff to leave the UK; 'Auf Wiedersehen, Pret'. 
“Brexit and the Law in Wales” Moderator: Prof Richard RawlingsPanel: @BangorLawSchool @Swansea_Law @CardiffLaw @AgriAdvisor #legalwales 
RU offered me access to Trump, all kinds of shit. Laughed in their face. Brexit guys rang me up. Laughed in theirs.  
The Daily Express has obviously become a vehicle for Russian Active Measures. @gchq should take it to the Govt as a priority. Same in Brexit  
A minority (37%) of U.K. Voters voted for brexit in an non binding referendum, and the government panicked 
It is a pity May's Brexit speech in Florence next week comes before Tory conference. This means little or no chance of her being realistic. 
Iain. I'm not comparing Brexit to Hitler, as must be obvious to you. I am comparing  Henry Viii powers with the Enabling Act. Very different  
Lest we forget...we were not alone in 1940 but we will be in 2019 if #Brexit isn't stopped!  
Masoud Barzani rejects US, UK, UN proposal to delay referendum  
For leavers it was about identity, for remainers it was about economics - @GoodwinMJ explains the vote for Brexit 
There is NO DOUBT that @putinRF via @Arron_Banks and Cambridge Analytica backed Brexit with the AI weapon Flynn stole from DARPA 
you know Brexit is a bad idea when this is the depth of the intelligence of its supporters 
BREAKING: President Barzani of Iraqi Kurdistan says referendum going ahead on 25th of September despite Western-led proposal to postpone it 
This is just crazy talk. The anti-Brexit Remainers have lost the argument and are resorting to sheer hysteria.  
Destruction of Royal Navy deliberate & now wait for the solution “oh we must have EU military unification” #Brexit a lie & always was RT pse  
"Brexit will help the site to thrive" German-owned Palm Paper invests £45m in #Norfolk factory  #GBmfg @BBCBusiness 
Fate of Vauxhall's UK factories and jobs hang on Brexit | Daily Mail Online by @raymasseytweets 
Whitehall must publish its Brexit impact assessments  
3BREAKING: “To this date, we have not received an alternative that can take the place of the referendum,” Bazraani 
UK needs transitional status quo period. Who knew!! Brexit transition offer key to settling EU divorce bill  via @FT 
I continue to believe Jacob Rees-Mogg MP is the only man who can save Britain on the economy and solidify Brexit.   
No-one likes Soft Brexit, but it fulfils the mandate, protects the economy & offers a leadership role for the future  
President Barzani: The legitimacy of referendum is from our people ,  from the blood of Our martyrs,not from any other country.  
"The Leave campaign was a con perpetrated on many by those who will reap the few and highly-dubious benefits of a Brexit"An excellent read  
This is delightful: "Legal status of Irish Fairies after Brexit?"  
Spanish gov's Operation Dialogue: restricting referendum websites, raiding print shops for ballots, taking 700 mayors to court - now this  
Err...voting against Withdrawal Bill wouldn't thwart referendum result. Buying a false claim uncritically thwarts democracy. @PCollinsTimes 
Both McGurk & Qassem Soleimani went to Kurdistan to pressure the KRG not to go ahead w/ the referendum - sounds like a good reason to do it. 
But I still don't see why attempts to get the least damaging Brexit possible are always seen as efforts to thwart the will of the people  
We're getting more and more listeners every week, and faster too. Do you know what, maybe this #Brexit idea isn't so popular after all…  
ah yes, the famous Brexit Jesus  
one of great stories by FT journo Paul McLean,  tragically dead age 24 was UK needs to renegotiate 759 treaties with 168 countries on Brexit 
#BREAKING Catalan mayors start to receive summonses by Spain's Attorney General for collaborating with referendum 
Philip Hammond needs to spell out his plan to make Britain's post-Brexit economy a success, says @JLongworthLML 
More apparent every day that the rest of the world isn't so scared of #Brexit   Economy seeing great things with #GBmfg 
Plus, there are 130,000 British exporting companies that currently have no red-tape to deal with, but will have to after Brexit. 
But the ‘one government at the border’ project has been stopped given Brexit complications. 
The current system can manage 55million customs transactions. New one = 100m. Estimate needed for hard Brexit? 250million 
Ringo Starr returns to narrate new pro Brexit Thomas the Tank Engine.  
What he says: "Brexit offers enormous potential".What he does: Puts a £50m investment on hold, because of Brexit.  
Friends! Easy!Everyone who voted for Brexit was an uneducated racist, according to figures recently made up by 112% of Climate Scientists.  
Labour must stop trying to frustrate Brexit 
Independence Referendum Rally in the Kurdistan Region - Zakho Full video: #TwitterKurds #KurdistanReferendum #Iraq 
Indy-ambivalent mayor of Barcelona endorses referendum. That's huge.  
SPANISH GOVERNMENT SAYS HAS PASSED MEASURES TO INCREASE CONTROL OVER CATALONIA'S FINANCES AHEAD OF PLANNED OCT. 1 INDEPENDENCE REFERENDUM 
The referendum is illegal because it hasn't been negotiated, but it can't be negotiated because it is illegal.  
The BBC's approach to reporting Brexit ought now to be a matter of genuine public concern.  
Thanks! Good that there were 2 voices from Brits in Spain, both anti-Brexit, & we were surprised that Beeb didn't edit out anti-Brexit stuff  
From today's @LeedsNews -a report on tomorrow's Stop #Brexit rally in Dortmund Square #Leeds (1pm). Don't miss our biggest protest yet! 
“These #Brexit lies will be on Boris Johnson’s gravestone.” Hear @NickCohen4 put the boot in on #Remainiacs podcast: 
Pound bounces back as #Brexit driven inflation needs checking with interest rate rises. Double whammy to those suffering low pay rises 
Catalonia launches independence referendum campaign. Madrid has declared next month's breakaway vote illegal.  
UK Home Office ignores court order from UK court - more evidence that EU court oversight needed for post- #Brexit rights of EU citz!  
Today's service industries & just-in-time supply chains unlikely to survive a hard Brexit unscathed | By @TimHarford  
Today in #Brexit  
#KatieHopkins: Has the #World gone mad?  #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #EU #USA #US #BREXIT #NEWS #TORY #UKIP #LABOUR #MP #PM 
My cartoon Friday @TheTimes. 'The Rebirth of #Brexit'....Mayboticelli paints an unappealing picture.  
No one saw this coming! Please all sign to trigger Art 20 which guarantees citizen ship of the EU even after Brexit.  
Theresa May should deliver a “concrete” Brexit message, Denmark says  
No, its looking like #Brexit is going to seriously damage key industries.   That is why telling the truth about it is ever more important.  
. @TheGreenParty calling for a ratification referendum - worth backing this petition  
The great @JuliaHB1 slams disgusting #BBC bias on #Brexit. The #British people have no regrets!  #SKY #UK #EU #NEWS 
The official logo for the YES campaign. Approved by the referendum committee today.  
Every clause is sacredEvery clause is brillEvery clause is neededIn May's Brexit Bill...2/3  
Even the supporters of leaving the EU are starting to worry about the effects of leaving without a deal. Time to exit Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Local police in Gasteiz closed down the referendum related event but it went on anyways outside. @AnnaGaSabate 
Absolutely appalling. Even if #brexit is reversed now, the damage to the UK will not easily be undone ;( #TakeBackControl #NotInOurName  
Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal. Nearly 65,000 signatures!  
We all live in a facist Brexit state, a land that's filled with hate, caused by twits with no mandate. #BrexitBeatleSongs #StopBrexit 
The Brexit pretext could enable an unprecedented Tory power grab. It's time to circle Scotland's wagons to fight it.  
#Britain should make a clean break from the #EU with #NO transition deal to avoid a #Brexit muddle - #JamesDyson  #UK 
“They forbid publicity about the referendum and then do it for us for free all around the world. They're impossible to understand.”  
Your democracy has just been stolen - and there's nothing you can do about it.  #Brexit  
A killing in Harlow: the 'Brexit crime' that wasn't.Brendan O'Neill on Remainers' shameless exploitation of a death  
#Brexit is about much more than #Brexit, about wht kind of country we want to be: open, inclusive, law-abiding or mean, intolerant, arrogant 
I voted for Brexit – why do academic colleagues treat me like a pariah?  
Yesterday I met a person whose job was created by Brexit. He works in Germany and his job is moving EU projects and funding away from UK. 
And another reminder that every one of the 32 council areas in Scotland voted Remain. #Brexit  
Catalonia’s president launches ‘yes’ campaign amid independence referendum row  
Your same old Zoe, just as you've always known her, now with SECOND PASSPORT!!*come at me Brexit bros*  #StayWhereItsStillSummer #Zexit 
BREXIT: US based millionaire pensioner comes out in support of leaving the EU. What a patriotic chap.  
Border & tax checks after Brexit will require an extra 5000 staff with new customs checks costing taxpayer £800m+ #BrexitShambles 
#AngelaMerkel: 'Solidarity or get out' basically DO AS YOUR TOLD #HUNGARY!  #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #NEWS #BREXIT #TORY #US 
Hearing increasingly often about anger at business events when @GOVUK ministers can’t or won’t give any detail about #Brexit impacts  
Barcelona mayor calls for talks on referendum  
REMINDER: think UK politics today is angry and divisive? Pro-EU-membership folks didn't ask for a referendum! This is 100% on the Brexiters. 
Juncker says he has "no hard feelings" towards Britain and denies wanting to punish the UK over Brexit  
My daughter, aged 13, describes anything crass, stupid, or in ostentatious poor taste as "very Brexit". Suspect this is fairly widespread. 
Shocking. Brexit Britain today. @frenchieinlimbo @ct4europe 
There are no arguments FOR Brexit. Everything's been exposed as a lie. SOMEONE has to step up and pull the brakes. Why are our MPs so timid? 
Brexit's even making our Terrorists shit. 
Britain should make a 'clean break' from the EU with NO transition deal to avoid a Brexit 'muddle'- James Dyson says  
The pound climbs to the highest level against the dollar since just after the Brexit vote  
Where we are with the Brexit mess by now: English students saying "That's just so Brexit" to describe anything mindblowingly stupid.  
Juncker has exposed Remainers’ ‘Big Lie’ that there is no plan to create an EU superstate   #Brexit 
I have been told to 'fuck off back to Krautland' by someone who then gave me a Nazi salute. #Brexit Britain  
...presumably after Brexit they will drink British coffee, grown on plantations in Norfolk, with the beans harvested by British workers 
The Lords must add a referendum on the Brexit deal to the Withdrawal Bill, writes @Andrew_Adonis for today's Red Box  
I voted Brexit too.Shame article is written anonymously but you can see why if you read the responses on this thread. 
Let us protect our environment from Gove, Tories and Tory oil donors. Loss EU protection with #brexit, fracking, fox hunting, badger culls..  
Burberry's Christopher Bailey sees 'enormous' trade potential:  via @BBCNews #BecauseOfBrexit #Brexit 
A new boost to pro-independence forces. Ada Colau's Catalunya en Comú to call its followers to vote in indy referendum on October 1  
Finally got all the Soft Brexit pieces out now: Should take about 10 mins to read & you'll be able to win arguments for about six months 
The logic end point of Soft Brexit:  One Europe for federalists. One Europe for the awkward buggers  
The shipping industry literally joining the wake-up Brexit Chorus.... the emperor with no clothes becoming obvious.  
Philip Stephens: Merkel’s message to Theresa May - Brexit means Brexit  
If they voted 52:48 in a referendum with the clear assumption that I would either jump or not jump then yes, of course I would.  
He's hit the nail on the head is my usual reaction to @PCollinsTimes columns - very pleased we agree on #brexit  
Anyone who wants to see what we academics who voted #Brexit must face, read the thread following the tweet below.  
Tories dodge scrutiny by refusing to reply to Brexit watchdog for four months  
Basically coz you outed yourself as a fool☟I voted for Brexit – why do academic colleagues treat me like a pariah?  
I'm an academic who also voted Brexit bcs EU is undemocratic. Always open to debate but often descends into abuse, I find. E.g. this thread. 
Head of UK Music @MichaelDugher: Brexit is a huge potential threat to the British music industry  
#politics #eu #brexit This! Just love the consequences of Ringo's Geriatric Intervention !  
English Knight / MP Vince Cable repeats myth that a divisive #indyref2 is unwanted...while demanding another divisive #Brexit vote? Deluded? 
The role of Twitter Bots in #Brexit using the bot detection system Botometer  presented by Fil Menczer at #SocInfo17 
So let me get this straight. You prefer to have FEWER rights, as long as they are made in Britain and foreigners don't get them #brexit 
UK manufacturers witnessed a 9% increase in export volumes following EU referendum & sterling depreciation #UKmfg  
Barcelona’s mayor will allow voting in the Catalan independence referendum  
I received numerous emails from academics backing my stand on Brexit & asserting that they're scared to go public Shame! We need more voices  
WATCH | The great @JuliaHB1 slams disgusting BBC bias on Brexit. The British people have no regrets!  
9% growth in manufacturers' export volumes following the EU referendum  
Watch live as former U.K. Chancellor Norman Lamont discusses Brexit on @BloombergTV 
Spanish police searching cars outside 3 printing companies in Sant Feliu de Llobregat looking referendum material  
33% of ethnic minority people voted for Brexit. They don't matter to Remoaners. They are casually erased.  
Election irregularities, Home Office letters telling EU nationals to get out, thinly disguised Enabling Act; our descent from civilisation. 
Brexit offers an almost unprecedented opportunity to boost UK's maritime sector | Transport Secretary Chris Grayling  
Please join our protest at London #dutchembassy to allow dual nationality for those Dutch people trapped by #Brexit. 12-3. Today. 
Machiavelli's assessment of Florence gives us a clue as to why Theresa May is giving her Brexit speech there. It will remind her of home.  
With the storm of Hurricane Brexit brewing even Tony Blair was briefly capsized over immigration:  
Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal - Petitions  
Just as well they're not in the EU, otherwise we would be shutting the door on that market with Brexit...Oh...Hang on... 
Even if you want a referendum, Buhari will never give it to you.You must first vote him out.This is simple commonsense.  
Leave campaign staffer confirms they didn't campaign in #Referendum to leave the single market  
Being ready for day one post-Brexit customs requires govt to orchestrate change across 30+ depts and public bodies  
Don't use the Brexit supporting Wetherspoon pubs.#exitfrombrexit  
Tories dodge scrutiny by refusing to reply to Brexit watchdog for four months 
.@transportgovuk: pls update on all the bilateral aviation post-Brexit deals you're supposed to be working on. Need to be ready for Mar 18 
Theresa May like a hostage 'handcuffed to a radiator in Beirut' over Brexit, Sir Vince Cable says #premium 
Official HoC petition for a Referendum on the final Brexit deal is at 62k. Help it reach 100k and force a debate.  
EU's 27 heads of government pretend not to see, hear or say anything about European Union business Brexit fears.  
" Britishness resonates globally," BBC News - Brexit: Burberry's Christopher Bailey sees 'enormous' potential  
That's ur 'Liberal', 'Democratic' Leader, V Cable' arguing devolved governments should b excluded from Brexit talks. #undemocraticunionists 
US Secretary of State Rex Tillerson says the United States will throw its weight behind the UK’s push for #Brexit... 
Chief creative officer of UK luxury fashion brand Burberry says potential for post-Brexit Britain is "enormous".  
Scottish devolution ergo the Scottish Parliament is clearly in danger as I've been predicting for a long... #powergrab #Brexit  
Britain is told to get ready for a rate rise – plus Friday's other Brexit stories  
Najmaddin Karim on Iraqi parliament's vote: It was a gift b/c it really makes the referendum cause so much stronger.  
Spanish government ‘order arrest of Catalan Mayors who back independence referendum’  
Tories, increasingly doing what they do best, even their own are realising they've built a house of cards; lie upon lie upon lie. 
The potential of Brexit Britain is "enormous", says @Burberry CEO Christopher Bailey #r4today 
How pathetic are we as a nation that we'll just accept being told that us having a place at the Brexit negotiating table is impractical. 
British Brands John Lewis and Dyson Clash Over Brexit -I DON'T BUY DYSON.. Why doesn't he manufacture in the UK?  
Burberry Backs Britain! Iconic fashion label #Burberry say #Brexit is a golden opportunity  #UK #fashion #news 
2/2 What should Catalonia do? Call the referendum anyway, and if Yes wins, declare independence. 
Spain: Catalonia officially launches independence referendum campaign  
Catalan leaders send last minute request for dialogue on the referendum to Spanish President Rajoy and King Felipe VI  
The Brexit propaganda show @BBCr4today comes today from London Fascist Week 
10 days to go! #Kurdistan independence referendum#YesKurdistan #TwitterKurds 
Reaching out to you for hard-hitting ideas for my placard 4 National #StopBrexit march in Manchester! I can only come up with 'Fuck Brexit'! 
Turning Kent into a car park coming along nicely. #brexit  
Truth is we literally cannot afford Brexit or have the time/resource in public or private sector. To enable it will add massively to CoGs   
#Catalonia's independence referendum campaign is officially launched  
No alternative is worth derailing #Kurdistan independence referendum. Promises have been made & broken countless times. Time to go it alone. 
1000s more HMRC staff at Britain’s ports and airports. Other projects scrapped to devote more resources to Brexit.  
Brexit's greatest exports?         Former parts of UK.  
EU chiefs should take 'wise-up pill' on Brexit - pubs boss  
Chav clothes manufacturer optimistic about Brexit but unable to open its Leeds factory because of Brexit. 
Former Burberry CEO: Brexit opens new opportunities for UK fashion industry abroad. Literally opposite of truth. #r4today #BrexitShambles 
Horrific Yet Remainers are still in denial as to the true intent of the EU#Brexit  
Jean-Claude Juncker: EU will respect the result of the Catalan referendum  
Sturgeon blames Brexit for teacher recruitment crisis in Scotland. Nonsense! She should blame her own mismanagement.  
ICYMI: @masoud_barzani : Without better alternative to independence, no turning back from referendum#TwitterKurds 
The hubris of #brexit, vs reality#StopBrexitHour #MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #leave #PeoplesMarch4EU #4EU 
Forget Brexit and all that guff. Its the big one. It's D day! Long drive to pick up our new dog from @ManyTearsRescue #radio4 #car 
Inquiry launched into state of Brexit negotiations as talks descend into disarray  
Juncker has drawn entirely the wrong conclusion from Brexit. He is risking the EU's disintegration' | via @telegraph 
Remoaner @KirstySNP SKEWERED on Question Time as proud Leavers @JuliaHB1 proclaim 'I don't regret Brexit'     
Labour minister @DawnButlerBrent mercilessly MOCKED on Question Time over party's 'Brexit position'   
Brexit Britain will not be back of the queue for free trade deal, say EU commissioners #premium 
The question of Brexit and the "Norway model" hasn't gone away  
#Catalonia kicks off banned independence referendum campaign  
News| US president's anti-Daesh coalition envoy tells Kurdish region's opposition leader to delay Sept.25 referendum 
UN, US, UK present alternative to referendum, Kurdish leadership . 
Brexit transition offer ‘key’ to settling EU divorce bill  
Brexit offers an almost unprecedented opportunity to boost the UK maritime sector  
Catalan vice-president stops providing Spain with weekly spending reports weeks before referendum  
Catalonia launches #independence referendum campaign. #Politics #Spain #Catalonia 
UK human rights are being ‘put at risk’ by Brexit bill, warns senior academic  Those pesky experts again. 
From the very beginning, Brexit has been nothing but an infantile wish to have your cake and eat it. It's time for the UK to finally grow up 
‘We will vote!’: #Catalonia officially launches independence referendum campaign (VIDEO, PHOTOS)  
Almost everybody is against a Kurdish referendum  
Brexit Britain to be asset stripped by its own stupidity  
Everything we were told about Brexit that turned out to be wrong  
. They've got my support. If we can afford a £50bn Brexit divorce bill we can sure as hell afford this. 
Excellent recommendations by @leadnowca concerning the electoral reform referendum in BC. Citizen juries could work   
#AlternativeWar #Brexit #Trumprussia @J_amespWhat a wicked Web @CamAnalytica weaves when it practices to deceive.  
Will #Brexit make #Paris Europe’s top #techhub? @frances_cook visited the startup momentum throughout  to find out  
I draw a line at amnesty. Not a new line. Was a line used as a referendum for my vote Nov 8th. @realDonaldTrump #NoDACA 
(Looks at Brexit) 
The petition was at 20k this morning, now almost 60k. Keep sharing and signing: Hold referendum on final Brexit deal  
Having laboured over decades for #Brexit, Murdochs say their Fox money necessary as post-Brexit UK will need investment; #couldnotmakeitup 
HMRC chief warns post-Brexit border and tax checks 'could cost up to £800m' | Politics | The Guardian  
Philip Stephens: Theresa May is making a mistake by expecting Angela Merkel to bend the EU's rules for Brexit  
You know Brexit's bad when even Vanity Fair thinks it's a coup!☟May Takes Her Darkest, Most Desperate Turn Yet  
Having read this I feel sure the #UK cannot survive #Brexit. But who will secede first, NIreland or Scotland?  
Iraqi Kurds prepare for independence referendum that could impact fight against ISIS  
Disappointed with #bbcqt tonight. It's like Hurricane Irma, North Korea & Myanmar never happened. Inward-looking and Brexit-obsessed. 
Young people fear for futures in Brexit Britain, says study - BBC News  
Ruth Davidson aint just, "No to Scots choosing in a Referendum" she is more-"Anything Westminster wants to do to Scoltand is fine" #awful 
May will have to listen to lawmakers who oppose her Brexit legislation, minister says  
Tory Party seems to have adopted terminology from infamous C20th dictator in Germany in a '33 Reichstag speech post rigged referendum.  
.@wself says the UK will regret the Brexit vote and shares an anecdote involving the former PM David Cameron #bbcqt 
52% of the population voted for #Brexit says @JuliaHB1:NOT EVEN NEAR: 37% of electorate;26% of the population: nowhere near 52%. #bbcqt 
This audience member says that when it comes to Brexit negotiations, you don't know which side Labour and the SNP are 'batting for' #bbcqt 
.@DawnButlerBrent denies Labour confusion on Brexit - has she spoken to her Shadow Cabinet colleagues? #bbcqt 
Bollocks. The EU withdrawal bill was renamed to make it look like Labour are blocking Brexit. It's about laws not being scrutinised.  #bbcqt 
Labour's "clear" position on Brexit. #bbcqt 
Good to see @DawnButlerBrent’s claim that there’s “no confusion” in @UKLabour’s Brexit policy gets a big laugh #bbcqt 
We triggered #Art50. We are getting on with Brexit and delivering on the will of the people #bbcqt 
“”I am delighted [to be in Florence], a city that taught us what it was to be European.“ Was. Not is. #brexit  
Jean-Claude Juncker has drawn entirely the wrong conclusion from Brexit. He is risking the EU's disintegration.  
The BBC - as evidenced by Dimbleby's sneering - WANT Brexit to go badly #bbcqt. They are firmly in the EU corner. Anti-British, anti-Brexit 
.@KirstySNP says that she lies in bed at night worrying about the outcomes of Brexit #bbcqt 
@KirstySNP is right on the threat from Brexit. Tories taking us towards the cliff edge, threatening jobs and incomes #BBCQT 
The solution post Brexit to secure #citizensrights has to include the ECJ. 
#bbcqtThe UK is not a CountryBrexit takes 3 Countries and a weird enclave in Ireland out of the EU 
.@JuliaHB1 says that if Jean-Claude Juncker had shown the same honesty ahead of the EU referendum then Brexit would have won by more #bbcqt 
Annnnd now we have a pro Jean Claude Juncker question! #bbcqt. Hahaha - the BBC is shameless. Bloated pro EU anti Brexit trolls. 
The next question follows comments made by the European Commission President that the UK will "soon regret" Brexit #bbcqt 
Spain blocked the official Catalan website devoted to the region's independence referendum  
Reminder: this govt is simultaneously arguing UK courts are enough to protect EU citizens after Brexit. What if Home Office ignores courts?  
UK and EU firms to urge faster Brexit deal  
Juncker understands hard liquor better than hard Brexit.  
The #Tories WILL TRY TO IGNORE the Petition [as best they can],but reach 100,000 signatures & THEY WILL HAVE TO ENGAGE IN DEBATE!#Brexit  
HMRC chief warns post-Brexit border and tax checks 'could cost up to £800m'  
This could be the turning point - bagpipes leading us into battle against Brexit  
It's particularly ironic that British politicians who supported #Brexit, oppose Kurds just having a vote, let alone independence #think 
How come western countries that have their own referendums like Brexit, Scotland etc, think Kurdish people in Iraq can't have a vote? #think 
I wonder if we'll get a bald fat old English bloke spouting pro Brexit garbage tonight? #bbcqt 
 This is what the Tory power grab is all about. #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
UK Government launches plea for 'valued' EU citizens to stay in Britain as it realises #Brexit is a disaster  
Theresa May lies, Mogg lies, Brexit lies. Accountability, none. Where are the publics legal protections against fraud and deception? 
There's a certain irony to Britain's role in trying to make Kurdistan cancel its referendum on splitting from Iraq.  
When you finally dump your partner but they just can't except it & really want to give it another go.That's a remainer.#Brexit   
Looking forward to the #Brexit Day of Action on Saturday   
These characteristics of Farage & May's Brexit Britain identified by @Andrew_Adonis make world & UK less safe & harm international trade. 
Spanish Guardia Civil at three more printing companies in Sant Feliu de Llobregat looking for referendum material  
'20,000 foreigners causing problems. This is why I voted Brexit Robbie' #arscol #EuropaLeague 
.@vincecable on winning back young voters, the Brexit vote, and why Strictly should include same-sex couples  
Hmm .Brexit  means Brexit  . They  will have  it  . No matter the cost 
Join us at 12pm this Sunday to create a human chain to defend Wales from Westminster's power grab. No Brexit Trojan Horse. #SeneddChain 
Not just Vauxhall: all the UK's car plants are at risk. So when people say 'get on with it' they're clueless #Brexit  
The #Leeds for Europe Stop #Brexit Day of Action is this Saturday! 1pm Dortmund Square. Be there with EU flags, hats. Let's make it massive!  
Brexit is costing the UK its international status across the world, EU president warns  
Catalan separatists set to officially launch their campaign for an independence referendum deemed illegal by Madrid  
All brexit ever was and ever will be, is politics fueled by hate 
Swedish MEP Peter Lundgren - "It should be the EU who pays the UK for leaving right now." #Brexit  
Petition for referendum on Brexit deal! Please sign & RT @solange_lebourg @MsMottram @mudlarklives 
many  people  are leaving  or about  to . What a mess  . Brexit  is ruining  so many lives. What  a terrible  sorry  sad bloody  mess .. 
.City of London is sees the writing on the wallBrexit will be a disaster for London#DamageLimitationExercise . 
We need plan to WALK AWAY as Brexit talks are FAILING, ex-bank boss Lord King declares  
Fate of Vauxhall jobs hang on Brexit Elite pulling their finger out and finding a way out if this shit show.  
Hearing reports that Claude off Arsenal Fan TV has steamed into the german crowd screaming "Brexit means Brexit" 
Brexit’s Irish Question, via @fotoole. Just superb. Every word, every sentence rings as true and as clear as a bell.  
Put this one in the positive about Brexit column?  
Barcelona’s mayor will allow voting in the Catalan independence referendum  
Brexit means Brexit   
ICYMI: Spanish postal service to staff: do not handle Catalan referendum material  
BMW calls Brexit a "very uncomfortable scenario" amid concerns over tariffs  
A #Brexit which weakens our alliances, reduces our wealth & threatens our union is the absolute opposite of patriotism. #StopBrexit 
The petition to #AddDemocracy to Brexit, calling for #NewFactsNewVote has almost 53000 supporters in only a day!  
Committee inquiry launched over Brexit negotiations, including whether UK govt can manage process effectively #proEU 
The "will of the people" has been expressed in both a narrow 2016 referendum result and the 2017 hung parliament.Both shape the "mandate".  
Brexit Twitter Sentiment Analysis: Faisal’s 683 Negative Tweets Since Referendum  
The #Catalonia independence #referendum is a world away from Scotland's@painesrepublic 
Looking forward to being back on @SkyNews tonight for the Press Preview with the fab @soniasodha .I'm primed for her anti Brexit bollocks... 
Juncker's speech was neither delusional nor foolish, but calculated to take advantage of Brexit by playing on the fears of EU member states 
Yes the EU have decided to create an army. To the East, Rampant Russia, West, Loony America, and North...Brexit Britain, a Nazi hellhole. 
Dyson: No Deal Brexit Won’t Hurt UK  
The Germans are getting nasty. I blame #brexit or whoever let 'em bowl around the city all day without tickets #AFC  
Brexit Lies x 1000ADD TO BASKET  
Better ways of spending billions wasted on reorganising constitution & legislature for Brexit;NHSEducationSocial CareHousing Anything 
One of the things largely ignored in the whole 'Brexit will be better for small businesses' debate: just how it would affect people like me.  
Continued abuse of freedom of speech by the #Brexit press will ultimately destroy the democracy that ensures that freedom. #StopBrexit 
Great to see so many people in my home district, #Canterbury, signing the petition for a referendum on the Brexit deal @ct4europe 
Compare this positive Brexit story with the headline, which implies the reverse. Our creatively 'impartial' BBC.  
Britain is set to have the highest employment rate in the western world after defying warnings of a Brexit slowdown  
One reason we fight Brexit - We don't ever see a place in UK Govt for 'foodbanks are uplifting' Victorian age shite 
Rex Tillerson sends the right message on Brexit.  
Please don't think that #Brexit represents British values. The UK is in the throes of an existential paroxism hyped by fascistic demagogues 
Philip Stephens: Theresa May is making a mistake by expecting Angela Merkel to bend the EU's rules for Brexit  
The search for an emergency exit from Brexit goes on  
Welcome to Brexit Britain - insular, nationalist, ungenerous, uncaring  
Merkel’s message to Theresa May: Brexit means Brexit  
Tarrago Arena. Start of the pro-independence campaign for the #1Oct referendum  
Agree. Another referendum won't fix this. Parliament got us here. Parliament needs to take responsibility and get us out of this mess.  
Juncker on Catalan referendum, Brexit and tech giantsFull interview here  #AskJuncker 
Rita O Hare & I with former US Vice Pres Joe Biden. Good conversation about northern talks, UI & Brexit.  
Referendum petition has just gone through 50k signatures. Let's get to 100k so MPs are forced to debate it.  
BREAKING: Spanish prosecutor asks police to confiscate posters in favor of the referendum across Catalonia. 
Great to meet former VP @JoeBiden today and discuss how #Brexit will impact Ireland.  
Philip Stephens: Theresa May is making a mistake by expecting Angela Merkel to bend the EU's rules for Brexit  
Finally, an explanation for Brexit. We're fucking morons.  
Brexit requiring a small fortune to be spent on up to 5,000 extra HMRC staff isn't the promised £350m a week for the NHS 
And yet UK government wants EU to accept assurances UK law can protect EU citizens post-Brexit...    
Edmund Burke would agree that a decision of the magnitude of Brexit should not be made by parties or voters, but by free-thinking MPs. 
“I'm longing for the day when we have Brexit!” boasts Lord Howard as he lists the latest slew of positive economic and business news  
Confidence in the Prime Minister has plummeted after a poll reveals 45% of the public think @Theresa_May will not secure a good #Brexit deal  
.Significant Brexit effect in NIFianna Fáil makes 1st moves to be All-Ireland party - prep for united Ireland 
Barcelona City Council, Catalan government reach agreement on the referendum  
Everything you need to know about why Brexit happened in a single paragraph   
Labour agrees wholeheartedly that Brexit cannot jeopardise the rights secured through the GFA and underpinned by the EU.  
The similarities between Hitler’s 1933 Enabling Act and Theresa May’s Brexit Power Grab are incredibly worrying 
'Most PATHETIC excuse I have heard' Anger as Sturgeon blames BREXIT for schools crisis  
BREAKING: Barcelona's mayor vows to provide logistical support for the October 1 referendum, making it easier for Barcelonians to vote. 
The pound finds itself at the bottom of 150 currencies, thanks to the thick morons that voted for #brexit  
He's a Malaysian exporter. Of course he thinks no-deal Brexit will be good - for him.  
John Lewis doesn’t have a Brexit problem. It has a Waitrose problem, says Ross Clark  
UK confirms offer of 'deep security partnership' with EU post-Brexit -  
Just moved back to my home country Scotland as I seriously didn't feel safe in a brexit England Happier with folk who think like me Scots 
#JamesDyson praises #Brexit opportunities & says there's nothing to fear from walking away without a deal!  #BBC #SKY 
US will be 'steadfast ally' to UK during Brexit process, Rex Tillerson promises 
Have said it before, but it still catches me, how both Brexit and Trumpit are grave *self-inflicted* wounds on the part of the two nations. 
Also, fundamentally, guess what? Brexit makes both an EU army and UK participation in one more likely:  
We, #Kurds, should no be bullied by US and other powers to give up our quest for freedom. Independence referendum should not be delayed. 
Spain: Catalonia to launch campaign for independence referendum  
Please donate/RT & help reach the 38k target for the Manchester #StopBrexit march on October 1st  #Brexit #Remain 
Anybody else in contempt of court ends up in a cell, but just like her boss Rudd gets off with it. 
On my way to Tarragona where #Catalonia's pro-independence movement stages their opening event for the official #1Oct referendum campaign. 
Excellent piece in @TheNewEuropean by John Smith advisor David Ward on what JS would do if Labour leader v Brexit  
Poland: Eurozone membership referendum, Nézőpont poll:Join the euro: 37%Keep national currency: 63%#Poland #Euro #SOTEU 
UK #government quietly supports new phase of EU #fishing policy reform hoping the #brexit brigade don't notice...  
A Labour determination to reverse #Brexit would be good news for Britain & EU says former @guardian Europe editor. 
'EU should pay the UK' Swedish MEP flips 'RIDICULOUS' €100bn Brexit 'RANSOM' on its head  
BREXIT will be DEVASTATING for the north says OIREACHTAS report  via @YouTube 
Brett McGurk: US position on Kurdistan referendum is also that of the entire Global Coalition against ISIS that considers it "ill timed"  
If John Lewis customers were feeling the pain of Brexit, you'd expect them to keep eating but cut back on new shoes.  
Brexit is hitting economy, says John Lewis boss in scathing attack  
"It's not just a football match, we want to show England that we want them to stay!" #afckoe #brexit  
The Government is now pleading for 'valued' EU citizens to stay in the UK after Brexit  
No referendum on anything, ever again. 
Tomorrow's @FT post will be on monkey selfies and intellectual property rights.A break from Brexit. 
Brexit must be reversed with NO 2nd referendum, on grounds of national, economic and geopolitical interest. We are a Parliamentary democracy 
"You've a steadfast ally in the United States - we'll stand by our allies as Brexit continues to take shape": Rex Tillerson, US Sec of State  
Rees-Mogg thinks the cost of no #brexit deal is zero and I think I want to cry.  
Person snapped holding the draft speech was Ollie Robbins, the top official dealing with Brexit! 
Surge in £ at the hint of a rate rise suggests that #BoE policy since Brexit vote significantly added to sterling's weakness in past year. 
Barcelona's Mayor @AdaColau confirms City Council will facilitate polling stations and ballot boxes for #Oct1 referendum on independence.  
Health coverage for 70,000 people is at stake in a referendum to be held in just 7 weeks.  
Dyson: No Deal Brexit Won't Hurt UK WTO tariffs would mean UK is £7bn a yr BETTER off.#HappyDays 
As soon as May resigns, that's Brexit finished because they're not going to carry on a policy that just chewed through two prime ministers. 
#German car industry puts the #EU above trade with #Britain after #Brexit. Please share our report. Link:  
The brave people of #Zakho city today said Yes For #Kurdistan independence and no more genocides against Kurds.  25-09-2017 Referendum Day  
Large turnout in a rally for Kurdistan independence referendum in Zakho, near Duhok, also attended by President Barzani.  
17 Dropping a veto over tax rules? UK has veto (like all other MS) and referendum lock. Eurozone finance minister? Covered by UK opt out. 
A lot of people are  being impoverished by Brexit. We need to get into mindset that there must be no more profiteering by the Brexiteers. 
Brexit is not sense and sensibility. But about how the landed gentry and rich can con / control the average person. 
Top-rate Brexit trolling by the EU's @GuyVerhofstadt - bringing Maggie Thatcher into the argument 
I will never buy another Dyson product as long as I live, after James Dyson's Brexit stance. 
Horror show: Tickets priced at £1,500 per person, & everyone in the country must pay (to cover one hundred billion pound bill)! #Brexit  
No, I think what James Dyson means is that HE has no need to worry as he is wealthy enough to not feel the effects of Brexit. 
Soon @EUPARTYEFA starts a campaign #handsoffcatalonia with international support for the Catalan mayors that are prosecuted #referendum #1O 
This Murdoch seems to think Brexit is bad for investment in Britain!   
Catalan government opens new referendum website after original is shut down by Spain  
11 EU army? UK (and all other MS) has a veto and a referendum lock. The horror, the horror of countries jointly buying helicopters. 
Some people misunderstood my tweet about gvmt behaviour. It's not about brexit per se - see Speakers comments today  
President Barzani attends massive rally for Kurdistan independence referendum in Zakho. Countdown for September 25th.  
This week's @agitpod_ guest: @Ed_Miliband! We discuss: Murdoch's evil empire! Brexit! Corbyn! Steps! DOWNLOAD HERE >  
still on the matter ongoing killings in south East #Nnamdikanu demand for referendum is legitimate, operation python dance is illegal-lawyer  
Junker's superstate plan gives Brexiteers the chance to get on the front foot again. Me for Brexit Central  
Another Brexiter lie: trade with rest of world @InFactsOrg  Mission impossible. If only Brexit would self-destruct 
Spanish postal service to staff: do not handle Catalan referendum material  
Barzani is studying a US/UK alternative to the Kurdistan independence referendum that might mean it's canceled  
Young people fear for future after Brexit, study finds  
Say it...say NO BREXIT! What does it take, for Gawd's sake!  
John Lewis boss calls for a "serious parliamentary debate" on Brexit, saying uncertainty is damaging the economy #r4today 
Juncker says EU would respect a yes-vote in a Cat. referendum but Catalonia would not automatically be EU member #1O 
"I suspect we'll have to leave without a deal... which frankly will hurt the Europeans more than the British," says Sir James Dyson #Brexit  
Right on => Ringo Starr Explains Why #Brexit Needs to Happen Now  
We keep on attacking the Brits over Brexit and then a plan is announced  by Juncker to scupper our competitive corporate tax rate. 
This will damage UK more than brexit ever could -> GDS is ‘sidelined’ and Gov as a platform ‘is dead’, says Maude -  
At fascinating meeting on ensuring women's rights in repatriating EU laws after #Brexit. Women's Rights are hardest won & first lost 
I'm unconvinced my Remainiac friends knew what they were voting for:EuroSchengenEU ArmyPolitical UnionGiving our UN seat to EU#Brexit  
Currently at 42k, it was 25k at 9am. 100k gets parliament debate: Hold a referendum on final Brexit deal PETITION  
Brexit is costing the UK its international status across the world, EU president warns  
#PresidentBarzani #UN #SRSG #Kubis #US SE @brett_mcgurk @AmbSilliman #UK Amb @FrankBakerFCO discussed Referendum,Dialogue & alternative path  
We want an exit from Brexit. It’s very clear and puts us in a different place to Tories & Labour - @vincecable 
Brexit has the potential to be a huge setback for the EU, warns Australian High Commissioner Alexander Downer  
Jean-Claude Juncker's speech was the perfect advert for Brexit  
Those Trump/Brexit parallels just keep on coming.  
A second referendum held in circumstances of true scrutiny and much greater public knowledge is the only way out of this mess.  
Catalan referendum becoming binding to Europe.  
VIDEO: Free trade agreements do not require free movement of people @UKIP MEP William Dartmouth  #UKIP #Brexit 
1000s of people have signed a petition asking for ref on Brexit deal, including voting to stay in the EU #proEU 
Thinking of going to see IT? I prefer my version of a total horror show. Here's my brexIT cartoon....  
#Vídeo Juncker says #EU will respect outcome #1Oct #referendum that @marianorajoy considers to be illegal! #important #urgent @JunckerEU 
Once 100,000 of us sign, a 2nd Referendum will have to be debated. We need every avenue for Brexit debate we can get. Pls sign the petition  
EPISODE 12 NOW LIVE!  We chat Brexit, Rupert Murdoch and Steps with special guest @Ed_Miliband! Download at  
379k more employed in UK since Referendum with unemployment lowest since 1975. Economic shock eh? Emergency budget?  
Holy Toledo, Batman. Juncker just blew a hole in Spain's diplomacy: "Juncker on Catalan referendum"  
Jacob Rees-Mogg has described EU chief, Jean-Claude Juncker, as the "greatest recruiting sergeant for Brexit".  
What's that? Could it be the Brexit elites threatening the Brexit government to let them have their Brexit crowns? 
BREAKING: Jean-Claude Juncker has said he would “respect” the results of a yes vote in a Catalan independence referendum. 
For the second time this week, the @HouseofCommons voted to allow the Government to get on with #Brexit   
"MPs are so caught up in the madness of Brexit that, for the most part, they cannot see the power grab for what it is"  
Spanish postal service warns staff not to handle Catalan referendum material  
Soon we will live in a country where profitable companies aren't subsidised to leave the UK to set up in other European countries. #Brexit  
Twitter sentiment analysis of three top journalists from BBC, Sky and ITV. Are they impartial on Brexit?  
Inquiry launched into state of Brexit negotiations by MP's Brexit committee as EU talks hit standstill  
You deserve Brexit.  
Twitter Sentiment Analysis: @faisalislam Has Sent 683 Negative Tweets About Brexit Since the Referendum  
When Daniel Hannan claimed EU nationals’ rights won’t change after Brexit, @IanDunt didn’t let him get away with it. 
Have you ever wondered why so many tax dodgers funded Brexit?  
British inventor Sir James Dyson says #Brexit will present an "absolutely wonderful opportunity" for trade  
SPECIAL: US Ambassador reiterates that America stands with Brexit Britain.  
Set to get much worse with Brexit and all the Tories have planned. Scotland still has a choice and this time we must take it #Scotref. 
James Murdoch warns No 10 not to shun Fox's Sky bid in Brexit run-up  
Approve our bid for Sky or post Brexit Britain gets it says James Murdoch.  
#Brexit — When taking back control means giving up control   
#Brexit #Trump and Penis!What's not to like! @KTHopkins 
One of the lessons of Brexit is how hollow are the talents of our political class. Good at persuasion. Hopeless at delivery. 
John Lewis boss: "We should be under no illusions. Brexit is having an effect on the economy, no question." 
Catalan separatists to launch their campaign for an independence referendum, from a bullring in Tarragona  
'200,000 Jews Will Settle Kurdistan': Turkey Turns to Fake News to Discourage Kurdish Referendum 
The only thing Britons will regret about Brexit is that we didn't do it sooner - better late than never. BRIGHT future ahead for the UK! 
Brexit won't affect your factory in Malaysia much will it James?  
BREAKING: Catalan Government has already made the draw to elect the 55,000 members of the polling stations in the October 1 referendum. 
20yrs on from #devoref the Tories are staging an unacceptable powergrab with #Brexit proposals that seek to undermine this parliament #FMQs 
Broken Brexit promises & projections looking bleak. Sign the petition if you want a referendum on the final deal:  
Thousands to march for independence in Glasgow this weekend in honour of 2014 referendum anniversary  
Legendary Beatles drummer Ringo Starr says Brexit a "great move" and we should get on with leaving the EU "shambles"  
Is this the age of the Tube? Not any moreFewer passengers due to Brexit; a Bank of England "bellwether", apparently 
A referendum in which we actually know what we're voting for you say?   
It’s Legatum again!I love the caption: wait for bad weather when the drones can’t fly. #brexit  
.@JunckerEU "I like the British, not my intention or working assumption to punish the UK. But let's be clear: after #Brexit, UK=3rd country" 
Brexit U-turn: Billionaire Bill Gates now thinks that the UK can THRIVE outside the EU  
The Government must be prepared to walk away from Brexit negotiations. 
Hurrah for Brexit! Hurrah for taking back control! Hurrah for making us poorer!Hurrah for...... oh, FFS...... 
Full debate between me and @DanielJHannan here. Hopefully with more content & detail than most Brexit clashes  
James Dyson tells @bbcr4 that no deal Brexit is fine - 'we already pay the WTO tariff into Europe and it hasn’t hurt us at all'  
Juncker's wonderfully blunt speech killed any prospect of pro-EU victory in a 2nd Brexit referendum before 2019  
Brexit is a 'stupid decision' the UK public can still reverse, says senior EU official  
Irony of the non-doms. Apparently pro #Brexit Ringo Starr didn't vote in #EURef because he's a Monaco resident. Why didn't BBC say this? 
Sir James Dyson expects no Brexit deal  
Nicola Sturgeon again calls for the Scottish parliament to unite in demanding more powers and defending devolution from Brexit #FMQs 
Brexit is hitting economy, says John Lewis boss in scathing attack  
Britain's problems were there long before Brexit and were the cause of Brexit. Britain's problems will still be there long after Brexit. 
Hello @CarolineLucas. EU rules mean it is impossible for UK to ban the export of animals. Why then do you continue to oppose Brexit? Odd.  
Ex Bank of England governor says Brexit negotiations isn't "going the way we might hope" - not surprising #proEU 
Prefer to see MPs 'grow some' and undo #Brexit - but 2nd ref to ' take back control' from totalitarians is 2nd best   
BBC excitedly reporting that Dyson thinks there will be no Brexit deal. He told the @spectator that in July:  
Dyson: No Deal Brexit Won’t Hurt UK  
EU are clear - full steam ahead to a United States of Europe. Brexit success will show there is a better way!  
Should #Catalonia have its independence referendum? Thursday #F24Debate on spiraling standoff between Barcelona & Madrid. #CatalanReferendum 
When @ScottishTories try to lecture you on attracting international teachers, whilst Brexit is making it harder for them to work here. #FMQs 
NEWS! Elderly rich white expat shocks nation by coming out in support of Brexit  
Barzani is now presiding a very crucial meeting on #KurdistanReferendum with US, UK, UN, France and Germany. Either referendum or indp pact.  
 As usual #Brexit used as a convenient scapegoat 4 corporate failure #JohnLewis . #Dyson meanwhile increases profits. 
The whole basis of Brexit: Yesterday #BrexitBeatlesSongs. 
Juncker's chilling speech suggests many Remain voters were misled about the EU's nature and its future plans. #Brexit 
Am I alone in dreading May's Florence speech? Unless she actually cancels #Brexit, she will surely only compound the current embarrassment. 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP says it's "pathetic" for Sturgeon to blame Brexit for teacher crisis. Points out SNP cut 4000 teachers pre Brexit. #FMQs 
BREAKING: Bank of England holds interest rate but 2 policy makers voted for an increase  
"Britain does not owe EU a 'brass farthing" over Brexit bill, says Jacob Rees-Mogg  
Ringo Starr backs Brexit – ‘Don’t tell Bob Geldof’  
Leave campaigner Sir James Dyson expects no #Brexit deal  
P/R Regarding the decision of the Iraqi Council of Representatives against the planned referendum by the KRG  
How big a Brexit divorce bill would Brits accept? Answer depends more on the options you show than the actual amount  
I hope @michelbarnier is keeping a record of the ridiculous attacks from Tories! #Brexit (Via @Simon_Gardner)  
The irony of #brexit voters demanding democracy now celebrating May bypassing parliament debate over ammendment to law.. 
#honestpoll As a UK citizen, has #brexit made you consider leaving the UK? Pls RT for inclusivity. Comments welcome. 
Michael Fallon tells arms industry to look forward to life after Brexit - removing niggling red tape will allow huge growth in arms sales!  
"I'm not doing it, it's stupid. Everyone's choosing prawn cocktail it won't lose"That's what we thought about brexit adam. #chooseorlose 
Well this is terrifying: The #brexit bill. So much for Parliamentary "sovereignty"...  
UK slammed for Human Rights abuses as we do away with parliamentary debate over #brexit. Not much separating May and Kim Jong now. 
Spain is closing webpages on the Catalan referendum and @guardiacivil boasts about it. SPAIN, not China or Turkey.  
'Project Fear' is fast becoming Project Reality as voters were warned that Brexit would lead to higher prices for goods. 
#honestpoll #hype Should we have a second EU ref once deal details are known? Pls rt for inclusivity.  Comments welcome.#brexit #eu #uk 
Fake news, Brexit, Trump: data is the power in politics that everyone wants to control. Join the latest data debate  
Jean-Claude Juncker has proposed a "blueprint for a United States of Europe" to be agreed the day after Brexit  
Brexit is hitting economy, says John Lewis boss in scathing attack  
'Europe's a declining part of world trade' Sir James Dyson hails Brexit opportunity in the FAR EAST  
John Lewis says Brexit is damaging retail industry - #newfactsnewvote ! 
The Catalonia Referendum website is back up in a new location: #CatalonianReferendum 
Former European Court judge Prof Sir david Edward says the UK Government has rejected help from experts on its Brexit papers 
James Dyson tells @WillHeaven why it's 'no big deal' if Brexit talks with the EU fail  
Jean-Claude Juncker's state of the union speech shows why Britain is right to Brexit 
That could only be so if they showed hard Brexit was entirely negative #thereisanalternative #stopbrexit 
uncker calls for MORE migration and a super-state with its OWN taxes as he claims UK will regret Brexit  
And then England belongs to all Europeans and we have the right to vote the brexit? #WTF 
Turkey warns Iraqi Kurdish referendum move will have a cost  
You are NOT going to believe how much money we have paid to the EU since we joined...  #Brexit  
Anger as Defence Secretary Michael Fallon says UK arms sales could grow after Brexit  
Jeremy King: “Stupid, short-sighted, xenophobic” Brexit will cost London restaurants  via @caterertweets 
LISTEN | Iconic British inventor James Dyson praises Brexit opportunities and says there's nothing to fear from walking away without a deal!  
Brexit puts UK at risk of worsening pollution & lower environmental standards, UN @SRtoxics warns  
Thread: How Brexit has changed political life & discourse, possibly forever; the disappearance of honour and civility in public life.  
Latest flash of brilliance from PM Rajoy: asking judge to cut down electricity from referendum polling stations  
#newfactsnewvote! Let's #adddemocracy to Brexit!  
New facts, new vote! 30K signatures already for petition on new referendum. #newfactsnewvote!  
Today we launch the second edition of Project Cheer - packed with even more reasons to be upbeat about Brexit!   
Catalonia referendum server is going #distributed on #ipfs to avoid being shut down by central government. 
Friends! Spot on!Our BBC always scrupulously balances anti-Brexit views against pro-EU ones, and pro-Labour views against anti-Tory ones.  
BRITAIN: "Brexit is the most stupid decision ever made by the voters of this country."AMERICA: "Britain, walk a mile in my shoes." 
Diane Abbott trending; thought we'd have a Thursday giggle as she explained Lab Brexit position. Turns out she's just playing victim again. 
#TheresaMay's off to Florence for her Brexit Speech. If she stands next to Michelangelo's David she'll seem modern (& less naked and scared) 
A wise thread about Brexit and politics. Please do read.  
The result of the Referendum was a resounding "We're not sure." 
So the question for Dyson is whether he will create lots of jobs here, and bring manufacturing back to Britain, to take advantage of Brexit 
Therefore Brexit was inevitable, only the timing was ever really in doubt. - 12 
Turkey warns Kurdistan will pay a ‘price’ if referendum goes ahead  
Fallon wants UKs arms industry to be the biggest in the world. Is that your country?  Trading in death #tories #brexit #bairnsnotbombs 
And now Ringo wants us to get on with it. He of course can enjoy Brexit from LA while car workers & aerospace workers lose their jobs here. 
Ringo Starr backs Brexit – ‘Don’t tell Bob Geldof’ who's Geldof anyway @ringostarrmusic 
A great thread on the worst effect of Brexit: how a cabal of low grade charlatans have irreparably destroyed Britain's political culture.  
John Lewis blaming Brexit for its poor performance. This morning @Morrisons and @nextofficial have reported rising sales and profits. 
Britain does not owe EU a 'brass farthing' over Brexit bill, says Jacob Rees-Mogg  
No deal on Brexit is not a worry, says inventor James Dyson.  
After latest attack on the "unpatriotic" BBC's Brexit coverage - this should reassure you that I am doing my bit  
John Redwood MP: State of the European UnionRemainers thought #EU was still just primarily a single market!#Brexit 
Ringo Starr says people voted for Brexit so "get on with it"  
Boris Johnson lies on everything, the Tory party cheats on everything, a match made in heaven that far too many people still believe in. 
Love this .... captures the demographic nicely @LyntonSpins @Tucker5law @cstross @CuppaTea366 #brexit  
CAT Pirates clone @gencat website for #1OCt Referendum on IPFS after spanish police shuts it down:  #decidimhojunts 
Farage chose fear of refugees (can't come here under EU Law) to push Brexit. Unjustifiably promoting fear of foreigners: Sounds racist to me  
Ringo Starr wants people of Britain to 'get on' with Brexit  
Why won't @DExEUgov publish its analysis of impact of hard Brexit on 50+ sectors? Could it be concerned it might put voters off whole idea? 
 : Britain's leading #fintech are banding together to work out a #Brexit strategy  #startup #investing #finance 
Rees-Mogg - getting by on barely £1 million a year - makes it clear only some people get to have their cakes and eat them in Brexit Britain  
Catalan Parliament elected by Catalonia's citizens passed a law to hold a legal referendum on October 1st, it will be binding and legal. 
Gina Miller says she is not anti brexit. She seems to forget the MP`s she backed & tried to get elected. Liars need a good memory Gina. 
'When was I anti-Brexit?' Gina Miller SNAPS as she's accused of 'complicating' divorceGalling woman.   
If JRM was as smart as he thinks he is he'd see problem with Tories no longer being the party of business. What's left for them post Brexit?  
James Dyson, big fan of Brexit - it works for his business "Uncertainty is an opportunity". Tell that to those in poverty James. #r4today 
Brexit talks are not going 'in the way we might hope', says former Bank of England chief - Politics live  
The New £10 Note is now worth £6.50 due to the thick people that Voted for #brexit  
New research from @COBCOE gives European businesses a voice on Brexit concerns  
Arab League rejects Kurdish independence referendum, calls it illegal  
Have a great Thursday everybody out there !! FFS Remoaners stop trying to derail Brexit every bloody day,17 million voted leave get over it.  
'Britain races to top with record employment figures' To those who bemoan #Brexit try living in EU countries #Greece 
Do you think the #EU will collapse after #Brexit?RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Instead of Ringo Starr (lives in Monaco) and Dyson (billionaire), maybe we should hear more from those actually affected by Brexit? 
James Dyson: Brexit uncertainty is 'opportunity'  
Video of Catalan "national day" march on Monday in lead up to October 1 independence referendum.  
Why the #EEA idea for post #Brexit Britain is a red herring: 
ICYMI: Spain will prosecute 712 Catalan mayors over their support for the independence referendum  
What the Catalan govt's referendum site looks after censorship action from Madrid Now at:  
EFTA Court President in London this week with aim to persuade UK to join. We spoke with his Chief of Staff #Brexit  pic.twitter.com/UOxr71j0as 
@julie4nw and I discussing all things #Brexit & Ireland - The GFA "in all of its parts" Brexit will reinforce partition & damage Ireland 32  
Come on out Chancellor, the nation needs to hear your plan for Britain's post-Brexit economy. Me for @Telegraph: 
Why is @JulianAssange so interested in promoting this illigal referendum? Have they promised you asylum? Are you getting a part of the #3% 
Tory Brexit is doomed. Corbyn has a chance to build the Europe he wants | John Palmer  
Defence & Brexit: UK Government planning to hand the full deck of cards to Brussels. My article.  
LISTEN James Dyson: No Deal Brexit Won't Hurt UK  
Links to "Everything we were told about Brexit that turned out to be wrong"  
I'm of the opinion that there should be a referendum held on who wants to be in Nigeria 
Jacob Rees Mogg on LBC: 'Some businesses that are not doing well like to blame Brexit, but that's an excuse for poor management.' 
Businesses complaining about the economic effects of Brexit are just guilty of "poor management" says Jacob Rees-Mogg. 
Mrs. Primer Minister, the 'deep, special' relationship you aspire to is called 'EU membership'. #Brexit @theresa_may 
Our advisory group member, Sir James Dyson, says British business will thrive after a clean Brexit.  
I support the rights of EU Citizens to remain in the U.K. after Brexit  
5,000 signatures overnight. Sign and share. Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Australia's High Commissioner to the UK says the country is 'deeply concerned about the eventual outcome' of Brexit  
I suppose, according to Twitter, like me - Dennis Skinner is also a racist for merely supporting #Brexit. 
Jean-Claude Juncker state of the union speech shows why Britain is right to Brexit - @reactionlife 
---NEWS FROM 2076---REMOANER: I tell you, any day now, Brexit will be the end of Britain... 
"I suspect we'll have to leave without a deal... which frankly will hurt the Europeans more than the British," says Sir James Dyson #Brexit  
John Lewis profits halve as chairman warns over Brexit uncertainty  
And we got here because your party leader forced his MPs to back all prior Brexit legislation. You've completely failed as an opposition. 
Honestly, #r4Today, if you’re going to have these people on, challenge them and their Brexit beliefs, because their BS is totally misleading 
We have now outsourced what we want from #Brexit to a small group of people whose intentions may not be in our national good. #politics 
Arab League unanimously rejects referendum for an independent Iraqi Kurdistan 
Labour backbencher slams party for ‘guerrilla warfare’ against Brexit Bill  
RINGO STARR BACKS BREXIT - DON'T TELL BOB GELDOF!  
Just waiting for Charlie Watts and Ginger Baker to give their views on Brexit, to get the full picture. 
Mervyn King is the British Varoufakis, consistently wrong on everything. Of course Brexit not going as he hoped...  
Great #Brexit con  #SirJamesDyson @BBCr4today wrongly claims British biz will thrive on WTO tariffs, no deal & uncertainty #Nonsense 
James Dyson dismisses John Lewis boss' concern of Brexit uncertainty damaging the economy, saying "uncertainty is an opportunity" #r4today 
There's a daily slot assured on @BBCr4today for some smug faux patriotic git like Dyson to speak up for Brexit.  
A referendum on the UK's long term future, once we know the deal is essential. Make sure your voice is heard. RT it like a Bot.  
How about returning manufacturing to the UK James Dyson?...post #Brexit Britain's balance of payments needs export lead growth #r4Today 
Unforeseen consequences of Brexit may force the complete breakup of the United Kingdom. Happy days!  
"Deep and special partnership" has become new "Brexit means Brexit": totally meaningless, designed to suggest UK has a clue what it's doing 
This article is the defense against any brexit argument. Outstanding journalism.  @PlymouthHerald 
I bet this will be list of ambitions best achieved as EU member dressed as vision of UK-EU coexistence post-Brexit  
John Lewis boss calls for a "serious parliamentary debate" on Brexit, saying uncertainty is damaging the economy #r4today 
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign | The London Economic  
"I would have voted to get out" - @ringostarrmusic urges the government to hurry up with Brexit, saying he thinks "it's a great move"  
When Daniel Hannan claimed EU nationals’ rights won’t change after Brexit, @IanDunt didn’t let him get away with it  
Pure hyocrisy from John Howard. He was the prick who ran the Republic referendum without releasing the paperwork for its form! #auspol #ssm 
BREAKING: Turkey says a 'price will be paid' if Iraqi Kurdistan independence referendum goes ahead 
The biggest Remain whopper in referendum was EU not aiming to be a Superstate. It's here:  
Catalonia puts out call for international election observers for October 1 referendum as threats from Spain heat up  
"I don't think that the negotiations are going in the way that we might hope" - Lord King criticises the government's handling of Brexit  
Catalonia calls for international election observers for October 1 referendum as threats from Spain heat up  
Leaving the EU will cost us more than we save. Brexit will make us all poorer. Time to end the madness. #StopBrexit 
UK contributes 1/4 of the combined defence expenditure of EU countries. Post-Brexit relations very important.   
Don't Forget @WPCScotland Iain McFadzean Today #Wellbeing in the #Workplace#Edinburgh #Scotland#ThursdayThoughts #edintravelBrexit  
Why Tech Startups Should Focus on Innovation to Weather Brexit  
We need plan to WALK AWAY as Brexit talks are NOT going well, Lord Mervyn King declares  
Brexit backing Beatle Ringo Starr tells Remoaners ’the people voted – GET ON WITH IT'  
'A Labour determination to reverse it (Brexit) would be good news for Britain and for the European Union as a whole' John Palmer @guardian 
‘No one EVER regrets liberty!’ Jacob Rees-Mogg condemns Juncker’s claim UK will rue Brexit  
"Do you think the Catalans will be able to celebrate the referendum?""Yes, I think so, Sancho."  
Amazing.Brexiters now openly claiming its "unpatriotic" for the BBC to report the truth about what's happening with Brexit.  
Says the tax avoiding billionaire who made his money from porn and gave millions to UKIP. 'Journalism' in Brexit Britain. pic.twitter.com/RN3PQB0jd2 
Britain, the job making machine: Unemployment hits a 42-year low of 4.3% as the UK leads Europe. Despite Brexit 
.@UKIP 's  @AMDWaters "If Brexit doesn't happen it is the death knell of democracy the death knell of your vote"  
Boris Johnson "is angry at claims that he misled voters during the Brexit campaign..."  
Theresa May to deliver Brexit speech in Florence  
Brexit won't solve issues that led to leave vote, says ex-trade minister, in fact will add to problems of vulnerable 
Actual reason for brexit finally revealed  
Philip Stephens: Merkel’s message to Theresa May: Brexit means Brexit  
UK didn't Brexit in time!Sad to see cultural heritage lost across Europe.Oh wait, statues of r heritage r being torn down too. Hmmm. 
To be fair the stuff they write in English is also gibberish so at least it's consistent. 
These are the three biggest obstacles for a Brexit science deal  
Heaviest Loksabha defeat wasn't any message for the ecosystem. University elections are referendum on nationalism. Kya khate hai yeh log? 
Brexit: UK will 'soon regret' leaving EU argues Juncker - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Switzerland may hold referendum on banning the burka after campaigners collected the 100,000 signatures needed  
Theresa May challenged to debate Brexit issues face-to-face with MEPs in the European Parliament  
#Switzerland: Campaigners collect the 100,000 signatures needed to force a referendum on a nationwide #burqa ban. 
Ringo Starr says he would have voted for Brexit: "Let's get on with it"  
Wealthy Chinese families are seeing Brexit as a 'good buying opportunity' — via @SCMP_News  
Beatles Drummer Ringo Starr Says He Would Have Voted for Brexit - Daily Beast  
May to set out post-Brexit 'partnership'  
Brexit: Airships could patrol Irish border, says think tank  via @BBCNews 
OBVIOUS McConnell's NOT getting Trump &Ppls Agenda into legislationWe should PETITION a Recall referendum on McConnell & throw him out 
UK PM May to make Brexit speech in Italy on Sept. 22: spokesman  
If you were wondering why the Brexit assessments haven't been published.  
Our paper @AMJPublicHealth Brexit: Severe Risks to Britain’s NHS @RifatAtun @HarvardChanSPH w/ @martinmckee & J Park  
The referendum should not have happened without Green Papers, White Papers, possibly a Royal Commission. Like when we joined! 
And tonight on Totally Irrelevant, Ringo Starr talks utter bollocks about Brexit. Later we ring up Barry Chuckle & ask him about Syria  
UK Govt now targets 'bespoke' #Brexit deal with EU to protect City, while denying bespoke deal for devolved nations 
Brexit: let's unify the moderates...before it's too late:  
We have a lot of experience stopping abusive censorship. I am happy to help protect the publishing rights of #Catalonia's referendum website 
Remember the party preaching fiscal responsibility pissed away $26M on a toothless flag referendum,the govt equiv of spending rent on pokies 
‘No one EVER regrets liberty!’ Jacob Rees-Mogg condemns Juncker’s claim UK will rue Brexit  
Tory Brexit is doomed. Corbyn has a chance to build the Europe he wants | John Palmer  
Brexit is a bad idea; it's being incompetently managed; but it's not "against the law" and ministers are not criminally liable. Just stop it  
Reminded again this week Brexit involves lawful removal of rights, along w/ any EU oversight. Control taken back, we're on our own. My take:  
When it happens it will happen fast. The vast majority of MPs are already on the very poise of abandoning Brexit. 
The Brexit referendum was non-binding, but clearly they are not ignoring that. 
It's the debacle that led to Brexit. The FT reviews 'Six Days in September', marking 25 years since Black Wednesday  
Important brexit thread   
Apparently, Ringo Starr has come out in favour of Brexit, so I think now is as good a time as any to remind you all about his MS Paint art.  
We won't leave Andrew. Clamour for referendum on final deal will grow as awful consequences become clear. We will step back from the brink 
The @CDU's @DrAndreasNick cuts right to the chase on #Brexit during @dw_conflictzone's debate #GermanyDecides  
This is really going well. Please sign and RT Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Govt refusing to vote on opposition debates...very strong and stable, not! And wasn't Brexit about parliamentary sovereignty???  
Our national humiliation continues apace under this lame administration, disabled by #Brexit 
They'll insist that THEIR Brexit would have been a glorious happy wealthy Brexit before WE ruined it with our UNHAPPY THOUGHTS. 
.@ringostarrmusic says, let's hurry up and get on with #Brexit..."I think it's a good move"!  
Ringo Starr is all up for #Brexit because he remembers with fondness growing up in a Liverpool slum and wants us all to experience it again. 
The EU is worried about London's role as a financial hub after Brexit. The UK chancellor says the EU has a point.  
Is this the man who said last year UK would be better off going for a hard Brexit? Yes I do believe it is!  
Former Bank of England governor Mervyn King on Brexit talks: "I don’t think that the negotiations are going as we might hope" #newsnight 
Brexit has failed. Everything you hear now about this deal, that deal, ready to walk away. It is all bullshit. 
Ringo Starr: 'Get on with Brexit'."To be in control of your own country is a good move."  
'Brexit is not the future of Europe'. Jean-Claude Juncker lays out plans for closer EU integration. Read more:  
Ringo Starr.I didn't vote, I live in America.Enough said.#Brexit #Newsnight 
“I’m not terribly impressed” – former BoE governor Lord King discusses Brexit negotiations with @EvanHD #newsnight 
Theresa May to deliver Brexit speech in Florence  
#Brexit’s #Irish Question: this is a really great read from the pen of @fotoole, in @nybooks 
Brexit is a great British bore. Europe has moved on, and the UK should be worried   | Guntram Wolff  
Unemployment Falls AGAIN in Brexit Britain  
Theresa May will give a big speech on #Brexit in Florence on Sept 22nd. That's Florence, home of Niccolò Machiavelli. 
Brexit is becoming a modern day English civil war: the Roundheads v. the Shitheads. 
Those who accused the Tory government of a "power grab" with the Brexit Bill might want to read Juncker's speech from this morning. 
Ringo says he would have voted for Brexit  
"Britain is going to be a bigger loser from the Brexit process than the rest of the EU is." Political blogger @jonworth on #TheDay 
Many leavers are lifelong losers who in the case of Brexit think they're winners. But they're quite wrong - they're still losers. 
Catalan President Puigdemont says that the referendum on 1 October will take place even if Spain suspends autonomy  
Brexit is imposing a brain drain we are unlikely to recover from. My opinion. 
Legal case for criminal Misconduct re alleged mandate for Brexit. Action to take to build for prosecution@wolchover 
This. Totally this. Articulates a nagging unease I’ve had better than I had ever thought to express it. #brexit  
"Prawn cocktail crisps will obviously win" well thats what they said about brexit and look where we are now. 
Today we hosted 100+ young people, represenatives from the EU Commission, 17 member organisations, 2 parliamentarians. Thank you all!  
Prime Minister Theresa May will deliver a speech on Brexit in Florence in Italy on 22 September 
Theresa May to deliver major Brexit speech in Florence next week  
Catalonia independence referendum: Spain threatens to ARREST mayors in favour of vote   
Good to see efforts of @M_AndersonSF and @sinnfeinireland team acknowledged. #designatedspecialstatus #Brexit  
Brexit is not the future of Europe, it is the end of ours.Brexit is not the reclamation of sovereignty, parliament has given it away. 
‘No one EVER regrets liberty!’ Jacob Rees-Mogg condemns Juncker’s claim UK will rue Brexit  
Brexit is not only system failure, it's failure of our parliamentary systems to deliver a fair, reasonable, and democratic outcome.  
Ringo Starr explains why he voted for Brexit but says 'don't tell Bob Geldof'  
‘Get on with it’: Brexit is a ‘great move’ says Ringo Starr  
Heather Nauert, USA spokesperson on CAT referendum: "We'll work with whatever government or entity comes out of that" (second 12)  
I've come up with a new immigration questionnaire-post Brexit  
#atalanta v #efc preview on @EvertonArentWe, containing Embassy Focus Points, Gansgear, Brexit and shithousing.  
FUN FACT: Turkey’s last election was 2015. Perhaps one of her friends could explain the difference between an election and a referendum?  
60 MPs have called for an extraordinary session on Friday to vote on the decision of holding independence referendum in #Kurdistan Region 
I am now watching Ted Cruz talk about sex toys on CNN. And I remember people thought it was strange that I asked him about #brexit. 
The US is warning it will cut off military aid to Iraq's Kurds if they go ahead with the independence referendum  
☛USA @statedeptspox on #1oct #Catalonia #referendum:"We don't want to interfere but we'll work with whatever govt or entity comes out of it"  
Jean-Claude Juncker state of the union speech shows why Britain is right to Brexit. (Gerald Warner for Reaction)  
Muslim preacher in Stoke told children: ‘Joining ISIS is better than school’  via @Your Brexit 
Tomorrow @ScotNational Brexit: Give Scotland's children a voice - Westminster warned the next generation will suffer most  
Switzerland may hold referendum on banning the burka  
There is fuck all wrong with being aggrieved over brexit. FUCK ALL  
This has to be considered as part of the scope of a full independent investigation into the EU referendum and subsequent Brexit process?  
george = brexitpaul = remainringo = brexitjohn = some hippy bollocks about how borders only exist in our minds 
1. Note to followers: Over the next 2 weeks, I'll post a lot about Kurdistan with independence referendum due September 25th. 
Dear Brexit supporter. You lost too. It just hasn't hit you yet. X  
Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Let's see if BBC 10 o'clock news again patriotically manages to talk about falling real wages & rising inflation without mentioning Brexit.  
Sevilla players pushing their manager down the tunnel  Like he's their da hammered on New Year's Eve after just bringing up Brexit 
People in the UK who voted Remain at the EU Referendum in 2016 did NOT vote for the Juncker plan revealed in 2017. There was no STATUS QUO. 
U.S. State Department, on the referendum in Catalonia: "We will work with whatever government or entity comes out"  
Apple launch the new iPhone breXit.  
Ringo says #Brexit is a "great move". Please RT if you agree with the legendary Beatle.  
Bloody #Brexit, it'll be the.......oh wait...   
no amount of political,media and military killings will overpower #Biafrans IPOB request for referendum date not even death, #freeBiafra 
I don't see how he can while the hard Brexit fruitloops are in the ascendant.  
Beatles for Brexit #GettingBetter #MagicalMysteryTour #YouNeverGiveMeYourMoney 
60% of young people would vote remain if another referendum was held today - would you? #remain #eu #proEU 
BREAKING: Catalan government defies Spanish justice and opens a new referendum website. 
Ringo fits the MO for a Brexit supporter: Old, rich, lives abroad and didn't play on Back in the USSR. 
WATCH | Dennis Skinner on Corbyn: "if he wasn't leader he probably would have voted for Brexit with me!" 
Thousands back second referendum on Brexit  
83,000 to go and we get a debate. Remoaners ...... assemble #Brexit #Eu 
Liverpool lead and the English teams are tearing Europe apart. Bring on Brexit. 
Amusing to watch Russian backed Brexit sockpuppets moan about a more united EU today - the reason Putin aimed at it to begin with #backfire 
Brexiters: "Remainers are all snowflakes"Remainers: "Brexit is silly"Brexiters: "FUCK YOU YOU TRAITOR THE PURGE IS COMING" 
I'm not saying that brexiteers are overly sensitive morons but after posting one joke about brexit today I've received 17 death threats. 
I fear many would rather see Britain fail than Brexit fail.  
How to make a Brexit coupFrom suggesting an advisory referendum to abolishing Parliamentary Sovereignity giving the Govt unlimited power pic.twitter.com/R1Xyusj4CJ 
Think I'm living in denial that #Brexit will actually happen. Keep waiting for the cavalry to appear over the hill #48% 
Brexit Twitter Sentiment Analysis: Robbo Not Neutral  
Tonight's topics. 1. Anna Soubry 2. Juncker's fevered fantasy 3. UK unemployment 4. Biased anti Brexit media! Do jo…  
Brexit is harmful to us & harmful to our allies. Of national leaders only Putin wanted Brexit to happen.  
1/ Up next on the floor: speaking on my amendment to remove GOP rider that repeals DC's budget autonomy referendum. #HandsOffDC 
The EU Parliament's Brexit negotiations rep just branded Trump white supremacist and Poland and Hungary “alt-right”   
In Spain…The Catalan Referendum Website is NOT LEGAL  Infamous Dictator Franco Foundation’ Website is LEGAL#HolaDictadura 
I was thinking. Which private company will win the contract to run the customs service post Brexit? And which MPs have a vested interest? 
Confused about #Brexit?  
BREXIT . The uncertainty of Brexit is causing havoc .Our industry employs more than 50% of Europeans who don't want to come back in GB 
State: U.S. considers Catalonia referendum internal matter, will not interfere, will work with whatever government/ entity comes out of it 
Well," said Osborne after Brexit, "Dave's fucked, I'm fucked, the country's fucked."  The ordering says it all. 
Join @iancollinsuk from 10 for the Great Brexit Debate.  @DanielJHannan vs @IanDunt and of course YOUR calls 
Well done to all the speakers in Trafalgar Sq just now standing up for EU & UK citizen rights after Brexit.   
As Govt co-opts 'will of people' to assault those people's institutions, here's what I wrote on Brexit and democracy  
Today Mr Juncker reminded us the big Brexit question is not if you can tolerate what the EU is, but if you can tolerate what it will become. 
 Quick succession of judicial and police measures against the referendum from Spain  . 
Teething problemsvia @TheCanaryOTPEU talks delayed as Davis claims 'dog ate my Brexit plan'  
This reminded me of Turkey | Spanish Prosecutor Summons 712 Mayors Over Catalan Referendum Plans  
Trafalgar Sq now: "We didn't come here as migrants. We came here as #European citizens. We are not visitors. This is our home" #Brexit #EU 
Poor Ringo, he is gonna get absolutely slaughtered for being a millionaire and sticking his oar in. #prayforringo #brexit  
Praise for Labour’s Dennis Skinner after he DEFIES CORBYN and votes for EU Withdrawal Bill  via @Your Brexit 
TONIGHT: @ringostarrmusic urges the government to hurry up with Brexit, saying he would have voted for it - “but don’t tell Bob Geldof!”  
Jean-Claude Juncker has said Britons will "soon regret" Brexit #SNT 
Consolidating wealth and power in the hands of those who have it is exactly what Brexit is about.  
Spain's public prosecutor acts against 712 Catalan mayors over their support for illegal independence referendum 
Netanyahu finally supports a two state solution — in Iraq. latest for @ForeignPolicy on the #KRG referendum  
Brexit—When taking back control means giving up control, painful lesson of what sovereignty means just learned by UK 
Jean-Claude Juncker says we'll regret leaving the EU. Nigel Farage asks if you have regrets about Brexit. WATCH LIVE  
Spain's state prosecutor orders criminal probe of all 700-plus Catalan mayors backing independence referendum  
Spain orders 712 Catalan Mayors 2appear over Referendum #FrancoTactics 2stop democratic will of #Catalyuna 
I agree. However, we have yet to see the SNP take the gloves off, even losing a referendum wasn't enough.  
EU wants the ECJ to have precedent control over EU nationals in UK post Brexit. Are they happy if UK courts to have similar precedence in EU 
Oops ...Toyota says Brexit talks drift could threaten UK production | Article [AMP] | Reuters  
#BREAKING Catalan #referendum website shut down after Spanish Guardia Civil police delivers judicial order to web host  
#Remain types must be feeling a bit sheepish today following JCJ speech.  Told ya! Viva #Brexit! 
I'll be on the floor at aprox 2pm to defend DC anti-discrimination law and budget autonomy referendum from unaccountable Members #HandsOffDC 
The reality of Brexit is so far removed from what was 'promised' even leavers should be demanding #EUref2. #StopBrexit 
Welcome to the Brexit Coup  
I couldn't agree more! Brexit has become a domestic British issue, and Europe has already moved on | Guntram Wolff  
Tory Brexit is doomed. Corbyn has a chance to build the Europe he wants | John Palmer  
Great day of action at the mass lobby and #CitizensLobby17 for EU and EEA nationals at Trafalgar Square  #Brexit  
The Govt's new Brexit video has booted Croatia out of the EU and appears to imply that we're not going to trade with South America anymore.  
Brexit is a polluted, stinking river that runs through both the Labour and Tory parties  
.The Brexit lies are unraveling. 
Read these two speeches, from UK's former EU diplomat and from a former Brexit minister, no less.Concerning stuff on UK and Brexit.  
They might not be, but the rest of us are better than this. If we let them get away with it, this may be the worst consequence of Brexit 34/ 
Scandalous actions by Spanish government in advance of Catalan referendum  The EU should defend the right to vote! 
Euro Parl back Green plans for Saudi arms embargo. But in #Brexit Britain, arms trade will continue with impunity.  
Good meeting with CBI, IoD, BCC, FSB & EEF. Helpful for @DavidDavisMP, @GregClarkMP & me to hear members’ views on Brexit and customs. 
Switzerland may hold referendum on banning the burka after campaigners collected the 100,000 signatures needed  
In particular, this from a former Brexit minister is, in its context, devastating about UK approach to Brexit to date.  
.#Brexodus"Paris will become a more prominent financial centre than London within 5 to 10 yrs because of Brexit". 
And yet on numerous issues around Brexit, Ministers have lied and misled with total impunity 14/ 
This by former Brexit minister Lord Bridges in the House of Lords last night is worth a *very* close read. 
Since the referendum constitutional conventions have been broken flagrantly and without consequence to those breaking them 5/ 
I'll be debating Brexit with @DanielJHannan on LBC tonight from 10pm for - I think - a full hour. 
We cannot release our Brexit impact studies as to do so would damage the UK and our international relations. But, trust us, it'll be fine. 
My final pre-referendum column as Bagehot made this point. Brexit is simply the Farage-ification of Britain:  
Farage last week stumped for a German party that equates nation with race. Brexit is his creation. Britain is being defined by him.  
Catalan's mayors have been threatened with prosecution for planning an independence referendum Spain says is illegal  
With his EU expansion plans Jean-Claude Juncker has today made an unanswerable case for Brexit, says Ross Clark.  
Joining with @ciwf supporters in Parliament Square calling for an end to live animal transport exports which will be possible after Brexit.  
No I'm not confused about Brexit. U and ur party have scammed & scared UK Citizens into thinking we are better off out of the EU & you lied! 
Brexit Minister: The Government is getting on with delivering Brexit  
In short, few on this side of the Ir Sea see any wisdom in the whole Brexit debacle. We will be collateral damage. 
Spanish gov looks to prosecute over 700 (!) Catalan mayors for supporting independence referendum. All in the name of 'democracy'  
Unemployment Falls AGAIN in Brexit Britain 
Be in no doubt - "Brexit" is to May's England what "Lebensraum" was toHitler's Germany. Both are Populist Slogans. 
Will the UK be more prosperous in the long term after #Brexit?RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
What are you doing about ongoing killing of innocent Biafran citizens in south East just because they want freedom and demand referendum  
Who will have biggest economy after #Brexit? French economy minister predicts Paris overtaking London after Brexit  
Rees-Moog: "On Brexit, Labour soon had more positions than can be found in the Kama Sutra."  
Arrogant Junker at the European Parliament earlier: "you will come to regret it (Brexit) soon"  
As we left the launch of our report into implications of Brexit for the GFA I spied this on the wall outside the meeting room @europahotel 
Brexit is a great British bore. Europe has moved on, and the UK should be worried | Guntram Wolff  
UK omits #climatechange from post-#Brexit foreign policy plan  
The "Brexit is only going horribly because you don't love ENGERLAND enough" Brexiters are possibly the worst Brexiters of all.  
If Jean-Claude Juncker wanted his speech to rouse doubts about Brexit in British minds, he will be very disappointed  
Corbyn wants "full access" to European single market after #brexit #labour #eu #stopbrexit #corbyn 
Another example: while referendum ballots are declared illegal, lottery tickets from fascist foundations are not pursued and have a prize  
Trump Ambassador: 'We Stand with UK Through Brexit, Always at the Front of the Line'   
WATCH: New Number 10 "Road to Brexit" Social Media Strategy   
BREAKING:Theresa May grudgingly admits she is using Brexit as a means of taking back control 'of' the people instead of 'for' the people. 
Juncker said today "#Brexit is not the future of Europe." It is not the future of the UK either. 
Just look at the rise of inflation since the EU Referendum.Welcome to Brexit. Welcome to Project Reality.  
Dominic Grieve calls for urgent deal on post-Brexit citizens' rights  
Tribalism can seriously damage your constitutional health. My column on Brexit power grab.   
Jean-Claude Juncker can't seriously regret Brexit: it has freed the EU to pursue its true agenda  
Dsd Turquia: "I read the news on the referendum. It looks like Spanish government is doing what our government does. Take care of yourself" 
#Brexit: what will happen:18 months of posturing Blame EUNo deal Blame EU Hard BrexitWTO defaultChaos Blame EU 
Brexiters cross about Juncker proposing more EU integration after Brexit are doing my head in. 
Bexit Undefined - new tee from People's March for Europe. Show the world what you th8ink of Brexit #rethinkbrexit  
David Allen Green: The UK government is a tightrope walker, and Brexit is a circus.  
"Britain's stomach-churning march towards Brexit". This week's edition of The New European is out tomorrow.  
Bill Gates: Why Britain can still lead world in science and tech after Brexit #premium 
UK omits climate change from post-Brexit foreign policy plan  by @climatemegan 
Alyn Smith: Scots will realise independence in Europe is the only way out of this Brexit mess (From The National)  
How to make a Brexit Coup  
Map with the city councils of #Catalonia. In blue those supporting the independence referendum, facing reprisals by Spanish government.  
Thank goodness we voted for #Brexit!  #StateOfTheUnion 
Not often we have a living legend on the programme... tune in tonight to hear from @ringostarrmusic about peace, love, and Brexit  
UK will "soon regret" Brexit, says European Commission president, Jean-Claude Juncker #brexit #eu #stopbrexit 
"Liberal" people, please stop treating DUSU election results as a referendum on Modi. Wishful thinking isn't the same as political analysis. 
Jeremy Corbyn deserves huge credit for shifting Labour's position on #Brexit into a much better place  - me on @bbc5live earlier 
Trump's UK ambassador tells Brits: "U.S. stands with you through Brexit; you're always at the front of the line"  
I can't believe Walkers are putting the fate of prawn cocktail crisps in the hands of a nation that voted for Brexit & a Tory government. 
Thousands sign petition for second Brexit referendum  
.@Kathleensf1 launches Oireachtas Committee report on impact of Brexit on Good Friday Agreement in Belfast 
If the only way to achieve Brexit is through dictatorship, then surely it's best to cancel Brexit. 
Brexit is a great British bore. Europe has moved on, and the UK should be worried | Guntram Wolff  
I've just signed this petition to hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Don't worry everyone, the Tories have a Brexit plan! Sell even more guns and bombs to dictators!  
Under their charter they should have shown everybody DURING the referendum what they needed to know to make an informed vote. 
Is ANY Journalist going to report about how much Theresa May' hubby has made on the back of Brexit ? 
Since Brexit, a reverse domino-effect is happening. People don't want to leave Europe, they want a reformed Europe.  
Spain will prosecute 712 Catalan mayors over their support for the independence referendum  
Tip: Britain is leaving. Were it actually still inside it might have hindered this. You can’t have it both ways. #Brexit  
Back fm Dublin where fears re Brexit if anything greater than UK. low pound killing exporters.Worries re peace process.+ losing main EU ally 
Why I defied my party to vote for Theresa May's Brexit bill - @frankfieldteam 
Very powerful lobby from @unisontweets, @The3Million and @BritishInEurope - Labour will protect EU citizens' rights in the UK after Brexit  
Brexit is a great British bore. Europe has moved on, and the UK should be worried   | Guntram Wolff  
We’re now live in #Erbil city, Veteran Peshmerga walk through the city centre in support of #Kurdistan’s independence referendum.  
Thousands back second referendum on Brexit  
The meeting room of today's Brexit Steering Group reminded me of this Thatcher quote, in favour of the single market.  
RudawEnLive: Rally in support of Kurdish independence referendum  in Akre  
Once Brexit is behind us, our ingenuity, creativity, integrity, know how & expertise will lift global demand for British goods and services. 
Things millionaire, offshore, metropolitan elites and media moguls told us about Brexit that ain't true no more.  
Newsflash: Bathnes advise us vote is "not a referendum" & will need a "significant majority" so @welovebath you know what to do #votePodium 
Whilst London voted anti BREXIT I find most Taxi Drivers are pro BREXIT 
Second referendum anyone? Messrs Maugham, Cable? Lineker/Izzard? Nope, thought not.  
European Commission president says Britons will "soon regret" Brexit during a state of the union address in Brussels  
...Among several other megalomaniacal policies. Clearly no lessons have been learned from Brexit – which he says we will “soon regret”.  
Thank you, Juncker, for yet another reminder of why Britain needs Brexit: 'Juncker dismisses Brexit'  via @MailOnline 
@Keir_Starmer signs pledge: Let's guarantee the rights of EU citizens in the UK & UK citizens in the EU after Brexit pic.twitter.com/ce9r1MkYtI 
Catalan @Govern ment Referendum ad, encouraging participation, PROHIBITED by the Spanish Govt, is most retweeted tweet in its history.   
Friends! Appalling!Almost 2% of Robinson's tweets are positive about Brexit!So much for Leavers' LIES that Our BBC "has a pro-EU bias"!  
#BREAKING: #Spain to arrest 712 #mayors for #Catalonia's #independence #Referendum on #1O. Still call it #Democracy? 
Over 700 Catalan town council mayors now threatened with arrest for agreeing to collaborate with 1st Oct referendum. From @elnacionalcatEN 
*Brexit Explained*  
Dulux backs Brexit Britain with new state-of-the-art £100m paint plant 
Absolutely pathetic non-answer. Govnt have done 50 studies of impact of Brexit on economy. Publish so Parliament and the public can see  
@simoncoveney hosts 1st Brexit Stakeholders Forum - a meeting of business, Pol Parties, State Agencies & other leading experts on Brexit  
Live: Rally in support of Kurdish independence referendum  in Akre  
Still baffles me that to change something in the core of a programming language (PHP) requires 2/3 votes,yet Brexit = 1 or 2 extra percent!? 
Bannon: Brexit, Populist Rise of 2016 ‘Inextricably Linked’  
And instead of using unpatriotic or unbalanced, perhaps offer balance yourself by telling us one clear evidenced economic benefit of #Brexit 
Huge cheer from EU citizens mass lobby when Ed Davey, Lib Dem MP says he'll fight to reunite the country and "reverse Brexit if we have to"  
The Govnt have conducted studies into the impact of Brexit on 50 sectors of our economy. But they are hiding them from Parliament & public.  
With Brexit, Westminster will try and steal powers from our Senedd. Defend Wales with #SeneddChain 12pm this Sunday.  
The two tightropes of Brexit"You are at a circus..."New by me, at @FT. 
The sooner we BREXIT the better this country will be.Then we can all sit back and watch the dictating EU crumble.  
Tonight's 8pm . 1. Juncker's EU speech. 2. UK unemployment 3. Anti Brexit media. Join me later! 
Scotland did not vote for Brexit. Brexit is not in Scotland's interest. Brexit will cause chaos and confusion.  
The Government must urgently change course from an extreme Brexit that is set to leave Britain permanently poorer  
On workers' rights we can see straight through the Tories. Join the campaign to protect our rights through Brexit >>> 
EU ambush over post-Brexit defence co-operation with UK. Comments by Gen Julian Thompson & me . @VeteransBritain 
Ground broken on new Boeing facility in Sheffield will make parts for Portland, US - eg of post Brexit trade shift?  
The EU is using the Brexit negotiations to punish us. It might soon be time to say 'No Deal', says Mick Hume  
Brexit won't solve issues that led to leave vote, says ex-trade minister  
Retard coke-boy Osborne is shark jumping again. Anyone would think he'd lost a referendum, his power & influence & was sacked by the winner? 
Are you joining the3million's rally for post-Brexit rights?  
Nnamdi Kanu should START TWEETING. He's abandoned his Twitter since his 2015 arrest. Getting a referendum requires active social media use 
Darling: Brexit wouldn't have happened without banking crisis  
UK wage rises lag below inflation as households feel impact of pound sterling slump post-Brexit vote  
Supporting @NFUtweets #BackBritishFarming Day @NFUPolitical @NFUShrops Read my agricultural policy post-Brexit here:  
Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Campaigners said the auto industry would thrive after a Leave vote, but Toyota say that Brexit uncertainty puts future investment at risk.  
Today I spoke in PMQs and asked the PM what the govt plans are to deal with labour shortages in our schools and pubs following Brexit.  
Analysis by @GuidoFawkes shows just how biased our supposedly 'impartial' broadcasters really are over Brexit.  
No rhetoric, no propaganda, no bullshit: a practical guide to the reality of Soft Brexit  
Brexit Twitter Sentiment Analysis: @bbcnickrobinson Not Neutral  
And a reminder that the status quo was never on the cards in the referendum.  
.@eurelationsappg: Cross-party pro-EU group announces new vice-chairs to take fight against hard Brexit in Lords  
Ignore the pessimists – Britain is still a major power and Brexit was the decision of a confident people  
Make up your mind about Brexit, Britain. The EU is getting bored with you | Guntram Wolff  
Blogged: #Europe must keep calm and carry on  #ESA #EC #EU #Brexit  
When the majority of serious academic opinion states that #Brexit will be bad for Britain, it is not unpatriotic to be a Remoaner. 
Spanish Attorney General orders investigation on 712 Catalan mayors over referendum preparations, threatens arrests  
there's also Norman, who works in the dairy industry and lives near the Irish border. he supports Brexit because the DUP told him to  
These are the three biggest obstacles for a Brexit science deal  
Our economy relies heavily on science and industry, helped greatly by the EU. People should have a say on the Brexit deal, not the Tories.  
Can Britain still lead world in science and tech after #Brexit? @BillGates RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
In Erbil, our veteran Pehsmerge marched in support of Referendum & Vote YES for the independence of Kurdistan.  
#transport disruptions loom as UK, EU face #Brexit ‘cliff edge’  (via @EURACTIV ) 
Whatever you think of Junker, his prediction is surely right. UK will soon rue the day it voted for Brexit while EU will grow stronger 
Spain threatening to arrest about 700 town mayors if they don't try to prevent the Catalan referendum from going ahead.  
Seriously feeling the need to take a 24-hour break from campaigning against #Brexit. The reality of it is so awful that it drains me. 
EU citizens gather outside Parliament seeking assurances their rights will not be diluted post-Brexit @PA 
MADRID (AP) -- Spain's state prosecutor orders criminal investigation of more than 700 Catalan mayors for cooperating with referendum. 
#CarolineFlint: Respect the result of the will of the #British people we are honour-bound to see #Brexit through!  
"The future is the wider world." Watch our board member @OwenPaterson talk about why the UK will not regret Brexit on @SkyNews 
#BREAKING: Prosecutor investigating 712 Catalan mayors for collaborating with referendum; orders arrest if they don't comply  
.@aronlund has the best primer out there on Kurdistan's upcoming independence referendum  
Dennis Skinner, 85., branded  'scab' by Corbynistas 4 voting for Brexit Bill. Corbyn was supposed to be nice new face of politics 
Tim Montgomerie just called the BBC 'unpatriotic' for reporting on Brexit. He's getting roundly mocked  
#Brexit in a nutshell:@LaylaMoran MP: Tell people the truth, #Brexit will cost jobs.Theresa May: Don't tell people the truth!#PMQs  
"A Brexit that works for British farmers". A combination of the loss of EU funding, imposition of tariffs, loss of labour from Europe. #PMQs 
Jeremy King - #Brexit is "stupid, short-sighted and xenophobic" and is London restaurants' biggest threat:  
Britain is Europe's big hitter, and there is no reason its influence cannot grow after Brexit 
.@LaylaMoran 1st pMQ today. Brilliant question on detrimental effects of Brexit. Theresa doesn't care. Barracking from Tories as usual! 
#PMQs underway. First up,  excellent question on #Brexit from #LibDem @LaylaMoran. PM still refuses to come clean about the risks of Brexit. 
Juncker laid out a bold vision for a more unified and politically-accountable European Union after Brexit #SOTEU 
First Q @LaylaMoran says her local economy will shrink as a result of #Brexit #PMQs calls for second referendum. 
Today, the Commissioner will tell UK Parliamentarians that children's voices must be heard on Brexit:  
Microsoft billionaire Bill Gates now admits Britain's science and tech firms will BOOM after Brexit - The Sun  
Toyota have said that Brexit uncertainty puts future investment in the UK at risk. But that's not what Leave campaigners said. #LeaveWatch 
The xenophobes are getting themselves in a tizzy. It's as though they know Brexit will be undermined  
If the UK wants to "attract the best and brightest" make them feel welcome!  #CitizensLobby17 #citizensrights #Brexit #WeAreInternational 
My amendment with @KerryMP to #EUWithdrawalBill to prevent zombie law & governance gap on vital environmental protections after #Brexit  
Brexit rots our rights. How can Theresa May ignore the stench?| Rafael Behr  
Bill Gates says Britain could lead the world after #Brexit. Juncker AGAIN  says Britain will regret leaving the EU. Who do you believe? 
'Brexit is not the future of Europe': Juncker vows EU will move on – video  
@AMDWaters Nigel Farage confirms what we already know immigration drove the Brexit vote, the effects of it on ordinary peoples lives 
Even with uncertainty over #Brexit worth remembering Remain was a vote not to stay in something fixed but in an ever changing #EU 
I think we should get #Trump to come over and negotiate #Brexit for us (for a commission, obviously). He knows how to talk to these people.  
Thanks to Brexit, Milan is back in vogue as Italy’s financial capital  
This was the whole point of BREXIT.This is the future no Brit wants.Truly dreadful.  
Terrific read by @iandunt on the practicalities of the EEA as part of a future post-#Brexit relationship with the EU  
Friends! Depressing!Just look at all the things that Britain will miss out on by leaving Our EU!And STILL Leavers claim "Brexit is OK"!  
RECORD: UK employment at historic high, 32.1m people in work. All this 'despite Brexit'... 
What surprise me is that you think the EU is a disaster.... back Brexit... But LIVE IN PORTUGAL  
Will the UK regret leaving the EU? #Brexit: UK will soon regret leaving EU argues Juncker RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
"Thank god we're leaving!" @Nigel_Farage responds to President @Juncker_JC's State of the European Union #SOTEU #brexit #EU @SBSNews 
My piece for @heraldscotland about #Catalonia's independence #referendum on 1 October  
Seriously WTF? The Sun has article in German about #Brexit. Really, the rest of the EU can read your  in English.  
Brexit won't solve issues that led to leave vote, says ex-trade minister  
When Brexit does go belly up, we need to remember the parts Farage Davis Johnson Corbyn & Hoey played in this disaster. 
Israel endorses Kurdish independence ahead of the Sept. 25 referendum  
Delighted that @CarolineLucas has tabled an amendment @HouseofCommons to bring animal sentience legislation into UK law as we #Brexit   
3 Wks Ahead of Spain Referendum, Huge Rally Gathers for Catalan Independence as Nig Cracks Down on #Biafrans @UN 
"You will regret it soon" - @JunckerEU weighs in on Brexit.  
The German car manufactures prepare for a hard Brexit. According to the Leavers they were meant to save us. Realists would #StopBrexit 
Brexit: Next round of talks delayed a week 'for consultation' - BBC News so much for "quickening the pace...."  
WATCH @Nigel_Farage to Juncker: "You've Learnt Nothing from Brexit"  
If the events since 2014, plus the unfolding Brexit shambles which is happening, don't create a YES win,I'm afraid nothing will.#ScotRef 
Brexit is injuring the nation's interest, Tim. Brexit is injuring the nation's interest. 
Xenophobic tweets from the far-right attacking Jean-Claude Juncker are shameful. The sooner we stop Brexit & weaken this scum the better  
Don't post much on politics but making an exception. This is how to stand up for Scotland. @TommySheppard #Brexit 
Listeners may want more than just a phone call - no? You've talked nonsense on Brexit for months IMHO. Why not gimme proper time to debate? 
Catalan EFA MEP @jmterricabras raised issue of the Catalan referendum in the #SOTEU asking for European institutions to side with democracy 
David Davis manages to negotiate something in the Brexit talks!! To have some time off from negotiating... #Sigh #Lazy #BrexitShambles 
"Ironically the only people from the north with any meaningful input into #Brexit talks in Brussels are Sinn Féin" 
Indy supporters renew call for referendum after EU Withdrawal Bill vote  
BBC reporting facts do not undermine Brexit. Fact. Brexit is undermining business, the economy, sterling, our global reputation. 
I'll be on @SkyNews at various times today on #SOTEU and #Brexit 
So overwhelmed by response to this. Very humbled & heartened by Brits concerned by legal limbo posed to EU citizens by Brexit. Thank you.  
This is the just the start of the Brexit attack on democracyExcellent from @IanDunt 
 Hello @JunckerEU @EU_Commission #Referendum #Catalunya #1OCT  
Brexit: UK will 'soon regret' leaving EU argues Juncker  
This hideous #Brexit nightmare must be stopped. Otherwise the country is doomed. Open your eyes and wake up, UK!  
Be in no doubt - "Brexit" is to May's England what "Lebensraum" was toHitler's Germany. How long will "Sovereign" Parliament suck this up? 
Minister claims #Brexit is second Golden Age, resigns & then claims #Brexit won't solve any problems. Again. What?   
Labour have abandoned any pretense of Brexit policy based on what's best for Great Britain. 
Denis Skinner echoing the language of the Brexit hard right. He's echoing their lies, echoing their rhetoric, echoing their nationalism  
Nicola Sturgeon thought so much of Mike Russell she sacked him within hours of taking charge.We're meant to trust him on Brexit. 
Hope it's not too 'unpatriotic' to share a Leaver's view of the current Brexit process. @BBCNews 
The Scottish Parliament is under attack. #Brexit 
Sorry Leavers, German car makers value the EU27 more than trade with Britain #LeaveLies #StopBrexit #Brexit  
*Another* report on avoidable and predictable consequences of Brexit. Reporting the truth is apparently unpatriotic. This is utter madness.  
The man is the best promoter of Brexit out there. 
Inflation at 2.9%. The Brexit squeeze continues.  
The EEA Option: A quick and dirty guide to saving Britain from Hard Brexit  
 Scottish Brexit Minister @Feorlean: the EU Withdrawal Bill puts 111 Scottish Parliament powers at risk. 
On British Overseas Territories and Brexit...  
UK is going to make a success of Brexit. For young ppl it's time to stop protesting and start engaging- for a Brexit that works for all gens  
Bill Gates: Why Britain can still lead world in science and tech after Brexit  
Brexit: Government passes controversial 'power grab' motion allowing it to pass laws without Parliament  
.@JunckerEU : 29 March 2019 will be a tragic moment in EU history when the UK leaves the Union, but says Brexit is not the end of Europe  
Unemployment down to 4.3% - lowest rate since 1975.Get ready for another round of "despite Brexit" headlines from the biased media!   
No money for decent pay rises for NHS, Police and Fire, but plenty to bribe DUP and squander on #Brexit. Disgusting. 
Jean-Claude Juncker plays down Brexit in EU state of union speech  
Farage: "Juncker speech powerful & worrying. Learnt nothing from Brexit. Thank God we are leaving. 'Populist' wave not over, not yet begun." 
* @LeaveHQ saying that Legatum is driving #Brexit policy Legatum is a 'charity' based in tax havens!!!#Remain /1 
Crap headline. The Tories have done no such thing, Parliament has voted to allow Brexit to be delivered. 
Listening to Juncker live in the EP has made me even more confident that Brexit was the right decision! 
Kurds raise a huge flag of #Kurdistan in support of the upcoming independence referendum in Makhmour.  
Juncker yet again proposes the flawed, damaging FTT.Great. Financial services & investment business will flee to post-Brexit London.#SOTEU 
Yippee best news I've heard all year ..... bring on hard Brexit !!!  
I am still ragingly furious about Brexit. The sheer hubristic stupidity of it boils my piss each time I think about it. We are idiotland. 
Tell me again about your plans for a second referendum guys.  
One for Corbyn to ignore at PMQs: Unemployment fell by 75,000 to 1.46 million May to July, despite Brexit. 
"You will regret this too, soon" - EC President @JunckerEU addressing UK on #Brexit in State of the Union speech  
Former Brexit minister Lord Bridges suggests government not being 'honest' about challenge of leaving EU -  
EU Parliament's Brexit chief @GuyVerhofstadt points out that all other EU countries have voted for PRO-EU parties. Sorry Nigel #SOTEU 
Just an idea but maybe don't shout down and insult the woke Leavers criticising Brexit? It's what you've been asking them to do all along. 
Jean-Claude Juncker: Britons will 'soon regret' Brexit vote  
Today we're at @HouseofCommons calling for children & young people's voices to be heard and their rights to be secured throughout #Brexit.  
"Brexit is...an excellent opportunity to heal a rift dating back to 1973" — New Zealand MP and former Deputy PM the Rt Hon Winston Peters. pic.twitter.com/2MDbaZJzWI 
@Nigel_Farage flying the flag for #Brexit Brits at Junkers #StateOfTheUnion here in Strasbourg 
Bill Gates: Why Britain can still lead world in science and tech after Brexit  
Petition for a 2nd referendum on final outcome of the #Brexit negotiations. Please sign and share. #BrexitRef2 
Juncker: #Brexit very sad moment in Europe's history and British will regret it. Huge applause in EU Parliament. #SOTEU 
Who cares what a foreigner, Jean Claude Juncker thinks about Brexit? Good riddance to these unelected cronies 
Jean-Claude Juncker says "Britons will soon regret the decision to leave the EU" but says Brexit is "not the future of Europe" 
You wanted Brexit. You could have made a plan to make it work. You had only bluster and bull. Own it and stop blaming other ppl, snowflake. 
"Brexit will be a very sad and tragic moment. We will regret it. But #Brexit is not the future of #Europe." - @JunckerEU #SOTEU 
"#Brexit is not the future of Europe. On 30 March 2019, we will be a Union of 27. Let's prepare this well" @JunckerEU #SOTEU 
.@JunckerEU #SOTEU "#Brexit is not the future of Europe. We must and will advance at #EU27." 
Everything in Juncker’s #SOTEU speech so far has made me more convinced than ever that #Brexit is the right thing for Britain to do. 
No credibility when Andrea Leadsom as cited as authority on anything. Lost jobs inevitable post-Brexit. Own it. Its what you voted for. 
The EU’s Juncker says Europe’s economy and confidence are bouncing back  #SOTEU 
"If the referendum is blocked by force, it will be legitimate to declare independence" President @catalanassembly 
Bravo @AMDWaters : Labour are trying to prevent Brexit & UKIP should be targeting Labour Voters, UKIP too quiet about Labour saboteurs  
Join us today from 13:00 at the mass lobby at Westminster to ask MPs to fully protect our rights after Brexit 
Home Office minister responsible for post-Brexit Immigration Bill @BrandonLewis: "We want EU citizens to stay" 
Brexit won't solve issues that led to leave vote, says ex-trade minister  
In Euro Parl listening to Mr Juncker. He referred to the '27 member states'. So accepted that UK is leaving. But no mention of Brexit so far  
The EU economy is booming. Brexit has unified the leaders in a way that nobody could have predicted. Britain looks like a bloody fool#SOTEU 
REPORT: 'Brexit Britain remains a leading global power nation'  
might just check in on Brexit negotiations*opens door to reveal a diarrhea orgy in a clown abottoir*oh 
I guess the upside is that any countries watching us negotiate Brexit will be excited at the idea of negotiating a trade deal with us 
Comprehensive explanation of threat posed by Brexit Bill to powers of Scottish Parliament and need for all parties to unite against the BIll  
Brexit "proves a delicate place in our migrant psyches": @rafaelbehr on May's failure to grasp multiple identities. 
Brexit: Airships could patrol Irish border, says think tank.  
Neither Scottish nor Welsh Govts will give consent to Brexit Bill without major changes  
Scots will realise independence in Europe is the only way out of this Brexit mess. From today's @ScotNational 
Tories starting to search for scapegoats as 'boasted advantages' of #Brexit evaporate |The Times & The Sunday Times  
The Tories have just granted themselves the power to bypass parliament on Brexit laws.  
*Another* BBC report (onR4 Today) on Paris seeking to poach jobs from post-Brexit London. As @andrealeadsom warned, it's looking unpatriotic 
When we're plunged into economic chaos because of Brexit, it won't be the fault of the EU. The blame lies firmly with Tories & Brexiters. 
Brexit U-turn: Billionaire Bill Gates now thinks that the UK can THRIVE outside the EU  
Remoaners:Brexit has passed every democratic./procedural hurdle since 28 May 2015Your contempt for democracy has achieved nothing at all 
REVEALED: Britain ALREADY planning for Brexit NO DEAL in payback for divorce bill demands  
Brexit — When taking back control means giving up control  
Brexit negotiators postpone next week’s talks. Here's what you need to know  
Bill Gates: Why Britain can still lead world in science and tech after Brexit 
Report: Brexit Britain ‘most influential country in Europe’  
I'd be a lot more worried if the Treasury wasn't making plans for no Brexit deal. 
No we do not have to wait until after Brexit. After Brexit the doors slam shut and the lights go out. #ScotRef 
Relentless (mainly false) reporting re there being no Brexit plan, negotiations being disorganised & UK being defeated have had their effect  
Brexit Britain - a country remodelled by rabid Tories, the DUP, Labour fellow travellers, and a supine Parliament.Oh brave new world. 
INTERVIEW: Amb. @AmbJohnBolton : Independence Referendum is “Good Thing”#TwitterKurds #WashingtonDC 
Really, really important thread. Hard Brexit is utter lunacy.  
Young people fear for futures in Brexit Britain - Tragic, we owe it to young people to stop this madness!  
Philip Hammond admits Brexit could plunge UK ports into chaos  PH understands implications but ploughs on regardless 
Nigel Farage is fed up with Brexit doom-mongering, so listed all the good news about the UK leaving the EU  
#Spain declares a #referendum in #Catalonia illegal, & restricts #freedomofspeech to inform & debate citizens' Right to Decide.#Democracy? 
173 out of 203 present MPs in #Iraq's parliament voted against the Kurdish referendum and have demanded measures taken to prevent it.  
Gibraltar: Chief Minister Fabian Picardo no longer fears Brexit.   
I see Leavers writing threads on risk of no deal or going out into WTO option.Tired of this. Reality is they supported Brexit and still do. 
Here we are, 447 days after voting to leave the EU, and the UK government still hasn't managed to come up with a detailed plan for Brexit. 
Fuck it. Let's get on with Brexit. The sooner we do the sooner we can campaign to rejoin, complete with the Euro, Schengen and no rebate. 
He should speak to Branson! : Brexit U-turn: Billionaire Bill Gates now thinks that the UK can THRIVE outside the EU  
11 working groups at the Department for International Trade are developing post-Brexit free trade arrangements with 16 countries. Telegraph. 
Brexit means...  
Now is the time to act! Brexit is the prelude to Britain's all-out attack on Scottish democracy. It's now or never.  
If UKIP MPs had been elected ALL would've voted for #BREXIT bill but people believed Labour's manifesto commitment to honour #EURef result 
Horror! since Brexit the UK annual growth rate of rental prices has fallen especially London #despitebrexit  
*Theresa May speaks to parliament to explain why special executive powers are needed* #EUwithdrawalbill #withdrawalbill #Brexit #brexitbill 
MUFG to pick Amsterdam for its securities base after Brexit, sources say  
Thought you would have realised by now that Brexit was suicide and May always intended to walk away and blame EU. There is a real lack of 
Who is to blame: Judges, EU, Labour, Remoaners, civil servants, the r27.Who is not to blame: those who promoted, those controlling Brexit.  
Thread on Mercer's involvement in Brexit. Excellent. Cambridge Analytica test run for Trump election.  
Scottish Government considers its own Brexit Repeal Bill - The i newspaper online iNews  
If we cant have credible elections in KE coz some folks are helbent on electoral fraud,NASA should begin referendum process for secession!  
Ukraine on Crimea independence referendum: "Crimea shall stay Ukrainian - or [we shall make it ] uninhabited." Go figure.  pic.twitter.com/qUMAQqqIkq 
While mercilessly killing the population of Donbass since 2014 for holding an independence referendum. Go figure.   
Brexit: Ex-minister Lord Bridges urges 'honesty' over EU exit.Over a year too late...#Brexit's built on dishonesty!  
Brexit the self harm of the UK, and only @theSNP speaking coherently against it 
Young people fear for futures in Brexit Britain, says study  
Pleased to represent @KRG_USA at Catalonia National Day. Catalonians will hold their referendum only five days after #KurdistanReferendum. 
Brexit U-turn: Billionaire Bill Gates now thinks that the UK can THRIVE outside the EU  #Brexit  
Brexiters that say £ crash is good because it was overvalued, show me ANY example of where you pointed this out BEFORE the referendum.ANY. 
Politics at its most slippery and vacuous. The Scottish Tory leader Ruth Davidson argues that Brexit will be disastrous for Scotland.  
As I stand in a massive queue at passport control, I curse the Brexit idiots who say “We don’t control our borders!” Oh, we bloody well do*  
Iraqi premier says Kurdish referendum on independence ‘unconstitutional'  
Brexit: Ex-minister Lord Bridges urges 'honesty' over EU exit  
I feel very sad and unsettled by the latest Brexit vote. When old socialists vote to give rampant neoliberalists power, logic is dead in UK. 
Brexit is causing absolute mayhem and you are successfully driving many new Scots and EU citizens out of this country. This is your doing. 
Norgrove without paywall ...  #Brexit 
@LeaveHQ are saying similar about it being utter madness.Why is @Number10gov going for HARD Brexit on such a slim majority of advisory ref 
This was the last page I wrote for the Brexit Handbook on June 25, 2016  
Brexit: We'll bring back power to parliament but we need to cut parliament's power to do itIt's not really about parliament's power, is it 
Through means of either a second referendum, or unilateral declaration of independence, should Scotland become an independent country? 
Steve Bannon on global populism: "Brexit and 2016 are inextricably linked": 
This is the beginning of the chorus as Toyota, & rest, see that when they said hard Brexit they meant the hard slam. 
Brexit has really crippled the UK. Remoaners were right.  
Barcelona Fans display WELCOME TO CATALAN REPUBLIC in the game between #BarcaJuve ahead of #Oct1 referendum  
Interesting: a Vote Leave staffer arguing against a hard Brexit in a long thread that is well worth reading. The tide is turning  
WE GOT OUR SOVEREIGNTY BACK or something actually no this is just fucking stupid you brexit morons  
Brexit: playtime's over - time to head for the bunkers ...  #Brexit.  
90% of my twitter is #chooseorlose defo think Britain is more concerned over crisp flavours than voting for Brexit or a new prime minister 
Referendum on ending Daylight Saving Time in Alberta would cost  ~ b/w $2 and $6 million  #abgov 
Kexit? Iraq’s Kurds Get Ready to Vote for Independence.  My latest, on the politics behind the Kurdish referendum.  
Davis & Hoey together.#Brexit  
Legatum looks seriously dodgy - a tax-haven based charity acting as a pro-Brexit research and pressure group #Brexit  
Welcome to our very own Banana Republic... 
If you only sign 1 petition in your life, make it this onePetition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
ScotlandIt is time to goAhead of BrexitJust end the political union with England the way it startedWith a vote in Holyrood  
Kurds & Catalans have the right to self determination in their own lands. #Solidarity #TwitterKurds #Kurdistan #Catalonia #Referendum  
.ICYMI - here's an example of the usually mild-mannered, don't-rock-the-boat NI nationalists who are truly fuming over Brexit.  
Imagine a business run by the Brexit Boys of Boris, Farage, David Davis or Liam Fox. It would fail. And that's what will happen to Britain. 
Yesterday, the referendum was illegal. Today it's illegal to talk about it. They've gone too far.  
The Tories have just granted themselves the power to bypass parliament on Brexit laws  
Well well well ... eventually govt will accept & follow Labour's sensible lead on Brexit transitional arrangements.  
A govt which insists the "will of the people" must be respected over Brexit won't respect the will of the people in the General Election 
This was always a risk if voting for Brexit. Best Leave could hope for was for it not to be too bad. You fools, we already had a great deal. 
Toyota warns Brexit jitters mean it could move jobs out of UK amid fears over free trade  
Fuckity night to Dennis Skinner's integrity.It's been a good run but this time pal, you're a rebel without applause. #brexit 
We are literally sacrificing our car industry at the altar of #Brexit. Thousands of jobs. Hundreds of millions of pounds. For what? #TOYOTA 
.“Tories didn’t win a majority, but are hijacking Parliament to try & impose their extreme Brexit on the country". 
Is this is true it’s a laughably bad strategy. If May does go for this it’ll go down like a bucket of cold sick in Brussels. #brexit  
The Tories have just granted themselves the power to bypass parliament on Brexit laws  
Iraq's Kurds are moving closer to an independence referendum, but there are still many hurdles to come.  
Breaking! Subs at the Independent have invented the exact word to describe Tory Brexit strategy: #stalement 
Hey @mrjamesob I don't agree with u that Brexit means UK 'poorer' & 'international laughing stock'. Why not debate me on @lbc next week? 
9 Remember: Leave side won on the basis of promising a free trade deal after Brexit. When May talked about "no deal" she lost her majority. 
Corbyn is not the solution to Brexit. He is at least 50% of the problem.  
5 If the UK govt wants - as it should - a sensible post Brexit transition period, there's a route open to negotiate one *with the EU*. 
Patrick Blower tribute to Sir Peter Hall and a nodding wink to Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Dear @DavidDavisMP , @BorisJohnson ... Your predictions regarding Brexit are unraveling fast. Please do the right thing and resign.  
Serious question: is the consensus in UK that a bad Brexit is preferable to no Brexit? Or are we just all sick of hearing about it?  
Attacks on freedom of press in #Catalonia taken to the EU Commission. #referendum #refcat #CatalanReferendum #indyref 
Even if Brexit never goes ahead it is now clearer than ever before that the UK exists to the harm of Scotland. 
To @gobiernoespaFrom Brussels we also promote the censored official advertisement of the Catalan @govern about Referendum #1oct #DEMOCRACY 
The EU hasn't got a clue how it will plug the hole that Brexit has blown in its budget  
Former Dexeeu minister Lord Bridges accuses govt of 'careless talk' + calls for more honesty on Brexit  
Brexit was supposedly all about restoring sovereignty. Now MPs' ceding of power to government ushers in a poodle parliament. How ironic.  
Last Night I Voted To Implement The Referendum Result - Building A Successful Brexit Starts Now  # via @HuffPostUKPol 
Just 32% of public expects PM to get a good Brexit deal. Last night MPs gave keys to some of most incompetent people in the country.  
Public confidence in the Prime Minister to get the right Brexit deal for Britain is low (32%), down from a high of 47% in Feb.via @ORB_Int 
Rite peeps here's the 19 Scottish mp's who voted for a hard brexit tweet this far and wide #the45 #Yesproudscot 
If you still labour under the delusion that Brexit is good for the economy, now is the time to drop that fantasy.  
This public ad asking to participate in #Catalonia's #1oct #independence #referendum has been forbidden by Spanish "justice". Please RT it.  
Excellent thread - but the #Brexit Ultras are driving the bus now and they really believe it can fly.  
On the way in which the government is handling the Brexit negotiations:Approve: 40%Disapprove: 60%via @ORB_Int 
Warning to Britain: Germany’s attitude to Brexit will get even HARDER after election  
Judges have been banning freedom of expression for a long time by prohibiting DEBATE on the referendum in the Catalan parliament.  
Theresa May loses Brexit majority as Tory rebels demand law on final deal | London Evening Standard  
Catch-up: Ruth Davidson says she would campaign to remain in the EU if another referendum were to be held  
Read in the context of Brexit & mounting evidence of discrimination against EU nationals / dangers of #EUWithdrawlBill, this is even worse. 
Lord Bridges: here's how to Brexit. On Reaction, his first intervention since resigning as Brexit minister  
independent research shows #Brexit will hit Aberdeen harder than any other city.Yet local Tory MP Ross Thompson supports it 
It seems that in the space of 12 months 'brexit' has passed into global common usage in multiple languages:'brexit' means 'stupid' 
Spot the difference. Brexit is an existential threat to our major manufacturing industries, and with it jobs and prosperity #StopBrexit 
Toyota says Brexit talks drift could threaten UK production  
Proud to have spoken in @UKHouseofLords debate on Brexit papers & to give a voice to EU/UK citizens who feel isolated & for the 16+ million. 
*Brexit Explained*  
Police ordered to seize ballot boxes ahead of Catalonia independence referendum  
Sign, sign, sign!Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
13/ A good way to spot a fraud or an amateur in Brexit/trade debate is to look for those who talk about trade purely in terms of tariffs. 
Forget the doom and gloom, @Nigel_Farage has some good, positive Brexit news for you  
1/ So the Treasury is supposedly planning for a no deal Brexit. As a Leaver, this is terrifying. The WTO option is, bluntly, suicide. 
labour have had 21 positions on Brexit since referendum closing the gap with the karma sutra which has 64 positions on how to screw people 
I'll be doing panel on democracy & Brexit at this. It's my favorite debating event by a long distance. Fierce and thoughtful at same time.  
Brexit strikes again  
Fake news, threats and referendum cast shadow on Diada #CatalanReferendum  
'Ban cruel foie gras in UK after Brexit' says Ab fab's Joanna Lumley  
These are strong words from a Japanese company just weeks after PM visited Japan, and after the Govt issued its post-Brexit customs ideas 
They keep saying after Brexit there will be a "Bonanza of New Powers" coming to Scotland Publicly I ask them to name Three!  
What a bunch of *insert your own expletive(s)* the @Conservatives are. They don’t care about citizens. They only care about ‘their’ Brexit.  
We support Welsh Government defiance of Westminster's Brexit legislation which will seriously erode Wales' democracy 
Good write up on the "no deal" Brexit scenario - including comments from me and @jdportes 
This from Legatum Institute, key advisors to govt on Brexit. We're descending into utter farce 
Scotland didn't vote for Brexit. Scotland didn't vote to have Holyrood undermined and bypassed. Kinda simple, no? 
Do you support the Scottish Government's opposition to Westminster's Brexit Bill? 
Usually 'how do you pay for it' is first question about any policy. With Brexit, it's barely mentioned  
The German Auto Cavalry are not comingGermany plans for 'worst case scenario' Brexit  
Refusal to put a concrete figure on the cost of Brexit is close to criminal negligence | Paul Mason  
This Catalan government ad is now banned in Spain as the war against Catalonia's independence referendum heats up  
#Brexit nonsense did not drive a stake through the EU's heart, it resuscitated it. We should admit our mistake and #StopBrexit. 
3/5 He said a cliff edge Brexit "would damage our concepts in Britain and elsewhere, but to be clear the higher pace wd be paid by Britain" 
2/5 Car industry chief Mr Wissmann also said that German industry task force is now looking at the "worst case" scenario of 'hard brexit' 
Remember all those Brexiters saying German car industry would push for a sweet soft Brexit deal? Incompetent fools:  
Unfortunately, I think it's true to say that Dennis Skinner would have voted for Hitler to get his Brexit. 
.. Caught up with head of German auto industry body asked him a lot about Brexit: "Britain is v important, but EU27 is even more important" 
EuropaPres: Spain has a plan to move 4,000 police into Catalonia to crush referendum  
How has making a “success” of Brexit suddenly become OUR job?  
Mr Grant, I want to thank you, and the SNP for fighting Brexit, in a way MP's in England have been found wanting. I'm In Cumbria & English 
Right folks.Now the ludicrous Labour party have failed dismally, can we please get on with our democratic Brexit full steam ahead? 
This woman is an absolute disgrace and is at fault for much of the racial tensions we have had since Brexit! pic.twitter.com/3RmDgIMHe0 
UK 2nd most powerful country in World! Pound is soaring, exports are boomingWhat can Leftards blame on Brexit now? 
Excellent - suspend their membership pronto! If we'd done this & cancelled Turkey accession before Brexit it might have been stopped  
New delay to Brexit talks... what could possibly cause that? UK fiscal position ****ed - that's what.  
Scottish and Welsh governments working together to resist Tory Brexit pretext power grab. Responsible government.  
Grievance agenda?Brexit is not a petty grievance for us to forget and shake hands over. Your party is monumentally screwing Scotland over.  
When Brexit is a disaster yet people still claim that everything is going great.  
Post Brexit defence. Gen Julian Thompson says we are walking into an EU ambush. And he's right. @VeteransBritain 
Gotta marvel at entrepreneurs. S&P 500 at all time high in spite of NK, Harvey, Irma, Hindenburg, Brexit, GOP, Dems, and bearish analysts!! 
Report: UK Most Powerful Nation in Europe Ahead of Brexit, Second Only to U.S.  
Fiery Labour MP Dennis Skinner was one of seven to vote in favour of the Conservatives’ Brexit bill.  
The fact that Dennis Skinner is a British nationalist and voted for Brexit is no surprise to anyone.  
Philip Hammond reveals HMRC is preparing for Brexit talks with the EU to collapse without a deal  
You do know #Scotland voted remain right!? @ScotTories #ScotRef #Brexit @RuthDavidsonMSP #PeopleOfScotland #EU #ShamefulStance 
Scottish Gvt won't progress Brexit Bill for legislative consent of the Scottish Parliament because it undermines devolved powers. 
If you support Westminster in disempowering Scotparl you'll be responsible for more division in Scotland than any referendum would cause. 
Toyota says Brexit talks threaten UK production - but CON Leave voters think losing jobs a price worth paying  
Brexit is the will of the British people".Really?53.4% in England and 52.5% in Wales get priority over 62% in Scotland and 55.8% in NI. 
Having lost the vote last night, BBC are now stirring it up for a general strike, they are determined to cause diversions for smooth Brexit 
She has my vote. This country desperately needs a strong voice to make sure Brexit happens & the threat of Islamism. Good luck Anne Marie  
Next round of Brexit talks rescheduled to week starting 25 September, rather than 18th @GuyVerhofstadt was right that they wd be delayed 
Brexit talks delayed a week to Sept 25. UK says jointly agreed to facilitate progress. EU source says 'due to UK political calendar'. Oops! 
Burgeoning relationship between sturgeon and carwyn jones one of most interesting #Brexit sidelines  
Catalan independence referendum must be recognised internationally - @gildernewm  
22nd November - the date upon which Chancellor Philip Hammond will reveal how much each of us is to pay for #Brexit. No holiday next year! 
The Brexit 'elite' are not running the negotiations, it is a Remain PM, cabinet & totally EU committed civil service. We could be out by now  
Dept for Brexit confirms fourth round of negotiations delayed until September 25th. 
Spanish tennis star Rafael Nadal criticized the Catalan independence referendum, comparing it to running a red light  
HORROR as Rotherham child sex grooming gang victim DENIED compensation  via @Your Brexit 
Then Lear decided, as a brilliant political gamble, that we would hold a referendum vote about who loved him best. 
We are present at the @delgoveu's reception on the occasion of the Catalan National Day, supporting Catalan govt and the 1-O referendum.  
The best thing I've read about Brexit, on the intersection of British, Irish, English, and European self-identity: 
Guy Verhofstadt was on to something. Brexit round 4 likely postponed until 25 September, after May's speech. 
"Toyota Says Brexit Talks Drift Could Threaten UK Production" > very serious  
Since Brexit, a reverse domino-effect is happening. People dont want to leave Europe, they want a reformed Europe. That's our mission #SOTEU 
This is what we see as a scrounger.Fuck #brexit  
Tory rebels and opposition Labour MPs are combining to tie Theresa May's hands on Brexit  
Leavers promised #Brexit would boost Britain's car industry. But now firms are getting nervous  
Brexit discrimination - growing evidence of EU migrants being illegally treated in UK  
I intend to be a strong voice on @CommonsNIAC in holding the Govt to account, supporting the Good Friday Agreement & opposing a hard Brexit.  
 Quick read: Westminster has voted for a Brexit power grab - so what happens next?  
Sums up Britain completely that its more divided now over choosing a packet of crisps then it was Brexit  
#BREAKING! Spanish Court also suspends an event in Madrid supporting Catalan referendum to be held on Sunday!Spain, like Turkey?  
Right to a REFERENDUM: Nigerian Military, And Britain Provoking War In Nigeria – View Africa24  
And the Brexit elite conned voters by pretending it would be so easy  
Impt to remember that nothing stops Brexit other than a revocation of Art 50 notice. No domestic legislative shenanigans changes that. 
Labour wants a jobs-first Brexit where work pays, employees have security and decent conditions and prosperity is shared. #TUC17 
BBC News - No Holyrood consent for Brexit bill 'at this time'  
Please someone tell me something good about Brexit. (banana shape choice, blue passport & vague claims of "taking back control" don't count) 
This is the basic truth that you rarely hear in media debates about immigration & Brexit   
What’s next for the Brexit withdrawal bill?Is there scope for optimism? New by me, at @FT 
#EUWithdrawalBill: We’re calling on all MPs to ensure #Brexit doesn't mean vital human rights protections are lost.  
Time to give ppl a referendum on #Brexit based on the facts - When the final deal is clear we need an informed vote 
SHOCK: UK to leave EU, but leave its armed forces behind. Latest UK Brexit paper is disgrace. Commits UK to EU army. @VeteransBritain 
Assange, Rohrabacher, and Yoko Ono are the highest international bigwigs who support Catalonia's referendum.What could possibly go wrong? pic.twitter.com/CHMsMZBOrX 
Brexit Newspeak: "harmonized customs arrangement with the EU" says Hammond. I.e. stay in customs union during transition. 
#BREAKING Court suspends event supporting Catalan referendum to be held in Madrid on Sunday 
What do you think is most likely for Brexit negotiations? 
Treasury is preparing for a no deal outcome on Brexit  - Hammond 
TSJC warns TV3 director of criminal charges if he collaborates with the referendum  
Just saw @MichelBarnier and asked if next round of #Brexit talks postponed: "It's possible" he said 
JUST IN: Brexit negotiators have postponed next week’s talks  
Much like with Brexit and Magic Stars, I'm not taking any risks. If anyone needs a hook up let me know. #chooseorlose 
Britain second 'most powerful country in the world' and in 'strong' position post-Brexit  
Ignore the pessimists: we're still a major power & Brexit was the decision of a confident people, says @james_rogers 
Nearing end of 90 minute Westminster Hall debate on rights of UK citizens in the EU after Brexit. One Tory backbencher present. 
19/ Bad news, however, is that EU wants UK help but doesn't need it. UK can't cherry-pick benefits it wants. For EU, Brexit means Brexit. 
FURIOUS: Businessman slams Vince Cable and his establishment friends for getting in the way of Brexit.  
Remainchester is fighting back: All the things we were told about Brexit that have proved to be just plain wrong  
*Brexit Negotiations Explained*  
.. plus amendments preventing a "no deal" Brexit and guaranteeing rights and protections UK citizens have by virtue of our EU membership  
Murdoch wanted Brexit as weak £ v $ makes Sky a lot cheaper.Govt desperate to be seen to be doing this right but will of course agree to it.  
Spain Catalonia: Rafael Nadal takes aim at banned referendum  
Brexit a "calculated deception of the British people on a monumental scale," says Michael Heseltine, in the Mail...  
Brexiteers say this is good for tourism. Fundamental  flaw in that argument is that Brexit vote has made foreigners feel unwelcome in UK.  
Repatriated Brexit powers 'go to London' not Scotland  
We asked anti-Brexit campaigners to give one word to summarise Brexit... What would yours be?  
We're pleased to announce that our new membership has been confirmed & the #Brexit committee is now up & running. First meeting tomorrow.  
As always, Anna Soubry voted with her party on Brexit, just as she has on all Tory policies. Join us 30/09 >  #Unseat 
Here we go once again... Freedom of the press in #Catalonia is being compromised by Court. #indyref #referendum  
Corbyn paints a Brexit fantasy at the TUC. Talks about using powers returned from EU to do things we can't do now. What powers are they? 
So this is what has happened to inflation since the #Brexit vote.  This isn't Project Fear, its Project Reality.  We all suffer  
READ | Now Tory Remoaners are trying to give themselves a veto on Brexit. NO WAY!  
Catalonia has a right to vote. We fully support the Catalan referendum that is taking place on the 1st of October! #DepèndeTu #DiemSi 
Court asks Catalan public channel TV3 "not to inform" on measures allowing the referendum. Freedom of information is under attack in Spain.  
Spanish Court says Catalan TV cannot "inform" [sic] about info/agreements facilitating referendum vote #censorship 
BREAKING: High Court of Justice asks Catalan public television to stop informing about the October 1 referendum. 
If a Leaver could describe to me one clear, logical process by which Brexit improves any tiny facet of life here in the UK, I would shut up. 
#Labour #Brexit Conundrum: So many of their voters voted Remain, but so many of their MPs represent constituencies that are majority Leave.  
Ruth Davidson "not flying the flag for Brexit" says BBC/S on day Scotland's Tory MP's vote for Brexit. Classic diversion tactic!#powergrab 
 Coming up soon: @Feorlean updates the @ScotParl on the #EUwithdrawalbill and the Brexit power grab.  
'We will be free' Catalans call for independence as Spain referendum looms   
Dennis Skinner, Jeremy Corbyn - Lifelong euroscepticsOne votes for #brexit bill, one opposes.Which one do the sheep criticise? 
More proof May is either totally incompetent or too scared to manage #Brexit, either way this useless PM has to go  
Pusillanimous MPs and the 2nd reading: the fight to stop Brexit is far from over. 
62% of the Scottish people voted to thwart #Brexit you & your grubby colleagues have voted against your own people & foisted fascism on us. 
President Barzani : The issue of border, sharing water, other outstanding issues will be negotiated seriously after referendum  
The Brexit attack on democracy has begun  
Brexit is hitting our supermarket shelves.  
KRG official @HoshyarZebari: “Kurdish parliament will have a response to the resolution" as Iraqi parliament rejects Kurdistan's referendum.  
The evidence of the data suggests you are far from impartial about Brexit. 
Brexit TruthIt is costs us money to Brexit.We won't get a better deal than we haveWe will get poorerA lot of people will lose their jobs 
And they voted for Brexit, who's says this shitstorm isn't down, in a large part, to stupidity  
PM loses Brexit majority as Tory rebels demand law on final deal  
If Jeremy Corbyn wasn't Labour leader he would have been going through the lobbies with Dennis Skinner last night. They're Brexit people. 
This is the last March for Choice before the referendum.  We need this to be the biggest and brightest it has ever been. 
Join the euro to stay relevant in the EU after Brexit, Juncker's top aide warns non-eurozone EU member states:  
Leavers, just stop asking for our help with Brexit! The latest @mitchbenn column here:  
Labour's Summer Mess of Brexit Flip-FlopsCorbyn: Flipped on Brexit.Labour: Flopped on Brexit.@Conservatives: Getting on with Brexit.  
Britain pledges to lend military might to EU after Brexit  
I joined Twitter to support Leave. If Remain had won, I would have quit, respected result & got on with life. Now I fight for a real #Brexit 
UK property crash fears prompt banks to offload risk onto pension funds and taxpayers  #Brexit 
The Met office made a mistake it is officially named #StormTheresa it will bring severe disruption to the entire country #Brexit  
To those Labour MPs who abstained or voted in favour - Donald, Nigel & Arron thank you for giving them a really good laugh.#Brexit  
May challenged to debate Brexit issues face-to-face with MEPs in the European ParliamentShe won’t she’s frit.  
Dell announces new "Brexit" keyboardThey've taken back Ctrl  
Brexit Twitter Sentiment Analysis: @Peston 82% Negative  
DISGRACE: Tory Remoaners push for MPs to get last-ditch veto on Brexit. Respect the will of the people!  
So, this pro-#Brexit groups is mad because it doesn't want UK govt to cooperate closely with EU on security, defence & counter-terrorism.  
Oh dear, looks like us nefarious remoaners aren't backing Brexit Britain vigorously enough.Or something. 
How English sparkling wine is benefiting from Brexit  
\ @frankfieldteam Say hello to your new friends. I'm sure Nigel will buy you a pint and you could get a ride in Donald's gold lift#Brexit  
We are been secretly cleansed by the Hausa/Fulani and it's time for that call for #referendum on #Biafra for self determination is our right 
5 Rosneft already argued that the Brexit vote ended EU sanctions and ECJ role in UK. ECJ said nyet.*sips polonium-laced tea*   
Brexiters wanting to kick out foreign nationals should be threatened with being kicked out of the country themselves. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
When people look back at what happened to the UK with Brexit and the US with Trump, the #AlternativeWar will be the name they use. 
Last night's vote showed #MaysTories' total contempt for democracy. It proved their incompetent pathetic approach to #Brexit is failing fast  
Iraqi parliament majority vote against the Kurdish independence referendum, in the interest of Iraqi unity  
Betrayal. "Despite Brexit"... UK heading for EU Defence Union. My comments in today's @Daily_Express. @VeteransBritain 
FALSE Referendum Law passed Sept6 In favor JuntsxSí + CUP 1,966,508 votes Abstentions CSQP 367,613 votes Against C's+PSC+PP  1,608,840 votes 
The UK government's latest Brexit paper, on EU/UK foreign policy cooperation, is now published -  
Flint abstained on Tory Welfare BillFlint blamed Corbyn for BrexitFlint demanded Corbyn's resignationRespect is earnedSkinner has it  
Sir Keir Starmer, shadow Brexit secretary, described the European withdrawal bill’s result as deeply disappointing  
"In voting for Brexit, they effectively voted to leave Ireland. There is no other way forward." #UnityRef 
If you haven’t been following the #Brexit negotiations, you’ll have no idea how incredibly diplomatic this tweet is.  
Theresa May challenged to debate Brexit issues face-to-face with MEPs in the European Parliament  
With #Catalonia independence referendum looming, Spain faces "one of its gravest political crises in decades.”  
2/ Brexit means repatriating powers not only to Westminster eg CAP, fish etc but to Belfast, Holyrood and Cardiff. HMG fears divergence from 
Deeply disappointed with the result of the Repeal Bill vote last night. #Brexit  
Born in 1948, paid taxes all my life, British citizen, EU citizen since 1973, EU citizenship taken away by advisory referendum 
Heard there will be a remake of lord of the flies. Didn't know it would be a reality show taking place in England. #Brexit 
The 'Dog's Brexit' Repeal Bill is already facing mutiny minutes after it passed  
About to discuss politics and economics of Brexit with @giles_fraser @lindayueh on @daily_politics #bbcdp 
My new blog now posted: #Poland, #Brexit, and the Curse of History  (Poland's waning influence in the EU. 
Guy Verhofstadt has called on Theresa May to appear before the European Parliament and clarify her Brexit plans.  
Can the Brexit ultras be defeated? My latest blog:  
The moment the @HouseofCommons​ passed the Second Reading of the #EUWithdrawalBill as MPs vote 326 to 290. #Brexit  
Dennis Skinner and Kate Hoey are among the seven Labour MPs who defied Jeremy Corbyn and backed the Brexit bill.  
An angry business owner tells Vince Cable "you and your politician friends" are ruining Brexit  
UK inflation up to 2.9 per cent. The pound has fallen because of Brexit. When will the penny drop? 
You literally voted for a Brexit power grab whilst your constituency voted 70% to remain. And you didn't even read the freaking bill!  
The British people should get the final say on any Brexit deal in a referendum. Agree? Add your name:  
Merkel ally warns Theresa May's approach to Brexit 'will not work'  
Iceland changed its laws to retrospectively prosecute bankers. We must aim to do the same to prosecute the #Brexit liars & con-men.#Remain 
Brexit is savaging the GBP which hits the poorest hardest. Clothing/footwear inflation highest for at least decade at 3%. 
Given the effects of a hard Brexit would be worse than 2008 by some magnitude I fear for what could be next scapegoat  
Last night's death blow to democracy is another "material change". Now is the time for indyref. Brexit irrelevant 
...are managing to enforce UK electoral law, either. We may never know who poured what money into advertising over Brexit, for eg. Only... 
Even venerable @DennisSkinnerMP faces deselection for voting with Tories on Brexit. Is this what @jeremycorbyn calls the 'new politics' 
Our #GetBrexitReady programme is designed to help tourism sector sustain growth in the wake of #BREXIT  
In light of latest figures: Brexit caused a lasting rupture in economic perceptions: Remainers are now far more negative (@BESResearch data) 
When your undemocratic Brexit blocking ploy fails and you sneak out the side door #Labour #Fail 
A useful reminder of another crop of #Brexit problems so far ignored by the government!  
Mundell repeatedly asked to name one of his mythical "significant powers" coming to Holyrood post-brexit. He can't. 
Hey Brexidiots do you want improved living standards or a tanking economy & Brexit? 
... meanwhile Veterans For Britain, set up by Leave campaign, has come out strongly against "Dexeu's" Brexit defence paper "betrayal"  
"They use the language of democracy to dismantle democracy. That is the stark reality of Brexit."  
This is your action guys - your voice against Brexit is here.   @wolchover #wolchoveraction 
Absolutely! Brexit not about splendid isolation. #GlobalBrexit 
Dennis Skinner @BolsoverBeast say hello to your new friends. Nigel will buy you a pint, and you might get a ride in a gold lift.#Brexit  
Britain easily has the international clout to thrive after Brexit. 
I am fascinated by this weird thing where apparently ALL protections against abuse of power must be discarded for Brexit.We'll regret this 
The Labour MPs who voted for the Withdrawal Bill should hang their heads in shame for allying with Farage, Murdoch Dacre et al.#Brexit  
Until govt releases #Brexit analyses, data available suggests we are better off in the EU. Me for @LSEpoliticsblog  
Was going to go downstairs to have a cup of tea but worried it might be construed as delaying Brexit #delayingBrexit 
BREAKING: Iraqi parliament votes against Kurdish independence referendum, which is still set to go ahead on the 25th of September. 
#BREAKING: Iraqi parliament rejects Kurdistan Region's referendum on independence, scheduled for 25/9.  
Boris's Brexit bullshit was lies that have consigned the UK to years of financial ruin.What is he still doing in government? #BrexitShambles pic.twitter.com/LdZqmL1s28 
Repeal bill analysis: This is the just the start of the Brexit attack on democracy  
I stand with Dennis Skinner. Then, now, always. So called leftists demanding his head need their own heads examined #Brexit #Skinner #Labour 
Special Brexit episode of the Twilight Zone:-All UK wants is bendy bananas-UK gets bendy bananas-UK can't afford bendy bananas-Screaming  
Dennis Skinner amongst seven Labour rebels to defy Jeremy Corbyn and vote for government's Brexit bill  
Racism and Authoritarianism Reach Climax Together in the Brexit Bill - There is in practice a link between racism  
Iraqi parliament votes against Kurdistan region  referendum, Kurdish MPs quit parliament session  
#BREAKING Iraq MPs vote against Kurdish independence referendum 
Lost in admiration for whoever drafted the Brexit Referendum question. Apparently it even covered giving dizzying powers to the Executive 
Support the call for a second referendum before Tory Cabinet has full powers without oversight | please sign and RT  
The 'Dog's Brexit' Repeal Bill is already facing mutiny minutes after it passed  
I do wish politicians and the media would stop referring to Brexit as a divorce. I left a club last week and it didn't cost me a penny! 
UK Government says 2.9% inflation is due to a rise in clothes & food... Not Brexit then? 
Brexit: Theresa May's landmark EU withdrawal bill passes first parliamentary hurdle  
Part of the Brexit problem, people still *actually* believe this is true 
I cannot tell you how much I fucking hate the phrase "jobs-first Brexit" because Brexit is going to be awful for jobs. 
UK seeks 'deep security partnership' with EU after Brexit  
*Brexit Explained*  
 Brexit is already making people poorer! 
See which MPs voted to derail Brexit last night  
BREXIT is almost irrelevant! 70 years of infrastructure, experience and success in financial services is a decent foundation for continuity! 
His constituents voted for devolution 20 years ago and voted against Brexit. Who exactly is he representing in Westminster!? #ToriesOut 
More details after Britain's core inflation accelerates more than economists expected.How the pound reacted:  
Brexit means - real pay cuts for public sector workers, real cuts in benefits, more child poverty, and higher costs of funding public debt.  
Evergreen gif. #Brexit  
Brexit Is Already Hurting The German Economy, Warns Country's Top Business Group  
MPs didn't vote to back the "will of the British people". Not all of Britain voted for Brexit. Scotland and Northern Ireland voted Remain! 
In spite of Brexit...  
BREAKING: Britain's inflation rate accelerates more than forecast to reach 2.9%  
People giving Dennis Skinner a hard time for this Brexit vote. Three quarters of his constituency voted Leave. 
Ruth Davidson: "I would campaign to remain in the European Union if another referendum were to be held".   
Brexit is based on lies, it is an act of complete stupidity and it is being enacted with unnecessary viciousness. I oppose it utterly.  
US 10y bond hasn't traded with this big risk premium since before Trumpening. As big as during Brexit turmoil - or before taper tantrum...  
Theresa May wins crushing victory in landmark Brexit battle despite Jeremy Corbyn’s bid to block EU withdrawal bill 
Dennis Skinner - a man of the people. Lining up with the Eton mess to serve up hard, cold #Brexit to the masses. Well done. #Brexshitter 
Brexit law passes hurdle in reprieve for UK Prime Minister Theresa May  via @ReutersTV 
Labour have had over 12 months to come up with a strategy. Instead we've had nothing but platitudes & confusion. #Brexit #WeDeserveBetter 
Regardless of your view on Brexit, this bill mustn't pass as it is. It gives govt power to make, change and repeal law without parliament.  
There should be three choices at the end of the Brexit negotiations:Accept the DealLeave with No DealRemain 
Whilst we lost this vote rest assured @UKLabour will push govt to get fair Brexit deal that protects hard won rights and jobs. #thisaintover 
Labour plots fresh Brexit rebellion minutes after losing key Repeal Bill vote 
A dozen Tory MPs warn Theresa May they're ready to rebel over the Brexit Bill  
One million people in the streets of #Barcelona supporting Independence #Referendum #Votarem #1Oct2017 @nytimes  
Lib Dem leader @vincecable is live on LBC, answering your questions on Brexit. Watch it live here.  
Read: Blair on immigration. An epiphany or a cynical attempt to stop Brexit? I think the latter!  me 4 @BrexitCentral 
This Tory Brexit coup must be stopped! Gloves off!  
Just had a Glasgow Labour activist/troll defending the Tory #Brexit position and power grab. Hand in glove with the Tories, as always. 
Plan to double the size of Britain’s merchant navy and deliver the country a huge trading boost after Brexit.  
Ken Clarke votes with LabourDenis Skinner votes with the Tories.One stands up for parliamentary democracy. One wants Brexit at all costs  
Brexit is fault of Tory Government. Many voted Leave due to austerity entirely product of Tories. Awful dire corrupt Government.#ToriesOut 
The response to Westminster taking Brussels powers should be a National Referendum to confer the powers to our Senedd. #CardiffNotLondon 
London: Tens of Thousands March to Oppose Brexit  #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Labour voted against the #EU Withdrawal Bill.This speaks for itself. A few #Labour MPs rebelled.But Labour's plan to foil #Brexit fails. 
Gosh, wouldn't it be good for democracy if John Humphrys gave #brexit MPs the hard time he's just given Richard Burgon on #r4today 
having spent years ranting about parliamentary sovereignty the #brexit elite now seeks to reverse the results of the English civil war 
I mean, on Brexit, in a way, he's sort of more of a Tory than Margaret Thatcher ever was. 
UK Parliament votes in favor of key Brexit bill, an important milestone in legislative process for leaving the EU  
Alistair Darling thinks Brexit wouldn't have happened if it wasn't for the financial crash and the austerity that followed - do you agree?  
In 10 years' time #Brexit and #Brexiter will be words of universal loathing & derision.I want my kids to know I was only & always #Remain 
Business investment has unexpectedly held up since the Brexit vote. Can it last?  
After more than 13 hours of speeches, UK MPs vote in favour of a repeal bill seen as first big Brexit hurdle  
Brexit: The belief that my kids can convert my car into a Ferrari.The Repeal Bill: The angle-grinder they said they needed. 
Labour MP Dennis Skinner voting for #EUwithdrawalbill to support result of a democratic referendum is an "affront to our democracy". Eh?   
The best deal we will ever have is full membership of the EU. The alternatives are not worth bothering with. Reverse Brexit and #StopBrexit 
They betrayed the majority of Labour voters who opted to remain, plus they ignored the disaster of Brexit for jobs, rights and services.  
Former Chancellor Alistair Darling says Brexit would not have happened without the financial crisis and the austerity that followed  
A crucial Brexit bill has passed its latest stage in Parliament  
And those who voted Labour three months ago now realise that, as with students, they were lied to over #Brexit.  
Thousands flood Barcelona's streets to celebrate Catalonia's national day and call for an independence referendum  
The government won’t release its analyses of Brexit’s impact. We have a right to see them  
READ | The EU Withdrawal Bill passed last night as 7 brave Labour rebels reject Corbyn's pathetic Brexit betrayal  
Brexit: UK seeks defence partnership with EU  
The strange thing about Lord Adonis is that while he is totally wrong about Brexit, he is totally right about University Vice-Chancellors.  
Keira is right. I don't care how you feel about Brexit but this Billis a massive over reach by parliament.  
Please remember to visit my website - I have compiled 216 links to GREAT #BREXIT NEWS so far, with daily updates -  
MPs Who Voted to Block Brexit in Full  via @GuidoFawkes 
 Corbyn to tell TUC his vision of ‘jobs-first Brexit’ is stark contrast to Tories’ ‘Shangri-La for bankers’ 
 @paulmasonnews argues we are still in the dark about the true cost of #Brexit 
A Brexit that your constituents voted against. The only thing that is grubby is your moral code 
Voting against it would have thwarted the impact of Brexit on Aberdeen's economy. We will hold you responsible for this @RuthDavidsonMSP 
The Trojan Horse has revealed its contents. #Brexit is nothing more than a right-wing authoritarian opportunity for oppression. Angry yet? 
When more people realise the impact of Brexit on their own lives we'll see a massive change: patient, principled tenacity WILL win through.  
Mazel Tov @Amaka_Ekwo Biafran Freedom Fighter. Strength to the Igbo Jewish community all the IPOB. Give them their referendum #Biafra 
Funny, I don't remember 'elected dictatorship' being an option on the Referendum ballot paper  
It is happening before your eyes folks. Chubb picks Paris as post-Brexit EU headquarters - France 24  
FULL LIST of MPs Who Voted to Block Brexit Last Night >>  
Brexit.. Take our country back and hand it to the Tory party. So democracy is now Tories making laws without consent of parliament. Nice one 
As the EU repeal bill wins the first Commons vote, should Labour give up trying to delay Brexit?  
Labour hard Brexiteers rebel even where Brexit not threatened. Tory soft brexiteers don't rebel even where Parl sovereignty is threatened. 
Britain second 'most powerful country in the world' and in 'strong' position post-Brexit  
UK is now the second largest global power, claims think tank as it rejects the ‘doom and gloom’ around Brexit  
It appears the majority of politicians in UK can still only talk about Brexit through lies. It's a sorry state of affairs and v worrying. 1/ 
Brexit(only 37% electorate backed Out) wouldn't happen under a union law requiring 40% of public service workers to vote for a strike  
Would it be cruel to ask their spokesman what Labour's policy on Brexit is this morning?'Yeah but no but its all Parliament's fault'.  
#Brexit : EU repeal bill wins first Commons vote -  Our thanks and congratulations to @DavidDavisMP 
The Great British Repeal Bill. #Brexit #Bakeoff 
Brexit Britain 'wields most influence in Europe and is second only to US worldwide' 
MPs vote for EU Withdrawal Bill despite Brexit blockers  
Anti-union bigotry when it's harder to strike than Brexit, only 37% UK voting to quit EU yet a 40%+ Con law shackles teachers, NHS, rail... 
UK a step closer to not only the Brexit abyss, but also the authoritarian state one. 3/3 
Labour says EU withdrawal Bill an affront to parliamentary democracy. voting against it an affront 2 democracy  in referendum 
#BREAKING: #Brexit wins again!! The EU repeal bill wins the first Commons voteSo proud of our U.K. cousins  
290 traitors to the will of the people who have no business being MPs #EUwithdrawalbill #Brexit 
Tuesday briefing: Brexit bill backed, but amendments pile up  
There are 318 MPs who respect the democratic process and 296 who think they are above the people#EUWithdrawlBill #brexit  
Dent in brain waves predicted individual Brexit vote better than expressed preferences.  
Cool. Just like how Brexit wouldn't happen, and Hillary would win. We cannot be complacent. #VoteYES. #TalkYES. 
We are with our brethren: Demirtas on Kurdistan referendum  
Stand in solidarity with West Papuans demanding a free & fair #referendum to decide their future #LetWestPapuaVote pic.twitter.com/oYDVzNX6K4 
Congratulations leavers! You "took back control" we always had, only to create a dictatorship #EUwithdrawalbill #Brexit #FFS 
Chubb to move its headquarters from London to Paris. 16 other insurance companies are also leaving due to Brexit.  
Fascinating presentation on PopVote in HK of digital referendum with hostile environment & cyber attacks by @VirgileDeville #civictechfest 
#honestpoll Main purpose of EU repeal bill is . A) Power grab designed 2 avoid democracy.B) Smart move 2 expedite #brexit paperwork. 
.@VirgileDeville presenting @DemocracyEarth collaboration with @HKCivicData during last #referendum in #hongkong  #civictechfest 
Referendum on Sharia wid 5cr signs to b filed along wid Review petition.Waiting fr th day whn 70cr Hindu wud sigh fr Mandir n submit at SC. 
If true it's further evidence of the vile effects of Brexit & loathing it's engendered. 
Brexit: Government wins key Commons vote  
 is closing more #FinTech deals in #Europe after #Brexit, from 6% in 2014 to 11% in 2017 via @CBInsights & @qz  
.@larryelder "The Election was a referendum on Obama"!   
Senior Tories warn May over Brexit bill after MPs vote for second reading  
U.K. lawmakers have backed a key Brexit bill, but a fight still looms  
 Brexit's not about RACISM, it's about SOVEREIGNTY!  Sovereignty for who? UK MPs! But you've just voted to take power away from them. 
Government wins key Brexit vote after Labour MPs ordered to oppose Withdrawal Bill  via @telegraphnews 
BBC News - Brexit: EU repeal bill wins first Commons vote  Tories united as Skinner puts 2 fingers up to Corbyn  
Up to 1 million people gathered in Barcelona to call for independence for Catalonia, which will hold a controversial referendum on October 1  
Trying to wreck the #Brexit bill is a very disagreeable thing for @tobyperkinsmp to do in the Vote Leave town of Chesterfield. 
I could have accepted losing but the betrayal of Labour over Brexit has left a very bitter taste make no mistake. Thank u 4 your efforts tho 
London Remains No 1 World’s Financial Centre 2017 #fintech #brexit 
How did my MP vote on the Brexit repeal bill? Search by name or constituency after crunch vote 
Brexit law passes hurdle in reprieve for British PM May  
Every single #libdem MP voted against the supreme leader tyranny #brexit bill! Well done, all of you! 
Senior Tories warn May over Brexit bill after MPs vote for second reading  
UK Parliament votes in favor of key Brexit bill, an important milestone in legislative process for leaving the EU  
Losing prawn cocktail would be like brexit but worse 
If Jeremy Corbyn wasn't Labour leader he would have joined Denis Skinner in voting with the Tories #brexit #GreatRepealBill 
FULL LIST: MPs Who Voted to Block Brexit >>  
The Lib Dems have tabled amendments to the EU Withdrawal Bill so MPs can take back control from Ministers and give vote on exit from #Brexit 
Remain whingers "worried for democracy" didn't give a toss about democracy every time they tried to get Brexit overturned. #EUWithdrawalBill 
BREAKING: UK government wins early-morning vote to push Brexit bill forward  
Govt should take no comfort on winning Second Reading vote on EU Withdrawal Bill. Real challenge will come at #Brexit Committee Stage. 
We are delighted that the #EUWithdrawlBill has passed second reading and will now move to Committee Stage. #Brexit 
Brexit smashes up principle that parliament not ministers decides big law changes. Commons just endorsed that smash and grab by executive. 
The Brexit vote was 301 to 318 - very close. I voted against the Bill because it is a power grab by the Government. @ReadingLabour #rdguk 
May be late, but will always happily stay up until 1AM to vote against botched Brexit and to protect jobs and public services in Bristol. 
BBC News - Brexit: EU repeal bill wins first Commons vote  
#BREAKING #Brexit bill passes at second reading, allowing it to move to next stage of parliamentary process  
Time for a very sharp exit before Brexit. The UK is finished and Scotland needs to get out ASAP. 
#BREAKING Brexit bill passes first vote in British parliament 
Good thread on what the Kurdish independence referendum does (and doesn't) mean.  
You're getting the hang of it...#Brexit #powergrab 
Government wins first EU withdrawal bill vote by majority of 22 - Brexit live  
Senior Tories issue warning to PM over Brexit bill after vote  
Have just voted against EU Withdrawal Bill after Labour amendment fell. Brexit negs can't be an excuse for massive, undemocratic power grab 
One thing is for sure ... when #Brexit is completed, there will be a lot less people voting for Gina Miller. 
Labour Amendment fails-but this was the result-No-318. Yes 296. Gov't's going to have a hard time with their #Brexit.#EUwithdrawalbill 
Our government met with Evan Greenberg, @Chubb CEO. The worldwide insurance group has chosen to make Paris its European base post-Brexit.  
About to vote against the Monstrosity that is the Govt's Brexit Bill #EUwithdrawalBill 
Patrick Blower on the effect Brexit is having on Parliament - political cartoon gallery  
Iraqi Kurds’ referendum fever spills over to Turkish cousins  
This is presumably the red, white and blue Brexit the PM promised. They have literally nothing else to offer.  
I hate sit/lie laws. They passed one in a San Francisco city referendum back in 2010 and I was incensed.  
During this debate Remain MPs have alleged a coup d'etat and compared the government to Putin and Erdogan. Brexit is sending people mad. 
In closing minutes of #Brexit debate  - I'll be voting against this constitutional outrage - people didn't vote for a Government power grab  
Most important Bill in decades, approaching votes and yet Government benches half empty @UKLabour benches full... #Brexit 
For those still up, I’ll be voting against the latest Tory Brexit bill in the small hours of this morning. It’s a massive land grab. 
Nice to have a wee cameo role! The BBC looks back on the Scottish devolution referendum 20 years on....  
Nice line from @JamesFrith - 'We need a Brexit that works for the 48 and the 52, not the 1922' #EUwithdrawalbill 
"Make Parliament sovereign!" screamed the Brexit MPs who are now voting to make ministers sovereign instead of Parliament.#EUwithdrawalbill 
Crazy that you are not allowed to lie to the pubic to sell wash powder but are allowed to lie to the public to sell policies or Brexit. 
Govt attempts to blame Brussels for the costs of #Brexit and the chaos of its own negotiating failures are pathetic  
Sammy Wilson (DUP) now talking about how Brexit would be easier without devolved assemblies & human rights. FFS. #brexitbill 
Brexit warning to EU: Brussels has to adapt to divorce or bloc will DIE, experts say   
Labour fighting Brexit Withdrawal bill feels a bit like bolting stable door once horses have bolted, run to another part of country, died 
#PowerGrabTheresa has already pulled the trigger but she can be stopped#ToriesOut #EUwithdrawalBill #brexit  
Whatever a vote for Brexit meant,it wasnt vote for degradation of fundamental constitutional values #EUWithdrawlBill 
Like pie man says - whether you voted leave or remain... Brexit without a plan is not a great plan @JonathanPieNews 
@PeteWishart "We've put the clowns in-charge of the brexit circus and their huge clown footprints are all over this bill" #EUwithdrawalbill 
Pete Wishart - "We are sailing towards that big, Brexit iceberg.""But Scotland has a lifeboat"#ScotRef #VoteYES 
3m+ people came out to in #Catalonia to march in support of the #referendum scheduled to hold on 1 October for an independent #Barcelona. 
 RT if you agree that the devolution process must be respected and Scotland given the powers it was promised. #Brexit #EUWithdrawlBill 
PUTTING YOUR COUNTRY FIRST 
Only one party in Westminster fighting for #Brexit.Remember this, next time @UKLabour come courting your vote.#Brexit is #BecauseOfTories. 
If you voted Brexit and support the #EUwithdrawalbill it's a tacit admission that your vote was never about Parliamentary sovereignty. 
Don't vote for a chaotic Brexit, says cause of chaotic Brexit 
It's always about the moneyStop #PowerGrabTheresa and get the #ToriesOut#EUwithdrawalBill #brexit  
Well that's not the message from the Scottish Tories on these benches tonight #Brexit #brexitshambles @theSNP @DundeeSNP 
Jeremy Corbyn 'not quite sure what the point of Tony Blair's latest Brexit intervention was'  
Interesting fact. Trucks going thro' Dover from EU take 2 minutes to process. Trucks from outside EU take 20 minutes.  Real risks of #brexit 
Rbt Mercer Bought SCL Elections, Created CambridgeAnalytica& Destroyed Brexit Election.Alt-Right alliance succeeded 
Refusal to put a concrete figure on the cost of Brexit is close to criminal negligence | Paul Mason  I agree Paul 
Goldman Sachs believes independence supporters will win 1st October referendum  
Brexit's now a problem of managing complexity. Our Govt are rushing it. That's begging for system failure:Full vid:  
Let's stand with the Tory Bench as they show strength tonight to ensure Brexit is fulfilled..So proud of the Tory MPs fighting for the UK!!  
Midnight Brexit votes v inconsiderate for newspaper deadlines. Still likely to dominate tonight's @skynews papers. @toryboypierce in denial 
Who has the best understanding of the best deal for Britain & #Brexit? #Labour #conservatives RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Fmr chancellor Alistair Darling tells #newsnight tonight: "I don't think Brexit would have happened if you hadn't had the financial crisis" 
Spanish prosecutor calls the head of Catalan police force to testify tomorrow on referendum preparations  
“The referendum will go ahead because people are prepared to defy the state.” Exactly. #Diada2017 
WATCH: Shock as Labour MP backing Brexit bill is heckled by her own party. She has gone up in my estimation!  
The UK’s faith in a ‘sweet Brexit’ isn’t just deluded – it’s dangerous | Joris Luyendijk  
*Brexit Explained*  
According to the head of Gorran movement's KNN TV, after pressure from Qasem Soleimani and Brett McGurk, the referendum will be delayed:  
"Trust us" says a government that refuses to publish #Brexit impact reports & knowingly hid immigration figures. Nah m8. #EUwithdrawalbill 
The UK parliament is currently debating one of the most important parts of Brexit. #EUWithdrawalBill 
#Brexit - threats of violence and a government power grab. The stench of fascism rising up from the swamp. #StopBrexit 
"If the referendum is blocked by force, it will be legitimate to declare independence" - Sànchez  
Good, mostly neutral overview of #Catalonia's independence referendum on October 1  
It's reasonable to argue against accepting the result of an advisory referendum. Remain could have argued against pre-written legislation.  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Brexit: Deportations of EU citizens soar since referendum. 
Our position on the #EUWithdrawalBill is clear: It’s critical that our hard-won rights don’t diminish after #Brexit.  
This'll just be trench warfare, a battleground for Brexit warriors. Doubt committee will be able to do anything useful.  
Luke Graham cannot answer a question from the SNPHis constituents voted remainHe now backs Brexit with Jackboots on 
Today President @Alicegast met with @DavidDavisMP and @SadiqKhan to discuss the impact of #Brexit on Higher Education  
Brexit would add £230m a week to GB sov debt. Our stake in the EU adds £1.9bn a week to GB economy compared to hard WTO Brexit. #factsmatter 
20 years on from the Devolution Referendum - Has the Scottish Parliament met expectations? Feel free to add your comments too. #scotnight 
Do you think Brexit has enhanced Britain's standing in the World? #LOL 
Brexit: workers' rights best secured by staying in single market, says TUC chief  
"Jeremy, we're RENEGING on our manifesto pledges, UNDERMINING Britain, DERAILING #Brexit & LYING to our voters""Yeah, bastard Tories" pic.twitter.com/ZJGfzVDGyT 
Speaking of West Ham, did you see Tony Gale going full Brexit earlier? Ederson was just being forrin (via @Wingers6)  
At the constitutional committee Strasbourg arguing for political representation in the European Parliament for north of Ireland post Brexit 
IF HADNT HAVE BEEN FOR HARD BREXIT JOEWE'D BE IN THE EUROZONEWHERE DID YA COME FROM WHERE DID YA GOWHERE DID YA COME FROM HARD BREXIT JOE  
Good on Slyvia Hermon - solely representing 56% Remain vote here as DUP give blank cheque for London's insane Brexit & SF sit on their hands  
What are Remainers to do? Are we supposed to accept that a threat of violence means #Brexit must go through? 
Just spoke in Commons on why I will be voting against the #Brexit Bill tonight and huge sweeping powers for a minority Government. 
Thousands gather in London to march against Brexit.  
#Catalonia you're looking good tonight. One million march for independence and democracy for #DiadaDelSi. #Diada2017 #11s2017 #referèndum  
Jeremy Corbyn has provoked confusion over Labour's Brexit position  
Clamour for the referendum. To @Elnacionalcaten  
And to answer all the questions in one go, I'm astonished @BolsoverBeast is voting with the Govt. This is more than about Brexit.  
Introduction of post-Brexit customs checks could cost traders at least £4bn a year, according to a think tank report  
If the impact studies showed Brexit to be positive it would support the 'they need us more than we need them' narrative. Clearly they don't. 
“Cynical” prime minister plans to fail Brexit talks, says @EmilyThornberry 
.Pandora's box"Brexit is this generation’s partition, it challenges everyone & every institution on this island" 
Reluctant? No. Labour have lied repeatedly on #Brexit. They don't have any respect for the 17.4m who voted Leave whatsoever.  
Scotland - and his constituency - voted remain and his hard Brexit is predicted to drive 80,000 job losses in 10 years. Who's he kidding?  
Labour’s Brexit Policy Clearly Explained  
Guido crassly simplifying Labour's positions on Brexit. Corbyn's interview today much more complicated than this.  
"Outrageous BBC C4 how did Brexit happen???, you guys commissioned the Romanians are coming" @faizashaheen #TUC17 @CWUnews 
When Labour vote against the #EUwithdrawalbill they shout loud & clear "We despise the people's #Brexit & will do anything to stop it" 
Been boycotting everything Virgin for ages now, this is whyBranson bankrolls G Miller's bid to oust Brexit MPs  
A democracy cannot survive if the political scales are tilted by the exploitation of threats of extremism and violence.#StopBrexit #Brexit pic.twitter.com/PnQoFSLzXb 
Debate on number MEPs in @Europarl_EN post #Brexit in @EPInstitutional -  Ireland to gain 2 seats up from 11 to 13 MEPs @FineGael @EPPGroup 
Brexit Bill had 6 hrs debate over 2 days  & only 1 SNP backbencher was called to speak. Criticisms of deliberate, cynical gerrymandering. 
Back to #London w/ @DanCardenMP for #Brexit votes tonight. We'll be standing up for working people + against the Tory power grab #tuc17 
Wise words of Dame Judi Dench On Europe &Brexit"There is something about being inclusive that is more important than being exclusive" 
Pre-Brexit: Too many immigrants.Post-Brexit: Too few immigrants.I'm beginning to think the problem's not immigrants. 
Brexit will cause undoubted economic damage and the world has changed since referendum vote says @DanielZeichner #EUWithdrawalBill 
Beware if #GreatRepealBill passes unamended tonight wake up in an Executive dictatorship under Mrs May & her Brexit believers Be afraid ppl  
Brexit: Airships could patrol Irish border, says think tank - BBC News  
"Once again, millions demonstrating and not a single incident. Open, brace, peaceful, civic people. Referendum is democracy."  
Live:Kurds rally in support of independence referendum during day and night across Kurdistan Region. #KurdistanVotes 
Forget #Brexit for a second, ask yourself if you'd support #EUwithdrawalbill otherwise. This is a genuine threat to parliamentary democracy. 
Brexit has always been about maximising the power of the establishment & the Tory party. Wonder if people getting it now? #EUwithdrawalbill 
UK Govt still in fantasy land over Food Brexit. Customs barriers will be hugely costly. IfG rept suggests partly why  
Impressive turnout for key demonstration before #Oct1 #referendum   #DiadaPelSí #Diada #Diada2017 #indyref 
Here's why I'm voting against the EU Withdrawal Bill tonight. #Brexit  
Grayling pledges Britain's maritime industry will make waves post-Brexit 
Big support at parliamentary Labour meeting for way Keir Starmer has developed Labour's Brexit position&exposed undemocratic Withdrawal Bill 
.Looks like someone isn't happy about the constant stream of Brexit FACTS from the quality newspaper @irishtimes . 
Exploiting the narrow outcome of a flawed referendum for a hard #Brexit will go down as the stupidest decision ever taken. For most of us. 
I'd be grateful if you could help embarrass David Davis by retweeting the linked tweet #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
This is what Henry VIII powers are and why everyone's fighting about them. #EUwithdrawalbill #Brexit  
#WithdrawalBill @SeemaMalhotra1:Vote today not about whether we leave EU but how we leave EU. "This Bill is little short of a dog's Brexit". 
Branson bankrolls Gina Miller's bid to oust Brexit MPs with 25,000 HARD TO IMAGINE A MORE CLEAR CUT CASE OF TREASON 
Britain must never surrender to cynical exploitation of threats of extremism such as this by Zac Goldsmith #Brexit 
The only thing that threatens our democracy is Labours BLATANT disregard for the will of the people who VOTED for Brexit! 
WATCH: @RhonddaBryant warns you can't trust Gov with sweeping 'Henry VIII' powers on Brexit given their track record. RT so everyone knows:  
After Brexit we can trade with Americans & Aussies, South Africans & Brazilians, on terms that help them & us; 
Any MP who says handing unprecedented powers to govt to override parliament is "only way to respect #Brexit vote" is brainwashed or lying 
After Welsh Assembly referendum BBC reporters didn't trawl the streets of Cardiff looking for people who changed their mind - @DavidTCDavies 
Disgraceful that @frankfieldteam and other Labour MPs are taking the side of Farage, Murdoch, Dacre, May, Rees-Mogg etc.#Brexit #Remain 
#Barcelona this afternoon ahead of October 1 #Catalonia independence referendum. #Catalunya #CatalanReferendum 
I really don't see why I have to support this useless bloody government in Brexit negotiations, says @JonnElledge  
The problem of complexity and a rushed Brexit... it's begging for systems failure from unforeseen interactions.  
What's wrong with frustrating Brexit? It's a disastrous folly. Hitler was democratically voted in. That didn't make it morally right. 
A few thoughts on the 20th anniversary of the devolution referendum: 
I think we should put the #EUwithdrawalbill to a referendum.. 
Thousands flood Barcelona's streets to celebrate Catalonia's national day and call for an independence referendum  
In the office with my sleeping bag - expecting a late night as we debate the Brexit Bill @readinglabour @rdguk 
With Brexit talks well under way now & government voting on #EUwithdrawalbill what is your current view on EU?RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
One of the utterly fascinating things about brexit is that nobody clamouring for it to happen knows what the EU is. 
Kurdistan is represented too in the big rally in #Barcelona for a democratic referendum in #Catalonia #TwitterKurds 
Tunisian #NobelPeacePrize laureate, Ahmed Galai: "Referendum is democracy" #Diada #Diada2017 #Catalonia 
Just spoke in #EUwithdrawalbill. I will be voting against Govnt tonight. All the promises of Brexit have evaporated into nothing (1/?) 
In Labour, "soft Brexit" being resisted by those who don't like free movement (the right) and those who don't like free markets (the left). 
"All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed"  
Barcelona rally ahead of October 1 independence referendum which Spain has banned  
Massive rally in Barcelona just weeks before the 1st October independence referendum in Catalonia #referèndumCAT 
Constitutional Rights aren't an irrelevance. Since the referendum, they've been trampled on in the UK. The warnings weren't taken seriously. 
It's almost as if we have scores of MPs in Parliament who don't know what they're doing. Maybe that's how the referendum happened. 
@BBCRadioScot top story in 5 o'clock bulletin was report on Brexit Bill & UK Lab opposition.  No mention of SNP position. Balance please 
Whatever Brexit vote was about, it surely wasn't abt degrading our constitutional values & the role of sovereign Parliament #EUWithdrawlBill 
This isn't about Brexit. The bill is a power-grab, sets a dangerous precedent, and is clearly antidemocratic. It must be opposed. 
WATCH: @patmcfaddenmp slams Gov over claim that voting down Repeal bill will cause chaos - ministers cause their own Brexit chaos. Pls RT:  
What a hideous place the UK is. Tories become UKIP, Labour become Tories. All to satisfy a Brexit English electorate. A xenophobes' charter. 
The marginal Brexit vote was driven by MASSIVE LIES & it's the duty of all informed Brits to halt it. The #EUwithdrawalbill is CORRUPT 
It would be wrong & highly embarrassing if post-Brexit British passports weren't made in the UK. Invest in UK business - buy & use British! 
In the House of Commons @patmcfaddenmp hits back at Ministers that claim voting down the #EUwithdrawalbill would lead to a "chaotic Brexit"  
Whose father started extremist political movement The Referendum Party.  
21.  The government does not need this near-absolute power of law-making for Brexit.  It does not need to usurp parliament. 
LIVE: Massive rally in Barcelona ahead of October 1 Catalan independence referendum  
20.Today's Bill is about handing almost the entire legislative power of Westminster over to Whitehall, under the guise of Brexit. 
.@StephenGethins quotes Ruth Davidson's support for single market asking Scots Tories if they're Ruth Davidson or Theresa May Tories #Brexit 
If the promise of Brexit is broken it will give rise to 'extreme political movements' says @ZacGoldsmith 
Are you frustrated with the lack of direction with Jeremy Corbyn on #brexit? @jeremycorbyn RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Can't disagree any gov would have to pass bill - unless you aspire 'to thwart the result of the EU referendum' - Labour's @CarolineFlintMP 
#LIVE: incredible #Barcelona's city centre in #Catalonia right now demonstrating again for #independence. #peace #Democracy #Referendum #1O 
Brexit in a nutshell. Tory Eurosceptic Sir Edward Leigh tells Commons: "Henry VIII was a bastard - but he was my kind of bastard." 
#BarcelonaReferendum is democracy #DiadaPelSI #Diada #Diada2017 #Referendum #indyref 
"Referendum is democracy." We have the right to vote. #LaDiadaDelSi 
London stays world's top finance centre despite Brexit | Article [AMP] | Reuters  
Tony Blair, facing prosecution over Iraq by families forced 2 crowdsource the cash is now Brexit honest broker. Wow 
What chance democracy with pro Brexit Tory-backing Labour MPs like Caroline Flint, Kate Hoey, Graham Stringer, John Mann and Frank Field? 
WATCH | Veteran Labour MP Frank Field will vote in favour of the bill as it's "the only option for the referendum result to be implemented".  
Brexiter reactions to Gina Miller show clearly that many of them give not a damn for parliamentary sovereignty or the rule of law. #Brexit 
Gina Miller makes our government obey the law & respect parliamentary sovereignty. Brexiters are outraged.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Labour MP @frankfieldteam says he will be voting for the only option which implements the referendum result - backing the EU Withdrawal Bill 
Has Jeremy Corbyn changed his position on Brexit AGAIN or did he just misspeak? Can anyone keep up?  
Lot of Conservative MPs seem convinced Brexit dynamics will change "after the German elections". #1922EchoChamber. 
.@UKLabour NOT seeking to STOP #Brexit just #ToryPowerGrab."That we are leaving is settled. HOW we leave is not" 
Brexit is not compatible with the Good Friday Agreement - @MaryLouMcDonald  
Waiting to speak in EU Withdrawal Bill. I will be voting against Second Reading, against Govnt's Brexit "strategy" & against this power grab 
City of London remains no 1 EU financial centre. what did Project Fear doom & gloom merchants say would happen after Brexit 
"People are changing attitudes they hear my accent and say oh are you from Poland?" #brexit #TUC17 
My @nybooks essay on Brexit, Ireland and English nationalism  
Sorry Nick, but the referendum was not democratically legitimate & that needs to be faced.- Nick Cohen @theguardian 
Why would Brexit-supporters on the left want to give more control to (disgraced ex-former minister) Liam Fox? 
What Brexit? UK investors are feeling more confident than European peers  
The fact the Govt won't publish Brexit impact studies as that would "undermine negotiations" can only mean they show huge potential damage. 
Nigel Farage is the best politician we have who dares to stand up to the Establishment 
We need to make Brexit affect his allotment somehow  
Tony Blair has once again shown his lack of respect for democracy with his latest attempt to derail Brexit  
Reader Letter: Brexit price cuts would force a number of farms out of business.  
Legal experts say common law Ireland to be 'isolated' within EU after Brexit @UCDLawSchool @legalscholars @KingsInns 
Strong piece "Will Brexit mean a return to the dark-age prejudices of 1970s immigration policies? | Claude Moraes " 
Tell your MP to vote against the withdrawal bill and prevent a Government power-grab from #Brexit  
Don't worry, if you don't like Labour's Brexit policy, there will be another one along tomorrow. 
The Factory Worker's Current State of Labour's Brexit Policy i'm not sure i would drink this tbh  
BREAKING NEWS: The UK has dispatched a new negotiator to Brussels for Brexit talks. On his way to Belgium in this clip...#Blackadder 
Isn't it possible that Jeremy Corbyn's Labour Party have lied, and are lying, to the whole country over #Brexit?  
EU's position on Brexit is like expecting us to agree to buy a car & the price, before negotiating whether or not it includes an engine. 
Why doesn't Labour just be honest and say "If you back Brexit, Jeremy backs Brexit, and if you oppose, he opposes as well". 
Friends! Very worrying!Due to Brexit, there's a risk that Britain will be excluded from bailing out Our Eurozone. 
'There's a Civil War vibe in Brexit Britain. I love it. Brexit *is* democracy' Brendan O'Neill on the Delingpole pod  
Brexit in a nutshell.  
The new unionist tactic. Undermine devolution itself to justify Brexit power grab from Westminster. So ask yourselves this: what next?  
Those Corbyn positions on Brexit:  a) Could stay in EU single market  b) But SM membership requires staying in EU  c) And we must leave EU. 
London still world's top financial centre despite Brexit, says survey  
Caller forces Nigel Farage to admit that UK could restrict immigration while remaining in EU - destroying his main rationale for #Brexit  
UK does not lack capability or determination on Brexit, but it lacks direction and a destination.New by me, at @FT  
Brexit Boost: London Remains World’s Top Finance Centre  
The Government is devising a new export strategy to boost Britain's £15bn maritime industry after Brexit  
You can read my speech on how @RoyalNavy can support UK prosperity post #Brexit here:  
Never forgetThe Labour Party created the 40% rule to overturn the result of the 1979 referendumWhich was 52/48 for YES  
Watching Brexit unfold in real-time.By me, at @FT:  
Labour's position on Brexit seems to be "me, drunk in a chippy at 1am trying to put in an order but being blown away by all that choice". 
"The Tories are clueless Theresa May is a Zombie PM we need them to be defeated in Parliament" #Brexit @Manuel_TSSA #TUC17 
Corbyn conned the electorate saying he'd gotten behind Brexit - awful  
Corbyn's exact words on #WATO re remaining in the single market post #Brexit. No, me neither  
Brexit bonus as thousands of migrants claiming benefits set to return home....to UK  
I thought bout leaving the Prawn Cocktail/Paprika debate to other people but after Brexit my trust in the public is literally less then zero 
Can she not issue James a license to kill Brexit?  
In same interview, Corbyn says UK could stay in the single market after Brexit AND that being in the single market depends on being in EU. 
"Will Brexit"? Dear UK, Let me get this straight: it already has!  
Today's the day: Time for Tories who give a fig about parliamentary democracy and sorting Brexit to put their votes where their mouths are 
Labour MPs defy whip over Brexit by Christian Adams - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Vital MPs honour referendum result and vote for the Repeal Bill tonight to ensure a smooth departure from the EU  
'Brussels wants to DAMAGE Britain!' EU setting Brexit TRAP for May warns Yanis Varoufakis  
I'd be grateful if people could RT and join me in putting this question to David Davis.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Most significant statements by Corbyn on Brexit since the referendum, on World at One. Labour now open to staying in economic union. 
Dame Judi Dench this morning spoke out against Brexit and Britain cutting itself off from the rest of Europe.  
Gibraltar and the UK will face the Brexit negotiations together and constructively  
EU accepts Brexit talks could BREAK DOWN and starts contingency planning  
HERO: #Labour #MP #CarolineFlint to defy #Corbyn & not vote against EU Withdrawal Bill. Referendum must be respected  
This. The Brexit bill is bad news for everyone who cares about democracy, in Scotland and elsewhere. We need to work together to stop it.  
.@BBCNews is lying about aLabour rebellion on the EU Withdrawal Bill. Labour isn't opposing Brexit - just the Tory power-grab. #bbcdp 
20 years on from devolution, Brexit Minister Michael Russell warns ‘constitutional crisis’ lies ahead  
Remain Marchers Compare Vote For Brexit to Vote For Hitler  
I do not not trust this government to deliver a #Brexit that makes life better for the majority. They've shown no interest in even trying. 
Oh but #Brexit will be so easy & will save us money....bollocks. It'll harm us in every way every day..already is!  
Labour’s Brexit Policy Clearly Explained:  
Will Brexit mean a return to the dark-age prejudices of 1970s immigration policies? | Claude Moraes  
My cartoon - the #EUwithdrawalbill#Brexit#TakeBackControl#wato 
Nicola Sturgeon says the Brexit bill is a threat to the Scottish parliament 
I thought Brexit *was the chaos.  
This is why Brexit can't come quickly enough. Coming over here, taking our jobs.  
Sacking an exciting,young,Dutchman after 4 games & appointing a70 y/o, washed up cabbage like Hodgson is the most Brexit move in PL history 
With the Brexit bill upon us, here's a handy Brexit guide to what is and what isn't democratic.  
"When you treat as sacrosanct a result secured by lies you encourage liars": @JolyonMaugham on the EU referendum  
Some MPs, it seems, would vote for a shit sandwich and happily eat it if you called it Brexit. 
We have found the same with NO voters from the 2014 referendum here in ScotlandThe lies that were told to NO voters were outrageous  
Spot on from @MatthewdAncona - crisis of inequality & public services won't be addressed by token measures to keep out foreigners #Brexit  
While Labour continue to play political games, the @Conservatives are working together to get the best Brexit deal for everyone  
Important initiative in terms of our response to #Brexit. New markets, new opportunities.  
Gibraltar in the spotlight: the Rock in a hard place over Brexit, tax … and sewage  
Thanks to Brexit, Milan is back in vogue as Italy’s financial capital  
Don't throw Brexit into chaos, UK minister warns before parliament vote  
Heard her on #BBCR4today this morning. I hope her career closely follows the crash trajectory of Brexit. Brexit will not happen.  
Don't believe Tory lies that #GreatRepealBill is tick box exercise to smooth Brexit. Any power they steal now, they will abuse 
"It's as if truth has ceased to exist on a meaninful level". Sums up Brexit.  
London stays world's top finance center despite Brexit  
The thing is, if that had been 100.000 UKIP/Tory bigots marching for Nuclear Brexit it would have been an all day exclusive on the BBC. 
The democratic deficit - and how only a referendum on the final deal can fill it. Four arguments () 
Judi Dench's response to Brexit is what Remainers need on a Monday morning  
I'll be answering questions on all things Brexit in Leicester tomorrow...... if you want to come along for drinks, a chat and Q&A!  
Once again we need @TheGinaMiller to make this government obey the rule of law. #StopBrexit #Brexit /1 
Should there be another EU referendum? @toadmeister and @JolyonMaugham duke it out  
It's likely to be a long day today, but with @theSNP colleagues, I will oppose a #Brexit power-grab by the Tories. #WithdrawalBill 
Come pick up yer da, he's gone full brexit again.  
This isn't "guaranteeing EU citizens' rights". Bad for our economy, our society and the Brexit negotiations  
* @DavidDavisMP - Can you please tell us what progress is being made on the post-#Brexit UK-German trade deal.  
 @NicolaSturgeon speech: 20 years since devolution referendum - let's defend what we won and work to build upon it.  
Unreal. Flint was saying Brexit was Corbyn's fault not long ago.  
TUC's Frances O'Grady says there must be "no dodgy trade deals to sell off our NHS" after #Brexit  
Britain’s divided. But there’s one thing we agree on: we don’t trust a word Tony Blair says  #Brexit 
Before Brexit, Ille-et-Vilaine received between 10 and 20 citizenship requests a year. Now, it's had more than 160.  
TUC General Secretary @FrancesOGrady criticises the Government's progress on #Brexit plans with scathing schoolboy-supply teacher analogy  
Even normal Remainers are getting behind Brexit - when will Blair, Soubry et al catch up?  
The UK’s faith in a ‘sweet Brexit’ isn’t just deluded – it’s dangerous | Joris Luyendijk  
You may think this a good thing, or that it is necessary for Brexit.Matter of opinion.But as fact: Bill is still biggest shift of power. 
"Plenty of offensive very little charm" @FrancesOGrady on Tory Govt's Brexit efforts so far #TUC17 - pretty accurate summary 
Wishing all Catalans worldwide a very #BonDiada Nacional de Catalunya - many of you will take to the streets today before 1st Oct referendum  
They voted that it "should". An advisory word when used in, for example, an advisory referendum. Your politics are puerile, James.  
Main thrust of Nicola Sturgeon's speech: calling on all parties to reach "consensus" on stopping hard Brexit for good of Scotland & UK 
EIB lends outside EU in 2 Cases:1. to countries that will join EU2. to support EU's poor neighboursDid Davis mean Case 2 after #Brexit?  
Nicola Sturgeon says "new spirit of consensus" is needed in Scotland "with Brexit now threatening the underpinning principle of devolution"  
One minute .@jeremycorbyn is a hard Brexiteer, the next he's betraying the referendum result. These clowns need to make up their mind. 
There is one excellent and simple way to avoid chaos @DavidDavisMP and that is to ditch the stupendous folly of #Brexit.#StopBrexit 
PM's approach to Brexit like "letter to Santa" rather than proper negotiating position, TUC's general secretary says  
FM @NicolaSturgeon giving address on 20th anniversary of 1997 devolution referendum  
 Watch @NicolaSturgeon give a speech marking 20 years since the devolution referendum, live from 11am. #DevoRef20 
Oh no, Brexit ruining everything.  
Why don't you provide a simple list of the clear advantages of the Brexit vote so far, plus the facts and figures of UK prospects after exit 
You're an ex Minister in the government party on the winning side in the Brexit referendum. On what planet are you NOT the establishment?  
Caroline Flint's volte-face has been pitiful to watch. She made such a rousing pro-EU speech during the referendum campaign. @Labour4EU 
Waving the EU flag is not about denying Brexit. It's about celebrating and defending part of our identity.  
We asked @SalmanRushdie what he thought about Brexit. He did not sugar the pill.  
A group of hard Brexit Tory MPs are holding the country ransom to get an extreme hard Brexit. Hold them to account:  
"Introducing customs declarations after Brexit would affect up to 180k UK traders and could cost over £4 billion a year" #shambles 
'Despite Brexit'  
How do Labour get away with fooling people into thinking they intend to remain when their position is Brexit with an extended transition? 
John Humphrys really had to prompt Judi Dench to attack Brexit on 'Today'. Almost as if that line was pre-arranged. Beeb on a fishing trip? 
"Let's have a renaissance for the UK."The foreign secretary is upbeat about Brexit but won't be drawn on length of transition period.  
Davis: The people didn't vote for chaos in the referendum.Oh yes they most certainly did and that is exactly what they and we have now got. 
Today @HouseofCommons votes on EU #WithdrawalBill - it's a power-grab, plain & simple, undermining #devolution on referendum anniversary  
The gall of people who say they hate nationalism but then want Scotland to accept the giant English nationalist elephant in the room, Brexit 
Labour's Brexit policy. Got that?  
Labour's Brexit Policy Clearly Explained:  
Judi Dench's response to Brexit is what Hard Remainers need to hear on a Monday morning 
The German vote is effectively a referendum on Angela Merkel. Here's a guide to the election:  
D-2 for #CitizensLobby17Make your voice heard. #citizensrights are not a #bargainingchip in Brexit negotiations.  
“Single economy” far better term than “single market” to understand #brexit Good piece by @jorisluyendijk 
With his latest witterings on Brexit, Tony Blair is fighting a war against his own irrelevance – and losing  
REBEL: Labour MP Caroline Flint to defy Corbyn & not vote against EU Withdrawal Bill. Referendum must be respected! 
If we introduced a £100 tax on every newspaper headline describing good news as 'despite Brexit', by how much could we reduce the deficit?  
David Davis told MPs voting against Brexit repeal bill would result in the UK suffering a chaotic exit from the EU  
#BREXIT Govt set to lay out benefits of 'NO DEAL'. Good. Demands for money "before we'll talk trade" is distasteful.  
Labour MP rebels against Brexit bill whip  
The EU isn't building a 'single market' but a 'single economy'. Which makes a sweet soft Brexit impossible:  
#Brexit is now leading to a constitutional.struggle for the survival of Paliamentary democracy and devolution? Can the UK survive this?  
Via @gralefrit, an old Fry and Laurie sketch which suddenly goes all Brexit halfway through. Really, really Brexit.  
So Labour MPs who were anti Brexit, now want to defy whip to vote for #EUwithdrawalbill? They've got less actual conviction than Judge Judy 
Unfortunate choice of words @BorisJohnson particularly after you said Brexit would be "a Titanic success!"  
Centrists: "Corbyn never fought Brexit."Corbyn: "Let's fight!"Centrists: "Corbyn is so hostile to Brexit"  
We salute Brexit hero Graham Stringer MP. Another who is backing Brexit and democracy   
Post-Brexit customs declarations could cost Britain's traders £4 billion, study says  
Here are some memories from across the Labour family of the 1997 referendum. #DevoRef  
When #9/11 happened 16 yrs ago, I knew the world would change but never imagined ISIS, Brexit, Trump....  
London remains the world's most attractive financial centre, despite #Brexit  
Theresa May's approach to Brexit is 'letter to Santa', union says  
Voting against EU bill means 'chaotic' Brexit, claims Davis  Is #Davis taking the piss? It IS chaotic already! 
Our new @instituteforgov report on customs is out today. It uncovers the huge task facing govt in preparing border for Brexit… 1/ 
Mind blown. We are in very big trouble. It's your civic duty to read @IanDunt's #Brexit book.  
Start of a busy week; keen to vote in favour of the 2nd Reading of the EU Withdrawal Bill tonight! #Brexit   
I'm against the withdrawal bill, as I'm worried we can still get pregnant #Brexit. 
Better back that Brexit bill as history has shown that the best way to avoid chaos is to do what the Tories say...  
I distinctly remember Caroline Flint on telly blaming Corbyn for Brexit. A year later she's effectively voting with John Redwood. #r4today 
Streets of Hawler decorated with #Kurdistan flag ahead of independence referendum.#YesKurdistan #KurdistanReferandum#TwitterKurds 
Full respect to @CarolineFlintMP who will break the Labour whip today for the first time in order to uphold referendum commitment. 
Brexit will leave NHS in intensive care. UK will be much less attractive place to work yet need to find 60k nurses & midwives #SaveOurNHS 
Staying in the Single Market is the best way to protect British workers after Brexit, @FrancesOGrady will say today 
“Exiting Brexit” by @chrishanretty - underestimates power of catastrophic fiscal projections but good on realities 
*Brexit Explained*  
Brexit provides a perfect cover of political confusion & exteded austerity to drive NHS privatisation.  
What do you mean "despite Brexit", Sky? 17.4m people expected the Brexit vote to lead to SUCCESS - we were & will be right!  
The EU looks to move past Brexit with a bold new relaunch  
There are good reasons why Remain areas like mine take an increasingly positive view of Brexit | @robertcourts 
Unions have set out their tests for Brexit – jobs, rights and living standards must be protected  #TUC17 
Today's @thetimes cartoon. #Blair #Brexit  
#TUC says #TheresaMay wish-list for #brexit is unrealistic & we should stay in #SingleMarket and play by the rules 
Still proud of this @TheScotsman devolution referendum - 20 years ago today - splash with my by-line. Changed Scotland and UK forever.  
Dame Judy Dench on #bbcr4today. "How can we not be more insular after Brexit?" God, how I love Dame Judy ! 
"Brexit: workers' rights best secured by staying in single market" - @FrancesOGrady is absolutely spot on here 
It's all to play for. Killing off the EU Withdrawal Bill could see the end to the Tories Brexit plans. It's time to fight to #StopBrexit 
London stays world's top finance center despite Brexit  
Killing this bill would cause "huge problems" - @CarolineFlintMP explains why she is defying three-line whip opposing Brexit bill #r4today 
Laughable. Not a single mention of Brexit.When will Tories realise they are the problem?May wept for herself alone & lets us weep for UK.  
When Lexiteers try to cite Greece, remember this is how actual Greeks feel about Brexit 
REVEALED: Britain ALREADY planning for Brexit NO DEAL in payback for divorce bill demands  
Your morning briefing: #Irma hits Florida, police pay cap to end, #Brexit ‘chaos’ warning & other stories 
20 years ago today I was standing at a polling station in Glenrothes for Referendum. Scotland has changed since then. Let progress continue 
The Brexit-obsessed Telegraph really does want us to head back in time   
Stop! That Brexit's no good for you.  
#r4Today hurrah! Judi Dench praises EU in lovely way, is v anxious about Brexit - "closing in..puts into people's minds how insular we are" 
Catalans mark national day as tensions rise after Spanish high court suspended October referendum on independence  
"ANY LABOUR MP WHO VOTES WITH GOVT IS A TRAITOR" Dump FLAWED Brexit bill, Labour’s Keir Starmer tells Theresa May  
NEW: Easy, nowTHAT DAVID DAVIS #BREXIT SUMMARY EXPLAINED IN DETAIL.  
'Brussels want to DAMAGE Britain!' EU setting Brexit TRAP for @theresa_may warns Yanis Varoufakis  
Labour lead increasing in Wales as support for 2nd EU referendum grows, according to latest @ITVWales poll  
Caroline Flint is going to change the repeal bill by voting for it, apparently #r4today #brexit 
Labour @CarolineFlintMP confirms will defy Labour three line whip opposing tonight's Brexit bill @bbcr4today 
20 years ago today I happily voted Yes to having a Scottish Parliament. It has never been under threat more than today, because of Brexit... 
UK is deporting more EU citizens since Brexit, despite promises to guarantee their rights  
Brexit: workers' rights best secured by staying in single market, says TUC chief  
Support for another Scottish independence referendum is falling faster than Alex Salmond doing a bungee jump. 
London extends lead as world's top finance centre despite Brexit  
Here's @JuliaHB1 sermonising about democracy. And here she is, days before the Referendum, peddling misinformation to voters.  
Latest Z/Yen survey of world's top 92 financial centres:1. London2. New York3. Hong Kong"despite Brexit" 
There are far too many joyless souls around who wish to Remain in the EU, writes Mandy Baldwin #csm #brexit  
Revealed: The Tory MPs using taxpayers’ cash to fund a secretive hard-Brexit group.  
Continued membership of the EU single market is the best way to protect British workers after Brexit #TUC17 
Should be clear that this is not a Brexit Bill. It is an attempt to remove parliamentary scrutiny of Govt activity. Don't they understand? 
Is Brexit the answer to immigration? Apparently not.... and Nigel Farage knows it.#MondayMotivation 
Ruth Davidson calls for new focus on education on 20th anniversary of Scottish devolution referendum  
Talking on @gmb about Tony Blair who called 4 free movement to end to halt Brexit. What a cheek. He opened floodgates in 1st place 
Catalunya on footing to declare independence if Spanish government continues to refuse a referendum. 
Grayling pledges Britain's maritime industry will make waves post-Brexit  
How the current political fixation with Brexit jeopardises the economy  
[PRESS RELEASE] Customs arrangements after Brexit could cost UK traders £4bn  
Truth is that no one has any confidence in the ability of Davis Johnson or Fox to handle Brexit negotiations @BBCNews 
The latest of #Irma & Brexit coming up on @BBCBreakfast & also @Baddiel, the grandson of Mahatma Gandhi, @ArunMGandhi & Richard Dormer 
The EU is drafting measures to make sure its emissions market is Brexit-proof  
My FT column on why  UK's proposed immigration regime will limit options for a post-Brexit trade agreement with EU.  
Former UK leader advises immigration curbs instead of Brexit:  
In the aftermath of Brexit, Wallace confronts his own internalized xenophobia. Gromit downloads Skype. 
#Mercer #CambridgeAnalytica "Revealed: how US billionaire helped to back #Brexit"  #FarRightGlobalCoup #TrumpRussia 
Blocking EU repeal bill is vote for chaotic Brexit, minister warns UK lawmakers  
#Berlin: #startup capital’s appeal growing  #fintech #insurtech @Jonathan_Moules #VC #brexit  
Time for brexiters to own brexit and take responsibility .. Know a Brexiter? Be kind, but remind them they caused this.  
The village of Gourec in Brittany has long been home to British expats. With Brexit, even more are flocking there.  
Today the UK parliament votes on its own relevance. Any MP who supports the Withdrawal Bill is betraying democracy.It's that simple#Brexit 
Brexit: Theresa May accused by TUC of 'Santa wish list'  
If Tories rip the UK out the EU in a Brexit power grab, Scotland will be dictated to and anything left will be pillaged by Wm capitalists  
Post-Brexit customs checks could cost 4 billion pounds a year, study says  
We're at that stage of #Brexit when @Conservatives politicians are actingto cover themselves & save their own skinsPublic good be damned 
The referendum on Scottish independence passed you by? I'm in bloody Australia and I knew about it! 
Yeah, let's all just shrug our shoulders and let mindless #Brexit vandals damage our country & harm its people. No fucking way! #StopBrexit 
Brexit: workers' rights best secured by staying in single market, says TUC chief  
Bill has basic gap. Doesn't say if EU rights count as primary or secondary legislation after Brexit. Gov too scared/ overwhelmed to be clear  
50,000 thousand attend anti-Brexit rally in London  
Wales and Scotland launch challenge against Theresa May's Brexit  
If a 15 year old genuinely thinks Brexit has "stolen their future", their parents and teachers have a LOT to answer for.  
Theresa May's government 'will collapse over Brexit in 2018', claim Morgan Stanley |  
The way forward on #Brexit is a new poll on whatever EU deal is reached | Andrew Adonis  
clue: he campaigned for years for an eu referendum and now he thinks he's friends with trump.  
Blocking EU repeal bill is vote for chaotic Brexit, minister warns UK lawmakers  
Who cares what the former leader of a party without a single MP thinks? #StopQuotingFarage #Brexit @EUflagmafia 
Louise Mensch is godmother to Jacob Rees-Mogg's son? holly gosh n golly, that's too much lulz 
'Brussels want to DAMAGE Britain!' EU setting Brexit TRAP for May  
550 people were asked if they liked Blair. 17 said Yes. The rest wanted him out of the UK. Time he shut his mouth & stayed out of brexit. 
#Brexit and Trump campaigns were linked and with illegal foreign monies  
A blatant Tory power grab.Always been my concern with a Tory Brexit.Brexit has always been about empowering the Tory party.  
Forget your red buses, phone boxes, tinned shortbread. To the rest of the world we are now basically Brexit and people's televised danglies. 
Everything we were told about Brexit that turned out to be wrong 
The 3 steps to "exit from Brexit""For P's sake"= What have we done?"For love of P"= Think again!"In the name of P"= We want to stay put!  
Brexiters may feel they have won. In fact all they have is sort of won a skirmish. We will win the war, Brexit will not happen. 
Yep the madness continues tomorrow with votes at 12pm in #Westminster. #MidnightMadness @theSNP #brexitshambles #Brexit  
Brian Adcock on Tony Blair stopping Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney pic.twitter.com/vlXDXmbaWh 
Russian bots out in force yesterday. Kremlin obviously worried about a second referendum  
Reminder: Top legal opinion is Article 50 notification can be revoked  #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Just you wait until Brexit kicks in properly and the NHS is gone.  
As UN Special Rapp finds UK flouting duty to protect citizens from toxic air pollution, what happens post-Brexit?  
The fantasy that #Brexit would be easy is costing us dear  
May be all shook up but Elvis has definitely NOT left the EU!Brexit isn't going to happen.  
Chief Minister of Gibraltar Says Rock Will Strengthen UK Ties After Brexit  
Thx Team effort #EUflagmafia @No10Vigil @EUflagmafia We did this for the musicians but scientists face similar brexit problems. #BrexitFail 
50 Hardnesses of Brexit is coincidentally the title of my soft-core pornography novel that is coming out e-book soon 
Gib Chief Minister on Brexit is well worth a read. Last year he said it was "existential crisis" but now...  pic.twitter.com/771BLGnZjb 
With his latest witterings on Brexit, Tony Blair is fighting a war against his own irrelevance – and losing   
52/48 is not a mandate for hard Brexit. It is literally a mandate for the 2nd softest Brexit of the 50 hardnesses of Brexit. 
The novels that explain Britain’s path from the Raj to Brexit  
Unfortunately, I wasn't chosen to speak during Brexit Questions on Thurs. Had I been, these would have been my questions to @DavidDavisMP: pic.twitter.com/dT5FBv9OuM 
And speaking of democracy; the govt. said it called the election because it NEEDED a bigger majority to proceed with Brexit. It now… 
Tommy Robinson SLAMS government for giving amnesty to ILLEGAL immigrants at Grenfell Tower  via @Your Brexit 
One of better things about Brexit is how you can follow it directly by reading primary documents, and not be reliant on politicians/media. 
Gibraltar’s government reverses bitter opposition to Brexit and declares they are ‘hugely optimistic’ about Britai…  
As ever returning from Eastern Europe on a flight full of the young is a reminder that Brexit was a vote against futures by the sour old. 
Important thread. Brexit or no Brexit, never apologise for welcoming former Communist countries into EU or allowing their cits immediate FoM  
You're completely wrong he is showing courage and leadership. We will oppose Brexit. National suicide is not on our political agenda.  
Rachel Johnson, Boris's sister, on @SkyNews "Brexit wl finish more political careers than I've hd breakfasts"."May will go down with Brexit" 
Is Brexit still on? Asking for a friend. Democracy, making people believe they actually had a say since 1000 BC. 
But that's just it!!! The cause of Brexit is *not* immigration. The cause of Brexit is lies about immigration. Which Blair accepts as fact.  
DP Ruto >> We can even change the constitution because we have the majority. He is forgetting fundamental changes must go through referendum 
Shame on every politician that doesn't take every opportunity to say how ghastly Brexit is.  
How Brexit is quietly killing science  
I refuse to make every bad play by Kirk a contract referendum. 
The Observer view on Tory ineptitude on Brexit negotiations | Observer editorial  POSTED AGAIN IN CASE YOU MISSED IT 
I have no position on independence itself--but in a democracy a populous region such as Catalonia or Scotland has the right to a referendum. 
Thanks, Tony, for introducing some much needed xenophobia into the anti-Brexit debate. We haven't heard enough anti-immigration arguments. 
Kurdistan is getting more and more colorful as we are approaching the upcoming referendum.Ankrê tonight as always wears its golden colors  
Thousands march through London against Brexit – video  
Brexit: Wales and Scotland to launch challenge against Theresa May's bid for sweeping new powers  
Catalan president @KRLS: "The government already has everything ready for the referendum"  
Out of patience? Then come to the rally in Manchester on 1st Oct, Brian. Don't stand on the sidelines while Brexit wrecks your university.  
I've never been employed by Jubilee! I do think Kenyatta is a great President though. Hoping for a   free trade deal post Brexit! 
We have a FB Page where we share our Pro-EU Labour message. Give us a like if you're Labour and against Brexit  
Geneve. Kurdistani diaspora rallied to support Referendum. Kurdistan independence is unstoppable. Intl community prepare for a new state.  
Don't let Theresa May's Brexit coup sideline Parliament  
Guy Verhofstadt: "Biggest victims of Brexit talks are citizens."CNBC exclusive  
How does a Kurdish man feel about coming referendum for independence from Iraq? Jubilant. "I am free. I have power.”  
Domestic observation: pat of butter now £1.60. Was 95p a year ago. Whatever long term gains it's a real cost of Brexit in people's pockets. 
Only 17% of Scots want another costly and pointless referendum @NicolaSturgeon, time to open your ears and drop the dead donkey:#refoff 
It would be funny if it wasn't so serious, but chaos of #Brexit is purely a result of Tory party trying to solve it's own internal squabbles 
The EU appears to want NO post-Brexit free trade deal with the UK. We should remind Brussels that 38 other Non-EU countries DO want them. 
Biafra Today: Biafra: Nigeria's Security Roadblocks Meant For Extorting Biafrans, On Referendum We Stand  
Theresa May's government heading for 'kamikaze' Brexit, TUC boss warns  
Blair is right on Brexit – but he is wrong to pander on immigration | Matthew d’Ancona  
Please retweet! Many Remainers are still unaware of upcoming anti-#Brexit events! #StopBrexit @LibDems @Labour4EU 
WE OWE THEM NOTHING.  Theresa May urged to leave with NO Brexit deal to tear EU unity apart.      
You can dismiss Mandelson, Blair, Heseltine, Clarke etc cos of their baggage, but on Brexit they're the grown ups compared with current pols  
Thinking of giving up & accepting #Brexit? Think again. This is the type of person & destructive mentality we're up against.#StopBrexitHour 
You are a good man and we are proud to be in the same Party @hilarybennmp. Please reject Brexit. #StopBrexitHour 
Have realised the only way to solve Brexit is a Carry On Loving-style food fight between the warring factions. 
Brexit nationalism is mainly an English nationalism in its extreme form. It exacerbates a real breakup of the UK  
#StopBrexitHour - let's support @UKLabour MPs and members who are against #Brexit@Labour4EU 
This man voted for Brexit to "stop immigration of Muslims". Apparently "movement across Europe is fair enough". I just... can't.  
Did you miss this? Morgan Stanley's predicts - Tories Brexit shambles means they won't survive the next year >>  
Galloway: Mass of British people outside champagne-bubble support Brexit and end of free movement  
Say NO to the Tories in Manchester. NO to austerity, NO to xenophobia, NO to Brexit. #StopBrexitHourJoin us 
Brexit will see Britain short of 60,000 nurses and midwives because of crackdown on immigration 
Dear .@BorisJohnson -people believed lie of 350 mill/wk for NHS.They voted for Brexit. What will you tell them now?  
Brexit will annihilate the NHS which survives due to incredible diversity of staff in it. Put pressure on your MP. 
If Law Society of Scotland are worried about Brexit bill damaging Scots law & Scottish Parliament it must be serious threat #StopBrexitHour 
Leave voters were told Brexit meant taking back control. The Tories want it for themselves.Let’s stop them in Manchester.#StopBrexitHour 
The Tories devastated the North West under Thatcher. Let's not let them do it again with Brexit#StopBrexitHour … 
#TUC17 passes @ProspectUnion motion on protecting science in #Brexit overwhelmingly  
FM @NicolaSturgeon to speak tomorrow 11 am GMT to mark 20th anniversary of devolution referendum #DevoRef20 
Another senior Labour figure backs what Greens call a ratification referendum, with option of remaining in EU.    
Our first GMB speaker of the week @dawsoncraig up at the rostrum talking Brexit #tuc17 
Tony Blair's bid to stop Brexit is "hopeless", politicians say  
Frankfurt eyes post-Brexit status as a top-rated Global Financial Centre. Give us a break! It's a small provincial city. London is #1. 
News just in, supporting workers' rights to campaign for better pay and conditions 'elitist', and I did Brexit.  
With his latest witterings on #Brexit, Tony Blair is fighting a war against his own irrelevance – and losing  
Thousands of pro-EU demonstrators have staged a protest in London against Brexit  
Union Boss warns of the dangers of a Tory Brexit and demands access to the single market. It's time to #StopBrexit 
Excellent piece by @georgegalloway - Mass of people outside champagne-bubble support Brexit and end of free movement  
Blair is right on Brexit - but he is wrong to pander on immigration | Matthew d’Ancona  
Modern Brits: some of the most benign, tolerant people on the planet. Very rarely complain (aloud). Rarely stand up.We stood up for Brexit 
Len: our best hope for workers' rights is not a hard or soft Brexit nor a 2nd referendum. It's a Labour govt under Corbyn's leadership. 
"If Theresa May uses Brexit as a pretext to remove workers' rights, she will live to regret it," says @unitetheunion's Len at #TUC17 
Then there's the £1bn 'Supply & Confidence' bribe to keep them in power, the £50bn+ to extricate us from the EU, the list goes on and on.... 
DIVIDE AND CONQUER: Theresa May urged to leave with NO Brexit deal to tear EU unity apart  
UK doesn't need Brexit to curb EU immigration, says former PM Blair  
You repeat a lie constantly recycled by Brexiters, but easily disproved (Brexit = bad history)  
nothin screams brexit britain mer than tenner entry tae an illegal rave 
Support for holding a Scottish independence vote ahead of Brexit has tumbled to 17%, according to Panelbase polling.  
Britain's longest married couple aged 105 and 104 suffer their first-ever row - over BREXIT  
.@SteveT_Unite moves General Council statement on #Brexit - making a jobs-first, rights-first Brexit #TUC17 
Tony Blair: we can control immigration without ‘sledgehammer’ of Brexit – video  
Taking a break from Twitter for a while. Nothing to worry about. Try and stop Brexit while I'm gone FFS! 
15 mnths since #Brexit vote. 6 mnths since A50 trigger. 4.5m citizens from UK & mainland Europe still in limbo. Shame on you May,Gove,Davis 
The Referendum committee mtg ended. Postponing referendum completely rejected, parliament session in 14/9,ask intl observers 2 participate. 
If Brexit wasn't pointless enough, remember, in 20 years, when all the nostalgic, empire loving oldies are dead, we'l be voting back in. 
2016 - Carshalton & Wallington votes 57:43 for Brexit2017 - Carshalton & Wallington MP joins protest rally against BrexitFunny old world.  
"Crazy that Catalans, who joined Spain in a peaceful war now want to separate with a violent referendum."  
Opinion: All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed  
Dear #Brexit fans. You know "we only joined a trading bloc not a political union" don't you? Wrong. Sorry, but have a little read.#Brexit  
Britons will lose freedom of movement in 31 countries because of bastards like Farage, Banks, Murdoch Dacre & Desmond. #GE2017 #Brexit pic.twitter.com/GpDI4prevj 
Even Tory arenaniac Ken Clarke says Brexit inevitable. So why are Labour & Tony Blair trying to scupper it 
Leeds for Europe #StopBrexit campaign in Leeds on Sept 16.@LeedsEurope#Brexit  
1. By now we should have seen progress in Brexit talks but instead Theresa May is held hostage by her hard Brexit fringe. 
The EU isn't punishing Britain we are punishing ourselves. Brexit is an act of self harm inflected by the Brexiteers. Time to #StopBrexit 
There is no Brexit ‘punishment’, apart from the self-inflicted one  
*Brexit Minded Britain*  
Brexit will see Britain short of 60,000 nurses and midwives  
Salmond calls for Scotland to be in free trade area to escape 'full English Brexit'  
When Heath finally succeeded in gaining entry, this is how his celebratory speech began. #Brexit  
'With his latest witterings on Brexit, Tony Blair is fighting a war against his own irrelevance - and losing'  
Just to be clear - I will be voting AGAINST the EU Bill tomorrow + measures to limit parliamentary scrutiny of reckless right-wing #Brexit 
Bloody nancyboy spastics who need a stint in Her Majesty's Armed Forces. Hard Brexit needed!  
Here's the thing Brexiters we are NEVER going to stop trying to return to the EU. If you Brexit we will carry on until we return. 
Why EU will never get its £90bn Brexit divorce bill  
No, you're 15 and Brexit just gave you a future. So stop whinging and start living your life you ungrateful little scrote !!!  
Is the world ready for “Kurdexit”? Referendum among Iraqi Kurds has Middle East on edge @Salon  
We live in extremely dangerous times - 4 weeks ago he made clear he's a white supremacist by defending Nazis, now this. Like Brexit 1/  
Maybe Rolf Harris also has some deep insight on #Brexit but both men for different reasons have blotted their copy book beyond repair.  
If #Indonesia was a democracy, they would respect the right of West Papuans to have a referendum. #LetWestPapuaVote pic.twitter.com/hbqnRe88hQ 
Farage admits #brexit is a mess. How predictable, that he won't take responsibility for his own part in it.  
The EU referendum ballot could have asked... Do you care about your children? 
Kurds along with #Chaldean & Assyrian #Christians in #Erbil rally for #Kurdistan independence referendum.#KurdistanReferendum 
Amazing talk on Brexit and Me as part of incredible #CityVoices for @GlosHistFest. So important to have this discussion. 
BREXIT MEANS HIGHER WAGES  
Brexit Secretary David Davis is saying very different things today than he was a year ago 
Brexit.  
I'm glad that there are so many people who can see how much damage #Brexit will do to our country. My original comment was sarcasm. 
'Whose side are you on?' Marr SAVAGES Blair for working on anti-Brexit plot with Juncker  
The sad fact is #Tonyblair doesn't want to keep Britain in the EU for us but the 1% which is just as unacceptable as hard Brexit. 
Impact of Brexit will be more profound than expected, ex-Barclays boss Bob Diamond says  
Who else thinks this is a more authentic expression of Brexit than many would care to admit?  
'Two men who have nothing in common, and they have to keep Crystal Palace in the Premier League.'Quick scene where Lee explains Brexit. 
Researchers riled by lack of detail in #Brexit science plans:  
Prime Minister failing to prepare public for inevitable 'compromises' of Brexit, #brexitwontwork 
Heseltine makes sense: "The big Brexit immigration myth and a monumental deception"  
Making a jobs-first, rights-first Brexit a reality. The TUC General Council's statement to Congress 2017  #TUC17 
"Senior MPs including Liam Fox, Andrea Leadsom & Jacob Rees-Mogg have used expenses to fund a party within a party" 
Whatever his words, when Blair speaks, people hear 'continuity'. How his interventions must delight those who badged Brexit as 'change'. 
Plymouth's 3 UKIP councillors are joining the Conservatives. "they now accept the work of UKIP" is done "with the outcome of the Referendum" 
#honestpoll Why did #brexit happen? Pls RT for inclusivity. Debate/Evidence welome. Follow for updates. 
Words of wisdom from Lord Heseltine telling us to turn back from the Brexit cliff. It is time Britain listened to the wise. #StopBrexit 
'Whose side are you on?' Marr SAVAGES Blair for working on anti-Brexit plot with Juncker  
What on earth is the Conservative Govt thinking? The post-Brexit British passport could be made by a French company.  
The height of #Brexit lunacy! #StopBrexit now 
This is the golden Brexit future we were promised: a chicken lasagne Brexit.  
Foreign passports? UK passports could be made in Europe after #Brexit  
Crooked, Lying,Desperate, Blair suddenly talks tougher on migration in bid to stop Brexit – Westmonster.    #fo2eu 
Trade union leaders accuse the Government of pursuing a 'kamikaze' Brexit  
Tony Blair's bid to stop Brexit with tougher immigration rules 'hopeless'  
Tony Blair repeats his advice "Brexit will be bad for the UK" Then again he said we should go to war so he can stick his advice up his arse 
GM friend finally explained 2 me #Brexit.She says it's the English term for scrambled eggs. Having my brexit with a side honey & figs.  
Nothing says neo liberalism quite so much as #Tonyblair's recent intervention on Brexit that calls to end freedom of movement. 
Chair of @G15London housing group echoes my warning of crippling effect of Govt leaked Brexit migration plans on the construction industry.  
 @NicolaSturgeon: 20 years on from the devolution referendum we face a Brexit power grab.  
The irony is that I have a cousin called Ramona who voted for Brexit 
UK doesn't need Brexit to curb EU immigration, says former PM Blair  
"There are better ways of dealing with the country's problems than #Brexit" — Tony Blair  
Which means the vote to remain in the EEC in 1975 was also illegitimate. On that basis, no need for Brexit as we're not even part of the EU 
Whether you love him or loathe him, Blair talks a lot of sense on Brexit. 
And how @acgrayling do you propose that we attempt to count the votes of those who choose not to take part in a national referendum?  
Amazing. The Rasputin of Brussels who is trying to scupper a Brexit deal threatened to punch a reporter   
Blair, who opened floodgates to EU migrants promising only 15k would come, now offers new controls to stop #Brexit  
We don't need EU immigration control, we need EU tax-avoidance controls which tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press barons want to escape.  
UK has no coherent trade strategy to improve the widening #trade deficit after #Brexit. Let's talk about ice-cream & sunglasses instead!  
No ifs,not buts,Labour must come clean on Brexit. It can't keep conning young people that they're with them on this issue when they are not 
Casemates... celebrate Referendum 50 on National Day.  
Apparently people still believe in the big red Brexit bus of lies. Sad really, the level people go to to avoid admitting they were duped.  
Brexit is lamentable, and it risks breaking up our nations, when compromise should have been a political obligation.  
'Whose side are you on?' Marr SAVAGES Blair for working on anti-Brexit plot with Juncker  BLAIR TRAITOR TOO THE END 
I'm still giggling about this. Sums up Brexit beautifully I think.  
Tony Blair is off his trolley on Brexit. (My latest for Reaction @reactionlife) 
Brexit- issues were the over crowed Schools, long waits in Hospitals, GP appointments, social housing, all of which will remain after Brexit 
The day after Brexit they'll realise it's f*cking stupid when lorries are held at customs & Brits aren't getting essential medical treatment 
This is same as non-debate over soft-Brexit vs Remain. Campaign more successful if we treat agreement as useful multi-pronged PR strategy. 
Blair and other politicians talking tough on immigration are just bolstering the #Leavelies that immigrants are benefits scroungers.#Brexit  
"Tony Blair says UK could restrict immigration without Brexit."We're not a burden. We contribute more than we take! 
Shout-out to Michael Fallon & his fellow Brexit converts & revisionists: this is what a certain Margaret Thatcher had to say to you in 1988  
Leavers promised £350m a week for NHS. The reality?Brexit will see Britain short of 60,000 nurses and midwives.  
North Norfolk MP Norman Lamb: ‘I will vote against Brexit bill’  
Leaked memo from City's Brexit envoy reveals ‘sobering’ analysis of EU stance  
Shame on you, Mr Blair, for making anti-migrant hate the driving force in Brexit debate yet again by accepting lies as fact. My thoughts:  
Public should do what Iceland did &mass*protest outside Parliament until all those who misled on #Brexit stand down  
The absurd degree of dis-information contained in UK tabloids begins to explain why the UK voted Brexit - and why the future is grim.  
If you also predicted cake-eating unicorns, forgive me, but I'm not that interested in your claim that Brexit is inevitable. 
The reality of Brexit for the NHS is not an extra £350m a week, it's a worsening shortage of nurses and midwives  
French & German firms have reportedly been shortlisted for the contract to produce Britain's post-Brexit passports.  
WATCH Ken Clarke Tells Blair: Brexit is Inevitable  
There's clearly only one way this Brexit thing is going to end, so sign up early to enter the "First against the wall is…" prize-draw!  
The EU does not work for youngsters. Just ask the record high number of unemployed youngsters in Spain, Italy and Greece. #brexit 
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
"It's vital that we come out in force for this Diada for the Oct. 1 referendum to be successful"—#CatalanPresident 
One of the worst things about Brexit is British figures still arrogantly talking about reform of the EU. Not ours to reform now. 
Presumably, as a 'non-conservative' you're appalled by the Tory plan to use Brexit to bypass democracy?  
SOLID: EU lashing out as UK negotiators push back on Brexit bill. Juncker whinging about David Davis!  
"We didn't have 17 million racist people voting for Brexit": Conservative MP Dominic Raab on immigration #Paterson @skynewsniall 
‘Exit from Brexit’: Protesters march in London to demand U-turn on EU withdrawal  
Tony Blair said Brexit is "a distraction, not a solution" on the #Marr show. 
It's 444 days since the Brexit vote, which means it equals the US Iran Embassy standoff as the longest hostage crisis in recorded history. 
This underlines growing feeing of embarrassment in UK that @EdwardJDavey spoke about at anti-Brexit march yesterday. 
Immigrants didn't create pressure on public services. Lack of funding did that and it will be a lot worse after Brexit. 
Blair immigration proposals make me v.uncomfortable. Therefore likely to be am effective anti-Brexit PR strategy  
Andrew Adonis tells @georgeeaton: Labour will back a new Brexit referendum within six months 
The euro area's economy is on course for its fastest expansion in a decade  
Please remember: no-one in isIam is quilty for 1400 years of slaughtering EuropeansBut every white child born is quilty for nazi.#Brexit  
Tony Blair serves nobody but himself, a spin doctor for a 'privileged few'.#Marr#Brexit 
 from 3"00.Public money used to fund research for a secretive,Toryparty hardline Brexit cabal  
Memo to @SkyNews Your repetition of the Remainer term "cliff edge Brexit" proves you are just as hopeless a Remainer echo chamber as BBC 
Tony Blair calls on MPs and ministers to rise up and oppose Brexit as he hints at plans for a new political party  
Brexit: Wales and Scotland to launch challenge against Theresa May's bid for sweeping new powers | The Independent  
On Monday we celebrate the 20th anniversary #Scotland’s devolution referendum #DevoRef20 
Tony Blair urges pro-EU MPs to publicly campaign to stop Brexit  
DESPERATE: Tony Blair talking tough on migration as he tries to stop Brexit. The public aren't stupid, Tony!  
Theresa May: ‘Immigration must fall after Brexit’  via @Your Brexit 
Grateful for this clear , trenchant statement :  All 4parts of UK must be heard in Brexit negotiations: Independent  
Sorting #Brexit details: "Can it be done in 10 months?" @skynewsniall asks Tory MP Ken Clarke. His answer? "No" #Paterson @SkyNews 
"He's as out of touch now as he was in 2004" says @UniteforLen of Tony Blair #Brexit comments. 
I can use my fans' hatred of the devil Blair to legitimise my opposition to his pro-EU plan, thus helping me keep #Brexit on track! #Marr 
Yesterday's @peoplesmarch4eu was awesome. Communities rising up against this Brexit mess the Govt is making.  
Good piece but idea nationalism as historically 'non English/UK' doesn't ring true IMO. British exceptionalist thinking underpinned #brexit  
Why #scotref is necessary BEFORE Brexit. If we wait till after, many if not most EU citizens will be gone. 
This is simple, obvious, and true: Brexit must be stopped.  
The way forward on Brexit is a new poll on whatever EU deal is reached | Andrew Adonis  
EU immigration offer could lead to Brexit reversal, claims Adonis  
Tories are using EU Withdrawal Bill to "rewrite history of devolution", @LeanneWood writes for Sunday Times  #Brexit 
There is no Brexit ‘punishment’, apart from the self-inflicted one  Stupendously stupid act of self-harm. #StopBrexit 
How about we partition the UK into two countries. The Republic of Remania and Lesser Brexit ? 
We should have a referendum on whether Tony Blair should be indicted for War Crimes.#marr 
11. The success of yet another #PeoplesMarch4EU has freaked out the leaders of the online drive for Brexit.Real people on the streets  
Those dealing 'directly with Brexit are 'horrified at potential for disaster', says Vince Cable  
The Observer view on Theresa May and the shambolic Brexit negotiations #May is not a capable or trustworthy leader 
Just to make it clear, it isn't about Brexit, it's about parliamentary democracy. Charles I was shorter at the end of his reign for a reason 
suspect some elements of British exceptionalism are a masked and polite way of saying English nationalism.Brexit sadly breeding  intolerance  
Losing the little trust I had left in our sycophantic MPs who put their own careers and party before country #Brexit 
The Brexit mindset: 'Twisted reasoning' @guardian 
The #Brexit Paradox reclaim Soverignty from a Bureaucratic EU & give it to Tory UK elites that erode every right you currently enjoy #marr 
Patiently waiting for a good reason to Brexit.  
TB: We voted for Brexit w/out knowing what the terms were. Should take final decision once we see the terms.  #Marr 
TB: Brexit is a distraction not a solution for the challenges that the UK faces. Need to address concerns.  #Marr 
Blair on one side of the argument, Farage on the other, we really are surrounded by complete Tossers. #Brexit 
#marr Any one listening to Tony Blair talking nonsense! Biggest liar ever, no one believes a word he says. Do all he can stop Brexit idiot.  
Tony Blair. The only man who unites the British people on #Brexit. The Leavers hate him & the Remainers hate him too. 
"#Brexit is a distraction to the problems this country faces" — Tony Blair  #Marr 
More people voted for #Brexit Mr Blair than ever voted for you. Focus on fighting the Corbynism you helped create  
"Brexit is a distraction, not a solution" says Tony Blair #marr 
Having Tony Blair on the #Remain side is probably the biggest endorsement for #Brexit 
Tony Blair talks a lot of sense on @AndrewMarr9. 'There is a better solution for Britain than Brexit' 
2. The people organising the online promotion of Brexit know a decision on the nature of Brexit will have to be put to the country. 
#marr #marrshow "#Labour will back a new #Brexit referendum within six months"  
TB: This paper looks at controlling EU migration in ways that mean you don’t need to do Brexit.  #Marr #EuropeRtC 
Blair's intervention on immigration far too little far far too late. Brexit is about democracy - running our own country - not just borders 
My patience has run out. Yes, David, brexit may result in chaos, and it will be your bloody fault if it does.  
With #brexit talk on @MarrShow who do you think would lead best negotiations? #marr @Keir_Starmer @DavidDavisMP RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
An Arab-Turkmen demonstration was launched in Mandali district of Diyala province against the Kurdish referendum 
For Iraq’s long-suffering Kurds, a referendum on independence is a moment of reckoning  
I just published “Exiting Brexit”  
Thousands of pro-EU demonstrators have staged a protest in London against Brexit  
The big Brexit immigration myth and a monumental deception  via @MailOnline 
As an EU national living in Britain, everything about Brexit is a personal and political affront. Thank you for your voice and eloquence. 
Jacob Rees Mogg supports Brexit, shutting our borders, lower taxes and authentic Conservative values. Would you like him as our next PM?  
Tony Blair: get tough on immigration to stop Brexit  
The anti-Brexit People’s March for Europe attracted only 15-20,000 people.  Hardly a ringing endorsement for the #Remain crowd 
There is no Brexit ‘punishment’, apart from the self-inflicted one  
I'd suggest dragging Blair out is not a clever way to fight Brexit, politically toxic. #marr 
Desperate Blair suddenly talks tougher on migration in bid to stop Brexit  
When it comes to Brexit scoops, the reaction to the story is also a story  
Things that fail to change democratic #Brexit votePetitionsCourtsPoemsMarchesThings that will change democratic #Brexit voteNothing 
And a huge thank you to everyone who voted Brexit and did this to the £. €80 now costs £83, or£86 with commission. Bravo.  
#Brexit will see Britain short of 60,000 nurses and midwives because of crackdown on immigration - Mirror Online  
A Swansea MP has asked Parliament to consider a second #Brexit referendum  
Friends! I didn't get a wink of sleep last night!I just lay there, shaking with fear about the evidence & the horror building over Brexit.  
Barça fans demanding independence at Camp Nou THREE WEEKS before the October 1 independence referendum!  
If Labour's leadership won't stick to their Brexit principles, why should their frontbenchers be punished for sticking to theirs?  
There is no Brexit ‘punishment’, apart from the self-inflicted one  
Let's look at the 1933 timeline on BBC bitesize. The smokescreen from the #Brexit 'bonfire of red tape' looks like our modern Reichstag fire pic.twitter.com/cV00l9po2R 
There is no Brexit punishment except the self-inflicted  Today's Observer column 
Right. Off to the Riga KGB headquarters to pick up my bonus cheque from the Kremlin for my work on Brexit.  
It's now 15 months after Brexit. It is quite clear that some people have very little in their lives. I suppose it was a good walk!  
US ‘still eager’ to sign post-Brexit trade deal with Britain  
20 yrs after devolution referendum, new @SundayTimesScot @Panelbase poll on impact of @ScotParl. 
“During Enlightenment, Mozart, Handel & Bach lived & worked in London. Presumably under the Brexit dark ages, they would not be welcome."  
Protestors demand 'exit from Brexit' as @GreenJeanMEP calls for people to vote on final decision via @HuffPostUK 
Brexit can and must be stopped, but it will be this EU that we remain in, not a fantasy one, and it is risky to put it off until later 23/23 
'We've got them on the ropes!' Why EU will NEVER get its £90bn Brexit divorce bill  
So the post-Brexit British passport could be made in France. That's taking back control  
All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed - The Washington Post  
The biggest worry for sterling is not Brexit, but Jeremy Corbyn, writes @JeremyWarnerUK #Premium 
Brexit: Wales and Scotland to launch challenge against Theresa May's bid for sweeping new powers  
The "Foreigners are to Blame" genie is out of the bottle. The Leave Campaign pulled the cork. If "Brexit" had a Brain, it could be washed... 
Firstly, early 2019 is too late for a deal v remain ref. By then EU27's extensive plans for post-Brexit will be fully underway. 3/ 
EU immigration offer could lead to Brexit reversal, claims Adonis  
Thousands of anti-Brexit protesters march on Parliament  
A referendum is coming, but Spanish bond yields are a picture of calm  
Tony Blair calls for tougher immigration controls in bid to stop Brexit  
Calls for unity as thousands attend anti-Brexit rally in London | Politics | The Guardian  
The Observer view on Tory ineptitude on Brexit negotiations | Observer editorial | Opinion | The Guardian  
Unemployment falls, optimism rises in the EU a year after Brexit vote  
A Hungarian perspective on popular sovereignty in the post-Brexit era  via @BrexitCentral 
Most Scots don't want a second referendum, and won't allow the SNP to blame all of Scotland's problems on the south  
The way forward on Brexit is a new poll on whatever EU deal is reached | Andrew Adonis  
We can afford no more dithering from Mrs May#Brexit  
I added a video to a @YouTube playlist  No Referendum No election by Don Prince aka Sampe 
Brexit: A little less speculation, a little more action  
Michelle.Rempel@parl.gc.ca: Canada do you want a Referendum on Muslim immigration? - Sign the Peti...  via @CdnChange 
Man, #UVaTwitter is all up in its feels tonight. Here’s a thought: How about every game isn’t a referendum on the program. Let it play out. 
"Exit from Brexit": Thousands rallied in London to protest Britain’s exit from EU  
Wales and Scotland launch challenge against Theresa May's Brexit  
A Warning from the U.K.  w/ @jongaunt via @RadioGaffney A must listen show of what is coming. The reason for #Brexit 
This picture says it all--that moment when President Trump became the RNC candidate. A true moment of national pride! #MAGA 
."Brexit is in danger of leaving our NHS in intensive care.". 
Brexit: UK Tories propose changing thousands of laws in secret, without Parliamentary oversight  
So I 'stole' someone's future for them by voting Brexit?Fuck 'em.They ruined my country by voting Blair.Payback is a bitch. 
Spain's crackdown on bid to hold independence referendum in Catalonia 3 weeks from now  
Here in America, we view Brexit like the election of Trump. A kind of national mass cult suicide based on lies that weren't even that slick. 
The Observer view on Tory ineptitude on Brexit negotiations | Observer editorial  
Theresa May's plan to gain sweeping new powers ahead of Brexit - Morten Morland - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
You 'respect' 37% of the advisory referendum electorate ( itself gerrymandered) as a democratic majority? = 26% of the population? Really?  
All you who mouth the lying piety of 'will of the people' - 37% of an electorate in an advisory referendum = 26% of the people - betray us.  
Behave, Mr Williamson. The 'democratic will' you speak of was 37% of a gerrymandered electorate, and there is NO MANDATE for Brexit.  
#Brexiteers might be fascinated to know that Russia's #trollfarms are tweeting for #Brexit. Just like they did for #Trump.#PeoplesMarch4EU 
Brexit is both Titanic and iceberg. A small idiot mob has barricaded bridge and engine room while Dacre's band plays Nearer My God To Thee. 
A QUARTER of people who voted #Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
EU immigration offer could lead to Brexit reversal, claims Adonis  
Tonight:1) BBC giving out EU flags at the Proms, splutter!<they didn't>2) Why did BBC not cover the anti-Brexit march, rage!<they did> 
We had a thriving business importing German sausages...then Brexit came along. Wurst case scenario... 
By late 2019 demographic change on its own will give #Remain the majority. A majority which will grow during any transition period#Brexit  
.@Nigel_Farage led successful #Brexit Vote now just as in US losers refuse 2 accept outcome like spoiled brats  
Wow!  @MikeH_PR interview with @mrjamesob A must, must, must, must listen!  Bots & trolls. #Brexit  
WATCH: Gina Miller gets DESTROYED on Sky News for saying Britain should PAY BREXIT BILL | Your Brexit  
Coveney calls on Britain to remain in extended customs union post-Brexit  
Let's all have a vote on the final Brexit deal. Seems fair to me. If it's going to be so great: let's vote on it. 
Thousands of anti-Brexit protesters march on Parliament  
On the streets of London with thousands of anti-Brexit campaigners  
@ centre of Britishness, the Last Night of the Proms, the EU flag of UNITY was in evidence. Clearly not all UK citizens agree with Brexit.  
I am so very proud of the young people in the UK. Wave the EU flag with pride and ignore all the #Brexit bigots. #lastnightoftheproms 
Dealing with #Brexit is too big for one party. We need to work across parties & administrations. My piece -  
Here is the game plan to stop Brexit. Please retweet.  
."We need to secure a referendum on the ultimate May/Davis deal (or non-deal if they decide to crash out)". 
The Tory party is heading inexorably towards demographic extinction #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
If you want to keep Leavers mobilised comparing them to Nazis, & Brexit to a fascist state, is pretty much the way to do it  
3 years since the referendum when Scotland voted to stay with the UK, we face leaving the EU & the UK diminish our powers.It's time @theSNP 
EU immigration offer could lead to Brexit reversal, claims Adonis  
A brilliant letter sent to Lord Strasburger @LordStras some months ago, and still well worth reading. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
PG Wodehouse can’t save me now. I’m Danish – and Brexit Britain wants me out.  
Being British is about competing & showing community of nations we've something special to offer. Brexit is about inadequacy and isolation. 
For Iraq’s long-suffering Kurds, a referendum on independence is a moment of reckoning  
"The free British people of Gibraltar made the right choice 50 years ago - thank you to the referendum generation" - @FabianPicardo 
Utterly LOVING the number of EU flags at the #lastnightoftheproms this year. Choke on that you Brexit wankers.  
Our front pageOn the 20th anniversary of devolution, Nicola Sturgeon warns: Tory Brexit plans will strip Scotland of its powers#scotpapers 
My husband just now "Well there's not much hope and there's not much glory, is there?" #brexit  
Will Scotland's Tory MPs join  the SNP in standing up for Scotland or will they vote for the economic blow that a hard Brexit will deliver?  
#lastnightoftheproms Land of Hope and Glory, let's make it that again and cancel #Brexit 
I met a man today from Lincolnshire who said Brexit has split his family forever. So unnecessary, the Tories and their infighting to blame. 
Having been an Erasmus student myself--which, in essence, made me what I am today professionally--this Brexit effect truly breaks my heart.  
"Unite, rethink & reject Brexit, leaving the EU no longer holds credibility in Westminster let alone on the streets"  
If you don't work against #Brexit that means that you don't understand #austerity.They're linked.Both brought to you by : the #Tories. 
“Science has always transcended national borders & there is a real will on all sides to ensure that #Brexit does not hinder that."  
I am supremely interested in everybody, on both sides of the debate, reconciling around the belated realisation that Brexit is a bad idea. 
Leeds for Europe #StopBrexit day of action, Saturday Sept 16. If you can be there, let's keep the campaign rolling!#Brexit #StopBrexit 
#Lastnightoftheproms #Europe owes us everything twice. We owe them nothing, paid in blood #Brexit  
According to a source, here is the main reason PUK and Kirkuk governor agreed to support the referendum despite Iran's objection:  
Leaked memo from City's Brexit envoy reveals ‘sobering’ analysis of EU stance 
How many Brexit Bins can you get in one tweet ?   
If #Brexit shows the Brits are mad in a bad way, #LastNightOfTheProms shows we're also mad in a good way! 
Outrageous: Spain charges Catalan newspaper editor for supporting Catalan's independence referendum on October 1.  
Right-wing think-tank wants agricultural tariffs scrapped post-#Brexit,  and food standards dropped. #StopBrexit /1 
Highlight of today's stay-at-home protest by millions of Brexit voters was watching #Peoplesmarch4eu on telly! 
Unbelievable. Editor of Catalan newspaper @elvallenc accused of "disobedience, perversion of justice & collaboration" on Catalan referendum.  
The Irish can see who Brexit is REALLY for & it's not usIt's ABOUT the Tories & FOR the ToriesBy @denisstaunton 
Sunday's THE INDEPENDENT: "Scotland and Wales deliver Brexit ultimatum to May" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Every time an anon says 'Brexit is happening' or 'you lost' or 'you can't stop it' it's more evidence that they know their dream is toast. 
People's March for Europe: Thousands hit streets of London to demand Brexit be reversed | The Independent  
Embarrassing, apart from enlightened, decent, UK newspapers, it takes the Washington Post to state the Brexit truth.  
Catalan newspaper editor charged on three counts over 1st October independence referendum  
Remainers, I salute you! Anti-Brexit marchers demand UK remains in EU  
Keir Starmer is up in arms about the Tory EU (Withdrawal) Bill.Thanks for inflicting the bill, Brexit and Theresa May on us Keir.  
#recap This letter proposing a solution on who should pay for Brexit has gone viral 
"Brexit is bad, and it's a stupid decision," one of the most powerful EU officials says  
The future belongs to young people & Brexit will rob them of opportunities.  
Hey, let's not forget Manchester - 1st October where we'll let TORY PARTY conference delegates know how we feel about THEIR #brexit!  
Anti-Brexit protest in London: Useful idiots and globalist shills march against democracy.  
Catalan leader has called for mass demonstrations next week, vowing to press ahead with an independence referendum  
Varoufakis: Theresa May should abandon Brexit talks with EU chiefs now as Britain is “sleep walking into a disaster”  
Oh dear @Channel4News almost got it right about the #PeoplesMarch4EU, and then spoilt it by saying Remainers were opposing 'hard #Brexit'. 
That bloody Brexit, bringing MORE jobs to the UK...  
Profiting from #Brexit: McLaren shifts supply chain back to the UK  
."We're led by a weak & divisive Prime Minister, a Brexit Secretary with no plan A let alone a plan B......" 
Honoured to speak at the University of Barcelona in support of Catalunya's historic independence referendum on October 1st. Visca la terra!  
Just talked to my father. He believes what I do. The poorest fooled into voting for #brexit will be the worst hit. Let's turn it around. 
Gotta admit that Sibelius' Finlandia in Finnish at the #PROMs2017 feels big. Not least in the midst of all the #Brexit crap. 
Think you'll find that your iffy future has less to do with Brexit& more to do with you being a foul-mouthed thicko minger.#MarchForEurope 
Spanish police searching for ballot papers to prevent a Catalan referendum, and Catalan girls try to prevent it ... with carnations!!!  
Catalan determination in the face Spain's use of police to occupy newspaper offices and printing firms to scupper independence referendum.  
Look at the #peoplesmarch4eu tweets. Specifically look at how many real people are against Brexit & how many fakes/anons are for it. 
Govt's leaked Brexit plans would have a crippling effect on construction workers needed to tackle the housing crisis  
How Brexit kills the thing it claims to love, by @NickCohen4. (). 
Great Lib Dem turnout at today's Anti-Brexit protest  
Fantastic turnout in London today. A celebration of our membership of the European Union. Brexit will be defeated! @GuyVerhofstadt 
So Varoufakis is advising the UK on Brexit, and Farage advising Germany on trade deals. Presumably Berlusconi on separation of powers next 
Encouraging. Next step is crucial: To declare - on basis of hard evidence - that Brexit is not deliverable without ruining the country  
PICS: ‘March of the Remoaners’ – Anti-Brexit Protesters Descend on London  
"As Brexit descends into a swamp ... populist patriotism will be the first resort of the scoundrels" by @NickCohen4  
WATCH: Full rare interview with @PrisonPlanet on Brexit, mass migration and more:  
Why do Leavers think that people who care about Britain should just shut up and let the harm of #Brexit go ahead? #PeoplesMarch4EU 
'Spanish gendarmes raid premises of Catalan newspaper in search of referendum material '  #ARAinEnglish 
My two boys marching. They & their peers not happy about #Brexit. Watch out Tories! Future voting generation is politically aware & cross.  
'Romeva welcomes the first group of international observers of the referendum'  #ARAinEnglish 
If Joe Hart had conceded this there'd be witch hunts. Pickford will get an easy ride because he wants a soft, grilled cheese brexit  
Many Leavers can't understand why people who love their country would want to stop the self-destructive folly of #Brexit #peoplesmarch4eu 
Sorry Leavers we haven't left the EU, and #Brexit is so stupid and self-destructive we probably never will.  #peoplesmarch4eu 
Abandon Brexit negotiations now or face disaster – Yanis Varoufakis:  
Goldman Sachs says these 10 Brexit events moved U.K. assets the most  
What an utter embarrassment to the UK these brainwashed sheep knobbers are.#Brexit   
#PeoplesMarch4EU showing once again that #Brexit is NOT the 'Will of the people' @theresa_may @BorisJohnson @Nigel_Farage#Remain 
We need local Councils in Remain areas to ensure both UK and EU flags are flown together.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Thousands have taken part in an anti-Brexit march demanding that Britain remains in the EU #PeoplesMarch4EU  
What is #Brexit - it is fictional fuckwittery, devoid of rationality and a terrible indictment of our education system. It must not stand. pic.twitter.com/z0e4VHwvcU 
The UK's largest car manufacturer Jaguar Land Rover sends 80% to 90% of its exported cars to countries outside the EU. Bring on Brexit. 
Thousands of anti-Brexit protesters march on Parliament  
Organisers say more than 50,000 people attended an anti-Brexit rally in London today  
"Brexit means a future that relies on chlorinated chicken and holding hands with an orange fascist".  
My favourite picture of an amazing day-amazing turnout! We're still very worried and angry about Brexit! #ExitBrexit pic.twitter.com/lkCOCK292R 
Thousands march to Parliament Square wanting to save country from Brexit's devastating consequences #exitfrombrexit #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Upset about EU nationals #citizensrights post #Brexit?Join us at #citizensrally17 in London on Wednesday 
PM @theresa_may comes out fighting with hard Brexit plan after Lord Harris brands her HOPELESS  
Come on @BBCNews @SkyNews there was a massive anti Brexit protest in London today. Please give it the coverage it deserves  @peoplesmarch4eu 
Only @theSNP can get Scotland out of the Tory mess that are austerity and Brexit  
In essence this is why I marched: Brexit means a future that will deny the next generation all the opportunities I had - simply unacceptable  
I marched with giants today, I walked with friends.  Brexit is not going to happen. 
'Stop criticising ourselves!' Britons urged to stand up to Juncker's Brexit insults  
No sign of any TV coverage of our massive anti Brexit march in London. Shameful @peoplesmarch4eu 
One thing I know from the People's March for Europe today. Brexit isn't going to happen. 
Minister @simoncoveney met with Scotland's Brexit Minister Mike Russell at the British-Irish Association Conference in Cambridge today.  
Brussels likens Brexit to the 3rd Reich. While themselves retaining a similar grasp on reality to 1945 Fuhrerbunker.  
Calls for unity as thousands attend anti-Brexit rally in London | Politics | The Guardian  
A man who has campaigned at every rally for every cause with every racist and anti semite going can't turn up to an anti Brexit rally. 
OPINION: The UK should lose hope that the next German government will bring a softer Brexit  
Labour Brexit Secretary Now Says UK Could Stay in EU Customs Union Forever  
Sorry to break it to ya, but your 'lots of people' is a drop in the 17.4 million people Brexit ocean. #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Thousands join #PeoplesMarch4EU as @vincecable warns politicians working on #Brexit see potential for disaster  
This is how any indyref held after Brexit might look  
Churchill, so admired by Brexiters, was a passionate advocate of a United States of Europe & wanted the UK to join the Common Market#Brexit  
50,000 protestors take part in anti-Brexit march 
Thousands march through London against Brexit – video  
At least they haven't ignored us this time!BBC News - Anti-Brexit marchers rally in Parliament Square  
Nigel Farage - endorsed by the former Grand Wizard of the Ku Klux Klan. #Brexit is inextricably tied to hate and bigotry. #StopBrexit 
Gibraltar referendum anniversary: the Rock's proudly British history  
If on #PeoplesMarch4EU, remember to fill in the form to say how democracy causes you pain.Show us on the dolly where Brexit touched you  
Spanish Civil Guard enters Catalan newspaper 'El Vallenc' looking for referendum material  
Good meeting between @Feorlean & Irish FM  @simoncoveney during today's BIA. Frank and friendly exchange on #Brexit, and Scot/Ire relations  
AstraZeneca CEO, worried by Brexit, not signing UK government letter  
Theresa May comes out fighting with hard Brexit plan       
"Help! We're trapped on a small island that's been taken over by mad people!" Placard at anti-Brexit march in London  
Tory Europhile Nicky Morgan was labelled a hypocrite today after accusing hard-line Tories of “undermining” Brexit  
Finally...I saw this on the BBC and thought you should see it:Anti-Brexit marchers rally in Parliament Square -  
Remainers protest peacefully, Farage & other Brexiters  use terrorist threats of violence violence to intimidate. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
.Psst - Labour!"Brexit weakens the financial sustainability of the NHS.". 
When a brexiteer comes to open residents surgery to gloat about referendum and how great it is that prices more expensive now for EU goods..  
Disabled people will be unfairly, negatively, hit by Brexit As with austerity, disabled rights are human rights & being lost #ExitBrexit 
Goes for #Brexit, too.#PeoplesMarch4EU#Brexiteers 
Mary Honeyball MEP. We are here today because we do everything we can to stop the destruction of Brexit.Spot on.#LabourAgainstBrexit 
Tired of hearing about brexit. It was clearly a rash decision that was neither thought out or made by people who knew what it even meant. 
Theresa May's plan to gain sweeping new powers ahead of Brexit revealed. #ToryPowerGrab 
EU TERRIFIED OTHER COUNTRIES WILL LEAVE IF BRITAIN GETS GOOD BREXIT DEAL, EX-GREEK FINANCE MINISTER.        
Anti-Brexit marchers rally in Parliament Square  
."The industry is already struggling; Brexit could tip us over the the edge.". 
Rich List Tory peer says Brexit positive as young people can work longer hours  via @LondonEconomic #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Tomorrow 10/9, KDP & PUK will have an important meeting.Joint work for the success of Referendum, restart of parliament no later than 15/9. 
Thousands march through London against Brexit – video  
On run up to 1983 referendum right wing fundamentalists decided to set up ethics committees in all hospitals.  
Everything suggests May is an authoritarian who sees parliament, courts, rights & reasons as obstacles to efficient government#Brexit 
'The British don't care that every strand of the Good Friday Agreement is undermined by Brexit' (via @thejournal_ie) 
All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed  by @anneapplebaum 
Exit from Brexit: 50,000+ attend pro-EU demonstration in London #stopbrexit #peoplesmarch4EU #march4europe 
I wish there was an anti-Brexit march every week,it's hilarious. Constantly reaching new levels of asinine. #PeoplesMarch4EU #MarchForEurope 
A lot of #Boomers marching in  #PeoplesMarch4EU .Kinda puts the lie to a few things. A lot of lies re: #Brexit 
Brexit no longer holds credibility in Westminster  #exitfrombrexit #PeoplesMarch4EU 
As is becoming very clear now, the EU has far stronger democratic and legal safeguards against the abuse of power than the UK. #Brexit  
"Brexit is what the decline has delivered. And the decline is in the courage of our politicians."Spot on, sadly.  
Let's be clear, Labour respect the referendum & WILL implement Brexit They believe Parliament should be sovereign not Theresa May #powergrab 
To leavers: If you don't like the democratic right to peacefully campaign for a change in policy, kindly leave the country.#Brexit #Remain 
Oxford and Cambridge top world university ranking, but Brexit may threaten their rise  
BIAFRA REFERENDUM IS AT HAND: BIAFRANS ESCHEW FEAR BECAUSE OF ARMOURED TANKS OF NIGERIA ARMY  
'Walk out or bypass Barnier' Theresa May urged to ignore EU negotiator to secure Brexit  
SENSITIVE |Police searching ballot boxes and other referendum materials in #Catalonia, tension is expected to increase. 
Thousands from all over the UK gathered in London to say "we will continue to fight #Brexit!" We can #StopBrexit together! #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Tories can't win an election so they buy a majority and scrap parliamentary democracy. Welcome to Brexit UK. 
Thousands of anti-#Brexit marchers descend on Westminster to demand that Britain stays in the EU  
Thousands join anti-Brexit march through London  
"I am 15. Brexit stole my future" #PeoplesMarch4EU 
half of young britons think they will be worse off than their parents; Brexit increases odds they may be right   
Catalans demonstrating against Spain's police (intent on seizing referendum ballots) but also offering them water & cokes.  
Tens of thousands of anti-Brexit activists march to Parliament#PeoplesMarch4EU 
1/2 The Spanish military police leaves after searching materials of the forthcoming referendum in the office of a local newspaper. 
Sad that those who voted #Brexit still talk about winning! Will someone tell the numb nuts,  we are all losers ! #PeoplesMarch4EU 
How many anti-Brexit protesters on the #PeoplesMarch4EU work for EU-funded universities, arts groups, charities or the BBC? 
I doubt Brexit (in any meaningful sense) will happen, but let's mark the attempt with new pub names#SuggestNamesForABrexiteerPub 
'Exit from Brexit': thousands attend pro-EU demonstration in London  
Brexit is exposing very real democratic deficits here not imaginary ones in Brussels @GreenJeanMEP #PeoplesMarch4EU 
.@GreenJeanMEP at #PeoplesMarch4EU: "Brexit revealed UK's democratic deficit. We need a written constitution & proportional voting system."  
Mary Lou McDonald: 'The British don't care that every strand of the Good Friday Agreement is undermined by Brexit'  
Thousands of anti-Brexit protesters march on Parliament  
Lots of people at the #PeoplesMarch4EU to say NO to #Brexit.  Time to #StopBrexit! 
"Brexit is what the decline has delivered; and the decline is in the courage of our politicians"@JolyonMaugham#PeoplesMarch4EU #EUcitizens 
From the anti-brexit march now taking place in central London. #notobrexit #antibrexit #brexit  
People's March for EU: 50,000 anti-Brexit activists march to Parliament in rally to keep UK in union | London  
How does a Kurdish man feel about coming referendum for independence from Iraq? Jubilant. "I am free. I have power.”  
'Incompetent, disfunctional, disunited': Vince Cable tears into May as anti-Brexit protesters take to the streets  
Break Brexit Before Brexit Breaks Britain.  Current chant at #PeoplesMarch4EU #PeoplesMarch 
For those of you playing Europhile bingo, here's the predictable Brexit-is-like-Hitler placard.  
Brexiters get very cross when other people don’t think Brexit is going very well don’t they? 
#EU terrified other countries will leave if Britain gets good Brexit deal.  – Westmonster #fo2eu means fuck off 2 EU  
A Tory peer argues #Brexit is a good thing because it will allow young people to work more than 35 hours a week!!!   
Thousands of anti-Brexit demonstrators descend on Westminster #PeoplesMarch4EU 
What the £ to Euro rate was on referendum day and what it is now. Brexit making us all poorer 
Anyone who was ever in a school class where willfully stupid twats held everyone back will do all they can to stop Brexit.#PeoplesMarch4EU 
Vince Cable tears into Theresa May's government, as anti-Brexit protesters take to the streets  
The BIG LIE that put xenophobic dog whistle politics over national interest before #Brexit vote:  #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Noticeable that @jeremycorbyn is no where to be seen.Wonder why that is? (He want Brexit - the harder the better) #PeopleMarch4EU 
#PeoplesMarch #PeoplesMarch4EU #Brexit #StopBrexit #ExitBrexit #StopBrexitNow #exitfrombrexitAbsolutely!  
Thousands of anti-Brexit activists march to Parliament for EU rally  
Puigdemont asked 947 municipalities to use public buildings as referendum polls. 650 said 'yes' - representing 34% of Catalan population. 
Spectacular salute to everyone taking part in today's #PeoplesMarch4EU. Brexit is the biggest con of our lifetime. Walk back in style.  
All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed - @WillBlackWriter have you read?   
People say to me “We waited 41 years for a referendum”, and I say to them: "That is because you waited” 
Goldman Sachs could quadruple its Frankfurt staff after Brexit, executive says  
WE WANT DEMOCRACY Brexit voters screeched.But if people express a democratic right to march the Brexit mob loses it #PeoplesMarch4EU 
As the Absurdity of Brexit becomes more obvious and the Politics of Self Interest becomes a stench, will the Will of the People change? 
It's becoming increasingly obvious that any account maintaining Brexit or Trump positives is not a citizen of either country. 
Thousands in #London today for #PeoplesMarch4EU, millions more at home worried about impact of #Brexit. It's not too late to #StopBrexit! 
Quarter of people who voted #Brexit; the equivalent of over 4.3m, believe Leave campaign lied #Peoplesmarch4EU 
#BREAKING Guardia Civil officers raid Constantí printing firm for a second time looking for referendum material   . 
Perhaps @BBCNews and media can report #PeoplesMarch4EU march properly this time #StopBrexit #brexitshambles #brexit  
Moral of the story - don't hold a referendum to leave the EU when you've no idea how to leave  
A hotel with a view: 'Brexit could tip us over the edge'  
People across the #UK are now marching against #Brexit Never give up, keep fighting! #Remain #PeoplesMarch4EU #exitfrombrexit #EU 
"On Brexit a year ago the British were united, we, the 27, were divided. Now it's the reverse". @NyTimes 
Here we go again. Yesterday a print shop, today a local newspaper in #Catalonia. Spain's #GuardiaCivil is searching for #referendum material  
Matthew Parris today. Familiar Remaniac egotism: 'I want Brexit and Britain to fail and people be impoverished so I will be proved right'  
The referendum was last year, you can stop lying now. 
As @RogueCoder250 said. A country that isn't allowed to hold a referendum on leaving a Union isn't in a Union. It's an occupation. 
Last week @euromove , @britainforeurop & @Open_Britain stands across country. This week #MarchForEurope #PM4EU Opposition to #Brexit grows  
Whatever your view on Brexit, this move by the Tories is the biggest threat to our parliamentary democracy ever. I'll leave this here   
Some Brexit voters and power-grasping inept Tories think democracy ended after the referendum. It's just starting  #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Would have been at #PeoplesMarch4EU had I not moved to to escape Brexit Britain. Well done to those of you standing up for Free Movement! 
Crowds of anti-Brexit activists arrive for People's March for EU rally  
Great turn out for Exit from Brexit #LibDems #exitfrombrexit 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Opinion | All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed  
It's not technically related to Brexit, but how can the co-op be out of mortons  rolls by 10am on a Saturday? 
Yes. Let's target one of the most progressive anti-Brexit,anti-racist and pro-feminist MPs & replace them with someone like Richard Burton.  
Since Brexit Europeans saying EU "a good thing" spiked up to highest level in a decade (57%), regaining losses from € crisis - Eurobarometer  
The reason the media is portraying Mogg as "bad man" is because he speaks the truth on EU and Brexit and they can't have that.  
.@vincecable: We got to stop the Brexit which this rather incompetent Government is trying to force upon us #exitfrombrexit #MarchForEurope 
Opinion | All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed  
In today's @guardian Blind Date: Gay men, Corbyn, Brexit and the wrath of London's waiters. My review:  
Watching the antics of #EU dignitaries since the referendum has only proven that 52% were right & % would be higher now. 
If I can convince 2 teenagers (19, 17) to travel into London with me for #PeoplesMarch4EU, we can stop Brexit. 
PATHETIC: Thousands of Remoaners (including Bob Geldof) march on Parliament in bid to block Brexit.  
Thousands of anti-Brexit activists descend on Parliament in 'Autumn of Discontent' protest | London Evening Standard  
This is why 3m EU nationals in UK and 1.2m @BritishInEurope do not trust UK Gov on #citizensrights post Brexit  
Marching to overturn a democratic vote while simultaneously chanting against fascism.....#brexit #MarchForEurope #thick 
I'd love to be going to the football today but there's another team needs my support. These are my colours#MarchForEurope #Brexit  
It is obvious to anyone who has thought about it properly that Brexit harms almost everybody. Our job is to make them think#PeoplesMarch4EU 
Not a word about #PeoplesMarch4EU Still pinning your hopes on him to stop Brexit? Austerity will be made much worse after Brexit.  
Police searching ballot boxes and other referendum materials in Catalonia, tensions might increase.  
If you're at #PeoplesMarch4EU today or following on social media, add hashtag #StopBrexit We're more than #4EU - we need to STOP BREXIT! 
In a week of Brexit fear and decay we glimpsed a dynamic and confident Scotland: my column in The Herald   
Theresa May is to promise Conservative Party conference that her end goal is still to deliver a clean Brexit  
North West march to save Britain from #Brexit#Unite #Resist #Rethink #Remain@MarieRimmer @StephenTwigg @ConnorMcGinn @peoplesmarch4eu 
Chuka is my MP - Streatham, south London. I'm very pleased at the way he's speaking out. This area is strongly against a hard #Brexit. 
Murdo Fraser using Catalonia and irony to attack his own government over Brexit. Respect to the man.  
EU terrified other countries will leave if Britain gets good Brexit deal, ex-Greek finance minister  
It is s pity the EU refused to recognise this *before* #Brexit Guy. The UK has been making this point for years. 
Why am I going on #PM4EU? Because I'm an academic and brexit is bad for universities, bad for UK and EU students & bad for my EU colleagues. 
PHOTOS: People rally in #Kurdistan Region, call for 'Yes' vote ahead of Sep. 25 referendum#TwitterKurds #Iraq 
So the UK government wants the ‘best and the brightest’ to come to the UK after #Brexit, but at the same time don’t like experts… 
Why am I going on #PM4EU ? Because brexit and loss of free movement does not represent the views of half the country, especially the young.  
CRAZY: Brussels think tank compares Brexit to rise of Third Reich and Russian Revolution. They've lost it! 
150,000 expected on ‘People’s March for Europe’ and Brexit protest rally in Parliament Square - #PeoplesMarch4EU 
PG Wodehouse can’t save me now. I’m Danish – and Brexit Britain wants me out | Martin Andersen  
Varoufakis tries to use use #Brexit to excuse his failures  UK bigger, stronger, more global, & not in the € 
Abandon Brexit negotiations now or face disaster – Yanis Varoufakis:  
Theresa May to deliver clean Brexit speech to Conservative Party conference | NIESR predicts uptick in UK GDP growth  
Mr Blair's presence reminds many traditional Labour voters of what they were voting against in the EU referendum.  
Business investment has held up since the Brexit vote. The question is how long firms will stay on autopilot  
Catalans living abroad have already started voting in the independence referendum. #JoJaHeVotat 
Despite 17m people voting for Brexit,it is to be cancelled cos Felicity from Kensington has painted her face blue and is very angry #Brexit  
What is an @uklabour MP doing cavorting with a known fascist? #brexit is 'slimy Anglicised form of fascism'. #stopbrexit #Remain 
Exchange rate UPDATE: Expert claims post-Brexit Britain will make pound sterling SOAR  
Brexit is unpatriotic, the greatest imaginable dishonour to this flag. That is why Russia bankrolls it.It is a war. Choose sides carefully  
UK's top hate-monger & architect of Brexit addresses far-right party in Germany  
#Brexiteer delusions summed up. Good luck to all marching today!#Brexit #StopBrexitHour#MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #EU #leave 
The government looks to be prioritizing British jobs for British workers after Brexit. But is this practical? And did it shock you? 
Big love to everyone participating in the #PeoplesMarch4EU todayShow the small-minded Little-Englanders what we think of their hard Brexit!  
BREXIT: EU will give Britain bad deal to make sure other countries don't leave, ex-Greek Finance Minister says. 
Thousands of anti-Brexit protesters to rally outside Parliament in 'Autumn of Discontent' march  
Britain is supposed to be engaging in epic Brexit battles. Right now the fiercest are in London.  
Thinking about Britain from the sacrifice of generations past, full Brexit is the ineluctable conclusion & necessity to reverse her decline. 
People's March for EU:1000s of anti-Brexit activists set to descend on Parliament in 'Autumn of Discontent' protest  
One of the very strongest cases against Brexit is that John Redwood is in favour of it. 
Yanis Varoufakis: Insurgencies often end up betraying the ideals that motivated them – Brexit seems no different 
We'll use our democratic rights to protest #Brexit & campaign for EU for the next 40yrs if we have to. Best get used to it #PeoplesMarch4EU 
Spanish 13TV: "we have to shoot the people who want a referendum"  
Nearly half of Merseyside wants a second EU referendum, survey reveals  
Govt can't be bothered to pretend Brexit is a viable policy any more.All they've left is direct appeal to sulphurous hard right demagoguery. 
Two men are blocking a Brexit deal for all... a cognac-soaked clown and a puffed-up dandy  
All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed - The Washington Post  
From EU's deputy chief negotiator on Brexit.  
See you in London fellow 'saboteurs'. Together we can stop Brexit! @peoplesmarch4eu 
Can't decide if #NigelFarage realises or not that this intervention will convince not one single German to offer the UK better Brexit terms.  
Ambrose Evans-Pritchard:  Brexit shows how close we have come to losing sovereignty altogether  
Trump’s fascist contagion gives the anti-Brexit cause what it lacked: an emotional heart @Freedland 
The UK’s Brexit strategy has returned to a state of chaosvia @IrishTimes 
All the worst lies about Brexit are about to be revealed via @anneapplebaum  
Europe sheds its Brexit baggage and aims for a bold relaunch  
Which is why ALL residents in Scotland could vote in IndyRef unlike Brexit where EU citizens were barred. Beware #nationalism eh? 
We MUST make the 2018 a referendum that we will no longer accept corporatocracy over democracy.  That it must be ppl before profits! 
#Assyrian Christians raise & waive the Assyrian flag at a Kurdistan Yes-to-Referendum Rally!! #Assyrians 
Seen this before? Unexpected results against poll trends? Trump, Brexit, Republic? #voteyes & post Let's get it done  
 IT'S OFFICIAL! Gov. @dougducey has been notified @arizona_sos referendum qualifies for Nov. 2018 ballot as Proposition 305! #NoProp305 
FWIW tonight, as a Pinellas resident, I'd like to Brexit from the European Model of hurricane forecasting. Not really fond of its position. 
The brexit explanation you never knew you needed... Or even wanted.  
Brexit: networks of influence - the dubious dealings of Steve Baker ...  #Brexit.  
A Warning from the U.K.  A must listen! @jongaunt & @RadioGaffney Hear what the Muslim Brotherhood is doing. #Brexit 
Dear mr farage i would like to see you make a return, as your a no nonsense man. And you have flare. Quick before may waters down brexit !!  
Why Brexit is putting the EU's digital future at risk  @IBGC_Fletcher 
Destructive Hurricanes Harvey, Irma and Jose - Leftards must be pulling their hair out trying to find ways to blame them on BREXIT or Trump! 
MEPs urge Spanish government to allow Catalan referendum  
Bob Moran on Brexit and the last night of the proms - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
A 'No brainer'(well for anyone with more than half a brain)Brexit Justify Another Scottish Independence Referendum?  
EU is after big corporations. That's why the Brexit elite want to leave it. Corporate and personal tax laws from EU. They're terrified.  
But we're marching, representing millions who reject Brexit. Meanwhile, Brexiters still trying to work out arse from elbow 
Dear NO:1. It's a survey, not a referendum.2. It's about marriage, not schools.3. It's about civil equality, not sacraments.#VoteYES 
Republic, Trump, Brexit. Take nothing for granted. Complete your survey and post it back - no delay!  via @theage 
Also, slap a Union Flag on this and you've got a pretty much perfect Brexit GIF.  
Hey Brexshiter/Brexidiots. It has been decided that you fucked up, Brexit is such a massive clusterfuck it must be abandoned forthwith.  
Trump’s fascist contagion gives the anti-Brexit cause what it lacked: an emotional heart | Jonathan Freedland  
The government is completely absorbed by Brexit, so there isn't time for anything else, we were warned about this!  
Wrong. There is still every chance Brexit won't happen. And every chance the future will see us re-enter. Nothing is over.  
Who is going to serve up low-skilled insulting anti-Brexit propaganda when the BBC isn't funded by the EU any more?  
If there was a referendum on Scots indy tomorrow how would you vote? 
'Walk out or bypass Barnier' @theresa_may urged to ignore EU negotiator to secure Brexit @yanisvaroufakis 
Where is the UK government's Brexit road map? Paper after paper hasn't answered the question, but here's our guide:  
The only time the EU Will talk to us is if we are prepared to do as we are told by the EUEU IS A dictatorship who won't listen to anyone 
Brexit: we have peacekeeping responsibilities and a duty to respect Remainers:  
150,000 expected on ‘People’s March for Europe’ and Brexit protest rally in Parliament Square  
Not so fantastic that you ruined the country by calling the Brexit vote, but hey-ho. 
'Brexit IS important for Germany' Nigel Farage calls for EU to 'grow up and start behaving  
Catalonia pushes ahead with its independence referendum, intensifying a standoff with Spain.  
That awkward moment when Brexidiots celebrate Brexit too soon.  
'Walk out or bypass Barnier' Theresa May urged to ignore EU negotiator to secure Brexit  
Britain's proposed immigration curbs after Brexit are unworkable, Dixons CEO says  
Brexit lets the Future be decided by those who won't experience it..... Ahhhh so *that's* what "anti-democratic" means....  
‘Yes’ rallies in Erbil, Shaqlawa, Domiz and Qushtapa draw crowds for Kurdistan referendum 
Brexit has dragged this country down into the mire. Cabinet ministers are openly insulting millions of Britons. Should be an instant sacking  
Kim, Don, Gary, & Irma Spark Dollar Exodus As Gold Gains Most Since Brexit  
Farage today in Germany addressed a far right group with links to nazi's. But there was an anti brexit demo outside  
Trying to avoid the negative impacts of Brexit  
Beyond farce. Having falsely told voters Germans wd ensure Brexit deal, Farage now lecturing Germans to ensure Brexit deal.  
'Brexit IS important for Germany' Nigel Farage calls for EU to 'grow up and behave'  
.YesAnd don't forget - Corbyn's Labour Party has supported EVERY Brexit vote since the refNEVER forget that!. 
#BrexitDon't let Jacob Rees-Mogg get away with this Leave lie  
Mariano Rajoy has unleashed the full power of the Spanish legal system against the Catalan referendum  
.He's got his priorities rightEnd Brexit FIRST! Oust Trump just a little bit later . 
Having got so much of what they said about brexit wrong, you would think remoaners would keep their big mouths shut. Brexit looks good. 
If you can't make it to London tomorrow, join us in #Leeds from 11 as we tell people about next Saturday's Stop #Brexit Day of Action  
'Theresa May's language on Brexit is as inspiring as a damp rag. Is she even trying to sell it?' #premium 
Final shout out to @peoplesmarch4eu! Against Brexit or not sure about it after all the news this week? Come join us in London tomorrow  
Shadow Cabinet to Attend Anti-Brexit Conference Events:  
With party political rebellions on both sides - which party will be split more, post-Brexit? #AndrewOnLBC 
Before Brexit the UK had the fastest growing economy in Europe now we are the laughing stock leaving my generation to face the consequences. 
"Only Brexit option for Irish peace"?Better yet is the #NoBrexit option -Irish Peace preserved #sorted via @FT 
The #Tories have no majority in the HOC. But are trying to strong arm  a majority on #Brexit committees.#TakeBackControl#ToriesOut 
Shows Farage’s ignorance! #brexit #btw17 
Had a conversation about Brexit with a colleague today. He instigated it. I think it turned out to be quite dispiriting for both of us. 1/11 
This is hilarious. May to promise close transition in Brussels speech, then clean Brexit in Tory conference speech  
Of all Brexit clichés, 'unelected bureaucrats' the laziest. UK elects neither its civil servants nor *majority of national parliamentarians*  
One Catalan police (Mossos) officer, @albert_dmcat, is openly supporting Catalan government on illegal referendum on Twitter.  
Kurds along with #Chaldean & Assyrian #Christians in #Erbil rally for #Kurdistan independence referendum.#KurdistanReferendum 
President @KRLS attending pro-indy campaign event in Sant Joan Despi. First one after convening the #1Oct referendum  
Brexiters always say the EUP has no power, EU fundamentally undemocratic etc. But, guess what, it has power to veto any Brexit deal.  
Of the many tragedies of Brexit delusion, this growing, fast-developing UK irrelevance is one of the most serious pic.twitter.com/pa7KI1JOsx 
GDP growth rate of EU member states in the 2nd quarter of 2017The UK economy is the slowest growing, more than a year after voting Brexit pic.twitter.com/EPUq8hzZQ9 
In case you missed it 80 Tory MPs are using tax payers' money to fund a SECRET hard-Brexit group. See video to end: 
At  09/09 anti #brexit March in London  just wondering if anyone fancies a drink and remoan at. 3pm St Stephens Tavern opposite big Ben  
The Catalonian Government has voted to hold an independence referendum 
What comes after Kurd referendum? Read "Kurdistan Rising"(1) English: (2) Kurdish:  @AEIfdp 
Anti-Brexit Campaigners to Hand out EU Flags at BBC’s Last Night of the Proms   
Germany's business community has set up a Brexit task force, which includes Deutsche Bank, Siemens and Airbus  
North Norfolk MP Norman Lamb: ‘I will vote against Brexit bill’  
Happening now: Large crowds gather in Erbil city's Iskan Street in support of #Kurdistan's independence referendum.  
In years to come the whole Referendum and Brexit debacle needs thorough independent investigation.Toxic times.  
That.... that's the code to cancel brexit!  
will Labour MPs who vote against Brexit Bill on Monday pay a heavy price in party's northern vote Leave heartland. join me @lbc from 7 
#Christians in Hawler support #Kurdistan independence referendum.#TwitterKurds #YesKurdistan 
Impact of Brexit will be more profound than expected, ex-Barclays boss Bob Diamond says  
Really pleased to be proposed to Westminster Select Committee on International Trade- absolutely key & important issue during Brexit &beyond  
We're still trying to work out his weird thinking behind Brexit!  Nigel must be doing the dirty work for the big money men.  
Brexit will have devastating consequences for health services .@CArchibald_SF  
And I can't forgive Corbyn for his lukewarm referendum campaign.  Where was his youth motivation then? 
James O'Brien says all evidence that Brexit could possibly succeed appears to have disappeared  
Let's put Brexit on ice (in a Tupperware box) until we find out what was in May's box & why she gave it to Geoffrey Boycott#TupperwareGate 
Do you agree with this FT reader's letter?: 'There is no strong case for a Catalan referendum'  
I really don't see why I have to support this useless bloody government in Brexit negotiations, says @JonnElledge  
Labour betrayal knows no bounds #BREXIT  
We now go live to Brexit  
#Kurdistan Independence referendum rally in #Washington on Sept 17.Make your voice heard for #YesKurdistan#TwitterKurds 
If Remainers derail the Repeal Bill, they will send Britain tumbling into a Brexit abyss, warns @asabenn 
BREAKING |Catalan Parliament passes law to hold independence referendum October 1.  
Working people need to dump Brexit, dump capitalism and dump you. They all belong in the dustbin of history. 
Brexit may embarrass Merkel and Schulz, but they need to start talking about it to protect the jobs of their own workers.  
We are en route to Barcelona to join comrades of @lesJERC for the Catalan National Day, ahead of October's historic independence referendum.  
We now go live to cat brexit  
It’s getting to the point where I’m not sure I’m ever going to be able to forgive anyone who voted for Brexit. 
BREAKING: Jacob Rees-Mogg ELECTED to Brexit Select Committee  via @Your Brexit 
If she wins, for me it'll feel like Brexit and Trump again, the UKIP establishment will be shaken to its core. Good! That's what's needed.  
In a nutshell: May caught between econ damage of Brexit and Tory ultras who don't care how much damage done via @FT 
David Davis's Brexit plan to use Henry VIII powers by Matt - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
After all revelations this week it's more important than ever to take a stand against Brexit. Come and join me in London tomorrow.   
Brexit: Ex-Barclays boss sees London jobs moving to New York - The Independent  
**URGENT ACTION** We have the chance to legally challenge the misconduct of politicians during Referendum, but need to each act by 15/09   
A group of hard Brexit Tory MPs are holding the country ransom to get an extreme hard Brexit. Hold them to account:  
The squad searching for referendum material is the same group that "accidentally" lost NeoNazi Panzer weapons, facilitating their acquittal  
Scathing coverage today in NYT of UK govt's handling of Brexit negotiations   
The Brexit bill is in reality a massive power grab and should be opposed, says Conservative former Attorney General Dominic Grieve  
Press |Catalan independence referendum blocked by Spanish court[BBC news]#Barcelona 
The BCC says sterling's crash after Brexit vote did 'more harm than good'  
The EU has just said Britain MUST PAY until 2023 – 4 YEARS after Brexit. Cloud Cuckoo Land!  via @Your Brexit 
Warnings issued magic mushroom Brexit brexitius causes hallucinations of £350M week for NHS 
I have asked PM 3 times in Parliament to speak to MEPs on her reasons for BREXIT. She  said in July she was thinking of doing so! CHICKEN!  
A successful Brexit deal is in the interests of workers all around Europe. EU politicians must recognise this.  
I’m at Nigel Farage’s speech to Germany’s far-right AfD party. He just seems utterly astounded that Brexit isn’t a German election issue. 
If #Brexit goes ahead we shall be an irrelevant ugly squabbling island for at least a generation. Such a horrendous waste. #StopTheMadness 
Woah there people here comes the #StopBrexit bus again - how many RT's can it get before the @peoplesmarch4eu tomorrow?  #Brexit #Remain 
Here's this week's Scotland in Europe update, featuring the latest #Brexit developments to keep you up to date:  
Getting emails from Spanish MEPs slamming the prospect of an Independence referendum in #Catalonia There's nothing to fear from democracy! 
Tomorrow more anti-Brexit campaigners will be marching to Parliament Square to fight Brexit. Here are our highlights from the last event.  
I am speaking LIVE from Germany on Brexit. Watch here:  
Thanks to Brexit, Milan is back in vogue as Italy’s financial capital  
Day by day the evidence & the horror builds. Brexit must and will be stopped. 
#OnThisDay 1967: Gibraltar was preparing for a referendum to decide whether to become part of Spain, or retain British sovereignty.  
Furious Labour MPs [rightly] accuse Corbyn of taking voters for fools over #Brexit. Starmer also in the firing line.  
Brexit: Do you want to ................. ?Please retweet after voting for better response, thanks. 
Breaking |Tebas: The Catalan clubs will not play in La Liga if the referendum goes in Catalunia's favour.  
BREAKING: Jacob Rees-Mogg ELECTED to Brexit Select Committee  via @Your Brexit 
The Brexit Trolls are returning to Twitter. They are losing the fight and they know it. It is time we come together to #StopBrexit 
A failure to deliver the Brexit that people voted for would shatter their trust in politicians, warns @Steven_Woolfe 
Tonight at 8PM, a gathering in support for #Kurdistan independence referendum in Hawler, Eskan St.#TwitterKurds #YesKurdistan 
Spain's Guardia Civil currently searching print shop in south of Catalonia hoping to find printed material for indy referendum. NOT A JOKE! 
Billionaire Brexit backer has two choices: admit mistake & apologise to readers or get the hell out of Dodge.  
Tory fallacy: migrants are taking British jobs and driving down wages'.Gov is happier playing to #Brexit gallery. 
Democracy includes the right to campaign peacefully to change any policy. Anyone who objects to that is an enemy of democracy.#Brexit 
This is why #Brexit is such a poison - it enables every reactionary throwback to start mainstreaming their nasty regressive beliefs  
Please always read Steve's brilliant threads. This on why claims that Brexit is an opportunity for Gibraltar are plainly untrue   
#janeygodleyvoiceover THERESA AND BREXIT  
One can *acknowledge* the referendum result; and even *recognise* it; but integrity forbids *honour* and *respect*, much less *obedience". 
David Davis: "We want to attract the brightest minds to the UK."The brightest minds: "Meh."#citizensrights #Brexit  
Yanis Varoufakis: a progressive Brexit transition can be built – on both sides of the Channel  via @ConversationUK 
A small band of hardline MPs are using taxpayer money to bully Govt into their minority aggressive form of Brexit.  
For Leavers:Treating WW1 as a victory of nations led to disaster.Treating WW2 as a victory over nationalism led to peace.#Brexit #Remain 
#BREAKING A team of 10+ Spain policemen enters printshop in search of independence referendum material in #Catalonia 
Spanish Guardia Civil police enters #Catalan print shop in search of independence #referendum material. Watch it here   
.@BorisJohnson says he is "rock solid confident" the UK will clinch a deal with the EU after Brexit  
Unprecedented usurping of power: if May's allowed, with no majority she'd control all legislastion, all Brexit.  8http://bit.ly/2jb5evK 
All hooked on "the will of the British people" ... Let me say it again: an advisory referendum put in place by a govt elected by 36% 1/  
10. A company’s customer base costs money to build and maintain, and this consequence of Brexit is not mentioned enough. 
Spain's Guardia Civil has entered the Catalan printer after 48 hours of surveillance. They're looking for documents related to Referendum   
WATCH: @PrisonPlanet tells Westmonster the 'EU is relying on people losing interest in Brexit'. In their dreams! 
'Brussels is not mandated to reach a Brexit agreement that's good for Britain or indeed Europe'   via @GMB 
The Economist on Brexit  
A major drawback of Brexit : losing English humor.  
Catalonia has officially set a date for its independence referendum. So what happens now?  
Salaries up: Job vacancies up. Brexit begins to work for the people of the UK  
Pro-EU groups are fighting back against a hard Brexit  
Brexit risks turning the UK into fertile ground for labour exploitation  
Nigel Farage who complained about Obama opining on Brexit will this afternoon address a far right election rally in Germany Let that sink in 
"There is no constituency in parliament or in the opinion polls for hard Brexit... 40 MPs is not a majority of 650." 
Grounded: Dire outlook for Brexit transport negotiations  
I don't have issue with Brexiters. I mind Brexit-at-Any-Cost-ers, Brexit-Without-a-Plan-ers, Magical-Brexiters & plain Xenophobic Brexiters.  
With so much going on, #Brexit shambles, the hurricane crisis guess what Theresa "so busy, no time for debates" May is doing today?  
Farage going the extra mile to make a practical success of Brexit. Refreshing that someone is putting the UK case to the EU.  
BREXIT: We stir up some more outrage and disgust on behalf of the permanently offended.  
At 3pm at Zitadelle Spandau in Berlin there is an anti Brexit rally. Nigel fartage is there. Please join in if you are there. RT. #remain 
Probably not what the Social Media person at Brexit Dept intended..  
KAL on Brexit negotiations - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
The Commons should spend as long as is necessary to debate these vital Brexit issues without some arbitrary limit by govt /4 
The Tory Party is still divided. So much for holding a referendum to unite the party. What a waste of time and at what cost? #StopBrexit 
Some, but not many, #Tories dare to defy #May and put country before their party in opposing her on #Brexit :  
Why don't they just take laundered Russian oligarch's money like Leave UK, rather than rob the tax payer #Brexit  
This by @NickCohen4 on David Davis is very good indeed.A lot to admire about Davis pre-Brexit.  And then came Brexit.  
"In this campaign, nobody is talking about Brexit, and they should be. Why? Because the Germans sell us £30bn of goods a year" @Nigel_Farage 
Gibraltar voted remain but since referendum their GDP has grown by 9% as investment flows in. Those talking down U.K. prospects take note!  
The pound hits a 5-week high against a weaker dollar  
More MPs must find courage to vote against Brexit 'smash & grab' which is a real threat to parliamentary sovereignty. 
As stated in The Irish Times | Why EU membership remains right for Ireland irrespective of #Brexit - by @Noelle_OC |  
It is clear that the Tories want to escape the ECJ because they bitterly resent any legal & parliamentary checks on their power. #Brexit 
WATCH | @IsabelOakeshott blasts @BillyHayes_CWU for suggesting UK still wants Free Movement and for his claim that Brexit is a disaster.  
Me too. You dont unite a nation by ignoring 16 million voters and pretending the referendum was a landslide.#remain #brexit 
A “no deal” Brexit might not be as bad as you think  via @prospect_uk 
More #Brexit revelations - how hard-right Brexiteers driving agenda - will be calling for investigation:  
When rulers invoke the "Will of the People", they mean that Parliaments and Courts should get out of their way. #Brexit 
#Brexit glory rhetoric want Britain to be a superpower again while committing economic suicide!!But bad economy will end up biting!#remain 
Found on social media. List of the companies that backed Brexit. I will be boycotting actively.  
Isabelle Oakshott discussing #Brexit on #BBCDP just now... 
See how confident the UK is in its #Brexit economy!  This graph says 1000 words while #May is bragging about 'Global Britain'#remain 
As James Chapman isn't any longer creating a political party committed to unwinding Brexit, could someone do so? Next week will be fine. 
Comrade Corby-chuff unhappy. Some Labour MPs won't ignore what manifesto said about Brexit even if he orders them to 
If/when Brexit is abandoned, pretending like nothing happened is not an option - MPs and leading Brexiters must publicly held to account 
In amongst impending nuclear war, natural disasters,Trump, Brexit + all that's crap, @RobGMacfarlane 's daily tweets are a complete tonic. 
All-British TVR to be built in Ebbw Vale, Wales – more embarrassment for Remainers who swore #Brexit would kill UK car manufacturing.   
Dear PM,I am unable to sign this letter because I agree with everything you said about the EU during the referendum.Love,CEO@mrjamesob 
Spot on Rosena. Lab will not give Theresa May a blank cheque on Brexit and will vote against the #GreatPowerGrabBill 
UK has done nothing to court the Parliament, which had a substantial role in Brexit - not least in voting on the final deal. 
an important statement from the Law Society.  they're not usually so forthcoming on political events! #brexit  
How is Britain doing economically since the Brexit vote?The UK economy is the slowest growing in EU  
How are we doing economically since the Brexit vote? Clue: Look left.  
Respect for human rights is enshrined in British law.  It is a nonsense to say that this will be lost after Brexit. 
Brexit talks stuck in 'phony war' in Brussels as British lawmakers wage fight in London  
Labour's good night in 14 local elections  Plus 5% ahead in latest Survation poll. Firmer anti-Brexit stand pays off! 
Why are 40 hardline MPs setting the tone of the Brexit debate?  
...or more accurately, the SNP are pretending that we never voted for Brexit & they are doing everything possible to scupper it.  
The president of the European Commission is questioning the 'stability' of the UK's chief Brexit negotiator  
A perfect example of how this mad country is mindlessly following a bunch of absolute bellends.... 
In politics Larry there is no logic. Look at the EU referendum result for proof of that! #powertocats 
Conservatives have a sensible plan for Brexit and the leadership to see it through – Labour by contrast… @conservatives @uklabour 
Business groups frozen out of new round of Davis Brexit talks  
Brexit logic - Must enact will of 52% in referendum.Great Repeal Bill logic - Must ignore  the the will of 58% in general election. 
The 52 per cent did not vote for this: Why Labour is right to oppose the Brexit bill, writes @thom_brooks 
“The Brexit policy of the hardliners in the Conservative Party would be disastrous for our country" 
'Britain is most likely to leave EU without a trade deal - and that's 'just fine'- Chopper's Brexit Podcast E-20  
So where were Labour howls of protest when UK Sovereignty was given away by Maastricht, Nice & Lisbon treaties without a referendum?#Brexit 
Poland and Hungary could threaten the EU more than Brexit does  
Can't understand why more ppl are not livid about this; our PM played politics with migrants lives, stirred-up hate & Brexit@LBC @mrjamesob 
Was it democratic to exclude UK citizens living in the EU, most affected by the outcome, from the referendum? 
People who really love our country aren't cheering on Brexit, they're distraught about the damage it's doing. 
Instead of having UK officials lobby individual MEPs, @theresa_may should debate with us in public #brexit  
This is incredibly obtuse. The problem is the two-way non-tariff barriers Brexit UK will impose, each time it decides to depart from EU law.  
#mfltwitterati Would LOVE your input on tomorrow's #researchED debate on languages Post Brexit Please RT!  
Theresa May is pretending the election never happened to try and ram through a destructive hard Brexit, We will fight this tooth and nail  
Many important questions: The Tory MPs using taxpayers’ cash to fund a secretive hard-Brexit group | openDemocracy  
Thank you, thank you all. I'd like to thank the Brexit trolls, who provide so much material & Theresa May for being such an inspiration.  
I have yet to hear from another member state what barriers they wish to impose on their citizens trading & travelling to the UK post Brexit. 
On my way to first weekend of #CitizensAssembly on #Brexit in Manchester. Excited to hear citizens' perspectives  
Theory: We would have had a much better pre-referendum debate, and ultimately a more sensible Brexit, if EU nationals had been able to vote. 
Oh dear! , Richard Bransons Holiday home "Wrecked" by a Hurricane. Could not have happened to a less liked man!Will he blame Brexit? 
Amazing how some people acknowledge #Brexit is an absolute car crash happening in front of their eyes but refuse any possible escape route 
Keir Starmer tears apart Tory Brexit Bill, calls it 'extraordinary power grab'  
Euro rises further above $1.20 as the dollar tumbles to its weakest level since 2015  
RUS invades UKR, aids Assad's butchery, funds Brexit, hax US elxn, arms Taliban, attempts coup in MNT. But they're only a "spoiler." Right. 
'Hang your head in shame': Nicola Sturgeon blasts Ruth Davidson for Brexit hypocrisy  
The Shadow Cabinet will discuss opposing Brexit and supporting free movement, is Labour now the pro-Remain party? 
Good news. But for purveyors of Brexit, anti-immigration, extreme weather and Diana, this is an absolute nightmare.  
*Brexit Explained*  
Ian Wright, DG, Food And Drink Federation:  ( industry employs 400k)"I don't know why people voted for #Brexit. " 
Theresa May's plan to gain sweeping new powers ahead of #Brexit revealed  
Big business shouldn't complain. They brought Brexit on themselves with use of cheap foreign labour. My column  
Labour just tore apart the Tory Brexit Bill and exposed just how 'extraordinary' it would be  via @HuffPostUK 
Revealed: The Tory MPs using taxpayers’ cash to fund a secretive hard-Brexit group | openDemocracy  
What best describes the Brexit Theresa May & her band of Brexiters are pursuing? (HT @AndrewzCooper) 
David Davis’s #brexit strategy @DavidDavisMP @Trump_ton 
They stood exclusively on their opposition to a 2nd referendum. They were elected to run P&K. This is the result.  
Leaked Paper: #Brexit Will Make It Easier to Deport #EU Murderers, Rapists   #IAmBritish 
At what point do we call time on this greed? @BBCNolan#RedSky #AggregateIQ #Brexit #RHI #BrexitTrade #NAMA #DUP #Expenses #Corruption 
Ironically the Brexit fanatics need the EU. It's a handy way of blaming someone else for their own failings that doesn't require any thought  
Nicky Morgan: Tory Brexit letter 'unacceptable'  
Things that are the same:Scottish nationalismWelsh nationalismEnglish nationalismBrexit nationalism#nationalismisforlosers 
Brexit -  in 567 days, 14 hours, 32 minutes and 1 seconds! #EventCountdown  
There's only one way to beat Brexit in ScotlandThat's to join @theSNP and get active!Time to stand up for our European Scots 
We're going to miss our own money too after BrexitIs @KateHoeyMP really saying no UK investment into EU science collabs? That wld screw us 
Hayleys Hotel: LeedsIt’s well Brexit. 2 newspapers available - Express and Daily Mail. I should check the bathrobe isn’t a Klan garment. 
Theresa May's plan to gain sweeping new powers ahead of Brexit revealed  THE PM TAKES A FURTHER STEP TOWARDS DICTATOR 
Pound sterling's crash after Brexit vote 'more harm than good', says British Chambers of Commerce  
I think this could be a bit like our #brexit negotiations  
The Tories seem determined to ram through their destructive hard Brexit even though they have no mandate for it 
Whether you're for #Brexit or against, no one wants a minority government to get away with the biggest power grab in ages #EUwithdrawalbill 
This is how EU Citizens living in Britain feel about the leaked Brexit immigration #citizensrights proposals 
Why so outraged by Brexit?Because selfish, arrogant, racist, idiots are trying to take away our identities, our futures & more.That's why. 
Furious Labour MPs accuse Jeremy Corbyn of taking voters ‘for fools’ as fresh civil war erupts over Brexit  
Now that he thinks he's secured #Brexit, #Farage no longer hides his true colours 
Theresa May MP: Brexit Negotiators to be breathalysed before each and every negotiation. - Sign the...  via @UKChange 
Tell you what, let’s have a referendum where gay people get to say if straight people are allowed  oral sex. 
*Brexit Explained*  
And their licence to do what they want was withdrawn by the electorate. They think they can get it back by doubling down on Brexit. Wrong... 
Brexit is such a clusterfuck it's gonna have to be abandoned... but who is gonna tell the Brexidiots? 
Never underestimate opponents, but journalists drawing parallels between Corbyn, Brexit, Trump and Rees-Mogg, showing ignorance > 
When will the public wake up, Brexit is the veil for a RW coup driven by the puppet masters of @theresa_may ? Democracy will be destroyed. 
Southern Leaders Insists On  New Constitution Through Referendum  
OPINION: Germany, seeking more European cooperation rather than less, is unlikely to toss the UK a Brexit lifeline  
Scores of MPs excluded from #Brexit Bill debate for lack of time allocated. Now this. May thinks she's a dictator. Outrageous.  
European Parliament: EU Citizens Stand Up For Scotland - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange #EU #brexit #indyref2 
Jean-Claude Juncker suggested David Davis isn’t up to negotiating Brexit. Nigel Farage’s response is hilarious  
OK so...Neo-Nazis, Tsunami, Hurricane x3, Nuclear North Korea, Trump, Brexit, Venezuela, Myanmar, earthquake2017, maybe calm down a bit? 
Part of the story of how Brexit & Trump were made to 'win.' Our democracy has been hijacked.  
UK employers raise pay as Brexit skills shortage bites - recruiters  pic.twitter.com/8UKHAhcqNk 
It is nice see the Tories piling the pressure on May, but it would be better still if they vote her Brexit Repeal Bill down. #StopBrexit 
David Davis's plan to use Henry VIII powers to speed up Brexit - Peter Brookes - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
If you are seeking business support to help sort the Brexit mess you've created its bizarre and foolhardy to exclude @CBItweets & @The_IoD 
Call for international observers for the Catalan #referendum #CATref #indyref #Catalonia #Catalunya #catpol 
These issues are of the utmost importance. We need to be very sure that in a post-Brexit UK, fundamental human rights are not undermined  
They fought for women's voices to be heard. #Brexit leaves our rights vulnerable. Defend them with us  #FaceHerFuture 
Exclusive: Theresa May's plan to gain sweeping new powers ahead of Brexit revealed  
Why Berlin won't come to UK's rescue on Brexit  
She said "Brexit could deliver an economic blow to Britain from which the country may not recover" But her 13 MP's will vote for it at WM  
Gibraltar National Day 10th September & 50th anniversary of our Referendum to stay British  
This graphic says it all. The blame for #Brexit is firmly placed on #MSM, #Tories fearing #UKIP & tax-avoiding rich. @StopBrexitMarch 
The MP, the £100k gifts & the Brexit trade deal: Questions over DUP MP's register of interests after Sri Lanka trip  
Well done @Keir_Starmer for showing the Brexit Extremists plans what they really are, "A Power Grab". Join us and help #StopBrexit 
Looking forward to meeting all my fellow 'saboteurs' on the big march in London tomorrow. Together we can defeat Brexit! @peoplesmarch4eu 
Brexit bill: Barnier makes Diane Abbotesque adding up error. Turns out EU owes UK £9.3bn.  
Hard Brexit would wipe out 2/3 of JLR's profits. Not speculation; the Chief Exec has done the sums. How many other firms face similar? 
Still waiting for Corbyn to ‘unlock’ my talent...MeanwhileHis student debt deceitSupport for tyrantsBrexit betrayalDoors to No10   
"Are we more in control when we can't travel across borders to work freely?" Well said @CarolineLucas #Brexit  
Still not heard a single German car boss demand a deal with the UK. But I have heard the boss of JLR label hard Brexit a disaster for jobs. 
Basically right as an overview of a failure to understand the EU that characterises much comment on Brexit (incl here @andrew_lilico). 
The referendum being over doesn't invalidate the fact that we've completely and totally fucking embarrassed ourselves in front of the world. 
"...and Brexit means...Daisy on a bicycle made for...smooth and...smoo......I am sorry Dave Davis, I am afraid I can't let you do that". 
BBC Radio 4 - The Briefing Room, What does the EU want from Brexit?  
"Brexit means Brexit, strong and stable, Daisy, smooth and orderly, Daisy, orderly, your answer do, Daisy, smooth, bicycle built for two..." 
Economically & culturally damaging, Tories putting party before nation, a huge waste of resources. #Brexit is not just mad but unpatriotic.  
So we MUST observe the will of the people on Brexit - but not on the general election? Our @HuffPostUKexclusive: 
Number of countries visited: 63Number of trade deals: 0Of which include services: 0Brexit is going great isn't.  
Do you agree with this FT reader's letter?: 'There is no strong case for a Catalan referendum'  
Goldman Sachs may have a fourfold increase in staff at Frankfurt after Brexit  
DID YOU KNOW? |According to a new CIA report, Erdogan Regime stole 4 mil votes in referendum that includes 2 mil votes from Syrians.  
#Catalonia sets independence referendum on October 1, Spain seeks to press criminal charges  
In divided Turkey, president defends victory in referendum granting new powers  @washingtonpost 
This is the Labour we want!☞Labour just tore apart the Tory Brexit Bill and exposed how 'extraordinary' it would be  
Disgraceful threats.  What next?  Anti-Brexit business leaders being forced to wear yellow stars? 
If there was any chance of a positive result with #Brexit I could understand the pain we are going through.There is not.Pain will increase 
Spanish prosecutor orders confiscation of "anything" that could be used for holding referendum #ridiculous 
Brexit needs putting back in its box, time for MPs to show genuine leadership and ownership of the solution.  
I'm beginning to formulate a theory revolving around literally everyone who still supports #brexit being in favour of democracy.  
Spain Catalonia: Court blocks independence referendum  
I'm actually convinced at this stage that many British are unaware they have a border with another country #brexit  
Some thoughts about Brexit   
#PeoplesMarch4EU #Saturday #Brexit #StopBrexit #RemainSee y'all tomorrow at the march @peoplesmarch4eu 11am Park Lane #London #EU  
Revealed: The Tory MPs using taxpayers’ cash to fund a secretive hard-Brexit group | openDemocracy  
Government's leaked outline post-Brexit immigration plans suggest Tory infighting is vicious & ongoing.Reverse it.  
There seems to be an almost suicidal recklessness in her actions which confirms she is not fit to govern..#Brexit 
In France. After great dinner and chat with friends here, feeling even more despondent about #Brexit. Such a mistake in our lifetime. 
Packed house for @IrishNetworkDC event with Ambassador @DanMulhall this evening in #DC for discussion on his career to date & on #Brexit  
FURTHER UPDATE: Here's my spreadsheet of 55 suspected members of the hard-Brexit European Research Group of MPs:  
Better Britain - Unionist Party (BUSP) identify as 'centrist' and support the Union, 50p tax rate, Trident, manufacturing jobs and Brexit. 
When brexit is proved to be the great success it will be, all those who attempted to obstruct it and damage the UK should be driven out....! 
NEW: Shadow Cabinet Members to Attend Host of Anti-Brexit Events at Labour Conference >>  
Gagging Act, voter reg changes, boundary review, Trade Union Act, #Brexit Bill & now this. Latest ruthless undemocratic Tory power grab  
It looks as though the British are going to need to suffer considerable damage from Brexit before they and Parliament change their minds. 
Mayor of Girona: I sign (digitally ) the decree in support of Catalan referendum on independence. Municipalities with @KRLS 
Ugly deep schism in Tory Party exposed in Brexit row as Labour MPs  meld into happy unity for Monday's vote against elected dictatorship. 
As Mayor of Collbató, I signed the decree supporting the referendum on Catalan independence on Oct1. #josigno 
Unsurprisingly, 'time waster' Barnier rules out nonstop Brexit talks. Tick tock, run the clock down.  
Spain Moves to Block Catalan Independence Referendum  
It's like I'm staring at the Brexit negotiations.  
“You have to have something to implement to have an implementation period” – @hilarybennmp on Brexit #newsnight 
So that's Irisgate, Red Sky, NAMA, UDA slush fund, London Metro ad, RHI, Saudi Brexit 'dark money', and now Paisley's Sri Lankan holidays. 
Here's hoping: 'Labour's new plan for Brexit gives hope that we might not leave the EU after all ' 
Cambridge Analytica was of course deeply involved in the scheme to influence the #Brexit vote #StopBrexit 
When is a Brit politician going to stand up and say #Brexit is a complete nonsensical chaotic load of bollocks? 
Is it just me or is anyone else getting more angry as we are lead to the precipice of Brexit? I don't want my EU citizenship taken from me. 
The Labour party have shifted their position on Brexit “dramatically” since the election, argues @CharlieElphicke #newsnight 
I am dismayed at Labours comment in parliament that we are leaving the EU, we respect the referendum. I don't, it was propagated on lies. 
Where was Parliament & its sovereignty with the Advisory Referendum? Will someone point to the actual vote in Parliament on 'leave the EU'?  
A company in Shropshire is to register its head office in Germany and is blaming Brexit for. (@HenryCPorter)  
JACOB REES-MOGG HAS BEEN ELECTED ONTO THE BREXIT COMMITTEE!! RT TO SHARE THIS WONDERFUL NEWS!! #Moggmentum 
Well well well. IPJ enjoying the fruits of Brexit.   
Hard Brexit Tory letter shows widening gap btwn business Cons - and nationalist/racist populists. Thread with my translation 1/  
Leading Remain campaigner, Anna Soubry, has failed to get elected to the all-powerful Brexit select committee.  
No one should have "got behind" a merely advisory referendum result of 37% of the electorate, on limited franchise - EVER. Least of all MPs. 
This might be the smartest insight today.No possible Brexit deal can keep all leavers happy in a referendum  
If Brexit=bad; Maybot.switch>>{hiding mode} 
Rejecting the Tory EU repeal bill isn't rejecting #Brexit, it's rejecting the biggest power grab by any gov in ages  
Spain's courts have suspended a law – passed yesterday – that set the date for a Catalan independence referendum  
This is why the Remainers would lose a second referendum. Unreliable allies across the Channel.  
Remember David Davis' British-German trade deal. Our future lies in the hands of this imbecile. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
At what point did half a country decide to leave the world’s most advanced free trade area because they believe in free trade #brexit 
Thank you Channel 4. This is now the National News Service. The Brexit Broadcasting Service is no longer fit for purpose 
HAYIR KAZANDI..In divided Turkey, president defends victory in referendum granting new powers - The Washington Post  
Millions whipped up into a frenzy believing in nationalistic slogans from self serving politicians... No not Nazi Germany but Brexit Britain 
Forget the Brexit battle in Brussels, the main fight right now is in London  
This is big; very big indeed. Theresa May is about to make another MASSIVE power grab to rig #parliament: #brexit 
#OnThisDay in 1983, the referendum on the 8th Amendment was held. None of us had a say. Next year, we won't lose our voice. #repealthe8th 
Friday's TELEGRAPH: "The MP, the £100k gifts and the Brexit trade deal" #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
Should the EU Charter of Rights still apply in the UK after Brexit?The argument against - and my reply in favour:  
ERG are a dangerous group of MPs. They use the cover of the referendum to force a small-state, low-tax Britain. MPs must reject their Brexit  
Tomorrow @ScotNational 'Hang your head in shame' - Sturgeon blasts Tory leader Davidson’s Brexit hypocrisy  
Britain's attractiveness as a destination for investment has fallen sharply. It's what many predicted. (@IanDunt)#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Corbyn's Brexit BLOW: Labour MPs to rebel against plans to oppose bill freeing UK from EU  
The Brexit paper on science reads like a bad Taylor Swift break-up song, says @justsomesomeone 
Catalonia parliament approves independence referendum for Oct. 1.Polls show only 41% favor independent state. #UnlessItPullsABrexit 
WATCH: Jeremy Corbyn’s EMBARRASSING U-turn over leaving the Single Market  via @Your Brexit 
Note the stress on being completely out. It's the EU tax avoidance reform that is driving Brexit. Nothing else matters 
Brexiteer Letter Demands Brexit  
Superb. Destroys all stupid arguments that Remainers have a patriotic or democratic duty to "get behind Brexit". Read it if you ever waver.  
Big business shouldn't complain. They brought Brexit upon themselves with their use of cheap foreign - The Telegraph  
James Lovelock on voting Brexit, ‘wicked’ renewables and why he changed his mind on climate change | The Spectator  
This is a very, very bleak week for @The3Million  EU citizens 'no longer a safe bet for banks due to Brexit'  
VIDEO: Labour's Keir Starmer forensically tears down Tory "power grab" Brexit Repeal Bill 
1967 Gibraltar Referendum"Let No One Dare Untie This Knot" 50 Years on and Gibraltar still speaks with devastating clarity!   
When the evidence suggests that patient care is going to be detrimentally affected by #Brexit, I see it as my professional duty to oppose it 
Brexit will allow UK to offer shipping firms better tax regime than EU - The Telegraph  
Whatever the 'will of the people' was, it no longer is; and it has fuck all to do with #Brexit. The Tories want that for their own reasons. 
You wouldn't let a bunch of rich sadists beat your children or grandkids. Don't let the European Research Group manipulate a hard Brexit 
*Brexit Explained*  
Latest from me: on E. Europeans who believe in free-mkt self-reliance... & are being done over by Brexit/the Tories  
SPAIN'S CONSTITUTIONAL COURT SUSPENDS CATALAN REFERENDUM LAW - COURT SOURCE 
Britain doesn't need independence from the EU. It needs independence from the power of Murdoch, Dacre, Desmond & Barclay Brothers. #Brexit  
Anyone wanting the EU perspective on Brexit - which we rarely get here these days - listen back to 8pm BBC R4 Briefing Room prog. Brilliant. 
BREAKING: Spanish Constitutional Court suspends Catalonia's referendum law; Catalan government will disobey the order. 
Exclusive: Leading business groups including the CBI and IoD excluded from meeting with Brexit Secretary next week.  
Our daily reminder that you don't have to be clever to be a doctor. #brexit  
CEO, Jaguar Land Rover will lose £1000,000,000 by 2020 because of Brexit. Good job you fucking Brexshiters, good job. Top! Fuck you! 
How can Tory Brexit minister live rent free in house of Vote Leave donor who earned £300k in EU farming subsidies?  
Britain’s greatest Brexit obstacle: itself  
The president of the European Commission is questioning the 'stability' of the UK's chief Brexit negotiator  
Podcast commentary: Britain’s deluded hopes for a painless free-trade deal  #Brexit  
.Or..... Just. Dump. Brexit.. 
."[London] will be hurt more than people expect from Brexit, with lawyers likely to join bankers in moving away". 
EU owes UK Brexit bill of £9.3 billion, report claims  
Euro-area economy is now forecast to grow 2.2% this year, the fastest rate since 2007  
EXCL: Tory Brexit minister faces 'conflict-of-interest' row after Leave donor gives him free use of a London pad 
Catalonia's October 1 referendum promises to be a headache for Spain  
Wrong.At the root of #Brexit is you. People just like you.Need us to explain? Then you just don't get it. Even now.Ignorance personified.  
Graham Stringer is the latest Labour MP to speak out against the three line whip to oppose the Brexit bill... 
Law Society warns of Brexit Bill removing devolved powers from Scotland.  
Labour's Keir Starmer forensically tears down Tory Brexit 'power grab' bill  
BREAKING: Report reveals that EU owes Britain £9.3 BILLION  via @Your Brexit 
For what reason&by what right,are you dictating 'quotas' of illegal immigrants to other countries?The EU is a trade organisation? #brexit  
How's the call to business to support Brexit going @theresa_may ? 
4/ Why do they still think that EU will negotiate a bespoke transition & then bespoke final deal- effectively, to negotiate Brexit twice? 
 Red Alert Australia!! Mercer's firm that delivered Brexit & Trump psyops campaigns is headed your way. #Resist 
Maybe this reveals my own deficiency, but I genuinely struggle to understand key aspects of the Tory hard Brexit mindset. 1/  
Watching CEO of Jaguar on #C4News lambasting Brexit saying it would cost the company £1 billion (yes billion) pa and make the firm unviable. 
The "[x] and [y]" list in Brexit rhetoric is daft and depressing.  
#EUWithdrawalBill: However #Brexit pans out, Govt mustn't be able to strip away vital rights as they rewrite UK laws  
Funny that a European Research group exists and we don't know about it? It pays for research for pro brexit Tories & we pay for it #C4news 
A Berliner told me if just a few had resisted when they started building the wall history could've been different.Feels the same with Brexit 
Brexit means BrexitNo deal better than bad dealStrong and stableSmooth and orderlyLook into the eyes, the eyes, not around the eyes  
#EUwithdrawalBill Tories claiming that staying in #SingleMarket wld not respect referendum shld remember wot #LeaveEU campaigners said: 
With Brexit destroying the country, you need to question why those in power are doing it. There will be a logical self serving answer. 
In a moment @SuellaFernandes from European Research Group on this letter doing the rounds urging hard brexit 
"We would like to position ourselves to be ready to offer *targeted* information" (my emphasis)...The reality of Brexit UK for @The3Million  
Stop Brexit so I can tweet more pics like this... Isn't he gorgeous.   
15 months after the Brexit vote & the EU has to remind the Tories of their responsibility to solve the border issue and protect the GFA...  
You mean the advisory referendum which was passed by a small majority, who were lied to and who aren't now being asked to agree the deal. 
LABOUR:Lied about WMDsLied about ending boom & bustLied about RotherhamLied about student debtLied about brexitSense a pattern? 
.@masoud_barzani invites international NGOs to observe #Kurdistan Region's independence referendum#TwitterKurds 
Brexit parties have turned the UK into a global joke, and that's not funny, it's a pathetic embarrassment.   
"EU citizens in disbelief over UK's leaked Brexit proposals" 
Catalonia has officially set a date for its independence referendum. So what happens now?  
#Brexit Scotland voted to remain in EU. The Scottish Parliament MUST vote against all Brexit legislation that comes before it. 
Brexit is the defining challenge of this generation – Don't let them silence your voice Agree?  Retweet!  
I translated just 2 Rob's quotes. He talks about Brexit:  
Furious Labour MPs accuse Corbyn and Starmer of taking voters "for fools" over Brexit:  
Heseltine: Brexit is a monumental mistake. UK a spectator, bled of its wealth,relegated from league of global powers  
Robert Pattinson talks 'Good Time', 'High Life', Brexit & More with l'OBS (France)   
Missed opportunity that PM May won’t address #EUParliament, pity she hasn’t read how to make friends and influence people #Brexit 
Brexit impact bad enough for EW& S, @jonlis1, but it's almost criminal negligence to inflict it on N Irl/Irl, Gib, & Brit depdt territories 
So obvious conclusion too expensive to leave as every sensible economist outlined so fix is obviously to remain and give up this Brexit crap  
'No special deal' Angry Barnier sinks Britain's trade dream and blasts UK over Brexit bill.We Owe nothing!  
The State of Play @TheEconomist #EUwithdrawalbill #Brexit #BrexitNegotiations 
While Brexit Britain stagnates the rest of the EU continues to grow.  
Remember folks: Any restriction UK floats for EU=Wicked & unconscionable; Any restriction EU says for UK=Justifed & inevitable given Brexit 
Tories' Brexit Bill a dreadful & dangerous Bill that was completely & forensically exposed by @Keir_Starmer today. No taking 'back control' 
PR triumph for the Government. Brilliant way of displaying what little business support you have for hard Brexit. 
Listening to #Brexit shambles on Radio4. Come on politicians, bite the bullet and simply cancel the damned thing. We need to stay in EU 
Brexit parties have divided the UK and its four nations - would be poetic justice to see them split.  
Here's my column on Brexit, which is going almost as well as England's batting  
(sighs). No it's probably a sign Brexiteers think Remainers are trying to stop Brexit while pretending not to.  
So bored of words from @Anna_Soubry on Brexit, so yearn for one, big, brave, bold vote from her against the Government.  
"They promised Brexit in terms which simply cannot be delivered" - @ChukaUmunna says MPs have a duty to remind us what Leavers promised 
Labour's @KateHoeyMP says voting against the bill makes it look like Labour are trying to slow down Brexit  
#RepealBill also aims to rob voters of possible right to a referendum on the #brexit dealvia @InFactsOrg @ljlythgoe 
Remoaner never complained that EU laws for 40+ yrs became UK law, bypassing Parliament. Their hypocrisy on the Brexit bill is breathtaking.  
British food and drink makers are gearing up for a post-Brexit export boom  
She's already said she will vote with the Govt on Brexit so this just seems to me about having her cake and eating it  
UK cannot use Northern Irish border as a “test case” for its post-Brexit customs relationship with EU, Barnier says 
Heseltine: Brexit a “monumental mistake”. UK a spectator, bled of its wealth, relegated from league of global powers  
So little understanding of the power dynamics here: the EU Parliament has the final say on Brexit terms...  
Tory Anna Soubry takes a swipe at her own colleagues who 'lied' to millions of Brexit voters 
In less than 24 hours more than 400 Catalan mayors have already signed the decree in support of #1Oct referendum  
Brexit is a bit like Britain getting really drunk and then deciding to troll, unfollow and block the EU on Twitter. 
Ukip donor attempts to unseat 'Brexit saboteurs' Rudd and Hammond | Politics | The Guardian  
On this day 34 years ago, Irish people voted in the referendum on the 8th amendment.No-one under the age of 52 has had a say.#repealthe8th 
59 MPs are members of the 'hard Brexit' European Research Group (ERG). Here's my list so far. Who have I missed? Please tweet me!  
Remoaners persist in fighting a Referendum battle they lost. They are rude. And they don't believe in the brilliance of their own country. 
A #Rellinars DECRET signat @AjRellinars #josigno #Referendum #1Oct2017 
Our position on the #EUWithdrawalBill is clear: It’s critical that our hard-won rights don’t diminish after #Brexit.  
‘Tax exile’ Richard Branson facing calls for his knighthood to be scrapped  COULDN'T COME SOON ENOUGH 
FTSE chiefs refuse to sign May's begging letter to support her Brexit plans. They know Brexit is bad for Britain, so let's #StopBrexit 
#brexit : leaving the world's largest free trade area because you believe in free trade may confuse people.... 
Davis slams 'cynical' Labour attempt to block Brexit bill   
12/ If you believe in Brexit, you should be asking these questions. But you're not. You just send abuse when I ask./End 
11/ I voted against Brexit. I think it's a terrible idea. But I'm astonished nobody from Leave is asking this stuff. 
5/ Dept of Transport anticipates 150 miles of daily tailbacks in Kent after Brexit. Where is the road widening, laybys, traffic management? 
.@M_AndersonSF Congratulates the Catalonian people on their decision to hold an Independence referendum on the 1st October 2017.  
Iraqi shiite militia leader Hadi Al-Ameri: "A referendum on Kurdistan Independence might lead to an armed confrontation"  
Brexit is toxic, it's already poisoned our relationship with our EU family, divided communities and split families.  
Keir Starmer Tears Apart Brexit Bill, Calls It 'Extraordinary Power Grab' - HuffPost UK  
The UK Gov’s Brexit Bill lays bare the betrayal of devolved administrations at risk of a Tory power grab #EUWithdrawalBill 
Germany has stopped caring about Brexit, and 4 other global stories  
Scottish referendum for independence becomes more necessary  
And that doesn't count the ones—like Barcelona—are in favor of Catalan sovereignty and holding a referendum!  
.@Anna_Soubry says Leave voters were lied to during referendum about reality of Brexit. "Far from easy it's a blooming nightmare." 
Catalonia should be allowed to hold referendum – @SeanCroweTD  
Labour just tore apart the Tory Brexit Bill and exposed just how 'extraordinary' it would be  
Confused about how #Brexit could affect our rights? Try this new interactive @rights_info tool  
I'm beginning to formulate a theory revolving around literally everyone who still supports Brexit being an ignorant fucking idiot. 
So the party that was so happy to wave through EU laws & treaties like Lisbon suddenly finds a conscience over the Brexit bill. Cynical tosh 
So I went to the model EU and the model Britain has a mini houses of Parliament with a mini anti Brexit March.  
God I'm bored of being told by natives who voted for Brexit how immigrants need to react to the latest Brexit news. Is this Brexitsplaining? 
"Soft Brexit? Hard Brexit? Let’s go for No Brexit". More on Saturday's march against the #EUwithdrawalbill:  
The European Parliament will adopt a new resolution to assess #Brexit state of play :   
Brexit is driven by their philosophies, predilections, tastes, education, or lack of, prejudices & personal crusades  
Right Hon Dominic Grieve QC MP (Con) says EU Withdrawal Bill "astonishing monstrosity"- won't support 3rd reading w/out major change #Brexit 
Interactive map of hundreds of towns signing decrees in favor of Catalan Independence Referendum 
"KRG Targets Minorities Ahead of #Kurdistan Independence Referendum — Part One: Exploiting the #Yazidi Genocide" 
Rejecting the Tory EU repeal bill isn't rejecting #Brexit, it's rejecting the biggest power grab by any government in ages (BBC clips used)  
Bin Brexit!It was sold on lies with interference from foreign billionaires.It's utterly insane!#EUWithdrawalBill 
On #Brexit UK is drunk sex offender uncle pishing in the corner at a wedding reception while the other guests chatter and try not to stare. 
On this day September 7th 1983, Ireland's citizens recognised in a referendum vote, the equal right to life of...  
Would that European Research Group misusing taxpayers' money be the same ERG as is campaigning for a cliff-edge Brexit? Reader, it would.  
A mistake, when she needs MEPs on side to ratify #Brexit deal. But in line w her general approach to scrutiny of exec power by legislature.  
Revealed: The Tory MPs using taxpayers’ cash to fund a secretive hard-Brexit group:  #EUwithdrawalbill 
Information about Catalonia's referendum on independence is available in four languages  
Those championing a soft Brexit actually want to thwart it altogether, writes @Steven_Woolfe 
Great to see all this debate about parliament's power and how to control the executive. Almost as though this was main point of Brexit. 
Power, influence, organisation - the Government's Brexit campaign hits new highs  
#Brexit Secretary David Davis clashes with counterpart Keir Starmer over #EUwithdrawalbill 
"I lost my job and I can't afford to go on holiday because Brexit tanked the economy, but thank goodness I have my blue passport back." 
Slowest economy in the EU for 2nd quarter in a row. Anyone would think Brexit was an imbecilic decision.  
Single most important debate so far on leaving the EU & #Brexit and MPs restricted to 5 minute speeches.  Govt shows its contempt for Parl! 
As No10’s latest Brexit proposal means sending home thousands of unskilled farm-workers, local Brits queue up to replace them.  
Leaked Paper: Brexit Will Make It Easier to Deport EU Murderers, Rapists - Breitbart  
Brussels chief slaps down David Davis' approach to Irish border and Brexit saying 'It will not happen' 
From referendum itself, to triggering Art50 to #RepealBill - pressure has been plied to push through monumental changes w unnecessary haste. 
Should May's government receive support from Tory backbenchs & Her Majesty's Opposition to pass Great Repeal Bill? #poll #brexit #RepealBill 
Labour's Keir Starmer forensically tears down David Davis' 'power grab' Brexit bill 
Failure to deliver a real Brexit will destroy faith in democracy  
Hey, Brexiters. Here's another graph that shows how shitty Brexit is. Just FYI.  
If MP's are going to go against brexit they should not be MP's. We voted out and its their duty to take us out. Their conduct is treason. 
"Nobody said Brexit would be easy". Er, they did actually. Repeatedly. 
The misconception being that the complex long-term task of Brexit can be treated as a simple task, done at speed.  /4 ends 
And almost every mistake of this government on Brexit comes down to the one basic misconception.  /3 
Every so often am told off for not being sufficiently solemn and earnest about Brexit."Don't you realise that..." etc.  /1 
Catalonia will hold independence referendum on October 1st despite Spanish objection 
Baroness Mobarik, a director of Better Together, who said voting No would keep Scotland in the EU. Is now an MEP ensuring #Brexit happens.  
EEA membership ruled out by @DavidDavisMP Ignoring a chance to avoid economic catastrophe shows that Brexit isn't safe in Government's hands 
Good news. Jacob Rees Mogg was elected to the Brexit select committee; Anna Soubry was not.  
Best Brexit humour I've seen yet! @IrelandsFarmers @ZwartblesIE @IrishFarmerette @SEWomenFarming @campbellsuz 
Pro-leave MPs prepare public statement insistent on hard Brexit  40 MPs are dedicated to wrecking the economy 
Celrà's mayor has signed the decree in support of the referendum and law. He'll then call special city council meeting to ratify the decree.  
Showdown In Spain: Madrid Moves To Block Catalonia Referendum  
EU #Brexit paper today is welcome. Strongly reflects our priority issues, like CTA & GFA. Will form basis for next round of negotiations. 
READ: The undemocratic pursuit for a soft Brexit will shatter trust in politicians. Brexit means Brexit.  Me 4 @CapX 
RT jmcruset: A #Riudoms ja hem firmat el recolzament al KRLS, govern i parlament_cat! #josigno #referendum #1oct…  
Hardline Brexit fanatics are getting anxious. Pro-leave MPs prepare public statement insisting on hard Brexit  
And I should point out Ken Clarke also says “It’s absurd to say all Labour MPs are agreed on Labour’s new policy”Brexit carnage. 
Regardless of your views on #Brexit becoming increasingly clear that Monsieur Barnier is a man alert to typical Brit tactics & skulduggery  
The reality of Taking Back Control re: #Brexit. Not the people. Or Parliament. But the 'elective dictatorship'.  
Poland and Hungary could threaten the EU more than Brexit does  
Universities to charge £4K a year for fruit picking courses to prepare students for Brexit 
From DACA to Brexit, there's a divide between those who dream and those who fear  
Why remainers shouldn't 'get behind Brexit'. My latest blogpost:  
I have the worst feeling that we are going to Brexit in the most horrible way and then people will see Remainers were right but too late. 
Tory veteran Ken Clarke threatens to "force the government back to the drawing board" over its Brexit Bill - live  
Sheila Hodgers died screaming in Sept1983. Her story not known in time to influence referendum held 34 yrs ago today  
The Castellers de Vilafranca (human tower team) stand firm on the side of democracy. We give full support to the Referendum on October 1st.  
Spanish Guardia Civil police search cars of #Catalan print shop workers looking for Oct 1 #referendum voters list . 
A warning 'to people like Hammond who think the election result means a softer Brexit' ....  
EU owes UK Brexit bill of £9.3 billion, report claims  
. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg says it’s ABSOLUTELY right that Brexit details are kept quiet  
Migrants/asylum seekers fear racism, violence and intolerance in post-Brexit Britain  #Brexit #EUref 
CRACKING: EU's Juncker and Barnier lash out at Brexit Britain as EU exit clock ticks. 
ECB raises euro-area growth forecast for this year to 2.2%, the fastest pace since 2007  
Hard Brexit Tories putting pressure on May. A non transition March 2019 hard Brexit will bring us to our knees.  It will be utter chaos.  
Superb Brexit debate speech from @Keir_Starmer leaving the Bill without a shred of credibility. #hardacttofollow 
Keir Starmer just gave David Davis a decidedly awkward moment in the Brexit debate - LIVE  
BREAKING: Spain's prime minister says Catalan independence referendum bill is an 'act of disobedience' 
Keir Starmer making absolute mincemeat of Government in his forensic demolition of the Tories hard #Brexit Bill. 
WATCH | JRM slams "fundamental contradiction" in Labour's Brexit Bill opposition. They would rather be run by an unelected EU bureaucracy!  
Keir Starmer correctly pointing out that there are Cabinet Ministers eager to undermine workers' rights post Brexit.  #EUwithdrawalbill 
EU President accuses David Davis of 'jeopardising' Brexit talks in minutes of meeting  
Powerful and frankly terrifying article by @IanDunt on the implications of the govt's #immigration plans. #Brexit 
Revealed: The Tory MPs using taxpayers’ cash to fund a secretive hard-Brexit group | openDemocracy  
"So would the business community like to obsequiously praise Theresa May and Brexit?""Er... we'll pass."  
11 Times Leave Campaigners Said Brexit Would Be Easy  
Brexit is truly giving us new opportunities. "Join the Brexit Land Army". You too can replace 31% of EU farm workers cutting cauli's at 4am.  
Clause 9 of Brexit bill allows ministers to amend primary legislation including EU withdrawal act itself. Brilliant point from @Keir_Starmer 
Bad news for those investing in a Brexit magical cake scenario I think.  
.@DavidDavisMP claims he can't remember a pledge to devolve immigration powers post #Brexit. Well here's a reminder.  
Dozens of Tory MPs in warning shot to ministers, signatures being gathered for letter urging them not to backslide on Brexit 
After Brexit, Pound Sterling is now the second-worst performing major currency in the world  
Exclusive: here is the letter being circulated around Brexit supporting Tories in the ERG  
Scoop - dozens of Tory MPs from the Brexit-supporting European Research Group to launch major push to stop government from softening Brexit. 
Spastic daughter has made me tea in a glass. I didn't serve Queen & Country for this. Hard Brexit needed!  
Coping with a hurricane must be tricky, but writing a column about Brexit as Jimmy Anderson tries for his 500th wicket, that's REALLY hard. 
#EU owes #UK Brexit bill of £9.3 billion, report claims – Westmonster.  So #fo2eu 
1) important thread on #Brexit bill & DemocracyJust want to add some thoughts on 'chaos' & 'national interest' 
EU's chief #Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says EU is ready to "accelerate" divorce talks with Britain 
Cake and all that  Britain still wants funding from the EU’s investment bank after Brexit, David Davis says  
Universities to charge £4K a year for fruit picking courses to prepare students for Brexit 
The way things are going there will be more Labour Brexit rebels next week than Tory rebels. 
Nicola Sturgeon, who disclosed details of a private conversation on live TV, complains UK Gov isn't holding  Brexit meetings with her. #fmqs 
BREAKING: Spain will lay charges against leaders of Catalan independence referendum bill 
"What I see in the UK's paper on Ireland and Northern Ireland worries me" @MichelBarnier #Brexit  
Spanish police searches cars of Catalan print shop workers looking for referendum voters list . 
Remainers & Leavers should accept Referendum outcome. Remainers & Leavers should oppose dictatorial powers for top Tories. #democracy 
"The EU recognises the unique situation and specific circumstances on the island of Ireland" @MichelBarnier  #Brexit pic.twitter.com/0tJUEPOJfR 
Gerry Adams has called for a referendum on Irish Unity to be held within 5 years. Do you agree? #UnityRef Please retweet when you vote. 
Speaking with @TurkiAldakhil, President of Iraqi Kurdistan says referendum was due to failure of Baghdad partnership  
Brexit minister @DavidDavisMP opens the debate on the EU withdrawal bill 
Brexit in a nutshell: 'UK cannot have benefits of Norway and the weak constraints of Canada' - key line from Barnier press conference. 
Labour accepts Referendum outcome - UK is leaving EU. Tory Bill betrays UK democracy by granting dictatorial powers to Tory Ministers. 
One way to describe the referendum result.  
"We will defend to the end the right of all Catalans to vote," president Puigdemont said after calling referendum . 
UK's position on Irish border "worries" EU's Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier  
Catalonia have announced their Independence referendum for 1st October this year. It's time we set a date for our own. #UnityRef 
After again failing to be elected on to Brexit Select Committee, Anna Soubry consoles herself with a small glass of white.  
Give the People The Final Say. Support the Terms of Withdrawal from EU (Referendum)Bill & if UK voters reject the Exit Deal stay in the EU  
WATCH: @ChrisLeslieMP is right to say that business is worried about a Brexit cliff edge, which David Davis is edging us closer & closer to.  
EU Brexit paper today maintains focus on key Irish concerns in phase 1 of neg. - protecting GFA, CTA, no hard border  
The Law Society of Scotland confirms Brexit Bill is a power grab!  
Tories: UK may never recover from BrexitTories: SNP must mitigate Tory austerityTories: SNP must mitigate BrexitSpot the pattern?#FMQs 
EU Brexit Negotiator Michel Barnier says he is "worried" about the UK government's position on the Irish border 
Brexit MP pushes for June 23rd Independence Day bank holiday. Retweet if you agree!  
It seems the UK's Brexit ideas have just been blasted into oblivion in a Petri dish at Laboratoire Barnier 
And no-one is interested in an FTA with post-Brexit Britain until they know how much access we have to single market. 
Pressure mounts on Britain's embattled Prime Minister Theresa May as Brexit gets real  
Anna Soubry on hearing she failed to get onto the Brexit Select Committee.....  
NEW: Jacob Rees-Mogg wins seat on powerful Brexit committee but Anna Soubry misses out 
Lots of Catalan mayors are signing declarations of support for the independence referendum today and announcing it with the hashtag #josigno 
WATCH Brexit Minister Steve Baker: We Should Not Be Afraid of No Deal  
Five new EU Brexit position papers just published - Ireland, IP rights, customs, procurement and use of data:  
Staggering that the Govt is ruling out EEA/EFTA and narrowing our options for a transition agreement. Hard #Brexit cliff edge gets closer... 
Government “misquoted” Lords in bid to manufacture support for Henry VIII powers over Brexit  via @psbook 
EU Brexit paper on NI here  
EU's latest Brexit papers now published here 
Brexit not just about excluding immigrants, it's particularly about excluding the poor. 
'Brexodus' to hit #Aberdeen hard as nearly half of EU citizens say they'll leave Scotland #brexit  via @pressjournal 
'Corbyn will pay a heavy price for ignoring the British people on Brexit'- Tory MP @nigelmp tells Westmonster: 
What does respecting the referendum result mean?  
Brexit: There must be an alternative to granting Government Henry VIII powers, professor @stevepeers tells @juliahb1  
There are a thousand ways the leaked Tory post-Brexit immigration plan is designed to exclude the poor from the opportunities of migration 
David Davis: "the best way to guarantee stability is to vote for the Bill".Is this a tacit acknowledgment that brexit is unstable? Probably 
Hey @DamianCollins, are you going to call Facebook to your parliamentary inquiry into fake news and ask them questions about Brexit??  
There is one place for the #Brexit liars, charlatans, con-men & tax-dodging press billionaires and that is #BehindPrisonBars.#StopBrexit 
Barcelona set for referendum on independence from Spain  
Theresa May accused of misquoting Committee to back up her Brexit power grab  
OH MY GOD. THIS IS THE BEST #BREXIT TAKE EVER #MONORAIL #MONORAIL #MONORAIL  
Soubry Fails to Get Elected to Brexit Committee Again | Full Results Here >>  
Blundering towards the Brexit cliff edge. But Scotland has a choice.  
Brexit can revive British parliamentary democracy. Not because of UK departing the EU, but in how parliament chooses deals with it./ends 
Brexit: Cabinet minsters 'revolt' against Theresa May's plan to curb migration  
No wonder firms won't back May's Brexit strategy - will destroy businesses + jobs, risk a no deal. Desperate stuff.  
There is no doubt discretionary power to make or unmake laws is necessary for Brexit to have any chance of being done. 
WATCH | @SuellaFernandes: "Had the British people wanted to be subject to EU law they would have voted to Remain in last year's referendum."  
Nearly half of Merseyside wants second referendum via @LivEchonews 
Even the most rebellious Conservative MPs are wary of being branded would-be Brexit-blockers  
Honoured to be re-elected onto the #brexit committee @CommonsEUexit Here's Clifford coming with me to vote for the committee election. 
Let's have a quick look at the post-Brexit "Democracy" that the #WithdrawalBill gives us: 
The second article in my new @Byline_Media investigation...#WhiteWash 2 - Nazi Britain: Empire to Brexit  
.@JunckerEU questioned "stability and accountability" and "lack of involvement" of @DavidDavisMP after 1st round of #Brexit talks  
Labour's Graham Stringer says his party opposing Brexit Bill at 2nd reading amounts to a breach of trust with voters  
Catalan government's website for the 1 October independence referendum is also available in English:  
#EUWithdrawalBill: We’re calling on all MPs to ensure #Brexit doesn't mean vital human rights protections are lost  
UK's Brexit position: "We want future status indistinguishable from EU membership in most respects, except ££, ECJ & FoM. Be accommodating." 
This is a minor masterpiece of deception on the front page of the Record. You naturally read "LABOUR STOP BREXIT POWER GRAB"...  
NEWS! Window poo rescue woman appointed to UK Brexit strategy team  
While Labour argues about their position on Brexit, we are getting on with delivering a successful Brexit deal that works for everyone.  
Parliament will be sidelined by Government for 40 years if Theresa May's Brexit Bill is passed, says Keir Starmer  
This is a fantastic piece on #brexit and the fallacy of #immigration promises 
Brexit? The EU focuses on bigger worries.  
Boris Johnson, before ambition turned his mind, warning us about scapegoating minorities.#StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
Who will pick the fruit after brexit? Sounds like the land owners talking about cotton fields trying to justify slavery in USA . @SkyNews 
Thanks to Brexit, Milan is back in vogue as Italy’s financial capital  
I speak from experience as #SelfEmployed builder and wages stagnated from 1995 to 2016 ! Since the #brexit vote companies have paid better !  
Nail on the head here despite the embarrassing state of denial from many - "We're impoverishing ourselves to satisfy xenophobes" 
Matt's pen on the Brexit pulse.  
NEWS! Young Britons looking forward to Post-Brexit fruit picking apprenticeships  
Just 4% of working age EU migrants claim benefits compared to 17% of UK nationals in Wales #Brexit 
UK still wants funding from the EU investment bank after #Brexit, David Davis saysMore wanting cake...#StopBrexit 
#Labour is simply trying to block #Brexit.  
Ex-EU Council President: Chance of trade talks before a deal on Brexit bill is "zero".These parasites won't budge. Let's just walk away...  
Theresa May and David Davis urge MPs to back key Brexit Bill ahead of Commons showdown  
THROW UP YOUR HANDS AND RAISE YOUR VOICE! BREXIT, BREXIT, BREXIT!MONO-DOH!  
Brexit will turn out to be a nightmare for many industries-for the uk economy too .We have 60% less European people wanting to work in GB 
I've signed the petition calling for the public and parliament to get more say on new Brexit laws. Will you join me?  
If Gov wants a better reception from British business, they should end their hard Brexit rhetoric  
Former Tory minister: Brexit bill breaches the constitution and MPs should not support it |  
People's March 4EU, 9th September 2017, London UK. Together we can stop Brexit  @Tony_Robinson @GaryLineker Please RT 
Facing real #Brexit. 'Britain is prepared to sabotage its own economy in order to stop foreigners from living here.'  
"If you wannabe my Puigdemont, you gotta get with my friends. Make it last forever, Referéndum never ends" (lo siento mucho). 
Key take from this as ex-CS is that, if true, the distinction between neutral civil servants and Ministers may be being blurred on Brexit 1/  
MPs will debate the EU (Withdrawal) Bill today. Here's our short explainer on #Brexit and Henry VIII powers  
If you voted for Brexit for reasons of sovereignty this should concern you a great deal. 
Brexit thinks it's Winston Churchill but it's actually Captain Mainwaring. 
As I understand it #EUwithdrawalbill would allow May to bypass our sovereign parliament in Brexit decision making process. It's a power grab 
Remember when the Remain campaign told us that voting #Brexit would put an end to the British car industry? They're awful quiet now...  
Food manufacturers say Brexit is a threat as 30% of their workforce are from EU. But in 2004 it was 1%. My column:  
Call for international observers & international visitors: Self-Determination Referendum Catalonia #1Oct2017  
Again Labour are playing games with the future of the UK - we need to get on with getting the best Brexit deal  
Thread on the serious and worsening shortage of doctors in UK and how Brexit will make it perilously worse. 
34 years ago today was the 8th amendment referendum, meaning, no one under the age of 52 has gotten their chance to vote on this issue. 
Leaked EU brexit papers propose a separate deal for Northern Ireland  
Brexit was a result of the Establishment splittingThe main drivers were Arch-Establishment Murdoch, Dacre, Johnson, Gove, Telegraph etc 
Hoping Starmer's anti-Brexit strategy will bring down this Brexit government so that I can go back to being pro-Brexit in government. 
Why we must march against May on Saturday - the grassroots fight against Brexit is taking to the streets again:  
If you'd like a say on the final #Brexit deal, you'd better hope this sneaky clause in the Repeal Bill is amended. 
Theresa May claimed an Lords influential committee backed her Brexit 'power grab'. It doesn't  
'The fact of leaving (the EU) is a settled issue' @Keir_Starmer No, that's for the British people to decide when we know what Brexit means! 
The noise @Anna_Soubry makes ahead of a key vote on Brexit is always in inverse proportion to the courage she shows when voting. 
Labour MP Graham Stringer suggests his party opposing Brexit Bill at 2nd reading amounts to a breach of trust with voters @BBCr4today 
Today:- hard Brexit- feel marvelous- wonder why there are so many beggars- raise taxes- debase coinage- worry about invasion- cake 
The Kurdish referendum is not an act of force. It is a right. It is time for the world to honor the Kurdish people as they have honored us.  
The very heart of the Westminster system is divided against itself, and Scotland and Wales united against this awful Brexit legislation.  
The 'British People' did not vote for Brexit. A small majority did. Stop normalising this narrative. #r4today 
Theresa May tells moaning businesses to start training Brits instead of fretting about immigration controls after Brexit https://www. 
The referendum was held #OnThisDay 34 yr/ago. I was 3.Next year we will come together, reclaim our laws & #repealthe8th #knowyourrepealers 
Theresa May left red-faced after business leaders refuse to publicly support her Brexit strategy  
BREAKING: Man against redefining marriage redefines 'referendum'.  
Brexit Bill start day, I feel like George Smiley, as described by John Le Carré @BBCr4today this a.m., a stranger in my own country. 
Murderers and rapists will be easier to deport after Brexit  via @MailOnline 
Brexit. Dead plan walking.(seen somewhere on Twitter) 
Well done for suppressing that information until now, Vince. Rather than revealing it at the time or before the referendum, for example.  
John Le Carré: ”Brexit, which I detest, and Trump, who I also detest....”Good man, John. @lecarre_news #r4today 
"Government of Catalonia welcomes both NGOs and individuals who wish to partake in the observation of the referendum  
Based on @LesleyLaird #bbcgms interview @scottishlabour have finally woken up to threat #Brexit poses to devolution. Now let's work together 
Neither of the two "fronts" of Brexit starting well: exit deal negotiations and Withdrawal Bill.Both have to be completed by March 2019. 
On #JacobReesMogg and the mask of respectability#Brexit #StopBrexitHour #MayDUP #ToriesOut #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #Tories 
#HurricaneIrma wreaks havoc, MP's debate key #Brexit bill, Prince George starts school & more BBC News Daily stories  
Labour MP Geraint Davies presents Bill demanding second Brexit referendum | London Evening Standard  
The Referendum was held #OnThisDay 34 years ago. I was 14. 
Of course the onus is on Uk to solve NI/RoI border issue post Brexit. EU didn't vote for Brexit  
My conclusion about Theresa May's approach to Brexit  
As you wake up frustrated by your govt today think about joining @peoplesmarch4eu anti #Brexit march at 1100 Sat 9 Sept Curzon Gate #London 
Another key issue in today’s Brexit Repeal Bill debate is ‘Henry VIII’ powers  
Call for #international #observers and visitors on website with information about #Referendum #Catalonia #1Oct 
Not a referendum. Not about religious freedoms. Not radical. Not about sex education. Not about schools. Really not that hard to understand.  
If the EU persists in placing interminable barriers in the way of Brexit trade talks, we should call their bluff and walk away. 
."The very union the DUP 'holds so dear could be threatened by the Brexit they have done so much to champion'". 
This Brexit leak shines a light on our collective lunacy about immigration | Jonathan Freedland  
Stop telling EU nationals in the UK that they’ll be fine after Brexit  
President Carles Puigdemont signs a decree officially calling for independence referendum on October 1 #Catalonia 
#Brexit is begging British business leaders for support. They can't. Their responsibility is to the workers and pension funds who own them.  
Is there a single soul who can really be surprised a policy like Brexit - presided over by a PM like May - has already descended into chaos? 
I think Downing Street should adopt this type of candour more. Would certainly make Brexit announcements more exciting  
EU+IRL maintain consistent position: 'onus on UK' to provide Brexit solutions that protect GFA + prevent hard Border  
The game must be up when this Brexit government resorts to trying to force British business to back their destructive plans.  
When even the Torygraph says government Brexit plans are in disarray, that means they are in real trouble  
'May's Brexit plans in disarray' The verdict of the Daily Telegraph!  
Labour under unprecedented pressure to keep EU free movement even after Brexit.  Showdown looms at party conference: 
education failed to teach you the meaning of 'referendum '  
MPs must take the chance now to preserve the public's right to a referendum on the #Brexit terms. 
Catalonia parliament approves independence referendum  
Bullshit. It's not a referendum.  It's a postal survey. On marriage equality. That is all.  
May’s Brexit plans in disarray as Rudd and Green refuse to back 'toxic' migration plan: this from Torygraph! 
Or is it a referendum on whether people think Lyle Shelton is gay? Who can tell?  
Still. If you can't get medical help you need, or feel a stranger in your own home, you will be comforted knowing Brexit means Brexit /Ends 
Not a referendum, not radical, nothing to do with sex education. You lie a lot for a Christian. 
But there's a big tide the other way. GMC evidence shows 54% of EEA Drs are considering leaving because of Brexit. /5  
It’s still on. A referendum on freedoms & radical LGBTIQ sex education in schools. 
Britain to slash EU migration after Brexit, leaked paper says  
Brexit: unleashing a wildfire #Brexit  
Michel Barnier to give Brexit update to Holyrood European Committee of MSPs. That'll piss May and Davis off. 
10 reasons the City should cut the fearmongering and welcome Brexit  
The woman who saved TMay from even bigger GE17 humiliation Ruth Davidson issues stark warning on Brexit economics  
Russia trolls also worked on Facebook in UK. Pushing Brexit as well? 
FTSE 100 chiefs refuse to sign letter backing Theresa May's #Brexit plan  
Russian Trolls worked in UK as well. Pushing Brexit? 
UK business leaders give May's Brexit strategy the finger  
This!#EU: #NorthernIreland to get diff #Brexit deal to rest of UK.Want it too #Scotland #London #Wales 
Catalan lawmakers broke into song after voting to hold a referendum on independence from Spain in October  
Latest: As #Kurdistan referendum looms, #Iraqi #Christians redefine positions  #Assyrians #Chaldeans @DeadmanMax 
Not that Brexit as such is any less an 'utter and complete disaster.'  
Cambridge Analytica involved:Kenyan election, overturnedBrexit, surprise resultsUSA, surprise resultsMercer/Bannon/Flynn 
Brexit: an absence of harmony - the milk of human kindness is noticeably absent from the Brexit talks ...  #Brexit.  
Checked the post shop. Yep they are there and they are re the 1967 referendum. Someone alert Katter.  The gays have stolen another word. 
How a fake Brexit-expert made up a conspiracy to fill his knowledge gap - and got "think" tank IEA to print it.  
BREAKING: UKGov has hired an infinite number of monkeys to try to produce a workable Brexit plan. Initial results are indecipherable: r3M@1n  
German industry sets up task force to prepare for Brexit  via @FT 
Northern Ireland 'to have different Brexit deal' - EU  
If even the Brexit Pravda is openly reporting Government's disarray, you get a sense that things might be heading south rather quickly  
#Catalonia to hold #1O #independence #vote after #Parliament passed #referendum #law despite angry #Spain #Gov 
Powerful op-ed by @BHL in @ForeignPolicy on #KurdistanReferendum. 'Kurdish referendum is not an act of force. It is a right.' #YESKurdistan 
I wonder what role AggregateIQ played with Cambridge Analytica - they held back end databases for UK referendum  
Catalonia's lawmakers give nod to independence referendum  
Thanks to Brexit, Milan is back in vogue as Italy’s financial capital  
Brexit: MPs to begin scrutiny of vital withdrawal bill  
Referendum law passed in Parliament   
Once in power the Nazis made European Jews 'citizens of nowhere', disenfranchised them & stole their property. Evil then. Evil now #brexit 
With every leak & every false reassurance, with every day that passes this Govt & those supporting its vile #Brexit shame our nation! 
New leak of Brexit papers reveals fissures between Britain and EU  
1) thread - Brexit minoritiesReading this article should make us all feel ashamed.A minority exists in the UK 
Dear @UKLabour In the future, how will you live with yourselves for not opposing #Brexit ? 
"Spanish Public TV acting as if it were the Constitutional Court: ‘They approved the ILLEGAL Referendum Law’”  
The Catalan parliament has approved a law to hold a referendum to break away from Spain, defying Madrid  
BBC News - Catalonia parliament approves independence referendum  
Madrid has refused to offer a Scottish-style referendum on the matter.  
When Theresa May attacked "citizens of nowhere" she was attacking all universalist, non-nationalist systems of values.#Brexit  /1 
Why Germany is REALLY worried about Brexit but desperately hiding their fear…   
Scottish Tory leader says she is worried Brexit could damage economy permanently - as it happened  
Have a read of this. Professor Chris Grey spells out why Remainers should NOT get behind #Brexit.  
Our Mark Kleinman's Number 10 Brexit letter story making the front pages:  .... 
The ministers of the Catalan Government sign the decree calling for the October 1 #referendum  
#Catalonia's Foreign Minister: This country has decided that no one will ever decide for it againWe have been convened #referendum #indyref 
Catalonian government calls for "binding self-determination referendum" on independence from Spain on Oct. 1.  
Delicious on Tory Brexit disaster: Redwood demands biz 'keep out of debate, beware meddling in politics'; May demands sign pro-Brexit letter  
The Catalan parliament approves a law to call a referendum on October 1 on independence from Spain  
Catalonia parliament votes for Oct. 1 referendum on split from Spain  
The @catalangov president, @KRLS, signs the call for the 1st Oct Referendum, as approved by Catalan Parliament this evening.  
Tim, the UK didn't vote for Brexit. 26% of the UK voted for Brexit. Adapt the WWII slogan: 'Careless talk costs the future.'  
The Government of Catalonia has passed a bill to hold an independence referendum on 1 October. #Catalonia #Yes 
"We reject the announcement by the Electoral Commission in the Kurdistan Region on the inclusion of the Nineveh Plain to hold a referendum"  
Sorry Leavers, but there isn't a fixed pool of jobs. If immigrants go many jobs will be lost with them. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
The Catalan parliament debated &voted with an absolute majority (no NO votes) the referendum bill: Catalonia WILL vote #1Oct2017 #Votarem 
May urges MPs to back key Brexit Bill ahead of Commons showdown  
Referendum law sparks multiple opinions and attitudes in Catalan Parliament  
The European Union is already looking beyond Britain and Brexit to concentrate on its most pressing problems.  
Latest @guardian cartoon on the government's post-Brexit immigration proposals...#Trumped 
Brexit Unicorn pic.twitter.com/s0SXEMkvo5 
Catalonia's Referendum and Self-Determination Law has been duly recorded in the Official Bulletin.  
#Brexit Only skilled well paid EU citizens will be let into the UK. Perhaps only younger, healthier UK citizens to be allowed stay in Spain? 
If Labour votes against the Great Repeal Bill, it's because it's decided to foil Brexit says @MrTCHarris 
Nearly half of Merseyside wants a second EU referendum, survey reveals  
Spanish government condemns Catalonia over independence referendum  
Spotted in multiple places on the M1 "Brexit will make you poor". Respect. #BrexitFail 
EU citizens in disbelief over UK's leaked Brexit proposals on #citizensrights 
EU's Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier will meet MSPs  
President Puigdemont signs and thereby enacts the Law to call the #Referendum approved by the Parliament of Catalonia  
BREAKING: Catalan government officially calls the October 1 independence referendum. 
Brexit negotiator Davis should be breathalyzed before going into brexit negotiations. Pls sign. It's a car crash.   
Poland mocks European Union by saying that it will DESTROY ITSELF with current plans  via @Your Brexit 
Brexit: There's no upside, all this is just attempts at damage limitation... let's call the whole thing off. 
First labour is all for brexit now its voting against it. What sort of idiots do we have that don´t recognise labour for what it is. 
 Referendum law passed in Catalan Parliament after a 12-hour session . 
This is Brexit. You did this. You broke it. You fix it. And we haven't left yet. We still have EU safety net  
Catalonia parliament votes for Oct. 1 referendum on split from Spain  
Spain's Guardia Civil has surrounded a printer suspected of (gasp!) preparing material for the Catalan referendum. 
Catalan Parliament Approves Law to Call Referendum on Independence  
#CatalanPresident @KRLS signs and proclaims Law of Referendum of Self-determination of Catalonia  
Secessionist majority in Catalan parliament passes referendum bill, Catalan president @KRLS calls independence vote slated for Oct 1 
About time we stopped subsidising Germany. Bring on a good hard Brexit.  
#Referendum law passed in Catalan Parliament  
Unbelievable: UK still wants funding from the EU’s investment bank after Brexit, David Davis says | The Independent  
New Guardian Brexit leak, this one from Brussels: UK must solve problem of Irish border post-Brexit, says EU  
1. How Brexit conspiracy theories do real damage to the UK. A thread:  
Catalonia's National Day demonstration on September 11: a prelude to the independence referendum . #Parlament 
The Catalan parliament has approved a law to hold a referendum to break away from Spain, defying Madrid  
Germany's finance minister gets blunt with Britain about the Brexit talks  
#Brexit has introduced into the heart of British politics a notion 'the Will of the People' which is absolutely toxic to democracy. /12 
Bottomless pit of incompetence and idiocy  Government asks big companies to sign letter backing Brexit strategy  
Catalan parliament approves law to call referendum on independence  
Brussels furious over 'toxic' Home Office #citizensrights paper - warns bespoke Brexit transition deal 'is over'  
It's hard to believe that same @RuthDavidsonMSP that is expressing concerns about Brexit carried out this interview.  
European Research Group: once assets are taken into account UK 'doesn't owe Brussels a penny'. #Brexit  
Tobi @ a cafe: can i have a covfefe with a brexit please?? Shit i meant a coffe with a biscuit 
BBC News: #Catalonia parliament approves #independence #referendum  
EU's Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier will meet MSPs  
Our dogmatic politicians,to the left & to the right have embraced Brexit. Slowly but surely their delusion is being exposed. 
Hanging 3m wide outside Downing Street! #MPs are back... The #Brexit Circus begins!  #StopBrexitNow #BrexitShambles  
Just had a scary moment. Took a wrong turn on Twitter & ended up in a lefty #Brexit bitch-fest. Then I remembered we won & felt lot better  
But then one of the few advantages of Brexit has been the demonstration of how non-existent convictions of the libertarian fight really are. 
How Brexit is quietly killing science  
72 in favour and 11 abstentions.Catalan, as Parliament passes law for 1st of October referendum. No threat from Spain will stop democracy.  
Catalan parliament passes law to hold an Oct1 referendum to split from Spain - setting it on a collision course with the Spanish government 
Catalonia parliament votes in favorof holding independence referendum  
BREAKING: Catalan #Parliament passes law to hold independence #referendum October 1  #Catalonia 
#BREAKING Catalan parliament approves independence referendum law 
#BREAKING Referendum bill passed in Catalan Parliament 
BREAKING: Catalan parliament approves the self-determination referendum law, openly defying Spain. 
Law on the Catalan self-determination referendum has been approved with 72 votes in favour and 11 abstention  
Catalonia's Referendum Law has just been approved in the Catalan Parliament with 72 votes in favor, 11 abstentions (and no Nos)!!! 
."Government’s Brexit stance will make London a graveyard" 
Funny old facts:Climate change is real.The earth isn't flat.The Nazis are back.Russia interfered in both Brexit and Trump. 
Those who voted for Brexit did so  because they believed it would reduce immigration. Gvt introduces plan to do so. Why the shock? 
EU citizens in U.K. tell of disbelief, sadness and fear for their futures over UK's leaked Brexit proposals  
No deal on Brexit would be an "utter and complete disaster for this country” says former head of the civil service @SirBobKerslake 
Thanks to Brexit, Milan is back in vogue as Italy’s financial capital  
Make no mistake the shambles of Brexit, the decline in your living standards & refugee crisis has #davidcameron's grubby hands all over it. 
"We want to see a referendum on Irish unity in the next five years. We believe that this is achievable and winnable." - Gerry Adams TD  
Trump, Brexit, North Korea and now this...  
We're not being treated any better by @UKLabour - why are you not opposing #Brexit? Please have the decency not to use our situation.  
Breaking: Researchers riled by lack of detail in Brexit science plans  
Survey: Migrants Less Keen on UK/U.S. Following Brexit, Trump Victories  
Britain and its "broken" economic model face watershed moment, Archbishop of Canterbury says  
PM @theresa_may has defended moves to restrict EU migration after #Brexit  
In 1980 Adolfo Esquivel received the Nobel Peace Prize and now he supports #Catalonia’s referendum on independence  
Said it before but I cannot get behind #Brexit, it is a theft of my rights. You might as well ask me to help a burglar take my TV to his car 
According to these pro-Brexit Conservative MPs, the EU actually owes the UK €10bn as part of Brexit  
Govt asks big companies to sign letter backing Brexit strategy>Planet earth calling No10.. come in No10..come in...  
Theresa May calls on employers to train more British workers to fill vacancies after Brexit  
Traitor.    Italy's Europe Minister holds talks with Blair after saying EU is open to Brexit U-turn.      
Brexit is just the BEGINNING! Poland warns a two-speed Europe will DESTROY and END EU.      
.@IanDunt: 'Home Office document on immigration control after Brexit is a manifesto of self-harm in the name of xenophobia.'  
Rather than challenge JC on his pro Brexit stance, you diverted attention by calling remainers and centrists undemocratic & deluded. 
Civil Servants Sabotaging Brexit  
Owen observes Brexit with one eye wide open fixed on the Tories and his hand clamped over the other eye so he won’t see Corbyn’s part in it 
“Science has always transcended national borders & there is a real will on all sides to ensure that #Brexit does not hinder that."  
#Brexit Labour set to order MPs to vote against Brexit Repeal Bill. Who would ever trust Jeremy Corbyn & Labour again no one traitors.   
History will not treat Cameron kindly. He not only abandoned the sinking ship but deliberately steered it towards the iceberg first #Brexit 
Theresa May suffers a double blow to her Brexit strategy  
Many British executives say the UK government is trying to 'strong-arm' them into supporting its Brexit plan  
Spokesman @JuntsPelSi : We base this referendum on the international right to self-determination, as it is included in the Charter of the UN 
"we have a Ukip government pursuing a Ukip policy agenda and pretending it's the Tory party". A must read, but deeply distressing. #Brexit 
It's time to face the musicIt's time to see the lightIt's time to cancel Brexit It's a muppet show of shite 
Is the government’s leaked post-Brexit migration document honouring Brexit? @Nigel_Farage is live. 
Twitter watching Brexit unfold.  
Brexit: Britain may never recover from economic hit, warns Scottish Tory leader Ruth Davidson - The Independent  
Next, watch the Swedish Chef give the ministerial statement to the House on the July and August rounds of the Brexit negotations. 
Theresa May calls on employers to train more British workers to fill vacancies after Brexit  
Anna Gabriel (CUP) confirms there have been enough intents to come to an agreement to organise the referendum. The time has come now. 
The EU is demanding the UK recognise 'geographical indications' for things like Champagne and Parmesan after Brexit  
FT Exclusive: What the EU is demanding from the UK after Brexit – from Champagne to intellectual property rights  
How does #David Cameron  sleep at night after his UKIP appeasing referendum paves the way for the destruction of the UK ? 
Patrick Blower on post-Brexit curbs on immigration - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
We need towns and cities to declare themselves friends of EU 27 nationals. Perhaps call themselves Euro-towns or Open-towns.#Brexit 
EU demands UK recognise Champagne and Parmesan designations post-Brexit: FT 
We voted #Brexit precisely because of the EU's toxic immigration policies. Eurocrats expose exactly what's wrong with unelected politicians. 
The Brexit circus is in town, led by .@TheresaMay_MP .@DavidDavisMP .@BorisJohnson and .@michaelgove #bollockstobrexit 
How chocolate exposes Brexit trade risks   
Here at Brexit HQ, it's the Muppet Show!And now over to Dr Bunsen Honeydew and his assistant Beaker.  
Tories will use Brexit to further block any chance of social mobility by forcing our young people into poorly paid, insecure, seasonal jobs. 
Does anyone still want a Brexit? Let's just admit it's all too complicated and pointless and get back to trying to live nicely together. 
Well with the damage your patriotic Brexit will do, and is currently doing, to the economy - good luck ever being able to retire 
Govt agrees FoM continues during transition, now doesn't. Same chop/change on 'no deal', sequencing, Brexit bill. What an incompetent shower  
MPs will push to give voters a say on the final Brexit deal  
EU migrant numbers will be capped after Brexit under leaked Home Office plans  
The best way to stop immigration is to make UK a poverty stricken shit hole no one would want to come to. One thing #Brexit will accomplish 
The Tory Brexit strategy would devastate the London economy. It would harm the very engine of growth the rest of the country relies on. - 1  
Brussels furious over 'toxic' Home Office paper, warns bespoke Brexit transition deal 'is over' Time to #exitbrexit 
How Brexit is quietly killing science  
I'm not pleased about current state of #RepealBill but looking fwd to speaking in Edinburgh tmw on 'Equality law after Brexit: what next?'  
This Brexit leak shines a light on our collective lunacy about immigration | Jonathan Freedland  
Cheap pound and Brexit uncertainty are doing little to boost the appeal of British assets   
Michael Caine on #Brexit: We cannot be dictated to by the EU.  
Scottish Tory leader Ruth Davidson warns Britain may not recover from Brexit economic hit  
"If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy"#Brexit  
FTSE 100 chiefs’ fury at being asked to sign letter backing ministers on Brexit - Sky News  
Why remainers shouldn't 'get behind Brexit'. My latest blogpost just up:  
Italian Europe Minister Sandro Gozi optimistic about overall Brexit timetable, says relations are "not as difficult as people describe" 
Britain to slash EU migration after Brexit, leaked paper says - despite EU migrants being good for the economy  
FTSE 100 chiefs refuse to sign letter backing Theresa May's Brexit plan  
This Brexit leak shines a light on our collective lunacy about immigration | Jonathan Freedland  
How strange. No ref whatever to fact that PM asked voters for a mandate for her idiosyncratic views on Brexit & didn't get one.  
Democracy cannot last long where a large portion of the media systematically and deliberately deceives the public. #Brexit /1 
Clueless Theresa May left red-faced after FTSE-100 bosses refuse to publicly support her Brexit strategy#bbcpm 
The Tories have asked FTSE 100 chiefs’ to sign a letter backing ministers on Brexit. They're angry and refusing.  
Scientists fear Brexit brain drain if leaked Home Office proposals implemented. 16% academics and 14% researchers EU  
BREAKING: British businesses must ‘give preference to British workers’ after Brexit  via @Your Brexit 
How I'll make Brexit a success for everyone - @theresa_may 
Only 2 women on #Brexit snr negotiating team. Outrageous. Campaign with us to stop this from being a #BoysBrexit:  
A must read from @stephen_dorrell :  The Government's Brexit stance risks turning the UK into Trump's America  
READ IN FULL: The leaked Brexit letter No10 tried to get big business to sign  
Take Action to Ensure Brexit doesn’t Weaken Wildlife Protection!  pic.twitter.com/auQIr8Okfe 
A final act of desperation from a zombie Prime Minister. The Tory Brexit strategy is unravelling before our eyes.  
Educated, adaptable, open-minded young people are Britain's future. They will be completely alienated by narrow minded #Brexit Britain. 
Outrageous. No money for nurses but plenty for DUP and Brexit civil servants/lawyers #ToriesOut 
The European Research Group - representing the hard Brexit wing of the Tories - has published a report saying UK doesn't owe the EU a penny 
Why would skilled & talented EU workers want to be 2nd class non-citizens in a UK that treats them as barely tolerated intruders?#Brexit 
Slashing migration won't placate the xenophobes, they will look for other minorities to scapegoat for personal & national failure.#Brexit 
Brexit. Leave it to us boys. We've got it in hand. #FaceHerFuture 
Her closest confidendente who coined "I feel your pain" and warned of Brexit, was also dismissed because "data" and "policies."  
Post-war fantasies and Brexit: the delusional view of Britain's place in the world  
#Brexit Britain is preparing to sabotage its own economy to satisfy the demands of xenophobes  by @IanDunt#Remain 
More criticisms of #brexit from all sorts of angles...  
FTSE 100 chiefs refuse to sign No 10 letter backing Brexit.#exitbrexit  
Theresa May humiliated as bid for big business to back her Brexit plan backfires spectacularly 
First #PMQs and Corbyn doesn't raise Brexit. He should be nailing this Gov over Brexit over & over but he supports every bit of it. 
From my recent contacts with UK Chairmen/Chief Execs, they don't recognise a #Brexit strategy. UK approach is incoherent and unpersuasive.  
Brussels furious over 'toxic' Home Office paper - warns bespoke Brexit transition deal 'is over' 
Brussels has no clear vision for Brexit, City envoy says  via @FT A dose of clear-eyed realism at last. 
Podcast commentary: Britain’s deluded hopes for a painless free-trade deal  #Brexit  
.@BenPBradshaw - British businesses won’t sign No 10 letter because they oppose the Govt's plan for hard Brexit  
Downing Street are asking FTSE-100 bosses to sign a blank piece of paper.#BrexitStrategy #Brexit  
EU Brexit negotiating directives are like the Maginot Line, a seemingly solid defensive line which is doomed to be outflanked or breached. 
Congratulations from @DerekBateman2 on the #scotpfg, but on #Brexit he comes out all guns blazing.  
Catalan president @KRLS: "Calling a referendum is not a crime nor a criminal offence. The very same Spanish law says so."  
Since the UK voted for Brexit in last year's referendum, what has surprised you the most 
Theresa May warned of #Brexit #RepealBill"power grab"of UK rights in #PMQs ambush by Tory Anna Soubry  #PeoplesClause 
Hungarian referendum98% say 'no' to EU migrant quotasBut Guardian says poll on migration has divided the nation ??  
If you don't oppose then you're supporting it and that includes passive support for the Fascists behind it. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Labour MP presents Bill demanding second Brexit referendum  
UK science success from @ERC_Research, but @BBCAmos hits the nail on the head by looking at the demographics in the harsh light of #Brexit.  
'Juncker has no right - he's unelected!' @DavidCoburnUKip  MEP attacks Eurocrats Brexit meddling   
10 year plan is about a United, agreed Ireland.Building political strength;securing referendum on Irish unity & in govt north and south.  
SNP agitate for second independence referendumUK gov consider sharing construction of complex warships around UKThe two are related Humza  
70% of EU citizens said they would choose to remain if a membership referendum was held in their country 
They don't have a #brexit strategy.  
Breaking News!!!!Today is the day for the long-expected clash of will between Catalunia and Spain over the referendum.#CatalanReferendum 
"Dear Big Business, please can you sign a round robin saying Brexit is going well."  
FTSE-100 chiefs’ fury at No 10 letter backing ministers on Brexit or 'Please support me while I wreck your business' 
Downing St is asking FTSE-100 bosses to publicly support their #Brexit strategy, but many are refusing. @MarkKleinmanSky has the details 
We should put the sheepdog that managed this in charge of Brexit negotiations.  
Ruth Davidson: Brexit could deliver an economic hit we never recover from 
Hey, do you know there's a Brexit strategy?No but you hum it and I'll play it  
Dear PM,I am unable to sign this letter because I agree with everything you said about the EU during the referendum campaign.Love,CEO  
Tickets are still available for the @acgrayling talk 'Brexit: The Next Steps In The Fight Against It' #Canterbury See poster for details. 
This Government is just barking mad.  Totally. It is about time business came out and publically denounced the current Brexit "strategy" 
FTSE100 boss asked to sign No10 Brexit letter told Mark "There's no way we could sign this given current state of chaos surrounding talks" 
EXCLUSIVE: Downing St is asking FTSE-100 bosses to sign a letter backing ministers' Brexit strategy - many refusing.  
Exclusive @MarkKleinmanSky - FTSE-100 bosses express incredulity at being asked to sign a Number 10 letter backing PM's Brexit strategy 
Sky Sources: FTSE-100 companies are being asked by Downing St to sign a letter supporting the Government's Brexit strategy 
FTSE-100 chiefs’ fury at No 10 letter backing ministers on Brexit  
1) This article illustrates one of the reasons why #Brexit is so frustratingIt just doesn't make sense 
The Government's Brexit stance risks turning the UK into Trump's America 
David Davies (2017) said that "nobody said Brexit would be easy". Seems David Davies has forgotten his tweets from last year!  
Theresa May defends post-Brexit migration curbs after leaked paper  
“Science has always transcended national borders & there is a real will on all sides to ensure that #Brexit does not hinder that."  
Dominic Grieve: Only a watertight withdrawal bill can put Brexit into effect  
.@GeraintDaviesMP just introduced his bill on a referendum on #brexit terms  
There's "no free lunch" in Brexit talks as reality sinks in, Germany's finance minister says  
This is a hugely important report on the role EU migrants play in small businesses + UK public sector, and on post-Brexit labour shortages.  
Government data analysis by @PAN_UK reveals multiple pesticide residues on free school fruit & veg. What will happen post #brexit? #organic 
Brexit Britain Gets Tough on EU Immigration, According to Leaked Government Report   
"After an intense debate, Catalan Parliament agreed to fast-track referendum law;it'll be debated and voted today" . 
Say it with me: skilled workers will be in demand in better places than Brexit Britain. 
And I see the post-Brexit UK immigration policy is to be to only let people in if they don't want to come here. 
A very important thread by @ProfMarkElliott on highly misleading claims by the Prime Minister that the Brexit Bill has been "endorsed":  
400+ reporters are covering today’s plenary session of the Catalan parliament where the secessionist majority will pass the referendum law. 
London ranked world’s best university city as experts warn over Brexit  
Anger - and more importantly, resolution - against Brexit is growing by leaps and determined bounds. Brexit will be stopped: 
Know you now. Mogg & the Brexiters want to take you back to the villeinage of medieval times via Brexit.  
Ruth Davidson: “Brexit could deliver a hit we can’t recover from". Excellent interview by @chrisdeerin. 
This Brexit leak shines a light on our collective lunacy about immigration | Jonathan Freedland  
Mayor Khan posts his FIRST decent housing policy which everyone will support but spoilt it by sniping unnecessarily about HARD BREXIT. SILLY 
Spanish #unionists trying 2 stop #Catalonia's #referendum at Parliament in #Barcelona. But no one will stop #democracy. #Catalans will #vote 
Brexit can still be stopped, one of the EU's most senior officials says  
Spanish prosecutor to file charges of disobedience and negligence against members of Parliament Bureau for bringing Referendum Law to floor 
It is an awkward fact for leavers that the only people with expertise and will to focus on practical detail of Brexit see it is a bad idea. 
1/ So UK govt paper on Brexit & science is rather vague (surprise!). Basically the UK wants to stay in EU programmes  
#BREAKING Spain calls Catalan move to hold referendum an 'act of force' 
A Brussels journalistic friend tells me that EU Comm. expect the May 21/9 speech will end the EU negs and signal a disastrous Hard Brexit 
Brexit science paper, condensed: "please let us have all the things we currently have"  
Useful meeting with the Ambassador of the Czech Republic, discussed impact of Brexit & need for designated special status for north in EU  
Far from misspeaking Rees-Mogg is consciously pushing media narrative in direction he wants it to go on. It's same as #Brexit  
No mention of #Brexit in first PMQs after summer break. Have our politicians lost the plot? 
Rees-Moog is firmly on disaster capitalism wing of #Brexit. He makes money whatever happens. He's so elite it's basically comedy  
Labour's policy on brexit....laughable  
Civil Servants Sabotaging Brexit:  
Michael Caine backs Brexit because "I’d rather be master of my own fate”  
Me in New Statesman on post Brexit immigration plans, with bonus Italian Job and Thelma & Louise references  
This brilliant piece by @IanDunt encapsulates everything I was worried Brexit would mean  I despair. 
Of course Theresa May won't criticise dodgy Mike Ashley. If she gave a damn about workers she wouldn't push hard Brexit. #PMQs#PMQs 
You can't win against Brexit if you don't take action to stop it. How will you live if your children have no future @MumsnetTowers 
Further thoughts from London on Brexit and divorce:  
The Brexit Bill is a power grab out of a 16th Century despot's playbook says @ClaireHanna urging MPs to vote it down  
Establishment Rails Against Proposals to Limit Influx of Migrants After Brexit. HEY, that was the IDEA ffs!  #fo2eu 
"We backed Brexit for other reasons... we didn't mean *this* kind of Brexit!!!" OWN. YOUR. MISTAKES. AND. ADMIT. BREXIT. IS. A. DISASTER.  
Just asked @theresa_may for a #technology taskforce to promote #Britain post- #Brexit in #PMQs. More here: ; 
Labour party shows true colours as it issues orders to MP's to block Brexit & betray it's voters & the British people they are embarrassment 
BREXIT: To be clear; when the government say ‘will of the people’ it is these people they think of - racists, morons and the delusional.  
BREAKING: Catalan parliament to vote on a bill for the holding of an independence referendum 
Leaked document reveals UK Brexit plan to deter EU immigrants  
This Brexit leak shines a light on our collective lunacy about immigration. My take  
The death of irony is #Brexit  
Nationalism, xenophobia, scapegoating, irrationalism, the 'Will of the People' - the #Brexit press is peddling core fascist ideas.#Remain 
As parliament reconvenes, @IanDunt has some Brexit advice for our PM  
"This just isn't a way to treat human beings" - EU nationals react to leaked Brexit immigration proposals  
In which Lord Kerr, ex Head of the Diplomatic Service, nails it on Brexit, Ireland & the danger to the peace...  
Universities hold key to productivity in post-Brexit Britain - powerful arguments from @cbicarolyn @CBItweets today 
#BREAKING Catalan parliament agrees to vote on independence referendum bill 
My cartoon Wednesday @TheTimes on #Brexit laid bare..... #Closer #DuchessofCambridge 
.@DavidDavisMP: "No one ever said #Brexit would be easy"In fact, a bunch of no one's definiteley said it would be.@mrjamesob @LBC 
Care is skilled labour. I want to build a country that values it, invests in it and welcomes all those who do it. #Brexit 
Telling choice of subjects by @jeremycorbyn. Focuses on broken Tory promises on pay & energy price cap. Ignores Brexit & immigration #PMQS 
Theresa May says during #PMQs that people want to see control of immigration after #Brexit  
May poor, Corbyn better but single biggest issue facing the country is Brexit and he has an aversion to holding May to account on it. 
SNP continuing pattern of Robertson #PMQs: asking what JC didn't. Today, Brexit migration leak. 
Fully expect Corbyn to not challenge May on #Brexit at #PMQs  as he knows domestic issues/social justice his trump card, not Brexit 
There you go. Silent on Brexit. Like I said, if you're a Remainer who seriously thinks Corbyn will oppose Brexit, you're a mug. 
No mention from Corbyn of Brexit or immigration - May gives pat line on public sector pay, independent bodies will come back 
Whitehall dismisses Holyrood's call for powers over immigration post-Brexit  
The PM claims a mandate for a #Brexit obtained, in part, through her deceit and mendacity .#StopBrexit 
Those people expecting Corbyn to go on Brexit and immigration are overlooking the fact he hasn't got a policy on either. 
REVEALED: Jeremy Corbyn 'probably voted for Brexit', says Labour Leave boss. 
BREXIT: “UK will not shut the door to migrants” says government minister “we’ll just hang a big sign saying ‘FUCK OFF’ on it instead.” 
You could have built a country like that regardless of Brexit but Tories spent last 7 years destroying it instead. How do you sleep at night 
"Today is the day of the long-expected clash of wills between Catalonia and Spain over the referendum" . #parlament 
A Brexit sellout would provoke the downfall of Britain's political elite  
Is Labour's position on Brexit now clear?Here are some clips of what senior figures have said about the single market since the referendum  
This is how we will use Brexit to build a country that works for everyone, not just a privileged few. 
Spot on from Lord Strathclyde: Brexit is complex enough without Labour carping from the sidelines and playing games  
I remember when he resigned over this in protest, and made the information public well in advance of the referendum.  
This is why some of us are anti-Brexit, Owen 
Crowdfunder for alliance of anti-Brexit groups  
Appalled by the complacency of David Davis' answer to my question on research funding after Brexit - our universities need answers!  
@mrjamesob Have you seen this thread? I'm in so much shock because I agree with all of it, and I HATE Brexit.  
If we are worried about unskilled workers, we should be worried about the millions of unskilled Britons & stop blaming migrants.#Brexit 
Anyone who thinks I will get behind Brexit. Not a fucking chance. Fuck you, fuck off, then fuck off some more.  
They talk about unskilled migration. EU migrants are far better educated than native Britons. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Cataclysmic #Brexit . "Only a swerve will save us" says @pollytoynbee 
.@M_AndersonSF meets Brexit negotiator over need to protect Good Friday Agreement  
Revealed: EU migrant numbers will be capped after Brexit under leaked Home Office plans  
Staying within the Single Market and Customs Union during the post-Brexit Transitional Period is so so important for the economy's stability  
How is Britain doing economically since the Brexit vote? I'm afraid you're going to need to look left...  
Once more for clarity:The the Great Repeal/Withdrawal Bill is not necessary if we remain in the Single Market.#Brexit 
BREXIT: The celebration of anyone not an expert on the topic continues…  
Why is @BBCNews still giving massive coverage to a lazy MEP?The BBC, mouthpiece of British fascism. #Brexit 
There was no referendum about the Great Repeal/Withdrawal Bill. It has no mandate. If MPs vote for it, they're voting for dictatorship. 
An example of why we can't accept UK Govs plans for #Brexit - we don't want a registry of 'foreigners' and friends and neighbours leaving  
"Nobody said Brexit would be easy".  Biggest #Brexit lie ever?#StopBrexitHour#MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU 
You can fix Scottish education. You can't fix Brexit, monarchy, endless Tory rule and the undemocratic setup that is the "United" Kingdom. 
Blair visits Junker - Corbyn decides to scupper #Brexit & betray voters, days later  
Fortunate for May with Brexit going badly a migration paper was "leaked" ahead of #PMQs to create a diversion #justsaying 
Trump and Brexit show us however just how appallingly widespread are racist / xenophobic voters. A societal and educational failure. 
Our Chair @stephen_dorrell argues it's more democratic to challenge Brexit than give the government unlimited powers 
The Parlament of Catalunya is meeting now to discuss the adoption of the Referendum Law! #1octvotarem @Esquerra_ERC  
Just like Austerity, this government is set to use Brexit as an excuse to enact their hateful ideology. #NastyParty 
All the rights EU citizens will lose under Theresa May's leaked Brexit immigration plans  
#Brexit: Leaked plan to give preference to British workers. [Corbyn's Labour party will not like this one bit]  
Tory Party`s dismal #Brexit divorce settlement fractures UK`s economy &bolsters @jeremycorbyn#Momentum beats Blairites&Brownites into shape 
Brexit voters wanted their borders back. The civil service are trying to sabotage the will of the people.  
Britain could still reverse Brexit, former minister Heseltine says  
In the mainstream media, Brexit seems to be inevitable, and Rees-Mogg is already PM. That's the message we're being fed. 
17) on Brexit,surely no nation in EU history has been more insular, self obsessed & unaware of how they appear outside their bordersend/ 
Tomorrow I will be announcing a fair and sensible approach to migration post #Brexit  
Brexit threatens the EU with only the loss of a member. Hungary and Poland threaten it with the loss of its values.  
British workers are to be prioritised over those from the EU for the first time under post-Brexit government plans  
Brexit: Britain could reverse EU exit decision if public opinion swings back towards Remain, - The Independent  
8) Perhaps this is a unique British problem. Many in the UK seems genuinely ignorant that the EU27 also has a view on Brexit 
Labour MPs Ordered to Oppose Brexit Bill in ‘Monstrous Betrayal’ of Party’s Voters  
Independence from #Iraq referendum will not be delayed without a better alternative — Kurdish President Barzani  
Brexit must mean better jobs for British workers, Minister says  
Stupid Leavers: #Brexit  
3) Both Labour & Tories have put forward variations of the same cake & eat it #Brexit (all the goodies without FoM) without reference to EU 
'A mean and cynical approach': Leaked UK Home Office document on post-Brexit immigration criticised  
In Seoul had a fruitful discussion w/ KIM SE YEON memebers of parliament. Thanked him for all of his  supports for our referendum.  
Reminder that all the Russian Bot accounts who got behind Brexit and Trump are now behind Jacob Rees-Mogg 
Brexit still might not happen according to the man who toppled Thatcher  
Excellent point.  The entire Brexit immigration strategy is nonsense.  
I'll be voting against the deeply flawed & dangerous #RepealBill on Monday - my cross-party amendment sets out the reasons why #Brexit  
Dear @jeremycorbyn When it comes to opposing Brexit, please remember that it is now a question of protecting human rights. 
I give a fuck, my contempt for this government and all those who support Brexit is beyond words. I stand with you.  
If we're getting rid of unskilled EU migrants, does that mean everyone who voted for #Brexit will pick fruit on minimum wage? 
Westminster report informs that Catalan referendum will be declared "binding"  
Wonder why we here so little about the Brexit end to freedom of movement depriving Brits of their rights in the 27 other EU countries 
Reminder, what we're all saying now about Rees-Mogg is what we were saying about Trump & Brexit - and what they were saying about Corbyn. 
A punt, som-hi! #Referendum #1O 
Lord Strathclyde for @timesredbox writes that Brexit is complex enough without Labour playing games with our future  
Catalonia expected to approve October 1 referendum on split from Spain  
Doctors, scientists and engineers from the EU could be booted out of the UK after three years after Brexit.  
A GP appraisal of Brexit  <Restriction of movement of EU medics will do untold damage to NHS! 
Daily Briefing- Europe's east-west split on migrants- Catalonia decides on referendum - UK Brexit document leaked 
5. Ever wondered why Quitlings like Suzanne Evans blame continuity Remain for sabotaging Brexit?It's because the 96% also hear you. 
Stupidity or cunning plan to leave the EU without a deal? Ether way the country going to buggered by the Tories Brexit. Let's #StopBrexit 
"Xenophobia" means Fear of Foreigners. The World is full of Foreigners. "We" are Foreigners. "Brexit" is the irrational Will of Xenophobes. 
Civil Service Sabotaging Brexit:  
Missed this. Follow the money on the private health care supporters etc who donate to "hard Brexit" MPs. £££££  
Something big is about to happen in the Parliament of #Catalonia #indyref #referendum  
In light of today's headlines about post-Brexit EU immigration, here's this from #AnywhereButWestminster (icymi) 
How Democracy works in the EU We will keep giving you a referendum until you give us the right answer 
The hard truth is there is no economic question to which Brexit is the answer | The Independent  
Basil Fawlty lightens the mood ahead of the next round of Brexit negotiations.  
From Feb: Brexit will lead to unfair deportations of EU citizens, academic warns  
Take a wild guess who'll be backing Rees-Mogg.The Brexit bots & trolls already jump on anything with "Jacob Rees-Mogg" in it.  
Brexit might not happen, City experts say  
"We don't want to shut the door," says defence secretary on leaked paper on govt plans for immigration after #Brexit  
Catalonia expected to approve October 1 referendum on split from Spain  
The increasingly hysterical tone of Lefty media both here and over the Pond re Brexit/Trump is a joy to behold. They know they've lost it. 
Always thought this. The only people who will benefit from Brexit are the rich. It has to be stopped.  
What a truly nasty, insular little island we're going to become with #Brexit. #r4today #wato #PMQs #bbcdp #bbcpm #newsnight 
Timely reminder: Hannan's endless claims that nothing would change for EU citizens after Brexit. Against strong competition, his vilest lie.  
Norwegian Ambassador Reveals Norway Doesn’t Pay for EU Single Market Access: #brexit #efta 
Today's @TheSun leader warns that Labour's official policy is now to vote against the crucial Bill that enables Brexit to happen  
CONTROL: Government's Brexit border plans step in right direction. Let's hope they deliver for the British people!  
1/ After the relative positivity from ScotGov, this appalling leaked Brexit paper highlights #ScotPfG's relative weakness on EU citizens. 
Today's @Daily_Express leader: "Shabby Labour refuses to back the Brexit process"  
Banks slams Labour attempt to block Brexit democracy  
If we're not to lose our EU partners, family & friends to Brexit expulsions, Scottish Indy is now not an aspiration, but a necessity. 
If Labour vote against Brexit bill on Mon, then its beyond political cynicism, and open sneering contempt for the 52%. But people voted Lab 
To all at @UKLabour who have escaped the ToryKip bodysnatcher plague: you now have only one option. Fight all-out against any & all Brexit. 
."Brexit negotiations will sour even more than they already have, and the Tories will be left holding the baby." 
Nobody is planning a post-Brexit migration system that would bar world class academics from working in Britain. #r4today 
Brexit immigration logic:“Are you good at picking fruit?”“Yes”“Do you have a degree?”“No”“We can’t take you on” 
Post-Brexit immigration: 10 key points from the Home Office document  Why aren't more MPs shouting about this? 
I am sure all those Brexit voting pensioners will be only too happy to get of their bums and pick fruit or labour on a building site.... 
"Most people from the EU come here to work" says MigrationWatch. So who's going to do the work after Brexit controls? 
Perhaps the Government can tell us how farmers will fill pickers each year? They are already struggling #brexit @NFUtweets 
#hurricaneirma hits Caribbean islands, #Brexit paper leaked plus all the main overnight stories in BBC News Daily 
Brexit "One big tantrum of the ignorant"  
9 nasty surprises in the Tories' leaked plans for immigration after Brexit  
This is astonishing: 759 treaties and international agreements Britain will lose after Brexit  
Andrew Adonis tells @georgeeaton: Labour will back a new Brexit referendum within six months 
It's always been all about immigration. The cold beating heart of Brexit.   
Just had a GREAT idea @theresa_may & @Conservatives - given Brexit is one big expensive mess, the 52% who voted for it can pay for it? #idea 
To anyone who wasn't aware that Brexit means an end to freedom of movement, I refer you to the 2017 Labour manifesto chapter on immigration  
BBC upset that the UK will restrict unskilled EU workers post Brexit.  
Theresa May is now in double trouble over her Brexit plans  
Leaked Home Office doc on post-Brexit EU immigration rules epitomises Theresa May's economically illiterate, command-and-control approach 1/ 
The pain & anxiety #Brexit is causing Brit/EU families & people who make a massive contribution to this country needs to be heard. Thread   
Tickets for #Brexit Question Time are selling fast but are limited. Reserve yours now! 16 Sep with @RCorbettMEP etc. 
Britain could still reverse Brexit, former minister Heseltine says  
Labour set to vote against the Brexit repeal bill  
The government has produced a study of the impact of Brexit on the NHS. They are keeping it quiet so I have put in an FoI. We need to know  
This is the key to understanding everything about Brexit in relation to @The3Million 
People of Boston Lincolnshire rejoice...you can get up very early in the rain & pick lettuces for long stretches #brexit #r4today 
Wednesday briefing: Brexit would slam door on EU workforce  
Britain could still reverse Brexit, former minister Heseltine says  
.@emmanuelmacron backs plan to use 73 UK seats for pan-EU list. Absurd idea & waste of money @politicoeurope #brexit  
70 percent of EU citizens said they would choose to remain if a membership referendum was held in their country  
.@VinceCable launches a ferocious attack on desperate Brexit fanatics whose zealotry is igniting a new McCarthyism  
If Labour votes against the Great Repeal Bill, it's because it's decided to foil Brexit #Premium 
Brexit plan provides for employers to give preference to British workers.  
Tell Your MP: No Brexit is better than a Bad Brexit.  
The hard truth is there is no economic question to which Brexit is the answer | @BenChu_ 
1. For #Brexit talks to progress the government needs to get a grip on reality. No more games. No more grandstanding. 
John Gapper — 'Brexit faces grave difficulties of substance, but it also has a brand problem'  
The NHS rather than get £350 million a week could be heading for staff shortages post Brexit. Deeply worrying!  
John Gapper: Britain’s Brexit brand is weak and confused  
The Downing Street suicide pact#Brexit  
First time since 2013 a referendum has made the ballot; 4 yrs ago, issue was pkg of election changes:  via @azcentral 
Brexit: Leaked document suggests UK plan to curb EU migration  
EU free movement for workers ‘will end IMMEDIATELY after Brexit’ amid migration crackdown  
1. If you're looking for any coherence in the latest tract to fall out of the #Brexit machine, don't bother. 
Only bigots, bots & trolls or billionaires still back Brexit! There is no mandate to leave or will of the people! We must #StopBrexit NOW 
Sat, Sept 9, 2017 at 11:00 AM, come to the march and let's make Brexit history. #rethinkbrexit  
Discrimination against fellow Europeans will end hopes of non train crash Brexit 
London ranked world’s best university city as experts warn over Brexit  
Thomas Sampson is writing a JEP article on "Brexit: The Economics of International Disintegration"  
With Labour finally standing against May on a Brexit issue, there's a real chance of burying this madness. It's all down to Tory rebels now. 
Brexit is going worse than expected.  
The duty of youth is to challenge corruption - Kurt Cobain #photography by Matt Greenstreet via @Kemenyans #brexit #travel 
Sorry, but for me, not honestly reevaluating your decisions in the light of new information IS the definition of stupid ... Brexit is stupid  
Home Office document exposes heart of Theresa May’s Brexit | Alan Travis  
"Brexit is bad, and a stupid decision. The only people who can reverse it would be the British people."Many agree. 
Brexit-bound Britain's economy continues to lag Europe  
Project2000 killed the nursing profession. Made it a degree course run by old polytechnics. RCN to blame for the crisis. 
Brexit: shock therapy - is Mrs May about to announce a UK "walk away" from the talks?  #Flexit. 
Not my most eloquent response, but certainly a visceral one to #Brexit! Because there is nothing which will make our lives better.   
Brexit Scaremongers in Retreat as British Manufacturing and Retail Sales Surge  
Britain currently receives 44% of fintech dollar share, although the effects of impending Brexit are yet to be seen  
Poorest will gain most under Brexit, says Labour report  via @telegraphnews 
Michael Caine doesn't want Britain to be controlled by EU bureaucrats 
MPs react strongly after post-Brexit immigration plans leaked  
If Brexit were like normal national politics we'd just be preparing for the next vote in 5 years time. #Brexit is not like that. 
April 2019: "May I see your papers, please?"#DACA-UK#immigration#Brexit 
Just like #MAGA - #BREXIT proves nay&doomsayers wrong!   
Leaked Home Office EU citizens paper can be traced right back to May. Fair to now say softer #Brexit only possible once she’s no longer PM? 
Because Russian trolls pretending to be Trump or Brexit supporters is totes cool but anybody impersonating Julian is where we draw the line.  
Juncker's top EU henchman brands Brexit 'STUPID' in astonishing attack on Leave voters  
Question for Brits: since Brexit, is it proper to say my UK shows are part of the European tour?  I'll just say the first wks are UK tour  
No cliff in sight... simply a beautiful runway to a truly global & prosperous Brexit Britain!  
."The mishandling of the Brexit negotiations is rooted above all in political cowardice." 
What about Kerslake on Brexit "There is no upside. This is damage limitation" quote and footage? 
The Guardian front page, Wednesday 06.09.17 | Revealed: Tories’ Brexit plan to deter EU migrants from Britain  
2mo @GOVUK publishes paper on science & research post Brexit - good to meet @UniversitiesUK & talk priorities - important for  Europe&UK 
Talk abt reversing Brexit if the deal is bad is missing a golden opportunity to talk abt things sure to be lost: benefits of EU citizenship. 
Just seen cracking 'The Producers' at @GCTStevenageWhat happens when people assume that they will not succeed then do so: Trump, Brexit... 
A leaked 82-page paper lays out how the UK wants to make it harder for EU migrants to work there after Brexit  
@BBCNewsnight Bob Kerslake, former head of the civil service, says of Brexit "There is no upside" & no deal = "utter & complete disaster" 
if #Brexit is forced through, then within 2-3 years I think a lot of major Brexit politicians will find themselves emigrating in a hurry. 
10 key points on Post-Brexit immigration.1. 2. 3. 4. 5. 6. 7. 8. 9. 10. Luvly jubbly!   
Peter Brookes on Theresa May and the 50 billion euro Brexit bill – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Failure to get a Brexit deal would be “an utter and complete disaster” says former head of the civil service @SirBobKerslake #newsnight 
The bit of Brexit that isn't directly racist is people with zero ambition or gumption trying to bring everyone down to their hopeless level  
Fmr head of civil service Bob Kerslake says failure to get #Brexit deal would be "utter and complete disaster for this country" #newsnight 
Brexiteers pushing for quick hard Brexit as public opinion will change as #brexitimpacts are felt in a slower exit 
Brexit "could trigger power blackouts", warn nuclear energy experts amid calls to stay in key EU agency 
Wednesday's Mail: "Brexit plan to end mass migration" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Wednesday's Times: "Immediate end to free movement after Brexit" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Brexit is a 'stupid decision' the UK public can still reverse, says senior EU official   
I knew a guy who voted Brexit because he was fed up with immigrants taking work. He's moved to NZ now, for work. His parents were Greek. 
Important: The leaked #Immigration policy paper is yet another nail in the coffin for a 'soft' Brexit. Gov committed to leaving the SM. 
.WHY would the Best & the Brightest want to come here?Who'd want to "COLLABORATE" with Bigoted Brexit Britain?. 
Moment of truth has arrived. Referendum Law is set to be approved tomorrow in @parlament_cat followed by the degree  
Xenophobia and narrow nationalism: the British #Brexit version.  
Banks slams Labour attempt to block Brexit democracy  
Oh hey there. Vote YES. Also tell your friends too. We don't want another Brexit/Trump surprise. VOTE YES. 
Tell Your MP: No Brexit is better than a Bad Brexit.  
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: 'Revealed: Tories' Brexit plan to deter EU migrants from Britain' #skypapers 
Labour MP Kate Hoey says her party voting against the Brexit bill is “betraying the will of the British people”… 
DAILY MAIL FRONT PAGE: 'Brexit plan to end mass migration from EU' #skypapers 
This document actually assumes that post #Brexit UK will still have a buoyant economy that attracts talent.It will not. 
If #Brexit does this, it would force my French wife out - and me with her. Hold fast, the @ScotGov resistance.   
Brexit: Leaked document suggests UK plan to curb EU migration  
Unfortunately #Brexit has introduced an authoritarian streak into a political system with very few safeguards against abusive government /11 
This is Tories secret #Brexit immigration planAnd it's shocking.Tomorrow's Guardian  
Turns out it wasn't 'Project Fear'... Brexit is really really Shit !!!    
4 What the govt means to say is that it wishes to overturn these pre Brexit ECJ rulings immediately - a derogation from the normal rule. 
Wow. It's like debating Corbyn supporters & being called a red Tory & blarite nonce, even though JC is as pro Brexit as the Tories  
3 This is misleading. The Repeal Bill will end ECJ jurisdiction for post Brexit judgments but maintain pre Brexit rulings as precedent.  
A bombshell leak has revealed the government's plan for immigration after Brexit  
I think all Remainers should only speak a non English language post Brexit to protest. Imagine the fun we can have and Brexiter horror. 
1/ A few thoughts on the government's leaked post Brexit migration paper. Unfortunately it contains several false or misleading statements. 
This is excellent antidote to Brexit delusion.  By triggering Art 50 we have set the clock ticking - on ourselves.  
#Brexit-themed remake of #LordOfTheFlies, starring @DavidDavisMP, @Anna_Soubry, #JacobReesMogg and #Boris.  #StopBrexitHour #DavidDavis #EU 
The most important thread you'll read. I've now read the paper and am bereft, it's the only Brexit paper that reads authentic Mrs May.  
Home Office document exposes heart of Theresa May’s Brexit makes scary reading if you're from the EU. Unreasonable  
MPs react strongly after post-Brexit immigration plans leaked  Why aren't more MPs more angry about this? 
Here's a fun poll... Please vote and RT!So... will Brexit actually happen? 
One irony about the proposed immigration changes is that by the time #Brexit is underway the main issue will be Britons wanting to emigrate. 
Brexit secretary 'refused to meet Scottish and Welsh governments'  
Midterm elections are almost always a referendum on the party in the White House.  
How the rest of the world will see Britain after brexit #GBBO 
Great to be at packed launch of @laboursinglemkt tonight. I'm fighting to protect my constituents jobs and their public services. #Brexit  
Andrew Adonis tells @georgeeaton: Labour will back a new Brexit referendum within six months 
The hard truth is there is no economic question to which Brexit is the answer | @BenChu_ 
BREAKING: Juncker almost dies laughing as buddy Blair says ‘I still have influence’  via @Your Brexit 
Hard to see why many skilled EU migrants should want to work in #Brexit Britain under these conditions #StopBrexit 
‘Call their bluff!’ Fed up Eurosceptics call for NO DEAL on Brexit as talks stall  
Leaked post-Brexit immigration plans branded 'mean and cynical'  
.@alison_mcgovern: The EU withdrawal bill eats away at all the freedoms we currently have #labour4singlemkt #Brexit  
More excited by this Prog 4Govt than anything else in my political career outside referendum. Stunning! Well done @NicolaSturgeon @scotgov 
EU doctors could be kicked out of the UK after 3 years post-Brexit, leaked Home Office report reveals  
I've had enough of this Brexit bollocks. Remember what happened when Canada said they were going to pull the pin. EU soon signed the deal! 
So let's get started for latest episode of "Brexit Clusterfuck"... Reading leaked immigration policy doc now and will do some tweeting 1/ 
Ben Jennings on David Davis and the Brexit process – cartoon  
Brexit Sec asked by @vickyford re frictionless NI border, refs visit to US-Canada border. Irish leader visited same too: "its a hard border" 
"Open season – a blank canvas for ministers to daub the post-Brexit landscape in colours to match their ideological taste." #RepealBill 
The referendum was NOT a 'democratic' decision- that's the biggest lie of all! 37% of the total (gerrymandered) electorate is NOT democracy.  
Nigel Farage - "We’re dealing here with thuggery, with bullying. I’ve been head-to-head with these guys for the last 18 years." #Brexit  
Why in god's name not 'Labour for the EU,' 'Labour against Brexit'?  
These are the leaked UK Brexit plans. This is not right in any way. We need migrant workers on every level in the UK.  
2018 midterm (will obviously be a referendum on Trump): Will Hispanics regret their stronger-than-expected support for him in 2016? (1) 
.@sdoughtymp: Hard Brexiteers got their #Brexit vision put to the country by Theresa May. The country rejected it #labour4singlemkt 
The Tories with their divisive referendum have fractured the nation. I'm depressed and angry that UK has become a populist dumbed-down swamp 
Thanks to Gina Miller Brexit is now enshrined into UK law and cannot be reversed regardless of what Remainers say. 
Four things you should know about Brexit  
Meaning #Brexit & #DACA not just a concern for immigrants. All citizens will pay the price for allowing the far right to capture this issue. 
Yes there is .... "How can we make everyone except the already very rich substantially worse off financially ... Brexit ... da-da"  
Ian Blackford's application for an emergency debate on Brexit and the role of the devolved administrations has not been granted 
Worst fears realised? Gov. to make it harder post-Brexit for EU students to come here. Major leak tonight:  
Leaked plans show Brexit government is keen to keep the foreigners at bay from day 1 of Brexit Britain.  
SNP Westminster leader Ian Blackford is now seeking an emergency debate on Brexit and the devolved administrations 
Corbyn is warned he will have to explain 2his voters Y he's ordering Labour to 'betray' the EU ref by voting AGAINST crucial Brexit laws 
At Labour Campaign for the Single Market launch.Brexit is Austerity 2.0 - and leaving the SM is Austerity on steriods. #labour4singlemkt 
Brexit is a 'stupid decision' the UK public can still reverse, says senior EU official  
THREAD spun from Guardian scoop on UK govt'a outrageous post-Brexit free movement plans  
"MUST READ: these measures could give a boost to the UK economy of up to 7% of GDP, some £135 billion PA"  #Brexit 
When we voted to Leave the EU We were voting to control our own destiny And not being controlled by the EUROPEAN UNION 
Leaked document reveals UK Brexit plan to deter EU immigrants.We do not deserve that, it is cruel! UK is our home. 
Thread on that leaked document of plans of UK to deter EU immigration post brexit 
Low-skilled EU migrants to be targeted by Government after Brexit, leaked documents show  
This is sickening:Home Office document exposes heart of Theresa May’s Brexit  
Verhofstadt says he deplores Brexit - maybe because he'll have to find new funding for his pension.  
Do they really honestly believe that ordering them to pay €5m by 25 Sept, it's going to stop the 1st Oct referendum?  
Brexit Scaremongers in Retreat as British Manufacturing and Retail Sales Surge  
Brexit latest: People on the Hindenburg who said it was crashing accused of totally spoiling the journey for other passengers.  
"No-one has ever pretended that [#Brexit] would be simple or easy," David Davis tells MPs...well....not strictly true...  
Baby boomer Leavers - You didn't fight WW2.  You have no special claim on patriotism. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
No, he said Brexit was a stupid decision. But our democracy was hijacked by lies, deception, fear & propaganda. It was the stuff of despots.  
I need to digest this properly, but this is all Brexit ever was about: turning Ukip BS into government policy. Well done, Brexit ... 3/3 
David Davis just said in the Commons that nobody pretended that Brexit would be easy. That will be news to the Trade Secretary.  
#Remain 'project fear'! What a joke! #Brexit was built on fear & hate - of the EU, migrants, refugees, Turks, Muslims, new light bulbs...  
Unspeakable plans of the #Tory Gov and @theresa_may RT Leaked document reveals UK Brexit plan to deter EU immigrants  
Juncker's right hand man says Brexit voters are 'stupid'. Are you tried of this public condescension? I'm on @LBC in 15 minutes. 
Those (Remainers) campaigning against Brexit seek to reverse the EU Referendum result. In other words, they're voting against democracy. 
17,410,742 voted for Brexit out of a pop. of about 60mBut 'will of the people' is more catchy than 'slender majority of those that voted'! 
"Sort of homogenous extension of", google translated from Brexit language into English= "same as"  
I will never ever 'get behind' Brexit if this is what it means, if this is how it treats people, if it brings out the v worst in us. Just no 
Fearless Labour MP Kate Hoey says her party voting against the Brexit bill is “betraying the will of the British people”  
A microcosm of how Brexit gets in the way of proper Government. The immeasurable opportunity cost of it all.  
The Government's planned immigration crackdown isn't just economically illiterate, it's plainly cruel too #Brexit  
Isn’t it about time you wrote the sequel? “Brexit: I thought it was going to go badly, but it turns out I was an optimist” 
In case you missed David Davis's statement on how Brexit is progressing for the UK, here's a summary  
Anyone voting against the #Brexit bill is "betraying the will of the British people."Nailed it, @KateHoeyMP 
"Come for the tanked currency. Come for the ethnic slurs. Come for the short visas": our Post-Brexit pitch to the world.  
Not only is this morally and economically profoundly wrong-headed, it'll make govt aims in Brexit deal much harder to secure. 
This is big: Leaked document reveals UK Brexit plan to deter EU immigrants  
Read David Davis' statement to the House on the July and August Brexit negotiating rounds:  
If you need more details on precisely how Brexit is going to fuck you and the country, get my book  
MEMO to David *dilettante* DavisWe KNOW what you did this summer #BrexitZilch - nada - nothng !!EXCEPT make a fool of both UK & yourself. 
Depressing that a full House of Commons for Davis on Brexit empties for Javid on Grenfell 
Really nasty UK #brexit stuff. And economically damaging. And unworkable. Oh, and most Europeans only have ID cards  
Soft #Brexit has zero appeal to most Remainers. It's @vincecable 's periodic soft-Brexity noises that stop me loudly supporting the LibDems. 
Tory leavers simultaneously believe EU dissolves national govt power and that national govt of Germany can fix Brexit for them.  
Labour launch an all-out assault on the government’s “undemocratic” and “unacceptable” plans to legislate for Brexit  
Remainer spin, summarised: “Economy is actually doing well – but something has to go wrong eventually, and we'll blame Brexit when it does.” 
David Davis confirms that concrete progress has been made in #brexit talks.  
David Davis maintains 'nobody said this (brexit) would be easy'. Oh yes they did. Time and time again. 
EU’s Barnier: UK needs to be ‘taught a lesson’ over BrexitProves yet again EU ’free-market’ is in fact a racket. 
Labour whips reporting "a number" of its MPs threatening to abstain if told Monday to vote against the Brexit Bill. Will a few vote for it? 
Before #GE2017 Labour had 3-line whip to support #Article50.Now they issue 3-line whip to vote against #Brexit.Hypocrisy, off the scale. 
Let me repeat this: Brexit is a scam, start to finish: backed by asset-strippers who fooled the gullible into giving them a giant tax haven.  
David Davis claimed that nobody said Brexit was 'going to be simple & easy'...  
This is basically all Brexit is: oligarchs hijacking the UK and turning it into a giant Jersey-like tax haven with captive low-wage labour. 
My Question to DD: will he publish the impact assessments on #Brexit that his department has seen? Or is he worried about looking 'silly'? pic.twitter.com/kxqzouv7ti 
Remainer MPs, knowing the damage #Brexit will inflict, are systematically violating clause 6 of the MPs' code of conduct.#StopBrexit 
DD suggests that they can't publish because it would help other side. This is standard objection to Brexit FoIs. It's nonsense. 
Caroline Lucas demands the publication of the impact statements on Brexit. More info on that here  
Brexit is a 'stupid decision' the UK public can still reverse, says senior EU official  
WATCH | Well done, @KateHoeyMP: "Anyone who votes against the principle of the [Brexit Bill] is betraying the will of the British people."   
Ken Clarke talking perfect sense as usual. #Brexit  
Kate Hoey socking it to the Lab frontbench in Commons over Brexit betrayal  
The Brexit bill is cataclysmic. Only a swerve will save us | Polly Toynbee #brexitwontwork#brexitshambles 
Brexit will restrict EU citiziens' rights to come to the UK & mine to travel to the EU, why should I get behind such a dumb idea as that? 
The Labour Party’s Brexit U-turn has taken them from “Remainers to reversers,” says Bill Cash MP  
Brexit secretary David Davis spot-on:“I only have to negotiate with Brussels, Keir Starmer has to negotiate with his entire front bench”  
Why didn't the Remain campaign use Ken Clarke more during the referendum? Puts forward the remain case simply, eloquently and precisely. 
Embarrassing to see David Davis laughing at his own lack of progress on Brexit. He's supposed to be representing our country. 
Starmer "we are obviously reaching stage of negotiations where fantasy meets brutal reality -too many Brexit promises made that cant be met" 
Starmer talks about the PM's red lines. No - the red lines, (e.g SM & CU) were set by the people on the 23rd June. Soft Brexit is NOT Brexit 
DD has very short memory! Keir Starmer absolutely right. Tories were bragging about how easy #Brexit would be. Now look at state of talks... 
Keir Starmer: "Too many promises have been made about Brexit that can't be kept ... The time for floating fantastical ideas is over." 
"No-one has ever pretended that [Brexit] would be simple or easy," David Davis tells MPs. Here's what Davis wrote just last year.  
Meeting with @GuyVerhofstadt 2day 2discuss his support 4 including GFA in Protocol of Brexit Withdrawal Agreement 2 preserve it in all parts  
It's been 439 days since the EU referendum and David 'The Brexit Bulldog' Davis says he's making 'concrete progress' #BrexitShambles 
Davis on Brexit: "Nobody pretended this would be simple and easy.” I'm quite sure quite a lot of people did actually... 
"Nobody pretended this would be simple or easy," Brexit Secretary David Davis just told the House of Commons.*cough*  
David Davis: "Nobody pretended this would be simple or easy." Pretty sure that's not true. #brexit 
It's been 439 days since the referendum. Yet the whole #Brexit process still shrouded in confusion. Not good enough. 
Leader Tory Brexiter Daniel Hannan wants a "buccaneering, offshore, low tax" Britain. In other words a tax haven for the rich. #Brexit  
Labour's decision to oppose Brexit Bill is a monstrous betrayal of its voters, says UKIP  
Davis says he's making 'concrete progress'. Would hate to see what a lack of progress would look like... #Brexit 
Gardiner, Thornberry and Starmer are sitting next to each on labour's frontbench. Between them, there's 27 different Brexit positions. 
David Davis up in the Commons for Brexit questions  
Jeremy Corbyn orders Labour MPs to vote against Brexit Repeal Bill  
.@Nigel_Farage meeting Demetris Syllouris president of the Cypriot Parliament to discuss Brexit, EU & Commonwealth  
Exciting news. From 9/11 @ChristianFraser and I have a new show - Beyond 100 Days. Trump, Brexit, our world. 2pm EST.  
Labour's @BrendanChilton: Millions of voters will be worried about party's new Brexit position.  
The amount of effort David Davis and Theresa May have put into getting a good #Brexit deal is demonstrated by this dog...  
There is no economic question facing the UK to which Brexit is the answer. My @IndyVoices column:  
What is a @UKLabour party when it supports a #Brexit built on the propaganda of far-right tax-dodging billionaires @Keir_Starmer? 
We must #StopBrexit & then we must deprive Murdoch, Dacre, Desmond & the Barclay brothers of their unaccountable power over Britain#Brexit 
DUP say a border poll is divisive & destabilising. Yet supported #Brexit, one of most divisive & destabilising things to happen the north . 
A three-line whip to oppose Brexit Bill when their manifesto committed to leaving the single market & customs union. Says it all.  
About right, although I'd put chance of Brexit reversal at something like 25%  
Interesting. Forecasters see a 'modest' chance that the UK will u-turn on Brexit. Leave a reply with your thoughts!  
Great to see Italy’s Europe Minister @sandrogozi to discuss impact of #Brexit and strengthen London’s friendship with Italy. #LondonIsOpen 
*BREAKING* it appears Labour HQ released thousands of leaflets pre- election with two words misplacedFOR THE FEW NOT THE MANY.#Brexit 
I prefer EU membership that already benefits the many, not Brexit that can only benefit the very rich and very few.How about you? 
Top ten financial centres in the world. No EU cities apart from Brexit London. Zurich is in non-EU Switzerland.  
Politicians are trying to overturn the referendum result by stealth  
‘Call their bluff!’ Fed up Eurosceptics call for NO DEAL on Brexit as talks stall  
nothing makes me prouder to be French than the fact that more French people back Brexit than UK citizens, what a petty nation we are 
Downing St says copycat deals replacing existing EU agreements are not “cut-and-paste” Brexit; more a case of “taking back Ctrl-Alt-Del”. 
Remember that stuff about the City emptying out because of Brexit?  It wasn't true  
A Swiss asset manager is understood to be picking a new London base after a Brexit U-turn  pic.twitter.com/gOqJvjORVz 
READ | @Arron_Banks: Labour's "foolish and futile" decision to block Brexit Bill will incense millions of Labour leavers.  
.@NicolaSturgeon: "As it stands, the Scottish Government will not recommend to Holyrood that we approve the #Brexit Bill." 
Nicola Sturgeon: "We will consider again the issue of a referendum on independence when the terms of Brexit are clear." 
Labour says it will oppose Brexit repeal bill over 'power grab fears'  
Their accountability is to the #EU27, not to the #Marr Show.This isn't #infotainment.#Brexit  
Is lake-sword girl pro or anti brexit? I mean they *are* putting her in charge right? 
Labour's leaders are betraying Brexit. Shame on them.  
Andrew Adonis tells @georgeeaton: Labour will back a new Brexit referendum within six months 
Labour is now explicitly anti-Brexit. It has officially abandoned its working-class voters and made itself a party of the bitter bourgeoisie 
Labour ready to wage ‘gruelling trench warfare’ against Brexit, says Quisling Scum Peter Mandelson   
Latest UK economic figures make worrying viewing for those backing Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn orders Labour MPs to vote against Brexit Repeal Bill in bid to block Tory power grab 
What a surprise, Labour begins undermining Brexit. Corbyn, man of principle my arse. 
Labour set to vote against the Brexit repeal bill  
BREAKING: Theresa May appoints new Brexit information minister.  
#Breaking: Labour party confirms it will vote against the Repeal Bill on Monday #Brexit 
Love @LBC caller who described first referendum as a ‘first date’, where neither side showed true colours. We need second date to see truth.  
More Brexit tips:3) Share baths with a neighbour4) Separate toilet paper into single ply5) Eat roadkill6) Sell a kidney on Craigslist  
‘ABSOLUTE CLARITY’ on Labour’s Summer of Brexit flip-flopsLabourPlaying politics with Britain’s futureCorbynToo weak to stand up for   
To give this guy some credit, he seems to have a better thought-through plan than most other Brexit supporters, including those in charge...  
Predictions that the Brexit vote would lead foreign investors to shun Britain are proving wrong—so far  
TRADE: Countries are queuing up to trade with post-Brexit Britain, says Iceland's Foreign Minister.  
Labour will back a Brexit referendum on the terms of Mrs May's 'deal', I predict  
The EU doesn't negotiate, it demands. It has no legal case for payment. We must be prepared to walk. #Brexit #UKIP  
Labour will back second Brexit referendum, I predict   
'Magical thinking' - my speech in Lords today on Brexit & Ireland. UK wrecked Ireland with bad policy in C19 & C20; let's not do it again. 
Good news on Brexit from Private Eye  
Expectation vs reality. #LaughingStock#Brexit  
Opening our markets to poorer countries would be a big, easy Brexit win, writes @s8mb @ASI for today's Red Box  
Brexit won't work for those of us who want to remain EU citizens because you have robbed us of that. So you make it work. I'm out.  
The govt is drunk on nationalism, but with a bit of pragmatism we can still get out of this Brexit nightmare   
BREAKING NEWS: David Davies denies that the expected statement he is due to make about the Brexit negotiations is "They're all c*nts" 
It's more than a year since 52% of voters were fooled into thinking that something called "Brexit" could make them live "Happy Ever After". 
Vince Cable calls for another referendum, this time with the facts. Is that the referendum we should act on? Or is it dodging democracy?  
The British public are losing patience with the Government’s approach to Brexit. Recent polling shows 61%...  
Look snowflakes Brexit is happening, War is happening, get behind it or-[suddenly shrouded by girl's dinosaur dress] ohmygod no pls im dying 
In The Kerryman on Aug 30th @KerryForChoiceWith a referendum getting closer its #timetoact to get #prochoice voices heard in every county! 
Scotland's losing these 2 people, their experience, opportunities and thousands of others for a Brexit imposed on it  
You can tell most Brexit accounts are Russian bots as they furiously condemn moaning, pessimism and criticism of the UK as 'un-British' 
Instead of talking Brexity wibble, @vincecable should have forcefully argued that any #Brexit is bad for Britain. 
MEMO to #bbcdpWHY the focus on Venezuela ?Kim Yong UN & Trump threaatening to *nuke* each otherUK in #Brexit shambles#HaveAGoAtJCTime ? 
Two unrelated facts: 1. A bigger proportion of the French now want Brexit than Brits. 2. Michel Barnier is a Frenchman.  
Lib Dems leader @vincecable says he's worried Gov't is "horribly unprepared" over Brexit negotiations and it has to "get real" about issues  
You can't rhyme 'exit' with 'Brexit', as if Brexit is a word completely unrelated to exit. Like rhyming radar with gaydar.  
As a Remainer I am utterly pissed-off by @VinceCable talking as if #Brexit negotiations going well would be good for Britain. #StopBrexit 
4) A Brexit campaign that prioritized "democracy" but admitted the actual costs of leaving would not have won the vote. Brexit was free. 
Labour MPs should not be voting against the #GreatRepealBill this week. They should be honouring the referendum by supporting it. 
Sinn Féin - 5 year time frame for Irish Unity referendum part of Westminster manifesto. Received highest ever vote 
Even the gooiest, softest Brexit diminishes our influence over rules that will bind us. The harder forms are an economic cyanide capsule 
.@mrjamesob: "Talking down the country" = truthfully reporting the facts of Brexit  
Remainiacs are testing our patience. This summer proved that all their Brexit claims were wrong  
There are three reasons:1. I think Brexit is a terrible mistake;2. It hasn't happened yet;3. I think the British are ultimately pragmatic 
Why I won't be climbing on the Brexit bus /1 
Brexit might not happen, City experts say  
Must Watch: How are Scots living in European Union and EU citizens living in Scotland dealing with Brexit?  
The public should decide the "destination" of Brexit, says Sir Vince Cable.What do you think? #r4today 
Vince Cable wrong to say that Brexit will mean we dilute environmental standards. Gove is clear,if anything we can now have higher standards 
The Liberal Democrats want an "exit from Brexit", @vincecable tells @jo_coburn #bbcdp 
Has anyone ever moved house before working out the financial implications and impact on their quality of life? And yet Brexit... 
Brexit’s like walking into a wardrobe. Brexiteers think they’re off to Narnia. The rest of us know we’ll end up in Josef Fritzl’s basement. 
All together now "Bollocks to Brexit" @No10Vigil @EUflagmafia @BrexitBin @pEussyhat @CarolineWWriter @Wok_Chi_Steve @HMCabinetCat #SODEM 
Some kurd named their kid referendum  
Only way to make Brexit work is to cancel it entirely.  
#Brexit implications get more embarrassing every day. Our Gov't is complicit in huge damage to our country. #StopBrexit @Number10gov @FT 
Euro Area Poised for Fastest Economic Expansion in a Decade. So much for the failing EU forecast by Leavers#Brexit 
Referendum summed up by Arron Banks, who stands to gain financially from Brexit: Leave won by manipulating voters.  
'Brexit would have been a bad idea even if done well'-@GuitarMoog says govt showing 'appalling dereliction of duty' 
Brexit ain't appnin is it. EU Jimmeh!!! 
Now seems as good a time as any to remind everyone that the chief architect of the Brexit referendum used Nazi-style adverts in his campaign  
REVEALED: How British people can RISE UP and stop our government paying EU A SINGLE PENNY for Brexit  vi @Your Brexit 
This Leave voter told @mrjamesob how to get behind Brexit:1) Holiday in Britain2) Wash your clothes by hand  
The Boat Of Uncertainty - what Brexit means to real people:  
Britain calls for non-stop Brexit talks with EU   
"There is clear democratic legitimacy and a political majority to hold this Catalan independence referendum." @markdemesmaeker @ViaEuropaTV 
The same Bot accounts that  switched from Brexit to Trump and back are now pushing Jacob Rees Mogg. Think about that for a moment. 
All wise politicians note: political parties can save their skins by putting approval on final #Brexit deal back to the country. Makes sense  
#Brexit: "Limited progress has been made after first 3 rounds of talks," says Brexit coordinator Guy Verhofstadt:  
Good to see @TomBrakeMP showing his support on his way to work. Come on down we're here all day!  #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain #SODEM 
MPs return to Westminster after summer break and are immediately being plunged into a series of battles over Brexit  
Martin Selmayr, Drunker's deputy at EU, says Brexit vote was 'stupid' and can be reversed. Another sign of how much the EU will miss us 
The UK cannot cut and paste EU trade deals, because the UK does not offer what the EU offers.#Brexit 
Friends!Shocking!Due to Brexit, even Our EU Budget will be hit by Tory Austerity!Is - literally - nothing sacred? 
The worlds biggest sovereign wealth fund is betting on Britain because our Government has a clear plan for Brexit.  
All this Brexit talk about leaving the EU but remaining in the CUSTOMS UNION is ridiculous.Here's why  
.@mrjamesob on @LBC Caller:"Buy British"JO:"Name a British washing machine manufacturer"Caller:"Wash clothes by hand"Brexit utopia.  
The reality of Brexit negotiations is much more positive than many newspapers will say  
I know everyone is bored of the Irish Brexit paper now, but I'd like to return to it for one second. Particularly the bit on food safety.  
Finland, YouGov poll:Would you prefer that the UK remains in or leaves the European Union?Remain: 70%Leave: 30%#Brexit 
This is the only argument for supporting Brexit the Tories have left  
21) Brexit is a victory for protectionism, isolationism and exceptionalism. Fair enough, but that has real consequences for new tradeend/ 
ME+EU - The story of a Scot in EU and an EU National in Scotland during the Brexit storm @ellenjoelle @TheRosie 
NEWS! David Davis to bring back Parliament’s sovereignty by not telling it anything about Brexit talks  
.@Albert_Rivera supports banning from office Catalan President @KRLS Puigdemont for organising 1-O referendum. C's real face.  
14) The Brexit message was simple: "we're the UK, a great trading nation, we don't need the EU, and everyone wants to buy our stuff" 
#LBC James O' Brien still straight on Brexit bashing, he never stops every bloody day. Let's get behind the government make it work FFS   
12) The Brexit position in 2017 is by it's nature insular, regressive, protectionist & negative, regardless of whatever idealism drove it 
Brexit was a 'stupid' decision and could still be reversed says top EU official  
The euro area's economy is on course for its fastest expansion in a decade  
In Paros, Greece. Met Brit couple who voted Brexit as too many people in UK. They've just bought a property on this tiny island. Irony lost. 
SIGN/SHARE: Petition to stop Islamist hate preacher Sheikh Ekrima Sabri entering UK hits 10,000  via @Your Brexit 
The Brexit Road Map  
EU treating Brexit as "primarily an internal disciplinary matter rather than an external relationship building issue", says city's J Browne 
Warning: the cost of Brexit could seriously damage your health service  
Absolute clarity?! In 14 months, Labour have put forward 10 different Brexit plans. Can anyone keep up?  
Factories report bumper order books - bolstered by weak pound in wake of Brexit vote and stronger eurozone economy  
Absolute clarity?! While Labour just try & play politics, the Conservatives are working to get the best Brexit deal for everyone.  
Politico's vg new morning email has grasped the rules of uk reporting. Bad news: due to Brexit. Good: #despitebrexit 
All the people guffawing at the thought of Rees-Mogg being Tory leader remember Corbyn, Brexit and Trump 
Withdrawal Bill must be urgently amended to protect from Government rollback on fundamental rights after Brexit 
Imagine, for a moment, how British newspapers would look today if our Brexit experience was being portrayed as positive by these chaps...  
There you go @DamianGreen we don't "need" to get behind Brexit. There are options if the UK is dynamic enough.  
Please sign and share - demand #Brexit transparency  
Also he said Brexit is stupid, which it is. More than anything, it is profoundly stupid. 
Tell the government to release the hidden Brexit studies! Sign the petition here:  
Useful reminder from Martin Selmayr, chief of staff to Commission president, that we can reverse Brexit if we want  
The Brexit bill is cataclysmic. Only a swerve will save us | Polly Toynbee  
The EU are terrified that Brexit begins the total disintegration of their project.  
The TUC and labour movement should embrace Brexit or become irrelevant, says trade unionist Fawzi Ibrahim  
UK proposes non-stop talks to break Brexit deadlock | Labour prepares first attempt to vote down EU Withdrawal Bill  
Me in the Times's Red Box about why after Brexit we should open our markets to as many poor countries as possible.  
.@darrenpjones: new trade deals w countries around the world is starting to look like another broken Brexit promise  
The brains trust of Mogg, Redwood et al. attempting to convince you that nothing is greater than something. 
Important piece on #RepealBill by @pollytoynbee: The Brexit bill is cataclysmic. Only a swerve will save us.   
No capacity so copycat trade deals coming. Yesterday's bluster is today's question - why are we doing this? #Brexit  
Brexit: MEPs worried about UK position on British “divorce bill”. Find out more in our press release   
BREXIT: Juncker's chief of staff called Brexit 'bad', 'stupid' and thinks it can be reversed. Nonsense. 
Brexit lie #3. We'll cut trade deals all over the world. Thanks Brexiters.  
Friends! Yes!And, due to Brexit, Britain is the most racist country in the world!No wonder literally nobody wants to come and live here!  
Blog: The poverty of Brexit - The Guardian confirms this morning what many have suspected for some time, which ...  
Heartwarming article on the Igbo Jewish community in Biafra (Give them their Referendum) who we continue to support  
Progressives take note: Brexit means Brexit, so let’s create a vision for it | Ivan Lewis  
Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg 'would refuse any ministerial job that gags him on Brexit'  via @telegraphnews 
REVEALED: How British people can RISE UP and stop our government paying EU A SINGLE PENNY for Brexit  via 
And The Guardian's spin on the latest good news? You couldn't make it up.'Factory and retail sales climb despite fears of Brexit slump.' 
"Despite Brexit"  
Nick Clegg just came up with the best metaphor for the mess that is Brexit  
Juncker's Chief of Staff says legally possible to reverse A50.MPs now need to ensure referendum on Deal v Remain. 
Tory party refused to let me vote and allowed others to remove my European citizenship. Shove your Brexit where the sun don't shine. 
 On the #Brexit front, senior figures have said the UK doesn't have capacity to negotiate multiple trade deals  
The Brexit bill is cataclysmic. Only a swerve will save us | Polly Toynbee  
Brexit: "oh, hi, I'd like to pay 50 billion to be outside of the market where we sell most of our stuff please"#BARGAIN#ultrarecession 
More on those 50 suppressed Brexit studies. Sign the petition: Release the Studies  via @euromove 
On the tyranny of the so-called majority ...#Brexit #StopBrexitHour #MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #LeaveEU 
Look at this example of extreme Brexit Derangement syndrome   
Important comment by @MartinSelmayr that it's "legally possible" to reverse Brexit. He's Junker's top official.  
UK 'does not have capacity to strike new trade deals after Brexit' #cutandpastebrexit#brexitwontwork 
Delighted to join the fantastic team at @DruryPN to work across many issues including Brexit.  
If the Govt gets more time to negotiate Brexit, that means businesses having to wait even longer for clarity. And many of them won't. 
.“What is proposed is not a Brexit for the UK nor even for Britain. It is a Brexit for the ideological hard right" 
Theresa May is planning a big speech on Brexit to force the pace of talks with the EU  
Five Nobel Peace Prize winners sign international statement supporting Catalan referendum.   
'The authority of parliament will be damaged by the Brexit bill' @guardian 
Deceptively provocative by @JananGanesh: Brexit as a slow puncture for Britain   
Please contact your MP now. The EU Withdrawal Bill is a threat to us all. Parliament must keep control of #Brexit  
One message:Brexit is bad for Britain. Don't let it happen. Stand strong. Let your voice be heard. Together we will #StopBrexit. 
Juncker Chief of Staff Slams Brexit decision as 'Stupid' - He's right!  
Britain was "stupid" to vote for Brexit, top EU official says  
There is worrying little sign that U.K. is preparing for the failure of Brexit talks, says David Allen Green  via @FT 
May is terrified - she's U turning again to try and convince Labour to back the Brexit fantasy. This is the worst Tory government in history 
Nick Clegg just came up with the best metaphor for the mess that is Brexit  
As long as Germany does not add it to the Brexit bill then I'm good with this! 
Morning! Talking Brexit & Royals on @GMB with @piersmorgan @susannareid100 @toryboypierce. What's not to like? OK, both Brexit & Royals 
Doing @gmb 6.15 on Brexit rebellion in Tory Party which isn't going to happen to the irritation of @Kevin_Maguire 
Britain offers £1bn a year to stay in the EU's science club after #Brexit  via @thetimes 
UK universities top global rankings for first time ever despite Brexit reputation fears  
Brexit was a 'stupid' decision and could still be reversed says top EU official  via @telegraphnews 
It must have hurt the anti-British rag to write this:Factory and retail sales climb despite fears of Brexit slump  
The Brexit bill is cataclysmic. Only a swerve will save us | Polly Toynbee  
Andrew Adonis seems to be one of the few who is speaking out what we all know - that Brexit is destroying the UK. Follow & support him. 
Kurdish Americans gather in Moorhead to support Kurdistan Independence Referendum  
UK 'does not have capacity to strike new trade deals after #Brexit'  
Brexit 'puts NI peace process at risk' - Hain  
#Brexit not of #EU's making. #EU27 share a joint commitment to its future which trumps future #UK relationship  
We're still no closer to a clear Brexit deal, but when one is agreed we should have another referendum  
Brussels has no clear vision for Brexit, says City envoy  
Five Nobel Peace Prize winners sign international statement supporting Catalan referendum  
A new fight has been brewing over the consequences of Brexit for the Northern Irish border.  
The brexit talks are shameful. Each turn of the EU screw has Britain sobbing and running for cover. For Gods sake give us a strong leader. 
MPs return to Commons for Brexit showdown amid reshuffle rumours  
Brexit#UnlikelyRoyalBabyNames 
Brexit was always driven by those that believe in totalitarian capitalism. Their methodology is stealth. Tragedy working class voted for it. 
And Remainers say to Corbyn & @UKLabour: you won’t have money to improve situation when economy crashes as a result of Brexit. Fight it!  
*Brexit Explained*  
Fucking Brexit.  
Major bank says Theresa May's government will collapse in 2018 due to Brexit split & we will get a fresh election 
Factory and retail sales climb despite fears of Brexit slump  
"Key EU official said UK could still legally reverse the Brexit decision."Millions would support reverse Brexit.  
Think the national referendums are pretty lame. But since UK destroyed itself with Brexit fail maybe referendum to depatriate Piers Morgan? 
Brexit: no Irish solutions on the horizon - Dublin sticks it to London ...  #Brexit.  
'Brexit will RIP a hole into EU budget' More German states TERRIFIED of funding cuts  
Tell Your MP: No Brexit is better than a Bad Brexit.  
"Remainers want a recession so they can say 'I told you so'" is twat-speak for "Can't you stop mentioning the negative effects of Brexit?" 
TL;dr. @DamianGreen is latest clever Tory to sacrifice their credibility to the Brexit gods. At this rate, only Osborne will survive.  
We're still no closer to a Brexit deal, but when one is agreed we should have another referendum#brexitwontwork 
Final para cd be political epitaph. Brexit won't work for everyone in UK. It won't work for anyone. If he knew it then, he must know it now.  
5Nobel Peace Prize winners sign international statement supporting Catalan referendum. @mlasalas to @Elnacionalcaten 
Brexit was a 'stupid' decision and could still be reversed says top EU official - The Telegraph  
 ... UK 'does not have capacity to strike new trade deals after Brexit'  
Off my bat, and speaking as a pro-Remainer, I'd still say the large majority of BBC presenters are anti Brexit.  
Anybody who uses the phrase "will of the people" as an argument for pressing ahead with Brexit is disqualified from being taken seriously. 
40% of Tories MPs would sell their children into slavery if it got them Brexit.  
I spent today in two EU Parl committee meetings. One addressed by Guy Verhofstadt. Listening to EU plan to delay, impede, and stop Brexit! 
Now Brexit is widely seen as a hopeless con trick doomed to failure, there may now be a race between Tories and Labour to disown it. 
UK 'does not have capacity to strike new trade deals after Brexit'  
#scotnight Sarwar supports Brexit. Scotland doesn't. 
Brexiters blaming Remainers for difficulties of Brexit: utterly predictable. The difficulties of Brexit are due only to the folly of Brexit.  
They're not even trying to pretend Brexit is a great opportunity any more. They  push on with it only to keep Labour out of power.  
Sent recently to every household in Hastings and Rye. Note the lie claiming "52% of the electorate" voted for Brexit. It was in fact 37%  
Brexit Britain for you in all it's shameful glory.  
'That's a threat' Anna Soubry shot down after admitting she WOULD vote against Brexit bill. Her voters said Leave!  
The UK is in a desperate #Brexit negotiating position with a divided country, a lame duck PM, and a squabbling self-serving Tory Government. 
They have same #Brexit view.   
.And based on Labour's track record so far- majority of Lab MPs will back the Conservative's Brexit preparations. 
NHS underfundedPolice underfundedFire underfundedArmy underfundedNavy underfundedAirforce underfundedSo how the hell is #brexit funded 
Tomorrow's papers; lady to have baby, Brexit still rubbish, great orange idiot still may or may not start WW3 
Brexit was a 'stupid' decision and could still be reversed says top EU official. What's more he's correct! 
She is lying. Our Great Brexit Leader Nigel Fromage said that they will join this year.  
Five Nobel Peace Prize winners sign international statement supporting Catalan referendum  
You are not sick now but when you are, the NHS and the migrants saving you may not be there when you need it. Brexit means NHS privatisation 
Looking at the present Cabinet, it does prove in this day and age you can lie your way to the top of British politics....#Brexit  
Tory MEP ‘ashamed to be British’ after Brexit  
Japan should be a #Brexit style paradise, non-EU, near booming markets, low immigration. It's been economically stagnant for 20 years. /1  
Brexit was a 'stupid' decision and could still be reversed says top EU official - The Telegraph  
We need to teach the EU a lesson: that democracy won’t yield to threats   #Brexit 
Foolish, costly and probably ruinous - many expect that's exactly what Brexit would turn out to be.  
Re-reading Orwell's Essays. Can't help but feel that if some of these were on the national curriculum we wouldn't be in this Brexit mess... 
Commercial construction industry is on the edge of recession all because of Brexit. Time to exit Brexit to save British jobs. #StopBrexit 
#Brexit & #trump have made intolerance great again. 
Please make every effort to join the march in London on Saturday. Numbers matter!Together we can stop Brexit! @peoplesmarch4eu 
Five threaders who are must #follows on explaining Brexit complexities@EmporersNewC@Sime0nStylites@GuitarMoog@tony_nog@eurosluggard 
Andrew Neil the best political interviewer on tv bar none, doesn't conform to BBC anti-brexit agenda so must go...disgusting!  
Fruitful meeting on #Brexit with  @simoncoveney: Good Friday Agreement to preserve in all its part 
This, by @faisalislam, is one of the best things you will read on where the UK is politically with Brexit:  
Hundreds of laws will have to be changed for Brexit to become a reality  
Obviously for me it's all relating to Brexit, but quite possibly from the same accounts. So: yep!   
8 things we learned about Brexit during the European summer  
David Davis refines his #Brexit negotiation strategy:  
Well, that means England belongs to her now. No "Ifs", no "buts". Wish her the best of luck in the Brexit negotiations, Finally, a step up! 
What would Theresa May have to say to unblock the impasse in Brexit negotiations?  
Theresa May's government 'will collapse over Brexit in 2018', claim Morgan Stanley 
#Brexit is in trouble.Voila the latest deflection: #BrexitGaslight.Boom! -make it look like #Remain and #Remainers are in trouble#Tories 
So sick of #Brexit *sore winner* syndrome. Nobody is to blame for #BrexitShambles but you & your allies in Govt. You wanted it, you own it. 
Poorest will gain most under Brexit, says Labour report   
64% of UK voters would oppose paying a Brexit bill of £10 billion or more, according to Guardian/ICM polling.  
"Brexit is bad, and it's a stupid decision," one of the most powerful EU officials says  
This is a very good back-to-school account of where we are across multiple axes of politics and Brexit.  
Tory MEP faces calls to quit after he says he's so angry about Brexit he might give up UK passport  BYE BYE TRAITOR 
22. European capitals have been told to watch out for PM's new speech on Brexit later in September 
UK Brexit team furious as EU threatens to keep British people dangerously well-informed -  via @newsthump 
Brexit was a 'stupid' decision and could still be reversed says top EU official 
Tories admit that their Brexit plan is so rubbish it will only work if all the critics shut up  
12. Now evident weakness in negotiating hand coupled with negotiating time disappearing, limits possibility for bespoke UK Brexit solution 
 #Brexit Talks should begin with NO Thanks and end with Nein Danke EU Bloodsuckers Adios! 
It's been nearly 15 months since the 3.8% marginal Brexit win & still I've yet to see or hear evidence of #OneBrexitBenefit 
8. Eg McDonnell meets with top FTSE 100 chief executives, Labour telling British biz to tell them what they're telling Dexeu on Brexit 
7. Labour's top team have had doors of business flung open since GE - much more interested in Brexit than their tax plans... 
Brexit: Labour prepares first attempt to vote down EU withdrawal bill - About time!  
Those who ask: 'Do you think Brexit will happen now?' are actually saying do you think the democratic will of the people can be overturned? 
'Brexit will RIP a hole into EU budget' More German states TERRIFIED of funding cuts  
4. Eg unsolicited letter to top Cabinet minister from British captain of industry imploring Government to stop Brexit for the economy sake 
Blimey. How has the rest of the world survived the last 40 years without EU membership. Frightening.#EU#Brexit 
Hard Brexit needed.  
Theresa May will make mystery 'important intervention' that could delay Brexit talks, EP leader reveals  Why wait? 
Who will get the blame when #Brexit fails?#Brexitwontwork 
If she will reverse Brexit, I will bend the knee, stat.  
Long read on where we are re Brexit, Parliament, diplomacy, economics, May Corbyn, "Norway in drag", & no No Deal...  
UK Brexit team furious as EU threatens to keep British people dangerously well-informed 
Brexit: Labour prepares first attempt to vote down EU withdrawal bill  
Join us in calling on the Government to ensure EU researchers can work in the UK after #Brexit:  #ResearchAtRisk 
84% of Germans against major concessions to UK in Brexit negotiations.  
Former Chancellor George Osborne tells Andrew Marr & @londonpressclub that he sees Brexit as a threat to London - not an opportunity 
RT Need more Tories to do this!Conservative politician "quite ashamed to be British" post-Brexit gets Irish passport  
British construction industry quakes at Brexit uncertainty -  
I've been loyal & always loved my country of birth  Britain but now distance myself from shameful  aspects of Brexit eg treatment of EU cits  
I understand five languages. I have two degrees. My passport isn't British. I voted Brexit. Therefore I win.  
."Brexit is fuelling a new restlessness within Irish nationalism north of the border.". 
Theresa May will make mystery 'important intervention' that could delay Brexit talks  
No thank you. A sorry attempt to shift blame onto those who warned about the dire effects of Brexit and those who heeded that advice. 
IMHO, @CharlesTannock, like most Remainers, loves his country passionately. To see it diminished by a Brexit would be unbearable for us all.  
Why are you not implementing the highly specific but secret Brexit plan that I had in my head when I voted?Brexiteers' musings pic.twitter.com/0GA3BoyuZN 
Brexit sets Britain on a stable path of relative decline  
Brexit: Labour prepares first attempt to vote down EU withdrawal bill  
We're still no closer to a clear Brexit deal, but when one is agreed we should have another referendum  
I'm 15yr working in City, writing abt regs; Brexit is never going to happen. Just need someone w big enough genitalia to call it. 
In the 14 months since Britain voted to leave the EU, the Labour Party have put forward ten different Brexit plans.  
The North Sea is on track for the biggest year of oil and gas field startups in a decade  
President @KRLS: “Any attempt to prevent the #referendum is destined to fail because democracy is unstoppable”  #1Oct 
The Government is keen to move on in #Brexit talks beyond the three areas already discussed  
Brexit school of calculations. 110,000 of those "not speaking English" would be Welsh speaking & aren't immigrants, dickchops  
People of Angus, you were told about the dangers of voting for the "No Referendum" party. #voteTory 
Today's headline: 1. Nuclear war; 2. Brexit chaos; 3. Royal baby. 2017 really has it all, doesn't it? 
The Looming War And Neglected Referendum, A Dice To Cast In Nigeria – View Africa24  
UK Govt right to take firm line on large ‘Brexit Bill’. We pay £billions to EU every year & claim has no legal basis 
To #Remain voters who think #Brexit has to take place to respect democracy, are you sure you want to work for these men?  
Prince Harry Says Kermit Can't Be Trusted To Deliver Brexit #PrinceHarry 
Keir Starmer says Labour won’t give the PM a blank cheque over Brexit, as “Jeremy needs it after promising to wipe out student debt”. 
"It's like staring at an empty building site and saying we've made progress because we've made a cup of tea."Nick Clegg on Brexit #r4today 
Brexit vote a heroic rebellion against an EU Empire addicted to extravagance & power, since ref they've fully justified the case for leaving 
Michael Gove, Boris Johnson, Andrea Leadsom all lied during the referendum.All given cabinet jobsThat's how accountable the UK are.  
Angry pro-EU Tory MEP obtains Irish passport in Brexit protest. Commendable for @CharlesTannock to speak his views. 
Brexit will be moved online, but will remain "a strong item in the mix".  
Will Brexit make Scotland a better place? 
So important for all Spectator's fanatics that complain that Remainers talk the economy down. Brexit screwed the UK economy - nothing else  
#Brexit is a Trojan Horse that will harm this country. Support the @LibDems call for a second referendum so we can overcome this menace. 
Brexit-induced Sterling’s depreciation has not led to a UK export boom—Devaluing your way to prosperity is not easy 
Brexit and Trump are a global phenomenon. They will dominate politics for the next decade.  
EU stands with Ireland in Brexit talks, Barnier assures Coveneyvia @IrishTimes 
Another Brexit argument crumbles.  
"Soft Brexit"  in a nutshell.  
Like so many problems Guy, if Brexit goes away the problem goes away. Brexit damages everyone.  
Public preference for Theresa May to stand down...This year: 35%Post-Brexit in 2019: 20%Not stand down: 28%via Survation 
WATCH - @Nigel_Farage: EU terrified that Brexit begins disintegration of their project.  
Guy Verhofstadt  says on 21 September there will be "an important intervention" from British PM, so Brexit round 4 pushed back one week. 
I wonder if @acgrayling is hoping nuclear war breaks out so he can blame Brexit just before the world ends: "See! I told you so...aaaaagh." 
Seeing this trend across the board. Brexit is massive in Britain because it could easily destroy us; rest of the world has bigger problems.  
"The First Minister must get behind permanent single market membership" - @HywelPlaidCymru  #Brexit 
Secure the future of wildlife this #NationalWildlifeDay: ask your MP to protect #nature  #Brexit #WithdrawalBill 
Cambridge Analytica, who worked for Trump & Brexit, also worked 4 Kenyan Pres in election overturned bcs of hacking. 
I blame Brexit...  
What a shocker! #Brexit Vote Leave director admits they won because they lied to the public  via @LondonEconomic 
President @KRLS: "Around the world a referendum is synonymous with democracy." 
I wrote something for @worldpressphoto about @1854's Portrait of Britain, August Sander, racists, and Brexit.  
It's quite inspiring to have our contempt for Brexit blamed for Brexit not going well.It's clear now that Brexit is theirs to lose. 
President @KRLS "A referendum can never be called a scam, it is just the opposite. It would be a scam to impede the holding of a referendum" 
What's her position on Brexit  
Sarwar's position on Corbyn's hard Brexit, leaving single market, NHS waiting times up 400% under Labour, PFI, etc.Eh, @BBCGaryR? #bbcgms 
Nigel not to be a 'ghastly remoaner' but how's brexit going? Is it going great? Is your well thought out plan going well? 
Has to be Brexit quote of the day, if anyone is compiling 'em  
This my friends is a fucking brilliant idea! #Brexit #BrexitMeansBrexit #UKIP  pic.twitter.com/D71AMMLVSa 
Brexit time pressure is Britain’s own fault  via @FT 
It is the arrogant EU elite, not Britain, that will get a lesson from Brexit  
Too many heavyweight  BBC "news people" - Neil, Humphrys & Robinson to name 3 - are actively pro Brexit - they're not interested in *truth*! 
READ | @TedMalloch_: 'There should be no halfway house, transition period or rule from European courts post-Brexit.'  
Brexiters when you ask them to explain the benefits of Brexit.  
So we sold all our best players and the manager lost the dressing room but we'll go down unless the supporters get behind the lads. #brexit 
Anti-Brexit @CharlesTannock is “ashamed to be British”. Conservative Party useless while it contains such people. 
May told to stop "bullish, macho, silly" threats to Tory MPs to fall in line over Brexit as Great Repeal Bill looms 
Damning letter of resignation from the Conservative Party. #Brexit  
Going to the People's March for EU on Saturday. Weather is said to be good. Better finish my placard! See you there #PeoplesMarch #Brexit  
Keir Starmer: Labour won't give PM 'blank cheque' over Brexit vote COME ON @UKLabour OPPOSE BREXIT ALTOGETHER!!  
BREXIT: For future reference, when the government say “will of the people” it’s these people they mean. Y’know, fucking idiots. pic.twitter.com/gqq3kTfohO 
It is the arrogant EU elite, not Britain, that will get a lesson from #Brexit, writes @asabenn #premium 
Former Brexit minister @DavidJonesMP tells me Tory MP @annasoubrymp should 'consider where her loyalty lies' over the EU withdrawal Bill 
"#Brexit isn't going to happen", Kurt Deketelaere, League of European #Research Universities. Let's hope he's right! @timeshighered #THEWAS 
1. A halfway competent government would have signed off the outline of the Brexit financial settlement by now. 
May and Davis criticise EU for attempting to influence UK voters by keeping them informed about Brexit process via 
Five of the busiest and most formidable names in Irish Politics will discuss Budget, Brexit and Better Politics on Sat the 9th!  #JFKSS 
This week Parliament starts debating #EUWithdrawalBill I am absolutely clear that not having Brexit is better than getting a bad Brexit 
Brexit: Theresa May wants to intensify pace of talks  
Anybody got a Brexit strategy? Asking for a bunch of idiots... 
For those loftily telling us it is our duty to get behind Brexit, here are some reasons why I for one will not.  
"Watching the UK government deal with Brexit is a lot like watching Aston Villa in decline"  
Britain stomps out of the EU and then demands a better deal with the EU than had by any other non-EU nation.#Brexit arrogance & conceit. 
How Arlene Foster helped nationalism find its teeth  V good piece. Add in Brexit to unionism self harm list too. 
Gonna be a big day at #Parliament & nationwide tomorrow #SODEM Stand Of Defiance against #Brexit - 10am start who's going?  #Remain 
Brexit, protecting the interests of the rich by sacrificing opportunities for the poor, made possible by a dishonest media owned by the rich 
Angry pro-EU Tory MEP obtains Irish passport in Brexit protest  
A healthy rich young woman is having a baby! Forget Brexit, Trump, North Korea: a woman is having a baby! I repeat: a woman is having a baby 
The .@Conservatives will get a huge shock if they think they can get away with blaming #Brexit on .@jeremycorbyn & .@UKLabour. 
Versus the awful Leave line, which boiled down to: "we will send brown people away" Brexit sickens me.  
In an effort to make Brexit look foolish, newspapers wrongly suggested that May's Japan talks weren't successful  
Sainsbury's CEO: "Food will rot at border after Brexit".Yes, no other country in the world has mastered the complexities of importing food. 
Siri, give me the stupidest take on Brexit and academia  
Memo to Prof Muscatelli: The Brexit "cliff edge" would place Britain in a trading position with the EU .... like most other nations. 
#Brexit -2 benefits:1. It has made #EU27 more united.2. We Remainers have come to treasure our dual nationality. 
Productive discussion today w/@simoncoveney. The issues specific to Ireland are a priority for the EU27 in #Brexit negotiations  
You know Brexit is in trouble when its proponents are resorting to taking credit for the continuation of the human reproductive system.  
Sorry, did I miss something? When did Farage become an expert on North Korea? He pathologically lies re: Brexit, so why trust him with this? 
So @AndrewMarr9 seems to think that "the majority of the country is now accepting Brexit". Is it true? Do you accept it?A simple poll: 
As Michel Barnier vows to "educate the UK" over Brexit, David Davis said to be thrilled with personalised hat.  
Farage strategy pretty transparent: 1. Demand govt do things he knows are impossible2. Label failure to do imposs things "Brexit betrayal"  
Brexit talks won't succeed.Theresa May adopted the language of the Leave campaign and failed to prepare the way for compromise  
Merkel will block Turkey joining EU. Another of Farages #Brexit myths busted. 
Tunisian Nobel Peace laureate supports Catalan referendum  . 
Referendum might have been over a year ago, but the govt should keep sight of why people voted leave when negotiating Brexit 
Soubry: No Tory Will Vote Against Brexit Bill  
Citizens, @The3Million and @BritishInEurope, could be biggest victims of Brexit, says EU Parliamt's @GuyVerhofstadt  
‘Patronising & bullying’ Barnier slammed in UK and EU over Brexit 'education' outburst. He´s a frog wanker.   
Min @simoncoveney meeting with @MichelBarnier  ahead of a series of meeting in Brussels for ongoing Brexit discussions  
We're with you Michel, keep defending the EU. Millions of us are fighting Brexit in Britain. 
Nick Clegg: Government 'wasted a year' on Brexit. No, they've wasted a generation and the future of our country!  
Brexit means.... Norway? Ukraine? Canada? Or WTO? Here are the options for #Brexit:  @DavidDavisMP @MichelBarnier 
Theresa May rules out any extension to Article 50 as Brexit talks grind to a halt.  
A year ago Britain was one of the EU's fast growing economies, now it's sputtering as the EU races ahead.#Brexit 
Shameful indeed & why is BBC pandering to hard Brexit section of population? Their duty is to report accurate objective honest information!  
End 'macho' Brexit posturing, Anna Soubry urges May  
‘I feel ashamed to be British’: Conservative MEP secures Irish citizenship following Brexit vote 
Selmayr, unelected CoS to Juncker, unelected Head of unelected EU Commission.It's to escape rule by people like them that we voted Brexit.  
.@Nigel_Farage "Brexit and Trump are a phenomenon that will dominate politics for the next decade or more"!   
Theresa May's spokeswoman says the UK is ready to intensify Brexit talks with the European Union but "nothing has been formally agreed" 
Christian Adams's take on back-to-school week and Brexit - political carton gallery in Putney  
Davis Stands Firm as EU Threatens to ‘Teach’ Britons the ‘Consequences’ of Brexit 
Britain was "stupid" to vote for Brexit, top EU official says  
There is, quite literally, not a single component part of his argument that is true. #Brexit  
Brexit is pandering to irrational fantasies. There is no "workable Brexit" to get behind. "Ladder to the Moon" Nonsense. Am now ex-Tory... 
Why didn't BBC report this? Liam Fox's deputy in charge of UK's post-Brexit trade policy resigned at weekend. You wouldn't have known...  
Patriotic Brit launches petition to name royal baby 'Brexit'  
We need to teach the EU a lesson: that sovereign peoples won’t be pushed around, says @Tom_Slater_  #Barnier #Brexit  
Good exchange w/@foreignoffice & @DFID_UK Min @AlistairBurtUK on #KRG- #UK Relations, #IDPs Situation,Post-#ISIS Stabilization & #Referendum  
Tory politician gets an Irish passport because he's 'ashamed to be British' after Brexit  He's not the only one. 
Is there another country where constitutional change on this scale could be introduced without a referendum? Essentially coup by executive 
Sadly we have people in positions of influence who seek to blind UK as to how Brexit means making us poorer on purpose. Thanks for trying. 
Is it treason if someone deliberately misleads a nation and is reckless as to whether that falsity is detrimental to them? #Brexit  
REVEALED: How British people can RISE UP and stop our government paying EU A SINGLE PENNY for Brexit  via @Your Bre 
2nd referendum would be held in circumstances of much greater public knowledge and infinitely more scrutiny. Informed consent the result.  
Great Brexit summary by @MESandbu - after wasting six months, UK government "edging towards the obvious'.  
UK construction:-growth falling-fewer workers being taken on-'flirting with recession'#Brexit Reality 
I said: #Brexit = occasion to explain single market benefits in all countries, incl my own. We do not want to  "educate" or "teach lessons". 
Why can't Brexiters understand that as we quitting the EU its politicians & officials are no longer accountable to Britain?#Brexit #Remain 
Shameful spin. This isn't what Barnier is saying. He's saying British public is woefully badly informed on impact of Brexit, which is true.  
With Andrew Marr & Andrew Neil both openly pro Brexit & Jeremy Vine enthusing about Farage on his show BBC may as well be owned by Murdoch 
#ROYALBABY name shortlist (boy):1) Flight Lt.2) Dodi3) Joffrey 4) Mycroft5) Ipality6) Will I Am7) Harryson8) Mohammed9) Brexit 
Brexit "caused by the impatience, highhandedness and inflexibility of European imperial ambition."Brilliant Times analysis by @NigelBiggar 
Former UKIP leader @Nigel_Farage makes the announcement of a new royal baby all about Brexit and "ghastly re-moaners"  
Evidently Farage believes this child is a Chosen One of Prophecy who will unite the realm under Brexit  
If they don't name the kid "Brexit" then what was the point of any of this? 
So now we know: These insufferable Eurocrats don't want a deal. They just want Brexit to fail  
Brexit supporting Labour and Tory MPs set to unite to stop Henry VIII powers in Great Repeal Bill row 
Tony is a Brexit troll. He would like to see Remainers shipped off to a gulag.  
If you want to reflect the true will of the electorate, have another referendum when people know what Brexit truly looks like.  
The Royals really must plan their shags to coincide with England going down the shit holeBrexit hits next year"Oh look a posh squirrel" 
Conservative politician who is "quite ashamed to be British" post-Brexit gets Irish passport  via @LondonEconomic 
Not as much as Brexit. 
Small businesses fear spike in cost of capital after Brexit  
Migrants have raised school standards in London, says Gove (conveniently after the #Brexit Referendum) #StopBrexit 
Read my article on why I believe a #Brexit extension not transition is urgently needed  
The Irish countryside is more popular than ever, thanks to Brexit  
Please explain how I can conspire to make Brexit more difficult and costly; I don't want to miss any opportunities to oppose this lunacy. 
Great news, that's another marriage alliance Britain can offer in post-Brexit trade negotiations.  
Saenz de Santamaria, Spain's VP, ready to use the police to withdraw ballotboxes from the 1-O referendum in Catalonia.  
LISTEN: Soubry: No Tory Will Vote Against Brexit Bill  
Not. Everything. Is. About. Brexit.  
A referendum called by Conservatives. A referendum won on a pack of lies by Conservatives/UKIP.Whose fault is it? Oh, Corbyn.  
Today's @Telegraph leader: Labour needs to be honest over Brexit  
Tory politician gets an Irish passport because he's 'ashamed to be British' after Brexit  
Clegg: Government 'wasted year' on Brexit  
New at @JackofKent - how criticising UK’s Brexit difficulties is like following a crap football team 
This morning @nick_clegg demolished David Davis' argument about making 'progress' in Brexit talks   
WSJ City: North Korea test hits stocks, true Brexit red line, stars align for Europe's banks  
Giving the public a vote on the outcome, with the option of an ‘exit from Brexit’ may seem increasingly attractive  
Getting pissed off with the EU who the hell do they think they are ? Sooner we are out the better #brexit  
- Merkel performs in TV debate- Brexit returned to EU parliament- Stocks hit by NK testsRead the Daily Briefing:  
The classic #Brexit mentality - loudly blame someone else, never accept responsibility. #StopBrexit 
Tories on the verge of meltdown as Senior MPs threaten Autumn leadership challenge over hard Brexit  
In the single market, UK would remain liable for huge annual payments, European Court jurisdiction & freedom of movement.That isn't #Brexit 
Back to the good old days of tinned fruit then? Brexit truly is stark barking raving bonkers mad.  
50 Brexit impact studies Davis refuses to publish are the people's property, not the government's. We have an absolute right to see them. 
I vote for @afneil to remain.... one of the very best interviewers we have in Brexit Britain  
Londra'dan #Kerkük'te Referanduma Hayır.================From London, a protest against the Referendum in the #Turkmen city of #Kirkuk. 
Nick Clegg on Brexit talks: "It's a bit like staring at an empty building site & saying we've made progress because we've made a cup of tea" 
NEWS! UK Brexit team furious as EU threatens to keep British people dangerously well-informed  
"It's like staring at an empty building site and saying we've made progress because we've made a cup of tea."Nick Clegg on Brexit #r4today 
The only benefit of the referendum is that support in the EU has grown stronger and Brits are actually discovering benefits and EU pride.  
Barnier says Brexit must be "educational" for the UK.Certainly will be. We'll be free to grow without the constraints of EU bureaucracy! 
Remainers need to get over the disaster that is Brexit but you can't get over man advertising crisps. Grow up. 
The government is "allowing their immigration strategy to dictate their economic strategy" for Brexit, says Barry Gardiner #r4today 
Tory v Labour on #Brexit.  Wishful thinking, delusion, confusion and arrogance v Wishful thinking, delusion, confusion and timidity #r4today 
Poorest will gain most under Brexit, says Labour report  via @telegraphnews 
I still can't see advantage in #brexit. We seem to be demanding things we already enjoy with punitive costs. Political and economic suicide. 
UK approach to Brexit is like trashing a jigsaw puzzle that took 40yrs to make. Only to pick up the same pieces and try to make it again.  
Days since the referendum I haven't been pissed off by Brexit: ZERO 
This is a decisive week in Catalonia. Catalan parliament will vote in favour of the referendum law and the "transition to independence" law. 
You said Brexit would be simple and cost nothing. It's not a conspiracy to point out that you lied.  
Blaming Brexit negotiation failures on Remain voters is like blaming a thunderstorm on umbrellas. 
The discourse around the Brexit divorce bill is v odd in this country. It's normally discussed as some sort of "punishment" notion or spite. 
EU's Barnier: We intend to teach Brits what Brexit means. Very big of ya Michel but we already know! #Independence  
Brexit latest: People who don't know much about the ramifications of leaving the EU furious at suggestion that more knowledge would be good. 
Brexit talks: Michel Barnier looks like a grown-up. David Davis looks like a small boy. We're going to come very poorly out of this. 
British people must be "educated" about the cost of Brexit, Michel Barnier reportedly says  
We Brits are fully-briefed on Brexit Mr Barnier. If anyone needs a lesson, it's YOU. 
Sainsbury’s CEO warns food could be left rotting at the UK border after Brexit  
Anything disrupting food supply chains after Brexit would be 'detrimental' to fresh produce, warns Sainsbury’s CEO   
I cannot see how "when people voted in the referendum they voted to leave the single market" is either true or a good position for Labour. 
Sky reporter says a consequence of direct rule is no one in NI corner for Brexit talks. Join the club as DD only talking for Little England. 
A bit of good news for a change. Government aims to protect science to an extent from brexit damage. Hope this signals a wider shift in tone  
The benefits of Brexit, it seems, are inevitable but only if people stop asking awkward questions and slavishly support it. Uh-huh. 
Labour freely moves to flip-flop on BrexitStarmer "It's development of policy"Gives a whole new to meaning to'Free movement of Labour'...  
If Brexit can be crippled by the mere application of critical scrutiny then that tells you everything you need to know.  
Yet to see a single Brexit MEP stand down and relinquish their salary and expenses now that they have "won" 
Brexit battles have even ruined @walkers_crisps - clearly the greatest but now just make me think about @GaryLineker moaning about Brexit 
If all the money spent on Brexit were to be spent on social housing we would solve the housing crisis. Tory pty comes b4 2 million families 
Well, Labour had a coherent Brexit stance for a few days. Then Barry Gardiner was interviewed on #r4todayFFS. What is he on about? 
Barnier is right, a reality check is long overdue. The Brexit fantasies peddled to the British people must end.  
This "bullish, macho" style of government over Brexit has got to stop says Conservative MP @Anna_Soubry #r4today 
A response to that "EU is being mean, so we were right to leave" line.#Brexit #StopBrexitHour#MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #EU 
We won't give the government a blank cheque on Brexit bills when so many of our hard won rights at work could be at stake. 
While #brexit doesnt even get mentioned,candidates vying with each other on who bashes #Turkey most effectively. Just sayin' #GermanyDecides 
ICYM @nick_clegg in @FT yesterday: a summer of posturing has done little to advance Brexit.  
#honestpoll With labour splitting over #brexit, is it time for a new leader? Pls RT for inclusivity. Comments welcome.#corbyn #labour 
After #Brexit (incl leaving the Single Market) we will be free to enter into global trade deals as well as with #EU 
The idea that those behind #Brexit weren't part of 'the elite' is the biggest con of all.  
Try to get it in your head Suzanne that you and you alone own Brexit not those of us who warned of the consequences.  
Brexit Britain sidelined as Theresa May not invited to migration crisis summit  
Brexit supporter or not, Tory capitalists will see profit in chaos. A bonfire of rights will bulge their pockets #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
A Call for Referéndum, is not a call for War. @nigeria State @AsoRock.Our peacefull Rally in Málaga-Spain Foto. @NkirukaNistoran @Amaka_Ekwo 
In Japan, Brexit is considered a provincial matter  
Brexit is just too damn difficult. Much easier to have 27 other countries run our country instead.  
"No Brexit is better than a bad Brexit" & Labour should add this option to their playbook says @eloisetodd  
With a good Brexit ahead, there will be more of this to come.  
Utter nonsense. Nobody knew what it actually meant in the referendum and they still dont know now. Voted to take huge risk with our future 
Post-Brexit rules could leave food rotting at UK border, says Sainsbury's chief  
In less than a month, Kurds across northern Iraq are slated to vote in a referendum on independence.  
UK says defense commitment in Nordic and Baltic states won't waver after Brexit  
Poorest will gain most under Brexit, says Labour report  via @telegraphnews 
After "Brexit," the queen and other members of the royal family might lose substantial E.U. farm subsidies  
*Brexit Explained*  
Should know better, should also ask himself why public are so badly informed on Brexit.Feels like it's all a game to the BBC 
5) informing public of #Brexit reality is not "teaching a lesson". It's doing Nick's job, because he can't or won't 
3) but instead of recognizing responsibility for failing to inform public on #Brexit,Nick thinks it's appropriate to misrepresent as well 
So the German general election hasn't mentioned Brexit. Pretty much like the UK one then. 
Zelaya attacked press freedom, judicial independence and free elections. The coup was provoked because he forced a rigged referendum that... 
On Planet Tory they are so deluded by the notion that the empire will return after Brexit even George Osborne thinks they're space cadets  
the air is clear my breath is fresh acne is extinct brexit never happened eyebrows on fleek and its all thanks to HER#Her1MPreordersParty 
Not what he said. You know it. Significant difference between being educated on what Brexit means and "taught a lesson." Shoddy reporting.  
I'm an electrician from York, every day I try to tie  David Davis shoe laces together so he can't make Brexit negotiations. #imCommited 
Merkel and Schultz went head to head for 90 minutes on primetime TV, and neither mentioned Brexit once. The EU is already moving on. 
This is outrageously bad journalism. He was saying that people in the UK do not fully understand the consequences of #brexit and he's right.  
You can't seriously be blaming the Remainers for the fact that those supporting Brexit had absolutely no plan for it? 
Been there done that had a referendum... 52/48 think we won....  
I'm baffled as to why anyone concerned about the poor and struggling in the UK would do anything other than fight Brexit tooth and nail 
UK says defense commitment in Nordic and Baltic states won't waver after Brexit  
Poorest households will be biggest gainers from Brexit.No wonder Labour/LibDem so called "progressives" oppose it.. 
No, he didn't. Inaccurate, unhelpful. Playing to the #brexit gallery?  
If only someone had made a commitment abt a £350m extra boost to the NHS. And won a vote on that. #Brexit  
This is really bad news. #brexit  
Brexit only really hurts Britain.  
Wrong lessons. Reason German pols aren't debating Brexit is bc there's nothing for them to debate. EU has clear negotiating mandate. 1/  
Theresa May's Brexit plans ridiculed as 'foolish' by former government legal chief  
*Brexit Explained*  
Brussels demands Britain pays for BEAR breeding as part of its £90billion Brexit bill 
Support this: Labour's new plan for Brexit gives hope that we might not leave the EU @labouruk @keir_starmer 
Brexit chief Davis hits out at ‘silly’ EU negotiation tactics  
So when Farage talked of violence as the next step he was exploiting a terrorist threat for political advantage. #Brexit  /3  
Morton Morland on our Brexit negotiating team - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Project Fear, you say?This is HM Treasury's own paper on likely outcomes of Brexit, published May 2016. Tell me which part they got wrong  
Why are politicians so quiet about pro-#Brexit terrorist threats such as those against Gina Miller? #StopBrexit /1 
Trying to reconcile my anger over Brexit. I can't, how can Farage, May and others take away my EU citizenship? It can't be legal can it? 
John Curtice on @BeyondBorders__ panel on #Brexit  that I took part in:"I detect a very slight shift in public opinion toward: #Remain." 
Here's a front page to wake up and notice. A reminder of so much at stake - no time for petty party politics. #Brexit  
#Liberals & #Rhinos easily critize the president, but offer no solutions. The 2018 Elections must be a referendum on #DrainTheSwamp. 
August - a month where so much, yet so strikingly little happened in Brexit terms. Britain seems to be jogging on the spot, as time ticks. 
So Angela Merkel thinks Turkey will never become a member of the EU. Another lie perpetrated by Farage and Johnson to get a Brexit vote. 
How many by-passes, schools and other pet projects is it going to cost to get Tory MPs to vote for Brexit? 
May's pitch at the Tory conference is going to have to be better than 'I know I'm crap, I know Brexit is crap, but Corbyn's even more crap.' 
If your Q is: why *would* #Brexit feature in  #TVduell… Well the 2022  World Cup in Qatar was debated. Brexit less significant than that 
Worth remembering in this context that Brexit deal must be agreed by every EU member state. Ireland might have view on this.  
Brexit Britain sidelined as Theresa May not invited to migration crisis summit  
Another plug for the most read politician blogger. As we head 4 the Brexit iceberg there's always the Scots lifeboat  
Watching Germany's TV "debate" tonight was one of the most depressing political experiences of my life. And I covered Brexit. 
Tories on the verge of meltdown as Senior MPs threaten Autumn leadership challenge over hard Brexit  
If Corbyn had stepped down in time there would have been a Labour government & no Brexit.  
What the brexiters seem to underestimate: that the EU's priority is the EU - not brexit island.  
"The idea that somehow the British people were misinformed about Brexit is absolute nonsense" ~ IBS  
Only a masochist, would want to stay in EU now. Brexit: UK to be 'educated' about consequences, says Barnier.  
Britain's Brexit strategy is being driven by the one red line that still matters: the ability to do FTAs. My latest  
Diminished tax revenue due to Brexit means much less money for the NHS #Fact 
Another thing we owe to Trump & Brexit: "Really, you mean my country and its government and opposition are a bit boring? Great!"#tvduell 
UK universities need assurances over Brexit now 
I warned Jeremy Corbyn about Brexit - now Labour must regain its radicalism, @yanisvaroufakis tells the NS 
Tomorrow @ScotNational Rotten Brexit: Supermarket chief warns of fresh food rotting in transit due to border delays  
TFW the negotiator on the other side of Brexit does a better job of opposing the governments actions than the official opposition does.  
I'd like to apologise to Harry. I mistook him for a journalist. Turns out he's just a mouthpiece for shitbag UKIP/Brexit fringe loons.  
Those who say frittering away £100bn on HS2, £13bn a year on foreign aid, £50bn on a Brexit bill is OK....Must remember: it's borrowed. 
War criminal "Tony Blair has no authority to speak for Britain" says @georgegalloway#Brexit  
No mention at all of Brexit in German election Chancellor debate Merkel & Schulz...positions  not that different, but still HT @jonworth 
Just for the record. In the 97 min #tvduell neither Merkel or Schulz mentioned #Brexit, but EU and its future role frequently. 
Britain's poorest families will be £2000 better off per year due to Brexit as rent & groceries set to topple..Brexit will improve the UK  
#TVduell #GermanyDecides. Not a single mention of #Brexit. Not one. In 95 mins debate. That’s how important you are in the  election, UK. 
BBC News - Brexit: UK to be 'educated' about consequences, says Barnier  Arrogance personified #Barnier 
Dr.John Danfulani stand with the people of Biafra & support their quest for a referendum.@UNHumanRights@antonioguterres@ecowas_cedeao 
A clean Brexit will help the poor. Read our new joint report from @LeaveMnsLeave, @labourleave and @Econs4FreeTrade: 
No Brexit is better than any Brexit. 
Brexit Secretary David Davis says the EU is playing 'time against money' in Brexit talks  
Barnier is right. The Brexit elite and I'm afraid to say many old colleagues misled the country on purpose. 
Imagine how many Jeremy would have behind him if he opposed Brexit  
We had a national referendum, you gargantuan buffoon. The decision was not party political  
Long Merkel-Schulz discussion of road tolls & Dieselgate. Weirdly no mention of German carmakers panicking because of Brexit. #tvduell 
Thread. You know the brexiteers blaming Remainers for the fact that brexit's a shitshow? That's Adonis on higher education.  
I am European, I have a British passport. I object to my rights in EU being diminished by #Brexit.#StopBrexit 
What result did you like best? #Conservatives #TheresaMay #brexit If none, do not vote but feel free to comment.Retweet & Vote #yourvoice 
Still supporting Brexit on Twitter is like admitting you're an idiot.  
#AwfullyBritishLovesongsBrexit up is hard to do 
Voting for Brexit is a bit like 17,410,742 people falling for an internet get-rich-quick scam.  
...No one competent in House of Commons to defend Brexit for a long time.  
Watching the Merkel-Schultz debate. Serious leaders, serious media, serious debate, serious country. No mention Brexit yet 
Barnier stated that UK needed education on what brexit will actually mean. He's right because politicians & journalists failing to do so 
The Government is hiding 50 secret studies on Brexit. WHY!?Demand that they are published.  
Brilliant satire #IndiaPartition #Brexit  
Thanks for the lecture on effective and logical political systems, from the land of Brexit and Theresa May holding on by a thread. 
In Brexit talks, the U.K. insists on the ability to strike its own trade deals. Enter the friction  
Kicking the can down the road isn't a strategy. Public need a vote on final deal with option to exit from Brexit  
Oooh. Articles starting to appear now asking the question of who to blame if brexit falls apart. If? Surely 'when'  x 
Nicola Jennings on Theresa May and the Brexit divorce bill – cartoon  
WATCH: Gina Miller gets DESTROYED on Sky News for saying Britain should PAY BREXIT BILL  via @Your Brexit 
Barnier has used this kind of language many times. He means Brexit should be used to educate people about benefits of EU. No great drama.  
This could get nasty. EU's chief Brexit negotiator says Britain needs to be taught a lesson ...   
In a politically sane country, a €60bn+ divorce bill - unmentioned in the referendum campaign - should lead govt to announce new referendum 
Fabulous question. Shows how unreasonable & desperate & politically obdurate the EU is. We did the right thing voting for #Brexit  
Why Brexit may not mean Brexit after all  
No Brexit is better than a bad Brexit. No messing about now, let's just get on with it & #StopBrexit  
#stopbrexithour And this is what we're squabbling over! This tiny amount of Govt spending. #Brexit has no sense of proportion.  
Flight bookings cd be pulled months before Brexit: early, tangible alert to ppl that Brexit has real consequences 
They've made UK the 'LAUGHING STOCK' of EU' Lefty Owen Jones trashes UK Brexit team stance. Get back in your Pram!  
Patrick Blower on Labour Tory battle over Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Will also pay for #Brexit and the ramifications !  
Meanwhile, at the Brexit department  
Can't wait for England, the country that's forced us all to pay a £50bn Brexit bill, to lecture Scotland about her finances. 
Thought it had an extra £350m every week since Brexit?  
Your employment rights could be put at risk through Brexit. Here’s why | Frances O’Grady  
Are you on drugs?In what universe has BBC News ever been pro Brexit?  
People's March 4EU, 9th September 2017, London UK. Together we can stop Brexit  @Tony_Robinson @GaryLineker Please RT 
This is basically it.Don't blame the #EU. They didn't tell  UK to #Leave, nor give a deadline.#FalseFlag#Brexit  
SHARE: Jonathan Pie reports on the The #Brexit Problem Bad Language alert, its justified!DD hasn't got a F#ucking clue! @JonathanPieNews pic.twitter.com/jV10dIsvCd 
."Britain is struggling under the weight of the Brexit vote, shackled to its damaging consequences.". 
A year on & @JonathanPieNews has no idea what our Brexit plan. The problem is, neither has anyone else. Not a soul  
If you're an MP, Lab, Tory, or other & you honestly believe Brexit is so bad for UK, then you must start voting accordingly now- or resign. 
*Brexit Explained*  
In that case @DavidDavisMP, release the 50 Brexit impact studies. Let the people decide if it's a vision or a fantasy.. #StopBrexitHour 
16 more months of this bollocks from May, Davis, Fox & Boris & we'll be into 2019 facing national disaster.325 MPs will have 2 'Stop Brexit' 
Former Bank of Eng official Adam Posen sets out clearly the impact of Brexit to the UK Economy  via @YouTube 
If @afneil is so invested in #brexit then fine, but can we have neutral commentators on the BBC please? 
This is the week that no plan #Brexit was exposedIt's simply unacceptable for a BBC lead political commentator to attempt to stifle debate  
I am not a fan of the new "the only problem with Brexit is people saying there's a problem with Brexit" column genre. 
'Not a single person who told us #Brexit would turn out fine was able to say why. Most common answer: 'it just will'. Astonishing.  
BBC would immediately put @bbcquestiontime on air with a lefty-liberal audience to discuss why #Brexit was to blame.  
Excellent on the government and Brexit, from @MatthewdAncona  
How well/badly are Government doing with the BREXIT negotiations? Well 25%Badly 55%YouGov S Times poll 
If UKIP MPs had been elected last June in sufficient numbers to hold the balance of power Brexit would now look at lot different. Retweet 
Evening @DavidDavisMP. Has to be said, great job trying to destroy Brexit from within! Join us for #StopBrexitHour? 
Brexit Britain EXCLUDED by Germany and France from IMMIGRATION summit in Paris  
Mark Thompson: ‘A second Brexit referendum risks seeming like a stab in the back by the elite’  
If Brexit is so great and you believe in democracy like @Nigel_Farage then you shouldn't have a problem with a vote on the deal. #StopBrexit 
EU negotiator Michel Barnier says he'll use Brexit to “teach the British people and others what leaving the EU means”...  
Your employment rights could be put at risk through Brexit. Here’s why | Frances O’Grady  
All politicians must remember we are all going to be affected by Brexit. We must all be represented. Democracy for all, not just the few. 
How chocolate exposes Brexit trade risks   
I apologize for all the times I put David Davis off during #Brexit  negotiationsI'm also sorry for feeding all his prep work to the dog  
War hero, 91, left bloodied and bruised after confronting SCHOOLGIRL yobs who were throwing apples at his house 
Why are the Brexit talks stalling? Because the government doesn't know what it wants, says @stephenkb  
The funny thing is that Brexit has made me realise how crooked Britain is, not the EU. 
It is a fantasy that anyone thought Brexit would be easy. However it would be a hell of a lot easier were it not for negativity of Remoaners  
And by admitting they were wrong to hold the referendum, they can then move on and admit that what we voted for cannot be done. 
the Beeb has been accused of being both pro remain and now pro Brexit. It is neither. False accusations of bias do not help.  
What they should say is. We are very sorry. We offered you a sloppy referendum with no thought of how to execute it. 
Tories on the verge of meltdown as Senior MPs threaten Autumn leadership challenge over hard Brexit 
No no deal Brexit No Corbyn Brexit No May BrexitNo soft BrexitNo hard BrexitNo transitional BrexitNo Brexit of any kind #StopBrexit 
This is excellent, by @MatthewdAncona.  A sensible insight into the politics of Brexit in almost every sentence.  
This is why if we do not leave the Single Market, Brexit will NOT be #Brexit and the people #EUReferendum will be betrayed. 
Britain's aerospace sector could be priced out after Brexit  
"Labour are laughing at us over Brexit. They are taking us for fools," says @StigAbell  
12) ultimately that's all that matters, our Brexit leaders put the UK at risk via a massive gamble that 27 nations would change their mind. 
Better than yr last tweet calling me Quisling. But mistake is for BBC to give up impartiality bec it thinks Brexit a done deal. It isn't.  
Poorest will gain most under Brexit, says Labour report #premium 
WELCOME TO THE.... #Brexit CIRCUS!  guaranteed hilarity for all those who still have a sense of humour left! #BrexitShambles 
8) if the EU really are as Davis says, then Brexit leaders should have said "we hope we'll get a deal, but we may not, vote accordingly" 
Campaign to rejoin. That is entirely democratic. 'Stopping Brexit' isn't. This is a fairly straightforward idea. 
6) our Brexit leaders are supposed to act in the national interest, not like they're playing pocker (badly) 
#marr I wouldn't want that thick and lazy idiot David Davis negotiating me out of a phone contract, let alone Brexit.  
'Brexit Broadcasting News' (BBC presenter, 2017)  
Flint: Labour must accept Brexit and move on  
Just read a Scottish Tweet suggesting #Brexit was like being handcuffed to the village idiot ......brilliant 
" defeat of complex truth in the face of simple lies".  Sums up not only Brexit but Left and right wing populism 
Despite what the Remainers say, Japan will be working towards a trade deal with Brexit Britain.  
Report: Brexit will be biggest boost for the poorest households  
Labour's new plan for Brexit gives hope that we might not leave the EU after all  
Brexit news: EU refuses to talk about future all they care about is the MONEY, @DavidDavisMP  
Hilarious that Andrew Adonis genuinely thinks BBC news output is pro Brexit. Delusional doesn't even cover it.  
Brexit will be an education for UK says EU's lead negotiator  
He doesn't do his job impartially. He is systematically pro-Brexit. That isn't acceptable while Brexit is so bitterly contentious.  
Keir Starmer tells @marrshow Labour's latest change on Brexit is a 'new development'. Sounds like another U-turn to me 
Note to brexiters:You wanted Brexit,so have the balls to accept the consequences & stop whining that EU are doing what they said they would  
Where have all our great politicians gone?Please wake up Labour leadership, others can't stop this looming Brexit disaster on their own.  
There was a debate before the referendum. You lost. Get over it. 
The Brexit Problem:  via @YouTube 
Trade Minister who promised #brexit could lead Britain to 'second golden age' resigns.    
.@theresa_may is sounding more and more like a fascist dictator every day. There can be no good to come of #Brexit.   
Question for @theresa_may: when do you see a return on the billions you've spent on Brexit? How many years after we're all dead?Never?When? 
Brexit Twitter is a stream of eminent, usually sensible people losing the plot.  
and I'm calling for your removal as Chair, National Infrastructure Commission because of your anti-Brexit bias, see how it works. 
I'm not calling for that. A v partisan Brexiteer shd not be a principal BBC politics interviewer while Brexit is still bitterly contested 
Japan has grave doubts about Brexit, an ex-diplomat said as Theresa May visited Tokyo  
If this results in anything then expect A LOT of letters going in about all those presenters who fail to hide their derision for Brexit.  
Labor has no credibility on the Brexit issue. They say one thing and do another and they played the anti immigrant card where it suited them  
Our latest report warns soft Brexit would "leave us worse off and in danger of remaining in the EU in all but name”  
When we Brexit, we'll still be in:WTOG7G20OECDFSBNATOUNSCUNEPUNECEISOILOCodexInterpolFive EyesCommonwealthCouncil of Europe 
I don't agree with Allie on getting on with Brexit, but if she ever corrects me on trade, take her word over mine. Thread ->  
'Theresa May is a great Prime Minister,' says David Davis on #MarrThis imbecile is leading Brexit negotiations. 
Worrying weekend Press stories that 'no deal' #Brexit is no big deal& that Single Mkt not so important. Wd be disaster for jobs&business 
Cold War? Not in the UK. Russian billionaires and laundered cash are welcome, especially after Brexit. My piece. 
You want to understand identities and Brexit? Just look at all this   
Keir Starmer: Labour won't give PM 'blank cheque' over Brexit vote  
Without meaningless terms like 'sovereignty' can someone please tell me a single positive thing that is guaranteed to come out of #Brexit ? 
I hear David Davis has been going round hospitals putting up banners that say Brexit will give us £350m pw to spend on new buses. Cushty. 
Brexit o "the defeat of “complex truth in the face of simple lies”. So much for referendums! 
Me on @LBC at 3pm: another day of contradiction over Brexit. We need an election with all parties owning up to where they stand, don't we? 
Fighting #Brexit is like herding cats: Leavers say they want 'sovereignty', but most can't describe it or say how it will benefit us! #ARGH! 
felt were insufficiently supportive of Brexit. Now, months later, having given away leverage & started the countdown, he realises the exact 
The most prescient sentence in @adamboultonSKY's superb Sunday Times column.IMHI Brexit was always an internal Tory n-mare but now it's ours  
Quote of the Day#Brexit  
'What are they afraid of?' Marr attacks EU Brexit negotiators for 'disdain' towards UK  
For months after the referendum, critics advised govt to aim for long EEA transition so it could neutralise the EU's time advantage. 
Tories: of course we can afford £50bn Brexit bill.Also Tories: we must cut public sector pay to save £1.5 billion a year. 
Future generations will envy how we watched Trump and Brexit unfold in real time. 
PM's self-indulgent Cabinet critics told to call off their plotting, she must see Brexit through & we don't want Corbyn given any leeway. 
If magic £50b for Brexit has been foundWhy are @Conservatives telling us NHS unaffordable?Only a fraction of that is needed to stop crisis 
But it's apparently fine if the Conservatives play politics with Brexit  
I see we've entered the Nicolson-Wishart stage of Brexit "fun"  
The issue is many believe the referendum was flawed and there has been a shift in public opinion we must respect that#stop Brexit #love uk 
Grimsby was #1 global fishing port in 1973. Just 15 UK trawlers use the port now. Brexit will trigger 100,000 fisheries jobs across the UK. 
I'm enjoying #DavidDavis delivering Brexit. Like a fat bloke heckling from the terraces being handed a shirt and invited onto the pitch 
Can someone ANYONE give me some comfort that I can have some CONFIDENCE in how *dilettante Davis* is handling the #Brexit negotiations NO ? 
Manchester Airport would be 'devastated if no post-Brexit aviation deal is struck soon'  
People complaining of #Brexit "Time Pressures" remember Corbyn wanted to trigger Article 50 immediately post ref..would leave only 9mths now 
@GuyVerhofstadt It is also demonstrably untrue - only 37% actually voted for the lunacy of "brexit" -  and only in a non-binding vote 
Assume @BBC audience 48%/52%.Do we ban all @BBCPolitics #Brexit commentary or just the presenters you don't like? 
Of course I am unlike people who are campaigning for money, I want the UK to be a better place for all our children#stop lies#No Brexit 
UK should have been educated about the various scenarios & consequences of voting Leave BEFORE the EU Referendum.What a mess!  
Brexit may deprive British shoppers of Spanish oranges and Irish beef, retailers say  
This is from EU's deputy chief Brexit negotiator.  
As David Davis says they're not worried about Brexit time pressure, what do you think the government's plan is now? #marr 
All the #citizensrights EU citizens in the UK are set to lose after #Brexit 
Brexit will be boost for the economy and help the poorest in UK society. Win win. 
MPs, A no-deal Brexit is now a very real possibility. Please don't consent to it. Please don't support the EUW Bill  
Those pesky Remoaners...BBC resident kipper @afneil gives up all pretence of impartiality, embraces Tinkerbelle #brexit   
Poorest will gain most under Brexit, says Labour report  via @telegraphnews 
My piece in today's @Independent: Labour's new plan for Brexit gives hope that we might not leave the EU after all  
IPOB Referendum Rally In Malaga, Spain Today (Photos, Video)  
.@CarolineFlintMP in today's @Telegraph calls on her Labour colleagues not to "take a wrecking ball to the Brexit Bill"  
Brexit will encourage Jaguar Land Rover and others to source component suppliers in the UK. Nissan has ALREADY decided to double its to 80%. 
Millions will benefit from Brexit as UK-owned and UK-based companies will be permitted to prioritise the employment of British residents. 
Remainers are so invested in the failure of Brexit they automatically side with the EU, however absurd its position  
Brexit is NOT just about exiting the EU. It's also about our opportunity to seal free trade deals with 38 non-EU countries. 
We hope Labour are listening to @CarolineFlintMP - they should not be playing politics with Brexit and the future of the UK  
We don't need to get behind Tories making Brexit work for the rich by removing workers rights, lowering wages, removing consumer protection.  
We signed up for the London marathon before doing any training, now race day is coming and we're annoyed about the time pressure. #Brexit 
The great missing story of Brexit is when Tory critics will actually start doing something about it. 
Interesting that @DavidDavisMP's version of Brexit impasse made simple is "We control the money. They control the time. We both need trade"  
Everyone's voice was heard.  We had a referendum.  We voted to LEAVE.  Largest vote in the UK for anything, ever.  We are LEAVING the EU.  
Labour's new plan for Brexit gives hope that we might not leave the EU after all  
Really helpful from @MollyMEP on calculation of EU #Brexit bill  
'@georgegalloway: For Blair to interfere and meet with Juncker during Brexit negotiations is sheer fifth columnism.  
Theresa May denies she has agreed to a £50bn Brexit divorce bill. Then again she insisted there would be no snap election. #MayLies 
Brexit: UK to be 'educated' about consequences, says Barnier  
The one Brexit thing UK had complete control over was triggering Article 50 two year period.UK placed self under time pressure, not EU.  
.@DamianGreen in @Telegraph writes that no matter how you voted at the referendum we need to get behind making Brexit work for everyone  
Tories agree to £50bn Brexit divorce bill. The same Tories who say we had no choice but to hit disabled ppl with £28.3 billion cuts. 
For those who object to a Brexit bill, how would you like it if Scotland f**ked off from UK leaving its debts behind? 
‘Leave now and then tell EU how Brexit will work!’ MEP urges UK to stop 'begging' Brussels  
Flint: Labour Colleagues Trying to Disrupt Brexit  
If May agrees a £50bn Brexit payment, that works out at 142.8 weeks' (or 2.75 years) pretend NHS payments the UK population were promised.  
Little by little, Tory Brexit ministers are paving the way to admitting UK will be paying a very significant divorce bill!  
Do you feel you understand how German nationalism in the 1930's happened having seen Brexit nationalism? 
The longer Brexit stays up in the air, the higher the risk flights will be grounded | Business leader  
Maybe you missed it, but we had a referendum on leaving the EU (not Europe as that would be silly) last year. 
This tongue-in-cheek letter is going viral  #Brexit 
Our latest report shows that Britain’s poorest families will be £2,288 a year better off ‘thanks to Brexit  
"How are we going to pay the £50bn Brexit divorce bill?"Me:   
Convicted fraudster and ex-MP Denis MacShane campaigning against Brexit in Brixton yesterday.  
UK minister: EU commission criticism of Brexit talks was 'silly'  
Mathira MP Rigathi Gachagua says Jubilee Party MPs will push for a referendum in order to trim the powers of Judiciary. #Decision2017 
Parliament returns this week and we are set to progress this clueless, disastrous Brexit self harm. New on my blog.  
Not really Brexit gloom then is it... 
In trumpeting Brexit fantasies, May & Davis have boxed the UK in. When the music stops the truth will be deafening. 
We Remainers are patriots who will fight tooth & nail against the greedy, cynical self-serving elite trying to foist #Brexit on Britain. 
I've Bankrupted the UK Economy, Lost AAA Rating, Caused race hatred, and now off to live in France ... Thanks UKIP Morons #brexit  
'A transitional period is necessary as negotiations will not be complete by March 2019' says Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer 
Labour's had more positions on Brexit so far than a teenage bloke desperate to show it's not his first time 
The Europe Commission has made itself look "silly" for criticising Brexit negotiations says Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP 
“ The #fool doth think he is wise, ...” #ShakespeareSunday#DavidDavis#marr#ToriesOut#Brexit 
Why are corrupt billionaires called "tycoons" or "philanthropists" in UK & US, but called Oligarchs everywhere else?No "£50bn Brexit"#marr 
I look forward to the day when I don't have to hear the word Brexit & don't have to see the faces of these losers now supposedly in charge. 
'@CarolineFlintMP: Labour should accept Brexit and move on. Will of the people must be respected!  
Families on 60% of median income will gain £44 a week because of Brexit  
Ten own goals from the UK's Brexit position papers  
Serious question to Brexit fans: The economy is tanking, falling tax take meaning NHS cuts & diseased meat...  
“We have to come up with an arrangement that reflects the outcome of the vote,” says @Keir_Starmer, explaining Labour’s Brexit U-turn  
A possible Tory rebellion over Brexit is leaving Theresa May panicking:  
Brexit is being betrayed! By Labour and some Tories. Only decisive action will make it happen. Read my Exit Plan  
#Brexit is emphatically NOT the #WillofthePeople. It is the mad plan of a minority. 17.5M voted Leave, 29.1M of electorate didn't. FACT! 
A Freedom of Information request submitted by @MollyMEP is asking for the details on Brexit's impact on the NHS  
Brexit talks: David Davis accuses EU of playing 'time against money'  
UPDATE: Over 10,000 people have asked the Government to release the hidden Brexit studies! Sign the petition here:  
The UK created the #Brexit "time pressure" - as Tories & Corbyn's Labour rushed to trigger Article 50 with zero plan of what to do next!!  
Thread. If Brexit = principles trumping temp economics, why would same advocates expect EU to put temp economics over their own principles?  
We need to keep Europe strong to avoid the horrors of conflict and war. Stop #brexit. Let's not live in a crazy time again.  
David Davis on Marr saying EU playing 'time and money' against Brexit negotiations. Yes, so why doesn't he tell them ZERO and move on! 
No one can "make a success of #Brexit" Prime Minister - the most that can be done is mitigate some of the damage   
BREXIT: Theresa May unveils plans to save the £350m a week we don’t actually pay to the EU by actually paying £560m a week to the EU.  
German MPs often ask if there's a secret plan. They can't believe the UK Government Brexit negotiators are as clueless as they seem.  
Are Labour helping or hindering Brexit? Watch the first Sunday show from @Nigel_Farage on LBC live #FarageOnLBC 
.@DavidDavisMP says UK won't allow EU to use time pressure to force Britain's hand in Brexit talks #marr 
I bet May's thinking: Thank god for #KimJongUn's H-Bomb. Now nobody will notice I just paid a 50bn Brexit bill to LOSE single Market Access.  
Labour's three positions on Brexit this morning. (Though Keir Starmer seems to have at least two positions himself.)  
Both Lords ministers for Brexit (Ld Price at Trade, Ld Bridges at DEXEU) now resigned. No one competent left to defend Govt in H of Lords 
David Davis on the #marr show trying to convince himself and everyone else that he has #Brexit negotiations well under control.  
REVEALED: May’s 'desperate bid to keep £50bn EU divorce bill secret' to stop Brexit revolt  
The European Commission put itself in a "silly position" saying that nothing has been done - Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP tells #Marr 
"They [Europeans] won't talk about the future, they'll only talk about so-called divorce proceedings" @DavidDavisMP on Brexit talks #marr 
If the EU is such a bad trading partner to be in bed with, why is David Davis begging them to start talking about a post #Brexit trade deal? 
You wake-up to the world facing a real crisis, you're worried about Trump's response and then you remember this pair represent us!! 
What's the deal with the #Brexit divorce settlement? How much do we owe and why? I try to explain:#marr 
It is important you make sure your MP understands you do not want the crippling Lancaster House Brexit. Thread.  
Which party do you trust the most on #Brexit? #DailyPoll #EU 
Andrew #Marr notes that EU side of #Brexit negs declining invites to appear. In a nutshell that''s how accountable they are & always will be 
NOTE to #marrKS is setting out Labour's #Brexit position CLEARLY & unambiguously.You really NEED to hone your ACTIVE listening skills ! 
Starmer is one of the most disingenuous shysters in UK politics.His "soft Brexit" = Remain indefinitely while pretending to leave.#Marr 
'Let's Brexit together' - Labour's @CarolineFlintMP says Labour shouldn't try to wreck the government's Brexit bill  
May secretly agrees £50bn Brexit bill. No Way May! Let's have Jacob Rees-Mogg as PM! 
He found it impossible to justify or explain the Govt's Brexit policy to the House of Lords - unsurprisingly, because he is a serious guy  
Another step in the disintegration of Brexit. This was the man supposedly negotiating our trade with the 'wider world'  
Remember nearly half of Tory Leave voters think that they or close family member losing job is price worth paying for Brexit  
REPORT: By limiting migration and lowering prices, Brexit will help the poorest the most.  
The Biafra Telegraph : War is destruction but referendum is peace, Message to Buhari  
Have added hours to my Sunday by  abandoning the Sunday papers. Find I can cope quite well with a day without Brexit or Trump or "celebrity" 
Our new joint report with @Econs4FreeTrade and @LeaveMnsLeave shows the poorest will gain from Brexit.  
"The EU were happy with the Dire Straits CDs and the cat on weekends - but I insisted on a £50bn Brexit" Theresa May boasts to cabinet #Marr 
Theresa May has secretly agreed a £50bn Brexit bill.Glad we've restored our democracy and taken back control:  
Err Govt gave UK a referendum & Brexit got the majority vote. That's democracy. @Andrew_Adonis still howling at the moon a year later 
Funny little article from #India mocking #UK and #brexit with references to colonial past.  
May losing majority could add £20bn to Brexit bill. Deal will not be revealed until after Conservative Conference  
Brexit is nonsense, already failing, definitely won't happen. The question is how much damage is done before we go back and beg to #breturn. 
News item "Britain has a 1 in 3 chance of Brexit with no deal, say ministers".  Great. Let's go for it. 
This stupid, weak, clueless, traitorous woman must be replaced now. Idiot!May secretly agrees £50bn Brexit bill  
I don't get how Brexit started off as the single most stupid idea possible and somehow each day gets worse. 
Let me get this right.. Brexit was voted in despite clear warnings from economists/Remain and now the damage is clear it's Remainers fault? 
We now have to add internationally embarrassing to clueless and delusional in the lexicon of how this  Brexit folly is being prosecuted.  
Mega useful video explaining Henry VIII powers in Brexit Repeal Bill  
MPs are threatening to derail the Brexit Bill because of ‘Henry VIII’ powers. What are they?   
4/ on 'the deal v the status quo.' So we have a strategy - & don't get disheartened that there is now anything inevitable about Brexit. 
3/ but not the EU? Alongside this, growing campaign for a referendum on the final 'deal' - NOT a 2nd ref on starting Brexit but a FIRST ref 
THREAD; DEFEAT BREXIT STRATEGY:  immediate priority is get HMG to negotiate contd membp of SM & CU for the 'interim.' They will have to do 
Theresa May secretly agrees £50bn #Brexit bill in-order to start EU trade talks. Why secretly? #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Brexit Britain sidelined as Theresa May not invited to migration crisis summit.This is shape of things to come. 
Poorest families in Britain to ‘SAVE £36 per week’ post-Brexit, Labour group finds  
Poorest will gain most under Brexit, says Labour report  via @telegraphnews 
‘Leave now and then tell EU how Brexit will work!’ MEP urges UK to stop 'begging' Brussels  
Britain’s poorest families will be £2,288 a year better off ‘thanks to Brexit’ as groceries and rent will tumble  
The Brexit lies exposed by @NickCohen4 in the Observer today. 
How many British citizens living in the EU27 recognise this? STORY OF A BREXIT ORPHAN ~ A British Expat Tragedy in 8 Acts  
... let's not forget the forecast £15bn per annum  (£290m a week) that the OBR projected Brexit would cost. And... /7  
... let's not forget the £315m a week we're *already* wasting because Brexit killed the pound. And... /6  
Meanwhile, the PM would rather have Jeremy Corbyn in Downing Street than face down her Hard Brexit ideologues. /2  
Good for him. Unlike Corbyn and his supporters who put socialist Brexit before the people who will be devastated by it.  
Missourians Get Nearly Triple the Needed Signatures for November Right to Work Repeal Referendum-  
PM appeals to Tory MPs over Brexit bill - Time for Tories to put country before party and reject this power grab.  
MoS Survation pollShould CON copy LAB's soft Brexit vow to keep UK in the EU single market? Yes 49%No 27%Dk 24% 
UK PM May says EU repeal bill best way to avoid Brexit 'cliff edge'  
Furious Tory MPs reject Theresa May’s threats over Brexit votes  
Default position of @afneil: Brexit would restore British empire's former glory if it wasn't for the backstabbing of journalists & experts.  
Brexit is a very British problem, few Europeans follow the negotiations, its as though they really don't care, why should they? 
Brexit: a new phase - domestic politics take over ...  #Brexit .  
The insane illogic of #Brexit increases with every passing day...as does, apparently, the cost! #NoBrexit would help solve this problem... 
May's allies try to stop rebels ahead of Brexit debate  
- euroslide gives no fs about Brexit -  
Britain’s poorest families will be £2,288 a year better off ‘thanks to Brexit’ as groceries and rent will tumble  
Missourians Get Nearly Triple the Needed Signatures for November Right to Work Repeal Referendum  
"Big lie of Brexit was not that it would deliver £350m/week to NHS but that Brexit would be easy" RT @NickCohen4  
Brexit: PM appeals to backbench Tories over repeal bill  
If someone would bother investigating, you'd probably find that the #Brexit campaign was, in large part, a Russian op. 
Spain (Catalonia): Independence Referendum, Sociometrica poll:Yes: 52%No: 48% 
Just been told that after brexit, a Brit with an EU spouse will never be able to return to the UK to see family ever...People believe this 
Perhaps it's time to remind everyone what a former Tory MP had to say about Brexit and his own party.  
Scotland voted Remain#Brexit is potentially catastrophic for very many Scots communitiesWe in Scotland *must* have a say in our own future 
The sooner we stop talking about the 48% who voted to Remain, & start acknowledging the 67% who didn't vote to Leave, the better. No Brexit. 
Is Theresa May living in fantasy land and is Brexit becoming a national humiliation? Join me from 1 on @LBC. 0345 6060 973  
Contrary to Twitter Land public opinion on Remain/Leave, and Brexit was Right/Wrong, has remained remarkably stable since June '16  
The fantasy that Brexit would be easy is costing us dear | Nick Cohen  
Soft #Brexit bounce  
So the plan is "We're going to jump off the cliff and shout "Europe's a load of wankers!" all the way down to the bottom. #Brexit  
Election failure added £20bn to Brexit bill- May ally to Sunday Times. £20bn   
Time to partition bitterly divided brexit Britain, says India pic.twitter.com/XYTLHZKalK 
In this week's Least Surprising News Round-up:Water is wetBrexit is a messBear faeces found in woodAnd: 
 #Brexit is a dagger pointed at the heart of the EU project  
1/2#MAGAphase2:Talking National Sovereignty, @realDonaldTrump, and #BREXIT with Mark Angelides. @libertynation 
Thanks, but we voted to take back powers into our Parliament in the referendum, not give them away.  
"Tory rebels told: Back Brexit or get Corbyn" - tomorrow's front page of The Sunday @Telegraph #tomorrowspaperstoday 
The real #ProjectFear was ruthlessly peddled by #Leave - Fear of immigrants, refugees, an EU army, Turkish membership etc.#Brexit #Remain 
Now you are better informed than you were at the time of the EU Ref do you now think Brexit is better or worse than you had thought? 
Nonsense from May and Green: amending the Repeal Bill won't a) "thwart Brexit" or b) mean that Corbyn magically becomes PM  
Matt Zarb says Theresa May triggered Article 50 too early. Corbyn wanted to trigger it the morning after the referendum. #SkyPapers 
America’s former UN Ambassador: Brexit is dagger pointed at heart of EU  
That exchange rate is well Brexit.  
Ukip = racistsRacism = unpatrioticUnpatriotic = traitorsTraitors = ukipAnd brexit is their vehicleFight a racist. Fight brexit.  
Leave voters losing patience with painfully slow Brexit talks  
With an indepdendence referendum coming up, Iraqi Kurds are waiting for more U.S. military aid, @paulmcleary reports 
So much for Brexit fears...  
Enough of the "respect", already. Acknowledge, yes. But respect recognises the referendum as a valid instance of democracy. That it wasn't! 
Really?Explain Brexit.Explain Marie Le Pen.Racism is a European export.  
7. Leavers don't like Remainers because we insist what we are buying should be fit for purpose. When in reality Brexit is a pig in a poke. 
Oh. That's in addition to the £315m a week we're already wasting because Brexit broke the pound.  
5. they don't want to face up to what's happening. They're denial and my refusal to accept Brexit makes them feel uncomfortable. 
3. As if my lack of positivity will somehow make Brexit fail. But in fact, what they really want, is for me to be like them. 
A Conservative Autumn:Gov walks from Brexit negotiations. Rebellion. Leadership contest. Rees-Mogg Leave front-runner. Remain wins out. 
This letter is without doubt the best thing I've read on Brexit. Let the generation who voted for Brexit.. bear its consequences.  
THE SUNDAY TELEGRAPH: "Tory rebels told: Back Brexit or get Corbyn" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
THE SUNDAY TIMES: "May secretly agrees £50bn Brexit bill" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Pound at 168-year low.  But Project Fear, Brexit all going to plan, &c., &c.  
A superb, spot-on piece. But also chilling. The final two paragraphs make clear why we absolutely must continue our fight against Brexit.  
SPOT ON      ‘Leave now and then tell EU how Brexit will work!’ MEP urges UK to stop 'begging' Brussels.       
Why the Brexit referendum may have been pointless  
THE OBSERVER (Sunday): "Furious Tory MPs reject May threats over Brexit vote" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Look, if the Shadow Brexit Minister in the House of Lords is reading #AlternativeWar, you should be too. 
.Hopefully Mr Niall 'Irish-America' O'Dowd is having a word in the right ears in the US to point out the looming disaster of Brexit .  
Quitting customs union would mean "Brexit bureaucracy bombshell," Labour's @ChukaUmunna says  
Bitingly accurate piece from @NickCohen4 on "A government unable to tell the truth" about Brexit 
More videos of #Biafrans IPOB in Málaga protest today 2/9/2017, a call for referendum is not a call for war, #Support #BiafraReferendum 
The US/Canada car industry was based on a sectoral trade deal, then general free trade deals. Exactly the opposite of a "no-deal" Brexit.  
A "nightmare scenario" for Brexit has been spelled out by a giant pension fund  
After Brexit we're getting those 12  days back!  
The universe has denied us Ostapenko vs Osaka. Can't help but feel this wouldn't have happened in a pre Trump and Brexit world. #USOpen 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: Labour’s new Brexit stance is for metropolitan cappuccino drinkers  via @BrexitCentral 
Don't forget, #marr is back tomorrow morning at 9am with guests Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP & Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer 
The Electoral Commission is investigating Cambridge Analytica involvement in Brexit 
Brexit Central deputy editor Hugh Bennett urges anxious Brits to stick with David Davis on Brexit tactics.  
We must have full 'truth and reconciliation' as soon as Brexit is over. The dishonest brexiters and their backers must be held to account.  
'The Disgraced Dr Liam Fox' must explain how the EU is holding us to ransom & blackmailing us? Isn't Brexit "Taking Back Control"? 
I feel the media should be referring to them as 'the so-called Brexit negotiations', for accuracy. 
The same creepy alliance of social media fascists & right-wing press that has brought us #Brexit is now peddling sectarian anti-Muslim hate. 
1. @David_Cameron tried to negotiate with you lot before the Referendum. You wouldn't negotiate anything.2. You still will not negotiate.  
A politicians tweeting like an adults about Brexit... Not British of course!  
.@NickCohen4 is spot on.May & her band of Brexit fantasists think if we wave Union Jacks, everything will be fine. 
I was against #Brexit coz I believe in #EU united. 2day I consider it a positive outcome and a possibility for EU to detach itself from USA+ 
The fantasy that Brexit would be easy is costing us dear | Nick Cohen  
And those voices will be heard. Second referendum is coming.  
Brexiteers are in denial about the basic fact that UK needs a Brexit deal more than the EU does, says @AlexMassie: 
Key point: ‘during transitional period’... Same Brexit destination.When will a party fight for the 16m+ Remainers?  
Labour's Brexit plan:More flip-flops than Margate beach...  
Active day across Yorkshire (including Leeds & York) with good public response from people who don't want a damaging and costly #Brexit  
Happening now - Kurdistanis and their friends show support for #Kurdistan's independence referendum in #Copenhagen 
The requirements of modern trade mean that #Brexit Britain will have less effective sovereignty than EU Britain. #StopBrexit 
PLEASE SHARE: Brexit Means Exit rally organised to show support for a FULL BREXIT  via @Your Brexit 
Britain may be disappointed if it expects Germany's next government to be kind about Brexit  
The @LibDems offer a haven for people with moderate views. It also offers radical policies to challenge inequality and a disastrous #Brexit 
UK Brexit Team Mocked By German And French Newspapers | HuffPost UK  
Vince Cable raises doubts about Brexit ever happening  
The United Kingdom is far safer and more prosperous as a member of the European Union - we need pro-EU MPs to join together to stop Brexit. 
Brexit was a good joke. It's made the world laugh (at us). But it's not funny any more.MPs coming back from their holidays need to get that. 
Fmr U.S. Ambassador: 'Brexit Is a Dagger Pointed at the Heart of the EU', Predicts Quick U.S.-UK Trade Deal #fo2eu 
Brexit could crash the UK out of the EU into a dangerous no-man's land -- Vince Cable at #ftweekendfestival today 
Used to think of Fraser Nelson as a canny window into Conservatism.  Brexit has mutated his writing into ignorant foghorning.  
May: "The public want me to stay". When 'utterly deluded' became inadequate.#Brexit #Tories #TheresaMay 
The current state of Brexit in a sentence  
A #Brexit vote based on Johnson and Davis's deceit cannot be respected.Rather than honouring it, the govt should order a public inquiry.  
Please tell Soubry & co that we've had the referendum ......... you lost. Get over it. 
Don't frustrate Brexit Mr Starmer @Keir_Starmer, kill it, stop Brexit dead in its tracks before it derails the UK.  
'France’s aggressive attempt to use Brexit to steal business from London will fail' 
Many things are better than 30 years ago, true, but the human rights agenda is in retreat now under the Trump/Putin/Brexit/Erdogan agenda 
This is a major step for many Brits, but Brexit has made it inevitable.  
As Brexit falls apart I'm increasingly confident we will stay in Europe. The British people will demand a referendum to stop this fraud 
Stop making the Dem party into a referendum on one Bernie Sanders. The Dem party should be an ideas-driven coalition to defeat Donald Trump. 
After seven years of "purgatory" this Tory led Country is in a worse state than it's ever been., on "every" parameter! Plus Brexit looming! 
Biggest obstacle to rational reporting of our unravelling Brexit by ordinarily honest journalists who backed it is the size of their egos. 
Reminder for Leavers: Democracy includes the right to campaign against any policy, majority or government.#Brexit 
It would kill democracy if Brexit is not delivered, say Sky NewsWhat will Brexit kill if it is delivered with no deal to leave the EU? 
The EU is farming's life support system. Brexit is the free market response - sink or swim.  
Could a better opposition leader bring Theresa May down over Brexit? My Sunday article for @IndyVoices  
A year after the Brexit vote, Germany has noted a 360 percent rise in citizenship applications from Brits.  
2. Brexit will be a disaster. It is already proving to be one. Each day a new supposedly unforeseen issue is brought up. 
1. That comment has riled me. Because i have had enough of morons telling me that democracy means i have the accept Brexit. No I don't. 
David Dingle of @MaritimeUK says UK's thriving shipping industry is key to Brexit success  
Hard to find anyone who wouldn't sign this @euromove petition today at Highbury, even Brexit voters want the facts!  
#Brexit warning: Forget the European Parliament at your peril - MEPs will have a veto on the final deal #StopBrexit 
David Davis replaced as Brexit negotiator by two short planks 
The German press has poured scorn on Theresa May and her ministers over their “clueless” handling of Brexit  
Vince Cable raises doubts about Brexit ever happening  
I think we need to focus more on this because Tory loathing of the ECJ is matched by a disturbing contempt for legal checks on govt.#Brexit  
What do Trump, Brexit & Kenya have in common?  All used Cambridge AnalyticaFunded by the Mercer family.Kenya at least gets a do-over  
Government confusion over Brexit means UK world class civil service is going to waste—a Rolls Royce driven by drunks pic.twitter.com/3vIO6UsJmT 
19. Money which is paid to the EU and sold as "Our priorities" as per the Brexit campaign /End 
They died keeping our country free #Blair #Brexit  
#Brexit in 2 easy steps:1. We're leaving2. Call us if you want a deal 
Tories not working for us. NHS asset stripping, Austerity & Brexit are mechanisms to take from poor & give to rich. #TheresaOut #ToriesOut 
THE TORIES ARE STALLING OVER BREXIT. WHY YOU ASK ?BECAUSE THE TORYS AGENDA HAS ALWAYS BEEN A UK TAX HAVEN FOR RICH. THERE WILL BE NO DEAL.  
Just so you're crystal clear on this, @NickFerrariLBC: we will fight against Brexit until it is halted or reversed. Nothing will stop us. 
Do not underestimate the role of the European Parliament: MEPs wield a veto over any final Brexit agreement  
Imagine if you bought a 5 bedroom house online, only to arrive on moving day at a muddy field, with no house and no money. That's #Brexit. 
Open Britain in Sutton  fighting a destructive #Brexit  
Lots of support for @Open_Britain's campaign against a destructive no-deal Brexit from both Remainers and Leavers in sunny #Brixton! 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg on Brexit negotiations #bbcaq 
Folk who compare Scottish independence to Brexit are completely naive. 
Nobody needs to "accept" the result of a referendum that was advisory and won only on the back of lies.  
My cartoon Saturday @TheTimes on the #Brexit deadlock #DavidDavis #Barnier 
If Germany is the enemy, think who the allies are. The ugly side of Brexit is never far from view  
Our government makes the negotiating position worse. Do you really think that "lefties" on twitter are influencing the Brexit negotiations?? 
There will be an event in Madrid on 17 September in support of #Catalonia's independence referendum  
No shit, Sherlock: Brexit talks cannot succeed  
I’m being to get the impression @LeaveHQ is none to impressed with the way Brexit is going so far.  
Dear @DavidDavisMP Do you now accept that these statements made by you before the #Brexit referendum were misleading and impossible?  
GREAT: @AmbJohnBolton says US trade deal with Brexit Britain could be agreed before UK even leaves EU!  
Summer 2016 May said her priority was to give certainty to 5,000,000 EU citizens affected by #Brexit. Summer 2017 is over. Bugger all done 
Leavers moaning about a final deal referendum should note that Farage & many Tory Brexiters wanted a 2nd referendum if #Remain won.#Brexit  
Theresa May is 'clueless' and Scotland must be involved in EU talks, says key Brexit MEP  #Referendum2018 #ScotRef 
#ProEuropeansTogether #Leeds now with @RCorbettMEP @Open_Britain @_Britain4Europe campaigning to stop May's #Brexit  
People voted for #Brexit on the basis of completely false promises (as in, can't be done) from David Davis. This, for example:  
This is hilarious #Brexit #PrivateEye 
We all know that Brexit is Murdoch's way of getting SKY cheap and Levinson 2 binned.  
People's March 4EU, 9th September 2017, London UK. Together we can stop Brexit  @48PercentPlus Please RT 
Cutting immigration means an ageing population and retiring later. #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
Bigger than Brexit! Are they really saying all children born from unmarried parents in UK are not British?  
‘Leave now and then tell EU how Brexit will work!’ UKIP MEP @GerardBattenMEP urges UK to stop 'begging' Brussels  
Leading Brexiters respond to evidence that Russia, DUP Dark Money and Team Trump helped deliver Brexit.  
Theresa May's Brexit strategy has been wrong from day 1. My #SkyViews take here: 
#Brexit must proceed. The #EU is a sinking ship– jump out now or risk drowning. 
"I keep trying to tell you, Harry, the implications of the Muggle Brexit are more serious for law enforcement than you think!" said Hermione 
Never forget what Brexit has done to our country and its reputation around the world. pic.twitter.com/uJEZVivBHq 
Clubs tell me some of their new imports aren't ready to play yet because a visa backlog caused by Brexit meant later than expected arrivals. 
#Brexit still going really well then...#ToriesOut 
Before the #Brexit referendum David Davis said this. It shows how little he understood about the EU. Or that he was trying to mislead.  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
British manufacturing defies Brexit doom by posting one of the biggest growth results in three years  
Govt's own #Brexit Papers concede that EU membership has been good for #Britain.Now aiming to salvage what it can. 
This week showed the psychology of Brexit to be composed of arrogance & self-importance accompanied by a crippling victim complex. 
WATCH | Remoaner Gina Miller gets embarrassed on live TV over her stupid suggestion that we roll over and pay Barnier's demented Brexit bill  
Plenty of pensioners voted to Remain & don't appreciate being blamed for Brexit. Many more would have done so too had they been able to vote  
Since our BREXIT video went down so well we decided to do another one on NORTH KOREA! Anything you want us to cover?  
Right-wing Tory heaven: a desperate no-deal Britain slashing taxes, regulations & welfare to attract business.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
R.I.P Sir David Tang. Businessman and strong supporter of Brexit. pic.twitter.com/Pu8JF6uz86 
BOLTON: BREXIT IS DAGGER POINTED AT HEART OF EU  
They blame immigrants for hitting jobs & wages, but #Leave votes were higher in areas hit by Chinese imports #Brexit 
Better idea: ballot members with question:Should Labour oppose Brexit?If 52% say yes, it should become policy. 
This is, quite simply, fake news. Japan has agreed to negotiate and sign a FTA after Brexit is completed.  
Davis hints UK could pay Brexit bill as part of new cooperation pact with EU. How much do EU owe us for buildings? 
MUST-READ: top 10 times Govt’s own Brexit position papers repeatedly concede being in the EU has benefited Britain  
#Brexit Britain wants a deal. Europe just wants a clean break. Mismatch in perceptions  is why things going wrong  
Blue Brexit = Red Brexit May's Brexit = Corbyn's Brexit Don't be fooled by Corbyn He wants Brexit You can't support Corbyn and No Brexit  
#honestpoll From a moral standpoint, who would you rather the UK trade with? Pls RT for inclusivity. Comments welcome.#brexit 
SNP has been accused of trying to airbrush history after omitting Sturgeon’s decision to call another referendum. 
Being anti Corbyn, anti Brexit & anti Trump is not a recipe for popularity. I am surprised I have any followers at all on here. 
This is what's steadily happening to the NHS.A campaign built on lies sends healthcare professionals to other  countries#Remain#Brexit  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
The damaging, chaotic & costly Tory #Brexitshambles means the wisdom of #brexit itself is increasingly questioned  
Interesting insight into Brexit psychology... from a psychiatrist MEP!  
For everybody who hasn't yet signed the petition to make public the secret #Brexit studies, here's the link: 
Seems reasonable. This puts the madness of #Brexit in perspective. No doubt the #Leavers will now throw insults. Tin hat on again. 
We need an enquiry into the referendum shenanigans @carolecadwalla @J_amesp 
EU is an existential, not a transactional project. Good assessment of what this means for Brexit by N. Nougayrède  
Labour "the Party of soft Brexit"? Try being honest, Keir.  Labour has become the party of "Remain in all but name" -- of no Brexit at all. 
'Hurry along, avert your eyes': the referendum was politically & constitutionally improper, involved illegality, & used for a Brexit coup - 
Primarily this is what unsettles me about #brexit & its supporters. Humanity is fragile. We are connected on this #PlanetEarth whether.. (1) pic.twitter.com/G5YU4i5DaO 
Ever more obvious that Brexit was the right decision. If you don't want to be in United States of EU then Leave 
Brexit: never has so much of the money of the many been squandered by the few on a more mind-numbingly daft project 
The country is now Bankrupt due to #brexit and the thick Racists, at least we have got our country back innit #ukip 
Snapshot of flight paths above world's busiest airspace. Notice above whom most Europe - US flights pass? Brexit doesn't change geography.  
I'm just surprised at your interest in historical links betwn Brexit and Labour but disinterest in present links betwn Brexit and Russia. 
A trade deal with Japan can't compensate for a hard-Brexit  
How Brexit could endanger Britain's supply of fresh food  
£100 million to get GPs from abroad - a Brexit cost. True cost of Brexit is soaring by the day. Whay are they doing it? V strange peple!  
This is why the Brexit talks are making little progress  
What does that mean? Do you deny Russian influence in Brexit? Or do you say Russian influence in Brexit doesn't matter? 
Got to be a no if you care about the UK at all. If you support #Brexit you are right wing Tory. @UKLabour  remember whose side you're on. 
If you want to know what the hell happened, read this. #Brexit #Trump #Russia #Terrorism 
Brexit minister David Davis says the UK can thrive and lead the way in trade after it leaves the EU. Do you agree?  
From Harvey to Brexit, here's how the world's cartoonists drew this week's events  
If only. Labour would be in a superb position if it came out fully against Brexit. Indeed it could stop Brexit in its tracks right now.  
Angry today. Everything about #Brexit is just so damned stupid. #StopTheMadness 
didn't hit me until now that at the end of HP they're co-existing with the world of Dat Boi and Brexit and Candy Crush but I'm HERE for it  
Give it 6 months/a year, let Brexit implode even more then please someone challenge Corbyn for leadership with the promise of 2nd ref. 
Brexit: lack of strategy, poverty of ideas and naive negotiation; outcome: a global embarrassment and exclusion.  
Ford to consider closing UK factories in Leave towns after Brexit  
Theresa May's team must "raise their game" in Brexit negotiations, London's mayor says  
Brexit lie #1 "EU needs us more than we need it". Why then isn't EU falling over itself to do a deal with us? Thanks Brexiters. 
Who's to blame if - sorry, when - #Brexit goes wrong?#StopBrexitHour #MayDUP #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #leave #DavidDavis 
Rees-Mogg also says (rightly) Labour are divided and not fit to be in government. Their position on #Brexit is absurd.  
Do not underestimate the role of the European Parliament: MEPs wield a veto over any final Brexit agreement  
Come on folks. What's the political equivalent of an Exit With Grace? Brexit was a dumb idea. Our country's future depends on abandoning it. 
'The Brits are dawdling and clueless'- German media correctly describes UK Brexit strategy   
Labour members could force Brexit policy rethink at party conference  
The Guardian view on the Brexit talks: clouds of delusion  
@BristolPost reports on @MollyMEP's FOI to govt to try and find out what the secret Brexit studies say  
How come the political commentators who tell you Corbyn is bravely walking a Brexit tightrope never mention this fact  
UK smashed to bits by Tory in-fighting & egos. 'National interest' never on their mind. Austerity & Brexit, but they'll blame EU #ToriesOut 
To quip that Brexit is like communism - a beautiful idea that doesn't work in practice - is actually a bit unfair to communism.  
Don’t be fooled: Brexit Britain wants a deal. Europe just wants a clean break | Natalie Nougayrède  
It's just not that complicated. Brexit was oversold. Being outside the EU will make our lives worse. The rest is chaff.  
UK manufacturing SOARS as companies see surge in post-Brexit orders, new survey finds  
How Brexit could endanger Britain's supply of fresh food  
Asking conservative supporters of Brexit to join the local party ... shockingly undemocratic  
What do Trump, Brexit & Kenya have in common?  All used Cambridge AnalyticaFunded by the Mercer family.Kenya at least gets a do-over  
2014- wanted referendum in Kashmir2015- tried to save Yakub2017- protecting RohingyasBhushan's illustrious career will be remembered. 
'You’re siding with the EU!' BBC host skewers Umunna for attacking UK Brexit negotiators  
So, #Brexit game plan is:1. UK demands impossible2. EU won't concede3. Negotiations fail4. UK blames EU5. Result = No Deal Hard Brexit 
."#Brexit: A Revolution Drifting Towards Failure". 
It is really remarkable that people have believed these views about experts, views told by the few people who will not lose by Brexit  
Where's BREXIT today ? 
Nissan to  increase output by 20% to 600,000 units per year with parts sourced in the UK up from 40% to 80%.  Brexit boom  
even if we agree to The EU demands there going to b some dust bucket country who will say no and veto it .  #brexit  
David Davis driving the UK negotiations with the EU. #Brexit  
@CarterCenter Just tell us @JohnKerry made a bad call..ir go observe #Brexit and leave #Kenya alone. @UKParliament has bigger Problems 
That's what we like to see, putting me into an early retirement #trump #brexit 
If it was May throwing today for Brexit she'd have missed the board completely and hit Tony in the face. 
Oh please , Post Brexit UK will have a Fair Equal immigration policy for the world ,not preference for EU as now which is discrimination.  
Totally missed opportunity for a brexit joke... Damn, I'm slacking today. 
Brussels thinks London has started a #Brexit blame game to lay the groundwork for collapse of talks.  @nick_clegg 
Nothing in this is clear cut as per usual with government legislation... God knows what the Brexit paperwork will be like 
Sky Views: Brexit talks cannot succeed  
Just imagine Remain had won the referendum. What the hell would we all be tweeting about ?Apart from Trump, obviously. 
1. These Tory games must stop. The UK is the initiator of Brexit. We are the ones petitioning the EU for a new relationship. 
Of course it is but the hard-brexit-state-shrinking-right-wing-coup brigade, who see Mrs. May as a puppet conduit to that, don't think so. 
Brexit means brexit.  
If the Krays were alive today they would look at the #EU and say they are worse than us #Brexit #blackmail 
Thoughts on Brexit and Scottish independence? — stay for both  
They have ignored us for too long. Reject Parliament's plans for a 'fearful' brexit and demand a pure brexit!  
UK's Brexit secretary "determined optimist" over future deal with EU:  
Brexit is 13775 hours away. #brexit 
Liam Fox says the UK should not be 'blackmailed' by EU over Brexit 
brexit [GONE SEXUAL] 
.@NickyMorgan01 @RuthDavidsonMSP talking much sense. Ppll are fed up w Tory wars & Brexit  mixed messages @BorisJohnson must grow up or go. 
Kurds have sought their own state for almost 140 years. Calling a referendum was the easy part  
All eyes on Catalonia as referendum day arrives  
Thousands rallied in Dublin against Ireland's ban on abortion, days after a referendum on the issue was announced  
Theresa May faces fresh tensions within her Conservative Party over how to manage Brexit  
EU Citizens to Have More Rights than Britons After Brexit - Same True For Americans After GOP Gives #DACA #Amnesty 
Spanish fascist saluters gather on Saturday to oppose Sunday's Catalan independence referendum (song: Cara al Sol)  
Imagine boasting about being pro life and being proud of the fact ur gonna vote no for choice in the referendum , some hams out there 
DC won 30somethings May 2015. May lost them spectacularly by June 2017. Not exactly rocket science, but omertà on young voter Brexit effect. 
It's Referendum Day in Catalonia and I support their people's right to express their democratic opinion. Good luck! #CatalanReferendum2017 
The brilliant Scottish crew supporting the Catalan referendum, viva catalunya  
Podemos: PP (Spain's ruling party) improperly uses the Ministry of Interior & police to campaign against the referendum on Twitter.  
Moià, in central #Catalonia: people await the #referendum at a polling station located in a local library  
The govt has made it clear that as far as #Brexit is concerned parliamentary democracy is overruled by plebiscitary dictatorship.#Remain 
We're out of time, do the sensible thing, goodbye Brexit.  
And apparently - David Davis only works 3 days a week.He's in charge of #brexit for goodness sake !  
Chris Riddell on the Brexit clowns that are hitting the road for Manchester – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Aww, it seems Mr Rajoy is upset that SNP politicians and activists are in Catalonia to observe the referendum. #Karma 
.@Plaid_Cymru back ELEN call for intergovernmental group to protect Celtic languages after Brexit. DIolch yn fawr @siangwenfelin 
Opening time for polling stations nears: ballot boxes are being set up for Catalan referendum, says @nytimes correspondent @RaphaelMinder 
I don't have an opinion on the referendum but silencing those with opposing opinions is ridiculous. 
#Farmers in #Catalonia prepare to block the way out of #Barcelona harbour, where #Spanish #cops wait to be used to crush the #referendum  
It's not even just Brexit. It's the lack of care for anything but power. No attempt to even be honest. Incompetent. Greed driven. 
Brexit: zombie apocalypse - reflections on a Tory Party conference ... . 
The Observer view on the Kurdish referendum | Observer editorial  
#Catalonia prepares for #independence #referendum 
The best-case scenario of stopping Brexit: Everyone who voted *Leave* would Leave.  
Has Spain been asking Iraq, Turkey and Iran for advice on how to retaliate against a referendum for independence? #CatalanReferendum #visca 
The BBC calling the #Catalonia referendum 'controversial' pisses me right off. BBC back tô its old ways... 
This from a woman who has made a profession out of undermining her party and the referendum result.  
So it's October 1st.The Catalan Referendum happens today.Hope there is no violence whatsoever and people just VOTE! #Marxem 
And you and other right-minded Tories must pay more than lip service to opposing Brexit. Otherwise, it's a dereliction of your duty as an MP 
Yay! @LibDems now the second biggest party in English politics. The opposition to #Brexit Home for progressives. 
Brexit is killing the Tories - from the Observer:  
If I wanted to win #CatalanReferendum2017, the last people I’d want to see is 2-time referendum-losing deposed SNP MPs on a jolly. 
May, Trump, Brexit, Farage, Johnson, Austerity, Mogg, IDS, ..... In a political world of arseclowns & turdery, he is to many the only hope.  
Why has the British Pound (GPB) depreciated since #Brexit? Time to have an honest talk! #Remain #GBP #Economics 
Ruth Davidson says 'serious people' needed for Brexit after Boris Johnson's 'glorious future' comments  
Remember folks, while hateful Brexit rhetoric literally murdered Jo Cox, this kind of thing is in no way divisive or inciting violence...  
If the IAs showed #brexit to be 'glorious' they’d have released them. #StopBrexitManchester 
Catalonia's independence referendum is an issue that draws passionate crowds. See them in action:  
Ruth Davidson: “Brexit could deliver a hit we can’t recover from” 
BREXIT IMPACT STUDIES?  Did someone mention the BREXIT IMPACT STUDIES?!For goodness sake don't mention the BREXIT IMPACT STUDIES!   
Assange accuses Spain of conducting ‘world’s first internet war’ to shut down Catalan referendum  
They weren’t counting on a complicit Congress. They should have added a clause allowing the people to act through referendum; a work around! 
Tory obssession with 18-24s and Corbyn fees pledge is what is going to kill their re-election hopes. That, and, y’know, Brexit. 
.@SadiqKhan is agitating against Brexit again, but more Londoners voted for Brexit than him, writes @LondonLeavers  
This is just beyond embarrassing now. Getting Britain a good deal out of Brexit requires grown up government, not kevin and perry styling..  
Every day, we see our govt literally making it up as they go along on Brexit. It's now well beyond scandalous.  
1500 journalists from 400 media outlets around the world to cover Catalonia referendum. Spain will pay a very high price if it errs on #1Oct 
Results matter , Nigel got the referendum and then helped win it. AMW would have been buried like Nuttall in nano seconds by the media.  
.OR alternative headline?Theresa May condemns younger voters to a future of Broken Brexit Britain & no EU opportunities for decades......  
Seriously?Brexit was a string of lies, years of propaganda, nothing that was promised is happening, it's a complete con.Time to stop it.  
The Catalonia vote is a bigger threat to the EU project than Brexit  
ATENCIÓ The Catalan independence referendum is a much bigger issue for the EU than Brexit  
#ConservativePartyConference #CPC17 #ToryPartyConference Government's #brexit strategy becoming clearer...  
Nobody needs to HANG THE TORIES - they have only won one outright majority in 20 years & are in meltdown over Brexit.#ConCon17 
Your children’s children will live in the shadow of Trump’s assault on constitutional govt, same w Brexit. That’s best case scenario. 
Brexit - how bad does it have to get.... 
NEW: May says UK could ignore some EU rules/regs during Brexit transition. @Telegraph 
Some people will never accept the referendum result, it's almost like some kind of religious calling but the reality is more like a cult. 
Increasingly looking like that the outcome of their proposed illegal referendum will be the abolition of the Catalan parliament altogether. 
This is the king of oxymoronic statementry Jeremy @jeremycorbyn . You know as well as I do that Brexit means Brexit. Brexit will not work.  
Conservative Party members approve of Boris’s Brexit article, but many are displeased with May’s Florence speech  
Assange accuses Spain of conducting ‘world’s first internet war’ to shut down Catalan referendum  
The Catalan Police seal off over half of polling stations for banned referendum on Catalan independence 
EXCLUSIVE — UKIP's new leader spoke to Breitbart London and slammed Theresa May's botched Brexit:  
Brexit is a political STD. I still can't quite imagine how Theresa passed it on to Jeremy. 
Barcelona, Catalunya, the night before referendum. History in the making. #ReferendumCatalogna #1Oct #referendumCat #1OctL6 
With International observers planning our deployment for the independence referendum in Catalonia.  
Do you want the UK to leave the European Union?  #brexitRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
The best images from the tumultuous days before Catalonia's planned independence referendum  
Petition: The Government must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  
Spanish "democrats" tear down Catalan referendum banners in Barcelona. So much for free speech in EU. Welcome back to 1936.  
Bank of America is understood to be in talks to secure office space in Paris after Brexit  
Catalonia riven with tension as referendum day arrives  
#BREAKING Last night of pots-and-pans protest for the referèndum of independence in #Catalonia 
Final speakers list published! An all-party Brexit opposition line-up! #StopBrexitManchester 
Far right Anti-referendum protestors climb the municipality building and destroy a banner says: "more democracy". #referendum1deoctubre 
Catalonia will absolutely not comply with the Spanish government’s orders to abandon the referendum. #Catalonia 
The biggest lie labour is telling is that there can be a Brexit 'for the many': there will be no money for NHS , school , transport. None. 
OPINION: An independence referendum is particularly dangerous in a divided society like Catalonia  
Former US Ambassador to #Iraq : Washington made Mistake in going against #Kurdish Referendum...Punishment wont work   
As with Brexit, so with climate. Tories can't keep their headbangers happy and ever hope to appeal to younger voters. Gonna have to choose.  
.@RevRichardColes on #strictly is the antithesis of doom-laden news, Brexit & the barking American. He's bloody joyous and I love him forevs  
Phil Hammond & Liam Fox arrive early in Manchester to settle differences over Brexit  
Ryan Crocker on Kurdistan Referendum•Abadi used Trump rejection to escalate•Iran benefits most from unstable #Iraq  
Spotted by one of our members in a service station on the way to the Manchester #StopBrexit march!  #CPC17 #Brexit #MakeManchesterMassive 
We'd love to, except the lying cowards in charge of Brexit are withholding the impact survey results. Because they're LYING COWARDS. 
Can we have Brexit Night instead of Guy Fawkes when this rubbish is over ? 
Bank of England can't solve everything when it comes to Brexit, Mark Carney says  
‘Catalan referendum illegal, it has no intl. support, no electoral union & no ballot papers’ – Madrid (LIVE UODATES)  
Here's the National Police of Spain calming the fears of Catalans by explicitly siding with anti-Catalan referendum protestors "Because we are not alone, because we are all one, because we are all Spain, for our Democracy, for legality ..." 
Derry’s Walls have turned Yellow & Red in solidarity with Catalonia on the eve of the independence referendum. Viva Catalunya! #DiemSí 
Families in this school in Catalonia are camping out to ensure it can be used as a polling station in the independence referendum.  
#Labour got my vote in June, but it was an anti-Tory vote, not a vote for Brexit. Don't assume a vote for Labour was a vote for #Brexit 
Mossos, the Catalan Police, Face their own Test of Independence during Sunday's referendum, under Madrid's orders  
100% were disrespected when a referendum was won by Gerrymandering...  
UK: Majority of voters regret Brexit pic.twitter.com/D0GEvtFNHc 
Yet another indication of the shift taking place in the publics' minds over Brexit.#exitfrombrexit 
Need a bus to stick this on. #Brexit  
Ballot boxes are being set up tonight for Catalan referendum, despite police block, but will votes be cast Sunday?  
Casual reminder that this buffoon is responsible for the mess we’re now in. #Brexit  
Hi @SkyNews Scotland didn't want to break up with the UK, remember that time we voted in a legal referendum to say we didn't. 
John Redwood MP: Preparing for No deal"If they want each side to have to pay to trade, then WTO tariffs is the cheapest and easiest way of paying for trade, and would be legal."#Brexit 
and so today we marched for potentially the last time before this country holds a referendum on whether i have a right to bodily autonomy  
Concert of Mishima in Barcelona polling station tonight.. Catalans preparing for referendum vote to sound of music  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately, then discuss a trade deal.Leave now & fully take back control of our country, lawmaking powers and borders?42,150 signatures...Can we get to 100,00 ?#Brexit 
#Spanish gov is so proud to have shut down electronic vote system. By the way, this system does not exist in #Catalonia... yet.#Referendum 
Most public buildings to be used for Catalan referendum closed – Spanish Interior Minister (LIVE UPDATES)  
#Kurdish cartoon expressing Kurdish sentiments on post-referendum situation and Iran-Turkey-Iraq policies towards KRI.  
#Kurdistan Parliament rejects decisions of Iraqi parliament, government over referendum#TwitterKurds 
Britain falls to 35th in list of best countries for expats as Brexit hits confidence  
UKGov chose to regard a very, very narrow referendum margin as absolutely binding. In doing so, it chose to accept an economic hit 2/  
Fascist salutes and Francoist anthem were protagonists at anti-referendum demonstration in Madrid.  
Essential to understand that Ruth has flipped, flopped & triangulated her way through Brexit so far. She’s up to her neck as much as BoJo.  
Holding an unofficial independence referendum where only your supporters vote is my new fav example of sampling bias  
Brexit it is a bit like Marmite, it looks like shit and tastes fucking awful 
p.s. we are Scotland and we'll have a referendum if we say we're having one, and no incompetent Westminster MP will tell us otherwise 
School open day today. Year 7 girl did a speech with a gag about how she'd make a better Brexit negotiator. BIG laugh. That's where we are. 
DIPLOCAT delegation details An international parliamentary delegation to follow Sunday’s referendum in Catalonia  2/2 
Spain's foreign minister has insisted "there is no referendum" in Catalonia  
Bolton: Theresa May isn’t going to deliver on Brexit, she hasn’t got a clue  
What does an occupied Catalan school look like? #EscolaJujol open tomorrow for the referendum.  
All you need to know about the Catalonia independence referendum  
Kurdistan Parliament: we ask the international community to recognize the results of the referendum for independence 
Far-right groups take part in anti-referendum rally in #Barcelona 
Kurdistan Parliament decided to reject all decisions which were passed by Iraqi parliament after the independence referendum 
Kurdistan Parliament approved the results of referendum for the independence of Kurdistan. All authorities in Kurdistan must commit for the fulfillment of the results. 
Oh, for goodness sake?!  Why are you doing this?This isn't about Labour -v- Tory!  It's so much bigger than that!Brexit = trash economy. 
Corbyn Brexit or May Brexit? A bit like being told you've got to have a leg off - but you can choose which one....left or right 
Catalan independence supporters have started occupying polling stations ahead of Sunday's referendum  
Shame on you for deceiving hard-pressed families. Labour's Brexit - just like the Tories' - will make them poorer.  
Catalans occupy polling stations, intent on keeping them open for Sunday's referendum, defying Spain's government  
The moment you make a buffoon Foreign Secretary - he is no longer harmless.. #Brexit #borisjohnson 
.@BBCNews: 'Tories are insisting that #Brexit will not dominate their conference.' Don't know how newsreader suppressed a guffaw. 
Democracy. Freedom to Decide. Thousands march in Bilbao (Basque Country) to support Catalonia's independence referendum.  
Gotta agree with Vince here. What Boris wants would make a transition imposible. That means cliff edge Brexit in 18 months. Enough already!  
It works like this @jeremycorbyn @johnmcdonnellMP :A) Brexit and decades of even more austerityB) No Brexit and you can end austerity  
Thousands march in Bilbao (Basque Country) to support Catalonia's independence referendum! Wow!  
Indeed, if it's the will of the people you seek to represent, then a second referendum with REMAIN as an option is the only way to get it. 
What's the difference betweenA Corbyn Brexit A May Brexit A UKIP Brexit Serious question! Fucked if I know. 
Hallo, Sun readers. I'll keep it short. When Johnson tells you #Brexit is going to be great, he means it's going to be great for him. Not U. 
I’ve just received this picture from the Basque Country. Tens of thousands march in Bilbao in support of referendum in Catalonia.  
This is what you get in Catalonia if you look up Catalan government’s referendum website  
Rachel Johnson: Uber is just like Brexit all over again  
Top-ranking European politicians turned their backs on Theresa May's big Brexit speech.  
Ruth Davidson says 'serious people' needed for Brexit after Boris Johnson's 'glorious future' comments  
Johnson tells Sun readers: "Brexit is going to be great."  They might swallow it but nobody with an ounce of sense will. He is a buffoon. 
Britain's Boris Johnson wants maximum two-year Brexit transition  
The controversial independence referendum is tomorrow.  
AFD’s Bronson: Brexit won’t change Britain’s strong relationship with Germany  
This is as empty, vacuous and meaningless as Brexit means Brexit. People are worried. Scared. They need hard details. Not hyperbole. 
Wake up Britain – it’s time to think again on Brexit - The Independent  
Catalonia's independence referendum is an issue that draws passionate crowds. See them in action:  
Polling station for Catalonia's banned referendum  
Using govt buildings to host partisan non-governmental 'think tank' to promote Brexit. This is effectively a coup d'état & must be stopped  
Hopefully UKIP will now re-emerge as the Brexit pressure party & force May to carry out the will of the people.  
The government has made it clear that it regards #Brexit as an enclave of authoritarian nationalist rule not to be sullied by democracy. 
The Catalan independence referendum is a much bigger issue for the EU than Brexit  
.@chrisgreybrexit makes important point about Brexit's new political correctness. Here's what I wrote about it in  
EU: Brexit is seen as a bad thing for the European Union. #Brexit  
Kippers have always tended to confuse German domination over England in football with Germany's role in the EU. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Wake up Britain – it’s time to think again on Brexit  
En route to #Manchester for tomorrow's anti Brexit protest #stopbrexitmanchester #exitfrombrexit 
German MEP Hugh Bronson - "German-British trade is going strong and #Brexit won’t change that."  
LIVE: Protest in Barcelona against Catalan referendum  
What's the worst-case scenario of stopping Brexit? Maybe everyone who voted Leave would never vote again.A plan with no drawbacks. 
If you're "for the many" why don't you listen to your members to see if they actually want a Brexit 
Brexit transitional period unacceptable, says new UKIP leader  
.@davidfrum on the international stakes of the Catalonia referendum:  
.“What is the UK’s bargaining power in a post-Brexit world? Not much.". 
The Urgent U.S. Role in Post-Referendum Kurdistan - The Washington Institute for Near East Policy  
Shit guys does this mean we have to stop brexit now?#cpc2017 pic.twitter.com/wUNRvOOnxW 
"#Kurdistan High Council for Referendum" to meet on Sunday & will change the name to "Kurdistan High Council for Independence".  
Hundreds occupy voting sites ahead of Catalonia's referendum. Should the region secede from Spain? #AJNewsGrid  
BBC News - Catalan referendum: Police 'seal off' polling stations  
Supporters of an outlawed independence referendum in #Catalonia rally on the final day of campaigning 
Just who can I vote for next GE. Corbyn will ruin us, May will sell out on Brexit, UKIP have gone establishment. LibDems don't even like UK 
Spanish police move to enforce ban on Catalan independence referendum  
Why not simply hold a referendum to make Barzani President for life? Oh, wait, they just did...  
See you there. Show the bitter, ignorant, hateful f*ckers of Brexit what you think.We have boots on the ground but their bots can't march.  
sorry but that is fantasy. Brexit won't work for anyone. Least of all @UKLabour.#cakeism 
Brexit can't work for the many and not the few, Jeremy.  It really can't.  The power to stop it is in your hands.  Do it!  
Unlike the Tories, Labour's Brexit will work for the many, not the few.#Lab17 #LabourConference17 #ForTheMany 
Guardia Civil takes Catalan telecom center in charge of vote count. Spanish government boasts of having killed the referendum. Oppression!  
Davis on Brexit bill: "we know there's a bill. We know we'll have to pay. We can't say so until after Conservative conference."  
#Iran, #Iraq to hold joint drills in response to #Kurdistan region's independence referendum, #Iranian military official announces Saturday 
Here's one for you, @jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour.It is clear that you still don’t realise how bad Brexit will be for the country.  
Leaving the EU is a bit like selling your Belgravia flat at 1973 market prices to pay an advance fee to a Nigerian prince who sent you an email saying you inherited Windsor Castle. #Brexit #BrexitReality @DanielJHannan 
This by @Mcr4EU looks fun tomorrow! Sensible Tories must know whoever owns Hard Brexit is doomed to electoral oblivion for a generation.  
'Prepare to leave EU NOW' Ukip leader Bolton calls on May to walk away from Brexit 
Hundreds of people protecting their school/polling station for tomorrow's referendum-lunch is served (as much paella as you can eat-€3)  
Symbolic votingin Cardiff to support the Catalan referendum. Diolch for the support! #vullvotar @omnium @324cat @YesCymru 
Boris Johnson's latest gaffe has grabbed headlines away from a new challenge on Brexit  
Over 100 international observers will be following tomorrow's referendum in Catalonia. . 
#UPDATE Police in #Catalonia seal off 1,300 polling stations to stop an independence referendum from taking place   
Assange accuses Spain of conducting ‘world’s first internet war’ to shut down Catalan referendum  
Actually, leaving the EU  is more like leaving a moving car because you don't like the choice of music on the radio. #Brexit  
Macron's invitation to visit France not related to Kurdish referendum - Iraqi PM  
Catalonia prepares for its independence referendum  
Well, that would be doing precisely what Boris wants. Brexit martyr.  
Report reveals SADIQ KHAN is most dangerous source of harmful emissions in London  via @Your Brexit 
It could take months for Brexit talks to move on, Michel Barnier says  
I'm glad there's a referendum happening; of course I am. And I'd hate to distract from the real debate in any way. 
UKIP leader Henry Bolton says "far from strengthening the UK's hand in Brexit negotiations" Theresa May's Florence speech "gave it away" 
"I say that the [Brexit] transition period at all is unacceptable and we must be prepared to get out now," says UKIP's @_HenryBolton 
Ruth Davidson demands 'serious people' start taking charge of Brexit  
European Commission says it wants "smooth and timely relocation" of European Medicines Agency & European Banking Authority after #Brexit  - @damonwake for @AFP 
Spaniards demonstrating simultaneously in many city halls all over We are one nation,We oppose the ilegal referendum & support our police  
.@_HenryBolton has some harsh words for Prime Minister @theresa_may and others over Brexit negotiations, in his @UKIP conference speech 
With @Masoud_Barzani the day after the referendum  #KurdistanBlockade 
Did @vote_leave breach referendum rules? Was the @ElectoralCommUK asleep on the job? // @JolyonMaugham #Brexit  
Dear UK, Just so you know: the world does see all of Boris Johnson’s self-serving Brexit stunts. And it understands them as such.  
The US State Department has been caught in a muddle over #Catalonia's independence referendum 
.@JonnElledge has annotated the government’s response to the petition calling for another Brexit referendum:  
How odd. Whenever I interview you, you tell me you accept that Brexit must happen otherwise the 52% would be disrespected.  
#sleepwet referendum, pushing back against Dutch government surveillance, needs exposure @Snowden @JulianAssange 
#UPDATE Iran slaps fuel trade embargo on Iraqi Kurdistan after its independence referendum, state media says  
Catalan referendum stokes fears of Russian influence  
We are all angry about response to petition on Referendum on final deal. This petition now more significant.    
A judge has ordered to shut down 29 apps that could be used to help citizens know where to vote in the referendum. 
Juncker is unelected bureaucrat &under no circumstances allowed to dictate tax rates in Ireland or elsewhere#Brexit 
All very well performing well on #labourdoorstep, but you need to stop being a #doormat for Tories when it comes to #Brexit! @Labour4EU 
Spanish govt says police intervention at the Telecommunications and IT Center shows "the referendum has been cancelled by the Rule of Law" 
BREAKING: Spanish authorities have shut access to 1300 polling stations in Catalonia leading up to independence referendum. 
BOLTON: Theresa May isn't going to deliver on Brexit, she hasn't got a clue.  
Ok @sinnfeinireland get retweeting - Spanish Gov orders Google to delete links related to the Catalan independence referendum #UseSocMedia 
Spain: Europe Holds Breath as Catalonia Prepares to Stage Banned Independence Referendum  
Catalan government says Spanish police operation at its Telecommunications and IT Center will not affect the logistics of the referendum  
Pro-EU activists to stage 'stop Brexit' march during Tory conference in Manchester to makeTories face the reality of Brexit. STOP BREXIT 
Hundreds of tractors roll into Barcelona to protect polling stations ahead of #Catalonia independence referendum  
You may not recognize them if they become independent, but we should respect a non-binding referendum to see what the people want.  
Analysis | Spain is trying to block #Catalonia’s independence referendum tomorrow. What’s going on?  
Boris Johnson warns Theresa May Brexit transition cannot exceed two years  
Euro-area economy is forecast to grow by 1.7% this year and 1.8% in 2018  
In Strasbourg next week: #Brexit, Ryanair, the next step for roaming, #EPlenary  
UK must be prepared for no deal on Brexit, says new UKIP leader  
Brexit Poses Threat To 'Every Part' Of The NHS, Lancet Warns  via @HuffPostUKPol 
World-renowned intellectuals support Catalan referendum, note some have called Spain a "rogue state"  
Boris Johnson,Foreign Secretary,facing calls to be sacked aftr 'breaking Ministerial Code'.He hosted hard Brexit event using tax-payer money  
Madrid struggles to close #Catalonia polling stations on eve of referendum  
#MPs urge #TheresaMay to walk away from #Brexit negotiations if trade talks aren't underway by Christmas. GOOD!  
We should have the same transition period we had when we joined."Britain passed peacefully into Europe at midnight last night...""It was difficult to tell that anything of importance had occurred!"No transistion period, no cliff edge!#Brexit  
Catalan referendum: Police seal off polling stations  
Brexit strategy & pissing on his own reputation. The tent is so drenched it has fallen down and yet he keeps on pissing anyway. 
JK Rowling just destroyed this awful Brexit metaphor  
No need to imagine it's happening around me! Being ordered to accept Brexit is being robbed by frauderendum  
GERMANY: 'Brexit won't change Britain's strong trading relationship with Germany' - AFD's @HughBronson_AfD 
Your banner's never too big when it says 'Stop Brexit'!   
Misconduct in Public Office in Relation to Brexit - David Wolcover explainsin a letter to Met Pol Comm.pdf  
I am now an expert in the politics of Spain and the Spanish region of Catalonia. #referendum 
Over 100 international observers will be following tomorrow's referendum in Catalonia  
If it clears MPs, Brexit will be halted in Lords because 2-year session means no time to reintroduce legislation + use Parliament Act (1/2) 
Outrage over Junkers bid to scupper Brexit deal, PM urged to prepare to quit talks as EU push back on a trade deal & say it'll be a miracle. 
Blog by UUK Chief Exec @AlistairJarvis for @timeshighered: UK universities need assurances over Brexit now  
One of Cameron's advisers points out that the main reason 16-17 years were excluded from the #Brexit vote was to placate the Tory right.  
NHS boss can't reassure staff, cant influence politicians. Sums up damaging, undemocratic Brexit.  
They say #Brexit is patriotic. Look at these diagrams. It is not. #Brexit betrays Britain. #StopBrexit 
LIVE: Protest against Catalonian independence referendum in Madrid  
The government loudly declared that #Brexit was irreversible, now it admits that Article 50 is revocable. #LeaveLies #StopBrexit 
Angela Merkel hails 'good progress' in the Brexit negotiations as she meets Theresa May at EU summit  
The #Brexit referendum excluded EU 27 nationals, 16-17 years, and UK citizens abroad for more than 15 years. All those most affected. 
Interesting fact: tomorrow's referendum in Catalonia will be 52nd on independence in the world since 1944.Most have resulted in a Yes vote. 
This is an incredible thing. I'm at Escola Jujol and there are people everywhere. Mothers, fathers, voters, kids. Every few minutes, someone appears with food, asking "How can I help?" Periscope next.#Catalonia #Referendum  
Rule one is unrealistic. Rules two and three are impossible. Rule four is just restating hard Brexit.  
For what they've done to the country over Brexit I'll certainly never vote Tory again. 
Canadian High Commissioner Says Brexit Trade Deal Could Be “Even Better” Than EU’s  
A referendum to #repealthe8th is confirmed for next year but we have a long way to go. Join us today to #MarchforChoice #ItsTime #ARCMarch17 
If you want to be anti austerity, you can't be relaxed about Brexit.   
.Boris Johnson has some redlines on Brexit, eh?Well, Britain has a couple of redlines for HIM..  
DEADLOCK: MPs urge Theresa May to walk away from Brexit negotiations if trade talks aren't underway by Christmas.  
Spanish military police has just entered this morning the Catalan govt Telecommunications and IT to disactivate 29 referendum apps. 
BREAKING: Spain's foreign minister says Catalonia region's plan to hold an independence referendum is "a mockery of democracy." 
'Shortsighted and despicable' Brexit.The consequences will be borne by the sick and the vulnerable.  
Boris Johnson's latest Brexit red lines would be disastrous for UK. He is motivated by selfish, personal ambition not the national interest 
UK has fallen from the top to the bottom of the league of G7 economies since the Brexit vote. Project Reality folks 
#BREAKING: Iran stops fuel product exports to #Kurdistan Region following independence referendum. #KurdistanBlockade 
Milan Brglez stated that Catalans "have the right to self-determination", referring to the October 1 #referendum . 
The government does not want democracy to apply to #Brexit. Stick a finger in its tyrannical eye. Please sign & RT  
A ruler who says that seeking to test the legality of a government action is subverting democracy is a ruler who loathes democracy. #Brexit  
Will Catalan's independence referendum go ahead tomorrow? "No it won't" says Spanish Foreign Minister Alfonso Dastis  
Catalan separatists hold rally ahead of unauthorised independence referendum  
JK Rowling had the perfect response to this Brexit metaphor  
The notion of the "Will of the People" gives a democratic face to the suppression of opposition & contempt for checks & balances.#Brexit /1 
Barcelona waiter asks: "Will this referendum be historic for Catalonia or will we be arguing forever?"Good question!  
#Brexit May get on with Brexit!! Labour stop trying to derail Brexit. Lib Dems give up!! Henry Bolton UKIP who are you?Today’s Politicians.  
“Nazi” is especially disgusting given that #Ukip had the same malicious slur levelled at them throughout the #Brexit campaign. Unforgivable.  
'Walk out' May urged to leave EU talks amid fury transition deal will DELAY Brexit  
Minister @raulromeva receives over 100 international observers who will be following the developments of tomorrow's referendum #1Oct 
As an #NHS boss, there is little I can do to reassure EU staff about #Brexit.  
I see Boris Johnson having tried & failed to get sacked & become a Brexit martyr two weekends in a row is having a third try this weekend.  
Amid his red lines, Boris made quite an admission to me. UK won't be ready for Brexit by 2019 
Guardia Civil enters Catalan telco building, trying to disactivate 29 apps. Workers exit the building and shout: "We will vote!" #referendum  
From the Netherlands all my support to Spain against the ilegal and anti-democratic referendum in Catalonia  #DesafíoIndepe 
The very odd thing about Brexit is that it's always the people who love rules & order & rigidity that support it. They voted for chaos. 
More than 30 Tory MPs have urged the PM to walk away from Brexit negotiations by Christmas. Should she walk away?  
Corbyn, McDonnell & Starmer are simply lying to us over the hundreds of billions Brexit is going to cost us. It will mean Austerity max.  
A man just appeared out if nowhere with two huge bags of bombons. He is visiting all the polling stations. #Catalonia #Democracy #referendum  
Politicians must show how they will raise living standards for Brexit-backing low-income voters says @claire_ainsley 
Let's make this is the last march we have to go on before the 8th is banished. #arcmarch17 #referendum #freesafelegal #RepealThe8th 
Theresa May says she "wants to make Britain fairer", leaving people unsure whether she means 'more equal' or 'lighter skinned' after Brexit. 
The Catalan people will hold a referendum on independence despite the obstacles put in their wayThe people will have their sayGood luck  
Boris sets out four key Brexit red lines | Tory MPs urge May to walk away if trade talks not started by Christmas  
Interesting thread by the owner of an SME re customs/ Brexit:  
JK Rowling just ruined this awful Brexit metaphor  
Threatened by Madrid, Catalonia Referendum Is Game of Cat and Mouse  
Boris has challenged May's leadership once again, this time outlining his "four red lines" on Brexit.  
I agreeJohnson wants to get sacked - so he can be a "Brexit martyr" and  shift blameMay is too weak to sack himWhat a pathetic shambles  
This missive struck a nerve with many people.My take is that the language in it betokens an entrenched infantilism at the heart of Brexit.  
The idea that Corbyn & Labour occupy the 'centre ground' is quite possibly that most preposterous notion since Brexit. Laughable. 
 London | Today 2pm | #205kTravelled in support of #ArcMarch17 | We want a referendum date & safe abortion access in Ireland & Northern Ire  
Far from the *will of the people* Brexit is a crime against the UK. Gov't's duty is to act in our interest. No mandate absolved them of that 
Kurdistan Referendum on the right side of history: French director  
 chrisriddellblog: The Brexit Debate by Ishtar Ostaria  
EU Immigrants are blamed, but it's Chinese imports that have hit jobs and wages.  #LeaveLies #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Spanish police leaving the Barcelona's harbour towards the city to repress the popular movement for the referendum  
Post-referendum Britain confounds Remainers desperate for bad news yet again.  #BrexitBoom 
Another question, which the EC can't answer, is, what was the £625k really used for? AIQ should have been audited. 
Stop Brexit March is in Manchester on Sunday - protesting #Brexit and Austerity policies, 50k will march on the Tory Party Conf #StopBrexit 
I hope my lottery ticket comes up so I can watch Brexit unfold from a villa in Italy while tweeting 'I told you so' every five minutes.  
Defeatism and fatalism the worst failings of reasonable people faced by extremists. In the face of Brexit, we should resist not succumb. 
It's not 'if Brexit empties the coffers' but 'when Brexit empties the coffers' #BrexitReality 
Brexit: The Tory #Brexit fiasco continues and continues to do immense damage to the country. #StopBrexit 
How can #TheresaMay "seize the initiative"? 1. Deliver a full and completed Brexit by 2019 2. How about adopting Conservative policies? 
This would be #Brexit Comedy Gold if it weren't so sad.How many thought Brexit meant stopping NON-EU immigration? 
I’m left wing but I consider Heseltine to be one of the most intelligent voices on Brexit. 
Ruth Davidson slams Boris Johnson over Brexit “overoptimism”.  Good, let's hope the #ToryParty divisions get bigger! 
.@FT: 'May on tightrope as Brexit tensions threaten to erupt.' Sooo tired of country being held hostage to Tory soap opera. #exitfromBrexit 
Should Boris Johnson be setting out four conditions he says are necessary? @BorisJohnson #brexit RETWEET & VOTE 
Save me from Brexiters who think trade just marches on post Brexit. I haven't had enough coffee for this nonsense. Spend 5 mins on WTO.. 
London's mayor isn't afraid of Brexit, ISIS or telling Donald Trump he's wrong  
Brexit goes sour: 40% of people support current course. 44% demanding a change  
Brexit: like when you were little and you ran away, but only got as far as two streets over because you had no clue where you were going 
Residents of Spain’s Catalonia region gear up for an independence referendum despite efforts by the government in Madrid to block the vote.  
New Nordic-Baltic Policy Statement: #Brexit means better links with region all the more important - @AlasdairAllan 
How should UK gvt proceed on Brexit? - latest pollLeavers more unifiedRemainers quite dividedOnly minor support for overturning #Brexit  
Theresa May must walk away from Brexit talks by Christmas if trade negotiations are still on hold, Tory MPs say 
Boris Johnson - “Am I impatient about #Brexit, do I want to get it done as fast as possible? Yes, absolutely.”  
State of failed Austerity & Brexit policies agonisingly exposed by latest growth figures. UK still has lowest EU growth & poor outlook :(  
Will Iraq force Kurds to cancel referendum results?  
Theresa May must walk away from Brexit talks by Christmas if trade negotiations are still on hold, Tory MPs say 
- Yes, Mr. Ambassador. The referendum will not have political effects and that is why we have closed the air space of Barcelona. 
Davidson cannot be leader of party bcse she isn't an MP It was Boris who delivered Brexit to Britain. Ruth a big remainer - there's the rub  
‘No trade without divorce talks Macron  AGAINST Brexit talks on trade deal. Ok, blockade UK ports,stop car imports!  
Taxi for May?  : Theresa May 'ready to give European Union better Brexit deal’  
SNP support for Catalonia referendum will justify same illegal #indyref2 in Scotland - my @EdinburghPaper column 
Vince Cable to join anti-Brexit protest outside Tory party conference this weekend | The Independent  
Banks are continuing to plan for an exodus from London as Brexit uncertainty goes on  
The history books are going to use these pictures for why people voted Brexit and why @conservatives put personality before party  
I love Catalan protests! #catalonia #referendum #lovedemocracy #wewillvote #votarem 
Heseltine is right. Europe is moving on without us. Brexit is a fallacy, a tragic mistake base on ignorance and wishful thinking.  
The Brexit Estate Agency is refusing to let us see the Brexit house & Brexit house surveys.So why should anyone agree to *blindly* buy it?  
I have white, black & Hispanic grandkids but because I voted Brexit & want a peaceful future for them all, I'm called racist.  
We need a referendum in England to get shot of subsidised Scotland 
To make sufficient progress in Brexit talks miracles will now be needed.Agreement required on divorce settlement #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
This shows the overwhelming majority of Tory members want a clean Brexit, not the fudge May seems to be creeping towards.  
Spent night in school in Barcelona with others to prevent the headmaster/police locking it down. We will vote! #1Oct #Referendum #Catalonia 
Schools occupied to prevent police closing polling stations in Sunday referendum.  
Help us bring integrity back to our democracy and the Referendum.  
Morning! Does anyone know what #brexit is yet apart from biggest constitutional upheaval Britain has faced for generations? #justasking 
Shiotgun fired at four manning polling booths in Catalonia ahead of independence referendum. Shooter still on the lose -- Vangardia  
May must walk away from Brexit talks by Christmas if trade negotiations are still on hold, Tory MPs say #Premium 
The Balkans may have a nifty way to solve the Irish border issue around Brexit  
Catalan separatists are determined to press ahead with independence referendum on Sunday, banned by Madrid  
Tractors roll into Barcelona to protect polling stations ahead of Catalan's 'banned' independence referendum  
Last poll on Catalan independence referendum.83% Yes! This information has been banned in Catalunya. RT  
Catalan referendum is about mobilization, not vote-counting: Madrid braces for irrelevant result, but serious crisis 
Catalan police asks for time so that they can vote in independence referendum on Sunday.   
Michael Hesletine: "Brexit is a vacuum, not policy"  
Hundreds of musicians play the #Catalan anthem in Barcelona to support independence referendum on Sunday. Impressive. #o1 
Here's my proposed ballot paper for a self-organised referendum on Brexit - please suggest alternatives & methods for organisation 
Spanish government moves 300 "Navy Seals" into #Barcelona during vote suppression operation ahead of Sunday's #Catalan independence referendum  #1o 
#DidYouKnow There are 5,343,358 voters on the #October1 referendum electoral roll  
#cataloniareferendum is just like Scottish Referendum but with 10x More Passion and 10x less cowardice#Go #Catalonia 
#Barcelona tonight ahead of #Catalonia's independence referendum on Sunday #1o 
Iraq shuts Kurdish airspace as part of backlash against the region's referendum  
The British arguments on Ireland are weak, even by the shambolic standards of its Brexit negotiating team.  
Six things you need to know about Catalonia's independence referendum  
Britain recorded its weakest annual growth since 2013 and its trading position with the rest of the world deteriorated-Brexit isn’t working! 
Catalonia's leaders vow to push forward on independence referendum  
United States does not recognize independence referendum in #Iraqi Kurdistan; urges end to threats of reciprocal actions. 
Sunday’s Catalonia Independence Referendum  
.@masoud_barzani talks to @BHL about Kurdistan's and his personal journey to the referendum  
In 9-10 months, a boom of referendum babies! 
Catalonia's independence referendum has turned into a covert operation to avoid a Madrid-ordered shutdown  
Tractors roll into Barcelona to protect polling stations ahead of Catalan's 'banned' independence referendum  
BREAKING - Brexit plan leaked.  
#WhyImStillSingleIn4WordsToo Busy Stopping #Brexit!@AcademyOfRock @BHforEU @BrexitRage @spaceangel1964 
Talking Brexit is certainly thirsty work! Rounding off our @ScottishFabians #ScotBrexit event with a few pints in the iconic @SloansGlasgow. 
The core weakness of the referendum was that a vote to remain meant a single thing, whereas a vote to leave was a voter's interpretation. 
David Pollock: Most Arabs & Turkmen in #Kirkuk boycotted referendum. Turnout in Kirkuk & Sulaymaniyah significantly less than Erbil & Duhok.  
When Puerto Rico votes for independence in its next referendum, the indifference of the Trump regime will be why. 
One of their unintended consequences of Brexit #Idiots  
Catalan referendum becomes covert operation to avoid police, where voting rights are more debated than independence  
The world's first internet war has begun, in Catalonia, as the people and government use it to organize an independence referendum on Sunday and Spanish intelligence attacks, freezing telecommunications links,  occupying telecoms buildings, censors 100s of sites, protocols etc. 
Brexit means brexit  
How FC Barcelona, Catalonia’s largest institution, is backing Sunday’s unofficial referendum on independence  
Boris Johnson's four red lines on Brexit would be a recipe for disaster - @thomasbrake 
Catalonia referendum: Tractors roll in and buildings occupied to support independence vote (via @thejournal_ie) 
What Corbyn and his supporters refuse to acknowledge: You can promise unicorns for all, but Brexit will kill them 
The govt doesn't want a debate on a final deal referendum. Their arguments are anti-democratic & mendacious. #Brexit 
Man who unilaterally signed oil contracts with the KRG says does not recognise unilateral referendum  
The #KurdistanBlockade is an illegal act against the people of Kurdistan who freely expressed their choice with Referendum. @FalahMustafa 
Barcelona says Yes 29 hours before the referendum! We will vote!  
Those Boris Brexit red lines in full: "Let me be PM, or else". 
The atypical referendum campaign is now over. It is now one day to go for the long-awaited referendum  
#Brexit is the tale of a cynical super-rich elite using their power over the media to dupe people into giving them a tax haven.#StopBrexit 
BREAKING Three injured by bebe gunshots while they were protecting a polling station in Manlleu, Catalonia for the #referendum  
Catalonia's independence referendum has turned into a covert operation to avoid a Madrid-ordered shutdown.  
For those unafraid of experts, highly recommend following @SEE_Group on #Brexit. (no affiliation as wasn't nearly senior enough). 1/ 
Our colleagues at @ScotNational have an exclusive poll suggesting Yes ahead in Catalan referendum  
We're proud to stand with Catalonia. Follow us this weekend & we will keep you up to date with news from the referendum #ScotsForCatalonia 
Catalonia independence referendum: Spain restricts airspace over Barcelona  
Raul Romeva: #Catalonia referendum 'impossible to stop'  
Dear me. It is data. Not misleading. However you cut it, & I hate to break the news, but there is no mass public uprising against Brexit.  
Threatened by Madrid, Catalonia Referendum Is Game of Cat and Mouse  
I understand what it means to not recognize a Declaration of Independence, but what is not recognizing a referendum?  
In the town of Riudaura, Catalonia, the mayor took the gates of the school so it couldn't be closed for the #Independence Referendum on Sunday.  
My local supermarket has stopped selling grated emmental. I could just about deal with Brexit but this is it, I'm moving back to France. 
This is why we need post #Brexit not "stop Brexit" @UKLabour policies 
A criminal offence is no small matter for anyone in public or professional life. But I will also write on what it means for the referendum. 
The @Conservatives & @UKLabour plan is to delay a damaging Brexit for 2 years. But the EU may not agree & neither know what to do after that 
Brexit has made Labour's radicalism possible - but it could bury it too. Bang-on from @Freedland 
Astonishing that Remainers are seeking to take over the Govt and marginalise Brexit advocates. Tories risking losing droves of Brexit voters 
So embarrassing to see our PM ostracised by EU 27 at meeting in Slovenia, even told not to mention Brexit, save some respect & leave. 
Spain’s central government confiscated ballot papers and arrested local officials who organized the referendum. #1O  
Since following @TheMuppets, my "who to follow" recommended list is a pleasing mix of official Muppet accounts and Brexit commentators. 
 #BREAKING Spain's Guardia Civil enters Catalan govt Telecommunications and IT Center. Court wants referendum-related apps to be closed 
Do you believe the UK will be better off leaving the EU by 2021? #EuropeanUnion #brexit RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
catalunya referendum polling place page distributed on ipfs uses browserify+crypto-browserify  
Basque separatists throw support behind Catalan referendum  
Excl: Boris says a Brexit transition must last “not a second more” than 2 years and lays out 4 new red lines for it; 
Let this little Brexit detail sink in  
Oh my. Spanish police force @Google to remove Catalan referendum app from Google Play, detain employees for hours  
Informative afternoon with @LesleyLaird discussing Brexit implications with the day shift team at Clydeport Glasgow.  
Discussing Britain's global influence with ex White House official. He says - "Brexit really closed the lid on the coffin." Nice 
At the closing event of the referendum campaign with an estimated crowd of 100.000-200.000 people. Catalonia on its way to freedom #votarem 
Have you been miss sold Brexit? Could you be entitled to compensation? #Brexit #EU #Gogglebox 
Met @GuyVerhofstadt. @TheresaMayPM does not get damage in #Brexit negotiations from using #EU nationals as hostages. Must allow role for ECJ 
They tell us it's only London opposes BREXIT. Go Manchester!!! #StopBrexitMarch #REF2 
Sturgeon got it very wrong when she thought she could use the UK's Brexit vote as a mandate for another referendum.  
Thank you . I think everyone is very tired after the referendum it was all consuming. Nigel in particular gave it his all...  
There are growing fears that Spain's crackdown on the Catalan referendum could fuel support for it  
If Brexit was a tweet  
800 of the 947 city halls in Catalonia are members of the Association of city halls for the Independence. Not a joke ! On Sunday referendum 
No one gives legitimacy to the referendum but the people of #Kurdistan. 
Brexit cannot continue to be about secrets and lies  
Anyone who thinks Brexit isn't having an impact on their purchasing power should try taking money out of a cashpoint in Europe..#brexithaos 
Catalonia referendum: Thousands turn out for closing rally  
They are. YouGov have been asking 'was Brexit right/wrong' consistently since EURef. It basically shows no change.  
Pre referendum rally in Barcelona led by the defenders of democracy;  firefighters, computer scientists, journalists, students, printers etc  
This tremendous rally in Barcelona closes the referendum campaign. Crowds sing #votarem (#wewillvote). 
I have also been tabling Parliamentary Questions asking the Govnt to publish these Brexit impact studies. Totally unacceptable  
U.S. won't recognize the possibility of Kurdish independence, says Sec of State Tillerson. A look at the referendum:  
Catalonia's FM says the controversial referendum is 'impossible to stop' despite  
Google removes Catalan referendum app from Google Play after court order  
Tensions are rising in Spain over Catalonia's independence referendum 
Catalan farmers show their support for the independence referendum with a tractor parade  
Dog namesPrincess girl dog , Brexit, finance, tiny ch dog, boss baby, dog stamper, Levi wife, international  index, FTSE, fist pipe steelZ. 
Thank you #UKIP members. We will rebuild/revitalise our party together, resume our core task regarding #Brexit and hold the govt to account. 
10pm in Barcelona and hundreds of people making human towers to keep schools open ahead of banned independence referendum on Sunday.  
Catalonia using IPFS to stop Spain blocking their independence referendum is the most cyberpunk thing I've ever read  
As Catalans celebrate their referendum, some migrants are worried. "Nationalism is a kind of racism," said one.  
School occupations in Catalonia, people start to organize activities to keep them open until the referendum on Sunday (cinema, games...)  
Tractors roll into Barcelona to protect polling stations ahead of Catalan's 'banned' independence referendum  
 Some schools stay open after class to stay full until Sunday referendum. No opposition from Catalan police so far  
London steet signs already preparing for #Brexit  
MORE: US urges calm, end to vocal recriminations and threats after Kurdistan referendum. Calls on dialog.Full statement:  
The United States does not recognize Kurdistan's independence referendum: Secretary of State Tillerson  
#BREAKING US does not recognize Kurdistan independence referendum says Tillerson 
Sec. Tillerson: The US does not recognize the Kurdistan Regional Government’s unilateral referendum held on Monday.  
This tremendous rally in Barcelona closes the referendum campaign. Crowds sing #votarem (#wewillvote). A united country can't be defeated! 
The petition for a 2nd referendum has not failed. It has achieved a very important purpose. It has touched a nerve. 
Vince Cable to join anti-Brexit protest outside Tory party conference this weekend  
Brexit: political correctness gone mad. My latest blogpost just up:  
We are being collectively punished by #Iraq for participating in a referendum. Where are the western leaders & their democratic principles? 
'We can go INSTANTLY' British diesel-importer DESTROYS politicians Brexit delay 'NONSENSE'  
We hope to be able to announce positive news on this shortly. It is vital the public understands what Brexit means.  
Catalan officials claim more than 60% of voters ready to turn out for referendum #SNT 
Who wants to abandon Brexit and remain in the EU?14% nationally, 30% of Remainers, 8% of the working-class..#Brexit #EU #CPC17 #Lab17 
While we obsess about Brexit, Spain may be about to fall apart. #Catalonia This would be the mother of all crises for the EU. 
If any Brexiter says “We knew what we were voting for” send them this video. 33 mins of confused Brexit gibberish. 
Google workers at Barcelona retained by Spanish police.Judge orders Google ban referèndum apps and links. Is it Freedom ?  
Huge Catalonia's Referendum campaign closing act in Barcelona now.They have weapons.We have no fear.  
No money for our NHS nurses. But...money for Big Ben For Buckingham palace For BrexitOh...and for the DUP. 
I fully support the right of the people of Catalonia to hold a referendum, and will respect their democratic decision. 
My new piece on what US needs to quickly do to protect US interests in post-referendum Kurdistan @WashInstitute  
Really obvious #Brexit metaphor no. 3372:  
Tory minister left gawping after the Brexit campaign founder says ‘Corbyn will be the next PM’ [VIDEO]  
if  referendum took place on Scotland's constitutional future how would you vote  
"The British people last year voted to leave, the British people did not vote for the transitional period." #Brexit  
Brexit is a UK Government power grab which will undermine our national voice  
Every time Jean-Claude Juncker comments on the progress of #Brexit, it convinces me of how right the British people were to leave the #EU. 
Catalan police (@Mossos, ~17k officers) orders no use of force against polling sites for Sunday's independence referendum. Spain effectively must rely on approximately 15k other police (@GuardiaCivil and @policia) that have been moved into Catalonia.  
.@BHL Interviews President Masoud Barzani after the historic referendum  
UPDATE: Google ordered to delete app providing info on Catalan referendum  
New study concludes that #Brexit is 'potentially catastrophic' for the #NHS. Opposite of #borisjohnson red bus lies. 
OPINION: An independence referendum is particularly dangerous in a divided society like Catalonia  
Brexit: the impact on Ireland. Check out our in-depth article on the consequences  
Great exposure of one of the most important government Brexit lies by @nickreeves9876 
The Tories are withholding a food price report post-Brexit. Leave or Remain: They shouldn't be doing this #ToriesOut  
One in three young people's mental health has deteriorated since Brexit vote, survey shows  
Brexit 'potentially catastrophic' for the NHS, Lancet study claims  
If Catalonia's referendum passes, they will declare independence w/in 48 hours. Which I guess means civil war in 49. 
Just weeks ago>> 'May needs to "get her finger out" over Brexit because it is going to be a "disaster", Ryanair's chief executive.' 
Meeting Catalan President @KRLS today in Barcelona with parliamentary observers delegation in advance of independence referendum.  
The government finally stops lying and admits that Article 50 can be revoked! #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit  
We're hiring a new Policy & Parliamentary Relations Officer to champion our rights leading on @Appg_Brexit   
The Queens head in pinner still flying the flag since the advisory referendum. Great place for a drink. #London #EUloudandproud 
Another nail in the Brexit coffin of transparency. Seismic changes affecting us, & we're all expected just to trust we're in safe hands.  
In Catalonia, many will defy Madrid's orders and vote in the independence referendum. No one knows what comes next.  
This is very good: "I’ve annotated the government’s response to the petition calling for another Brexit referendum"  
Plz @Google confirm/deny you've been ordered to delete #1O referendum links/app. If so, will u stop operating in Spain like u did in China? 
NEWS: Anti-Brexit star of the Labour Party conference, Cameron Clack @CamClack, will speak at the #StopBrexit National march Manchester! 
I can't wait  until we find out the real cost for #Brexit after the Tories bottle every negotiation with EU..  
The Canadian High Commissioner tells @IainDale a UK-Canada Brexit trade deal could be “even better” than the one it has with the EU  
Nice to meet you Mrs. Prime minister @theresa_may today in Tallinn. I hope you enjoyed the sunny day #brexit #theresamay 
Over 140 websites related to ‘unconstitutional’ Catalan referendum must be taken down – court  
."There are no pots of gold at the end of the Brexit rainbow.". 
BREAKING: Google removes Catalan referendum app. Statement from Google to follow.  
The delays and bullshit being experienced by our negotiators is bullshit. This is conspiracy between UK & EU. Brexit is possible instantly. 
That's £430 million to restore Big Ben & Buckingham Palace, £1bn for DUP, plus £?bn for Brexit. Lads, I fear the UK is actually quite rich 
#BREAKING Catalans occupy polling stations to protect referendum: AFP reporters 
More than 60% of voters are expected to take part in Catalonia's independence referendum  
Scandal: Guardia Civil police has held Google staff at their BCN office for hours to order removal of #1Oct #referendum app, search results  
Spanish court orders Google to remove an app that shows people where to vote in Sunday's independence referendum in Catalonia 
Spanish gov. orders @google to delete links and apps to vote on Catalan Referendum #1O 
1. The language used in the government's email, rejecting a second referendum on Brexit after over a reported 100k people signed it... 
.@VinceCable on why he's joining Brexit protest outside Tory conference in Manchester on Sunday  
Former European Court of Justice judge: Why the sequencing of the Brexit negotiations should be abandoned  
Speaking of crackdowns, thanks for not saying that promoting such a referendum in Russia carries a 5 year jail term. 
Thanks #Brexit  
You wanted Brexit. That meant hard Brexit. Have the balls to own it and stop blaming other people for your decisions  
Catalonia refuses to halt independence referendum, defying Spanish court  by @RobertMackey 
This is the referendum app on Google Play that the judge has ordered taken down. Currently has about 1,200 installs. 
@jameschappers Why no BBC coverage of the Lancet report "catastrophic effect of Brexit on NHS"?  
LATEST: High Court in Catalonia orders Google Inc, Mountain View CA 94043, to remove referendum app tweeted by Puigdemont from Google Play.  
Spain urges Google to censor content on referendum. As you will, @EU_Commission. No rush. #HiTurkey #HiDictatorship 
A few questions on this so here you are EU Brexit resolution: Article 50 can be revoked   
BREAKING: Spanish government orders Google to delete links related to the Catalan independence referendum. 
Catalan Foreign Minister in Brussels: Parliament will declare independence if 'yes' wins referendum  
Spanish press: Google ordered to delete links to app on voting information for Catalonia referendum on Synday. Google staff in Barcelona detained in their office for a few hours. #1o 
From #Brexit to #CATExit #Catalonia #CatalonianReferendum #indyref 
Brexit on the menu at TallinnSoupe et douche froides.....  
Congratulations to @_HenryBolton on his election. Looking forward to UKIP focusing on three priorities now: Brexit, Brexit, Brexit. 
Not sure what's funnier, the idea that Brexit policy is of highest quality or that they are deliberating about it in private. 
It's like it's written by someone satirising the government's Brexit strategy. 
This is yet another sign of the Government desperate to avoid scrutiny and seeking to bypass Parliament and the public on Brexit. (2/2)  
.@DExEUgov have declined my FOI request to publish the Brexit impact studies. We must know the facts of leaving the European Union. (1/2)  
On Thames with @LondonPortAuth.  No way London #ports like #Tilbury can manage inspection if #Brexit involves customs checks. 
Catalonia referendum: Tractors roll into Barcelona to defend vote   BBC News 
You have the crapiest analogies! Brexit is like moving from a house to street-living and convincing yourself it was worth it. Control! 
Henry Bolton elected UKIP leader, never heard of him, AMW came second, just hope they can unite for the sake of this country & Brexit. 
Catalan leaders vow to push forward on independence referendum  
Don't miss an interview with the journalist who knows where all the #Brexit bodies are buried. Former Mail Political Editor @jameschappers tells all next Monday   @EventbriteUK 
Rural agents in favor of democracy and the referendum. Goosebumps. #Votarem 
Should the UT-A&M rivalry game be revived? Those who voted in yesterday's referendum seem to think so   
 The Guardian: "Catalan leaders compare Spain to North Korea after referendum sites blocked" #1Oct ##Catalonia 
New UKIP leader Henry Bolton says Brexit is party's "core task" but not "the end of the line" for them  
There is no evidence that the UK will be able reap a bonanza from #Brexit. Brexiters must admit their lies. 
The U.S. owes it to the Kurds to help de-escalate tensions after the independence referendum  
For Catalonia Separatists, Language Is The Key To Identity: How language is influencing an independence referendum 
Tory MEP leading hard Brexit lobbying group backed by Boris Johnson called the NHS "a mistake"  
Catalan Separatists Unveil Ballot Boxes; Spain To Shut Barcelona Airspace, Says "Referendum Won't Happen"  
"#Catalonia referendum: tractors roll into Barcelona to defend vote" (via @BBCWorld). 
Catalan officials claim more than 60% of voters ready to turn out for referendum  
Debate over Pique/Spain comes back to same thing so often (deliberately) misconstrued. He backs a referendum, not necessarily independence 
With Brexit, what kind of border will the Republic of Ireland and Northern Ireland have? People on both sides are worried.  
The Eurozone will survive after Brexit – even if the UK crashes out of the EU  
We are ruled by a government which clearly wants to conduct #Brexit in the manner of a dictatorship. #StopBrexit #Remain 
The govt doesn't want a debate on the petition for a Final Deal referendum. Read their response then sign/RT#Brexit 
.@JonnElledge has annotated the government’s response to the petition calling for another Brexit referendum:  
Spain’s Data Protection Agency has joined the efforts to prevent the October 1 referendum from taking place  . 
George Osborne's family business loses out on £1m profit because of Brexit 
Impressionant #video!!#Catalunya #1octubre2017 #Votarem #Bcn #1Oct #Llibertat #Referendum #adeuEspanya #Republica #Espana #Freedom #piolin 
David Davis returns to London after successfully concluding Brexit negotiations  #BladeRunner2049 
Whatever the outcome of the referendum, no one should expect Catalan independence any time soon.  
Thousands took to Barcelona's streets in MASSIVE pro-Catalan #referendum #protests #Catalonia #Barcelona 
The #UKIPLion is ready to savage the enemies of the people who resist our glorious Brexit  
Tractors roll onto the streets of Barcelona, as Catalonia referendum battle lines drawn 
The European Parliament rejected including the October 1 referendum on the agenda for its next plenary session . 
Looking forward to joining anti-Brexit protest outside Tory party conference  
Mini-thread on the insanity of our 'Brexit divorce bill'.  
Very striking logo that hopefully does what it shows on the tin -the Lion within the British people must roar to stop backsliding on Brexit!  
OPINION: An independence referendum is particularly dangerous in a region like Catalonia  
#Catalonia: in #Tarragona alone hundreds of farmers have gathered for the upcoming referendum  
"Remain Cabinet must be swept aside and replaced with Brexiteers who are capable of delivering Brexit." @JohnBickleyUKIP #UKIPConf 
From new figures showing Scotland making progress under the SNP to Brexit, here's what your SNP MSPs did this week.  
Our survey. Party members approve of Johnson’s Brexit article, but many are displeased with May’s Florence speech  
Watch the moment Brexit campaign chief says Jeremy Corbyn will be the next PM – if Theresa May stays on  
Started out as Remain, this Guy now makes me look forward to #Brexit :#ByeGuy 
"So far, Theresa May's handling of Brexit has been an utter shambles. She is showing herself to be Theresa the Appeaser." #UKIPConf 
'We can go INSTANTLY' British diesel-importer DESTROYS polticians Brexit delay 'NONSENSE'   
Boris could be sacked over allegations he used government resources to host hard Brexit event at the Foreign Office.  
With all this #Brexit chat going on I want to introduce Roger- one of the amazing #EU nurses @Leic_hospitalThey are a HUGE part of #teamED 
#Catalonia: all throughout the regions Catalan farmers are gathering w/ their tractors, stating they'll protect the polls on referendum day  
Rural agents in favor of democracy and the referendum. Goosebumps.  
An MEP admits the EU's negotiating strategy is to sabotage Brexit!  
It is very likely that a final deal, whatever it is, would be opposed by a majority of the people. What of democracy then?#Brexit #Remain 
DYI ballot. Spain's military police claim to have seized 12.5 million ballots in their attempt to stop Catalonia's referendum. Every 2nd household and every business has a printer so Catalans are spreading the ballot image as a backup.  
Vince Cable to join anti-Brexit protest outside Tory party conference  
Given the government's determination to suppress democratic contention on #Brexit, I advocate that we start speaking of the 'Tory regime' 
UK Islam - Terror attacks, child grooming, homophobia & people recruited to ISIS = Be tolerantLabour - overlooking of child grooming, illegal war in Iraq & antisemitism huge increase = ProgressiveUKIP - Wanting Brexit, controling borders & limiting criminals to UK = Intolerant 
The UK has abandoned two red lines in the last round of the #Brexit negotiations as a result of t3m/BiE campaign for #citizensrights. 
Spain (Catalonia): Support Independence Referendum on Oct 1?, InvymarkYes: 52%No: 44%#Catalonia 
The prime minister has moved the Brexit talks forward, but splits in her party remain glaring  
Brexit: European Parliament to propose Northern Ireland stays in single market  
UN’s Human Rights Office decries crackdown on Catalan referendum  
WHITTLE: I'll make sure UKIP's the party that delivers Brexit if I win leadership election @prwhittle. 
Love story of both goes back to 2002 when both of them supported mush in referendum #BoriWedsGaali 
Will pirate drone operators flock to Barcelona now that Spain has closed the airspace from now until Monday--during its referendum crackdown? The pictures must be worth a fortune! 
.@JonnElledge has annotated the government’s response to the petition calling for another Brexit referendum:  
Can't shake feeling that there's a way back for Ukip (or a new party) if a "Brexit betrayal" narrative develops. 
"We have demanded to negotiate the referendum. It is not a crime," says Catalan Foreign Affairs Minister. Watch it here   
Belgian MEP claims EU negotiation strategy is about sabotaging Brexit.  
Always obvious that EU would be guided by politics not economics over Brexit Brexiteers were either stupid or lying when said the opposite 
Germany's unemployment rate hits a record low as its economy powers ahead  
I’ve annotated the government’s response to the petition calling for another Brexit referendum  
'We can go INSTANTLY' Leave-voting diesel importer blasts politicians' Brexit 'NONSENSE'  
"Read my lips: #Brexit is unachievable!"@JunckerEUWhat's more @theresa_may and whole UK Govt know this 
Once more for those at the back.The only "Soft" Brexit is one which accepts EU Freedom of Movement.All the rest are Hard Brexit. 
This is the ballot box for the Catalan referendum. @catalangov says citizens will be able to vote even if polling stations are sealed off. 
Tractors in Lleida in defense of Catalonia's referendum for independence#votarem 
Make sure Theresa May hears Manchester’s voice, your voice, demanding the chance of an exit from Brexit.  
.@M_AndersonSF meets Catalan President ahead of independence referendum #Catalonia 
If Ann Marie Waters wins the UKIP leadership the party will sink without trace. #UKIPleadership #Brexit @talkRADIO #Moats 
The petulance of this response is shocking. #brexit  
Do you think #Labour would do a better job than the #conservatives with the European Union negotiations? #brexitRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
#UPDATE #Catalonia government says over  2,300 polling stations ready for independence referendum  
TEV-DEM declares its solidarity with Catalonia and supports its referendum (ANHA)  
FC Barcelona’s important role in the Catalan independence referendum - me for @FT  
Today on S&S @ayeshahazarika is joined by @campbellclaret @IainDale and @suziruffell to talk Corbyn, Brexit and Uber  
Do you support Catalonia's independence referendum? 
Brexit in one image:  
Catalan leader says is sure voters will act peacefully in independence referendum  
Only 'miracles' can move Brexit talks forward by October, EU tells Britain  
Jean-Claude Juncker, President of European Commission, said 'miracles' would be needed to make progress on Brexit  
And if the #Brexit deal doesn't work for Britain...? 
The President and Minister Romeva receive an international parliamentary delegation visiting Catalonia for Sunday’s #referendum  
A thousand tractors in Tarragona in defense of the referendum. #garantimreferendum @assembleapagesa #Catalonia 
No! @Nigel_Farage When Brexit is a disaster you fucking stay. You fucking started it, you fucking own it, no fucking hiding place for you.  
UKIP "relaunching Brexit campaign" today, announce national "doorstep campaign" to get Britain out of the EU. #OutNow 
BREAKING @ukip launches new nationwide Brexit campaign under the slogan "Out now".  
SPAIN'S GOVERNMENT SPOKESMAN SAYS THERE WILL BE NO INDEPENDENCE VOTE IN CATALONIA ON SUNDAY;CATALAN REFERENDUM WON'T HAPPEN: MENDEZ DE VIGO 
BREAKING. First images of the ballot boxes that will be used for sunday's referendum. Very high expectation among journalists. #Catalonia 
Jean-Claude Juncker says Britain needs "miracles" for Brexit trade talks to start in October  
This is a ballot box for the Catalan independence referendum. Ministers presented it today during a press conference in Barcelona  
Aaaand the first "country" to recognize the results of the Iraqi Kurdistan referendum is... Nagorno-Karabakh  
1) Today on #dailypolitics "We should be preparing for no deal on #Brexit"Ok, perhaps we should...But we weren't promised this in the ref 
New study in the respected health journal The Lancet says that Brexit poses “substantial threats” to NHS staff levels, funding and drug treatment. “Almost every part” of health service, from organ transplants to curbs on tobacco, would be hit hard #BrexitShambles #SaveOurNHS 
Sergio Ramos on Gerard Pique’s Catalan referendum tweet: "His tweet isn't the best if you don’t want the Spanish fans to whistle him."  
May's appointment of Fairhead as trade minister suggests she thinks crime is the answer to Brexit trade deficit. Drug money kept HSBC afloat 
This response from the no mandate DExEU is astonishing. If that doesn't incite you into action nothing will......... 
The government's stance makes it all the more urgent to heed Attlee and Thatcher's warning against the danger of referendums. #Brexit /6  
Lords cannot block Brexit.That happens by operation of law on 29 March 2019 (or another agreed date).So not against "will of people". 
Vice President Junqueras, Spokesman Turull and Minister Romeva present the ballot box which will be used for the referendum on #October1 
OFFICIAL: These are the ballot boxes for the Catalan independence referendum on Sunday.  
Once the 'Will of the People' is invoked there are the people, and there are the enemies of the people, traitors & outsiders.#Brexit /4  
Urna. #1OCT #Referèndumvia @324cat 
Dinner at the EU Digital Summit in Tallinn. A picture that paints a thousand words.#Maybot#Brexit#TheresaMay#EU 
The Catalan sports minister has claimed Barcelona could play in the PL if the region's independence referendum is passed on Sunday. Spain seem inclined to expel Barca from La Liga if regions votes for independence. He cites Welsh clubs in England and Monaco in Ligue 1 as examples 
The notion of the "Will of the People" is profoundly toxic to democracy protraying political opponents as enemies of democracy. #Brexit /2  
#RichardTice: says that #UK #politicians should put the UK first when it comes to negotiating any new #TradeDeals! #BBC #SKY #EU #BREXIT  
"At the moment, both sides are heading for the most extreme form of Brexit: A breakup with no deal at all". Ominous words  
Just back from Germany, where this seems to be very much the sentiment. Bemusement at Brexit has given way to indifference.  
BREAKING: Government of Catalonia says more than 2300 polling booths are ready ahead of independence referendum 
Catalonia's independence referendum is set to go ahead on October 1. Here's what you need to know:  
FFS.Only European defence mechanism worthy of “unconditional” support after Brexit is #NATO. *Not* #EU.May must go 
UKIP. The Lion party.Well, they were lion about immigrants, lion about the economy and lion about Brexit, so this is very on brand.  
Statement #Spain: The work of human rights defenders must be respected amidst conflict over referendum in #Catalonia  
There might actually be more violence in this independence referendum than there was in Iraqi Kurdistan...  
Catalonia: Teachers and students prepare to open schools for referendum  
Theresa May is not trying to sabotage Brexit.It is just that her actions would be indistinguishable if she were.  
#Brexit that works for Britain? True meaningful vote for MPs must have all options on the table  via @RCorbettMEP 
#BREAKING Catalan government says over 2,300 polling stations ready for the independence referendum 
We encourage anybody and everybody to march tomorrow and tell @campaignforleo that any referendum less than the citizens assembly recommendations is not good enough. We are doing this for the health and safety of Irish pregnant people, our family, friends and patients #ARCMarch17 
THIS WOMEN IS SO BIUSY RUNNING THE COUNTRY AND BREXIT. BUT SHE CAN ALWAYS FIND TIME FOR A NON TAX PAYING COMPANY CORRUPTION CORRUPTION  
Great profile of the man behind Catalonia's independence referendum  by @Mrs_forecast 
I have never wanted to live anywhere else but Brexit has made me realise how small minded and selfish many Brits are. I am no longer content 
This is the same Brian WilsonWho, in 1979 went to Court of Session to block TV Party Political Broadcasts for 1979 Referendum  
#StopBrexit #bollocksobrexit . Brexit will make the UK poorer. Only the rich can afford #Brexit  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately PLEASE SIGN THEN RETWEET 
5,345,358 Catalans eligible to vote on Catalonia's independence referendum. There will be 2,315 polling stations around the country 
 @raulromeva: "We have demanded to negotiate the referendum. It is not a crime” #1OCT 
I would love to see the Spanish government holding a press conference in 3 different languages #Catalonia #1O #ReferendumFoto @naciodigital 
Catalan separatists call supporters onto streets for 'peaceful' referendum day  
Spain has passed Turkish authoritarianism on Catalan independence referendum, they've opened the China playbook now. 
Beautiful video of a Spanish paramilitary police on horse transforming into a ballot box for #Catalonia referendum 
Britain being bullied & blackmailed by unelected neo-liberal austeritycrats in Brussels and WAY too many "liberals" here support it #Brexit 
NEWS! As Brexit talks reach deadlock, David Davis considers drastic step of putting in a full day’s work  
Just landed in Barcelona with @LNBDublin for the Catalan Independence referendum. It's going to be an interesting few days. 
Welcome to the UK, a dictatorship. This response to a 2nd Referendum on Brexit should scare the bejeezus out of you  
Colin Firth is now an Italian as well as a British citizen.Do more Brits want dual EU nationality after #Brexit?  
The response to this petition is provocative & undemocratic. Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
"We can never have another referendum. Because democracy."  
EU leaders 'set to agree Britain’s request for two year post-Brexit transition' 
Carney was a key player in Project Fear and is no doubt still opposed to Brexit.  
Spain asks for aerial space for helicopters and small planes to be shut down in Barcelona during Oct 1 referendum 
How will #Brexit affect health and health services in the UK? New Health Policy paper published today  
.@RussellGroup really starting to show its exasperation on the progress of #Brexit talks...  
The petition isn't asking for a second referendum. It's asking for a referendum on final deal. They haven't even read the bloody petition 
'Cheats do prosper, liars win, #Brexit is happening, #Trump is president' - @mrjamesob on @LBC 
The president of the European Commission just warned Britain needs a 'miracle' to meet Brexit deadline  
#BREAKING Columns of hundreds of tractors going to #Barcelona & other large cities to defend #Catalonia #referendum 
Brexit: It just gets worse and worse. UK's trade with EU more important than claims by Leave campaign suggest  
At least someone is prepared to tell us the truth. The Government are covering up the effects of Brexit on the economy. Time to #StopBrexit 
Boris Johnson Challenges PM, Demands Short Brexit ‘Transition Period’  
Belgian MEP: EU’s negotiation strategy is to sabotage Brexit  
90yr old Brexit dad has asked me to get him a new book, I've just ordered @J_amesp Alternative War for him.  Wicked daughter #StopBrexit 
Brexit: Like resigning from a tennis club and demanding to have full access to the courts without obeying club rules & paying membership fee 
Iran arrests dozens of its Kurds for celebrating Kurdish referendum.  
A democracy that ignores votes of such a significant proportion of 'its people' is not a genuine democracy. Brexit is merely the symptom.  
"Between 70 and 80 percent of Catalans say they want to decide once and for all" — Catalan referendum podcast debate  
Lancet piece on the danger Brexit poses to health  
In 1979 the Scottish Referendum was 52/48 for YESThe UK Government overturned it using the 40% ruleWhich the 2016 referendum would fail  
Don't let the rain forecast put you off for Manchester march & rally on Sunday. We're better than rain. We're better than Brexit. 
And do the Hedgies who paid for Brexit and made a mint crashing the Pound care? They do not.  
There is total proof now that the EU is conspiring against Britain in an attempt to overthrow Brexit. Why has government not complained ???? 
The president of the European Commission just warned Britain needs a 'miracle' to meet Brexit deadline  
‘What part of LEAVE don't you get?!’ May blasted for Brexit transition 'no one voted for'  
Brexit is a risk to almost every part of the NHS... new Lancet study: 
I made this graph this morning. It's the annual growth rate of food prices in the UK. The red line is #Brexit. Data from @OECD. 
It's Theresa May's birthday on Sunday. So what better day to protest her Brexit plans? All you need to know here:  
The EU is terrified that Britain will become a low tax, business friendly haven after Brexit 
This rejection of a debate on a 2nd referendum is straight out of the UKIP cut and paste playbook. They even say "leaving EU not Europe"  
Theresa May let in a record 650,000 migrants last year, despite talking 'tough' on immigration. Why would anyone trust her with Brexit?  
This is outrageous. 100k people signed this petition for debate on a 2nd referendum and a govt dept has rejected it   
Really crazy. We just want that Spain respect fundamental rights in response to Catalan referendum. 
Manchester Central, hosting the Tory conference part-funded by EU #WhatsTheEUeverDone4us #Brexit #StopIfDirected 
Spanish Ambassador threatens Finland because an MP  (@KarnaMikko) supports the Catalan referendum and doesn't want to meet. Crazy.  
Ignorance is the opposite of patriotism. Fools like this Leaver are betraying their country. #Brexit  
Hysterical tone from government on 2nd referendum: 'the British people have spoken!' (rubbish): 'NO going back! NO debate!!' - Panicky, eh? 
Guy Verhoftstadt, chief Brexit co-ordinator for the European Parliament, didn't hold back about his thoughts on Brexit in a speech at LSE  
Belgian MEP: EU’s negotiation strategy is to sabotage Brexit  
To reject #brexit is not to reject #democracy, but to pay heed to evidence and place the people first. 
Calls for Boris Johnson to be sacked after 'breaking Ministerial Code' with hard Brexit event  
There is no good Brexit.Brexit in any form poses major risks to NHS, academics say  
Again. Why do you not inform the media of your visits, Mr Gove? We have some great questions for you. #Brexit  
Young people 'more anxious than ever' due to Brexit and rising debt  
VERHOFSTADT: Brexit is waste of time and energy. We'll be the judges of that thanks Guy!  
On my way to 2nd w'end of Citizens' Assembly on Brexit. Time for recommendations #demopart #brexitassembly  
Amazing response to 2nd referendum petition from government: dictatorial tone, emphatic rejection. We are being subjected to a coup. 
#Brexit effects will be far worse than Black Wednesday (if we go ahead with it): 
Sums up Labour - instead of taking apart the Tories over Brexit, universal credit or education, they're focusing on 'centrist dads' 
Mark Carney says the legal validity of tens of thousands EU and UK derivatives contracts could be called into question by Brexit. 
On current form the outcome of Brexit will be such pressure on food prices that out of date chicken may become an unacknowledged norm. 
And Mark Carney's double generosity to May and government is his unambiguous statement that Brexit is undermining UK's growth potential 
"Brexit means Brexit" Theresa May in splendid isolation amongst our #EU friends  .. 
If we follow their roadmap, we will never be allowed to leave. Let's go offroad and demand brexit now!  
The 'Brexit Vote' Premier League Table Everton 2nd most votes to leave, Liverpool 19th - despite being in the same city..    
It wasn't the breakthrough Theresa May hoped for - plus Friday's other Brexit headlines  
We need more democracy not less. Every day the need for a ratification referendum becomes more urgent. Please sign and share #Brexit  
From the LRB, on the commonly accepted notion that it was the 'white working-class' that voted for Brexit.  
Economists are warning that any kind of Brexit is bad news for the NHS  
Important report on "substantial threats" to NHS from Brexit by a leading medical journal.This requires a formal response from government.  
Friends! Other racist sayings:"Not all white people are bad", "Some non-white people are bad", "Terrorism is wrong", & "I support Brexit".  
Brexit is Britain’s gift to the world  via @FT 
There'll just be a lot of noise about how this isn't what they meant when they said Brexit and it doesn't count. 
On 23/06/16 a large stone was lifted and a lot of simple scurrying creatures emerged; time to replace the stone. 
When Brexit happens and it’s dreadful, there must be a reckoning, both main parties have shown themselves to be unfit to govern. 
Staff levels, funding, drug safety, even transplants 'at risk' from #Brexit: we need to #StopBrexit to #SaveOurNHS 
EU thinks David Davis could be holding up Brexit talks  
Oh Jer-e-my Cor-byn: Doesn't CareOh Jer-e-my Cor-byn: Wants BrexitOh Jer-e-my Cor-byn: Will Wreck The NHSOh. 
"Bait. Switch. Repeat." Brexit in three words.  
How to avoid a bad Brexit? Rediscover the art of British diplomacy | Peter Hain  
Brexit in any form poses major risks to NHS, academics say  
Will @NigelNelson get klaxoned again at 7.40 in @SkyNews for bringing up #Brexit ?!  
Any form of Brexit is dangerous for the NHS. Lancet study looks at the different options.  
Third of young people say their mental health has deteriorated since Brexit vote, survey shows  
Brexit potentially catastrophic for NHS - Lancet study. 
Brexit in any form poses major risks to NHS, academics say  
Freedom of movement used to be only for the rich  then with EU it was for everyone  after Brexit it will only be for the rich again  
Macron's reforms paying off? Bank of America in talks to move parts of its London trading hub to Paris post-Brexit  
Liz Kershaw gets her hooter out if Nigel says #brexit @skystephen @SunriseIsabel @LizKershawDJ @NigelNelson 
Spain's Civil Guard Seizes 2.5Mln Ballots for Catalan Independence Referendum  
| Pique:"We will Vote"The Barcelona defender tweeted his support for the independence referendum  
#Brexit likely to have far-reaching impact on all aspects of #NHS and health - analysis of three possible scenarios  
Suspect the "fact" Europe's economy barely matters is too central to world view of Britain's Brexit elite for them to accept the below.  
Wilson Center Expert: US wrong to reject Kurdistan referendum  
I forgot to drink the cool aid - in the brave new world after Brexit, Trump magics into Prince Charming. Total idiocy.  
But his ideas are dishonest: in a hard Brexit scenario there simply is no story for the many.  
Huge Trump tariff on Bombardier, the biggest UK-based train manufacturer, destroys 'free trade with the wider world' Brexit nonsense 
The dumbest take on the Kurdistan referendum (so far)  
Banks are pressing on with plans to move staff from London because of Brexit  
Catalan Govt will explain at noon the details of sunday's #Referendum #1Oct #CatalanReferendum 
If you voted for Brexit to give the NHS extra money then you had better listen up!   
Gov responds to petition for a ref on Brexit deal ‘No attempts to rejoin it through the back door’ How is consulting the people a back door?  
Last nights dinner at the Talin European meeting. Mrs May alone nobody turning to her. A picture worth 1000 words ? #BrexitReality #Brexit  
Theresa May set for Brexit-focused meeting with Angela Merkel  
1. Economically there isn't much of a case to be made for Brexit in the short to mid term. Tory delusions do not hold water. 
Catalonia aims to stage an illegal referendum on Sunday. Here's what it means to investors  
So there you have it. UKGov says Brexit at any cost, with Parliament to choose only between a bad deal & no deal.  
Brexit 'potentially catastrophic' for the health service, experts suggest in Lancet journal @TamaraHervey @Nickf72 
#NHS under threat from #Brexit detailed report on staff shortages   by @martinmckee @guardian @Scientists4EU @EK_EuropeanMove @Labour4EU 
The historic Kurdish independence referendum, explained  
In which @Jacob_Rees_Mogg explicitly contemplates stripping UK citizens of rights after Brexit. Will you tell us what rights, Jacob?  
#Catalonia urges EU to mediate on independence, ‘secretly prints’ referendum ballots  
If you read the article, there''s no such thing☞ David Davis claims 'decisive steps forward' in Brexit talks  
If you want to know more about #Brexit, in particular how it will impact Ireland, pick up my @rtenews colleague @tconnellyRTE's new book  
Statement of Spokesman on US State Department Spokesperson’s comment on Turkey’s statement as to KRG Referendum 
Independence referendum answers many Kurdish dreams, but for Baghdad and its allies it's a call to arms  
London's mayor isn't afraid of Brexit, ISIS or telling Donald Trump he's wrong  
Brexit: Are more British nationals applying for dual nationality in the EU?  
100 years after the Sykes-Picot deal, the northern Iraq referendum could divide the Middle East yet again. What are the consequences?  
“The Kurdish Referendum Could Spark Another Middle East War” by @NGrossman81 
The U.S. owes it to the Kurds to help de-escalate tensions after the independence referendum  
On the ramping censorship in Spain around the Catalan referendum  
Young people 'more anxious than ever' due to Brexit and rising debt  
The Spanish government in Madrid is trying every way it can to stop Catalonia's independence referendum Sunday  
Former Aussie Prime Minister Is Angry Macklemore Plans to Perform ‘Same Love’ in Midst of Gay Marriage Referendum  
Theresa May set for Brexit-focused meeting with Angela Merkel  
The U.S. owes it to the Kurds to help de-escalate tensions after the independence referendum  by @IgnatiusPost 
Opinion: Catalonia’s secession referendum in Spain could lead to further conflict, writes @tunkuv 
Good news! Ireland is holding a referendum next year to vote on easing the country's strict abortion ban.  
Verhofstadt: Brexit is a waste of time and energy  
There will be #Brexit. The greatest opportunity for our #Country in almost 50 years. The World awaits us. And we must embrace the #World! 
Just home from Wakefield after a revealing #C4News #BrexitReality debate. Agreement on Brexit but confusion, impatience and anger over how  
The world is on the verge of nuclear war, Brexit negotiations are going nowhere, yet the prime minister can talk about a mini cab company.  
#Maine Voices: Mainers should shun reviled Briton who campaigned for Brexit  
Brexit is the Obamacare repeal of British politics.  
How to stop a run on the £? - Cancel Brexit of course! #BBCTW 
Young people 'more anxious than ever' due to Brexit and rising debt  
Brilliant Brexit Report: EU Accounts for 50% our Export. Brexiters lied even on this or I suspect they have no idea   
Where could #Brexit #Patriot Farage go? 
Turkey's Erdogan calls Iraqi Kurdish referendum illegitimate  
Top-ranking European politicians turned their backs on Theresa May's big Brexit speech.  
Given that Scotland voted to remain in EU by 62% to 38%, should Scotland not be given same option?#Brexit #scotref 
Although many British farmers apparently voted for Brexit it will kill their industry as surely as Xmas will kill their turkeys.  
Brexit's health effect: new Lancet paper w @martinmckee  
I know great journalists on Brexit papers who don't have to write Brexit bollocks.I hope they'll now ask if they can write honestly about it 
Should they Bring back National service 
A mass exodus at the airport in Erbil, less than 24 hours before Baghdad plans to close Kurdish airspace in response to referendum.  
That's what's angered me most about conduct of Brexit negotiations the very idea of human 'bargaining chip' articulated by a senior Minister  
There is one sensible thing to do, and much good will flow from doing it: Stop Brexit. 
#bbcqt How come these people don't see the difference between an election which can be overturned 5 years later and the Brexit Referendum? 
Just a reminder that the UK economy is tanking directly due to the Brexit vote. #BBCQT 
Chancellor Angela Merkel's chief of staff described Brexit negotiations as an "awful complicated mess" #bbcqt  
WATCH | Leave.EU co-founder, @TiceRichard blasts Labour for its ever changing position on Brexit, gets a commitment to no second referendum!  
Interesting isn't it, for five years there seemed like a blackout on discussing Uber in Parliament. Now it seems bigger than Brexit 
Each week the #bbcqt re-runs the Brexit referendum debate. They CANNOT accept that THEY LOST, WE WON and we ARE leaving. 
As a leftie I'm delighted Labour has found its socialist soul but their Janus-faced nonsense on #Brexit takes progressive voters for mugs 
As Theresa May finally outlines Brexit plans 52% of Brits now want to STAY in the EU #Brexit #BBCQT 
"The labour party is absolutely crystal clear on Brexit" - Ian Lavery #bbcqt 
.@ClarkeMicah says that he did not vote in the EU referendum and says it was a voting result that no party is responsible for #bbcqt 
For all the platitudes, the thing that sticks out from tonight's #bbcqt is that Brexit is a parasite sucking the sanity out of this country. 
Guy Verhofstadt pokes fun at Theresa May over Brexit speech – video  
Welcome to the real world after Brexit - a short, must read  via @FT 
brexit is awful and the worst thing is how slow and grinding it all is like being stuck on a shit fairground ride 
Brexit Poses 'Substantial Threat' To all Of The NHS, Lancet Study Warns @TamaraHervey @Nickf72 @mikegalsworthy  
Support grows for referendum on final #Brexit deal when more facts are known :  
Verhofstadt: Brexit is a waste of time and energy  
Britain must start making very visible preparations for a “no deal” departure from the EU   #Brexit 
Catalonia and Spain ready to talk, but Madrid calls referendum a 'charade'  
Great to see @ScotlandTonight taking Catalan referendum seriously. @CatalansForYes 
A medium sized company Chairman explains the great benefits of the Single Market for companies like his. But who cares, its #Brexit!  
Strong rare CBI/TUC joint statement calling on both sides in Brexit negotiation to stop "human poker" re EU citizens  
Catalonia’s police will not enforce the orders of the Spanish courts to prevent voting in independence referendum  
Growing distrust of BBCNews is largely down to its own pitiful coverage of Iraq, the crash, Tory austerity project, indyref and Brexit 
El Pais claims Spain's military police, the Civil Guard, have seized another 2.5 million ballots, 6 million letters and have surrounded 6000 ballot boxes in their on going attempt to stop #Catalonia's Oct 1 referendum.  
N Ireland - a huge gap in the Brexit story that has been papered over by Leave, May's govt & ideology.Turns out the detail matters.  
Guy Verhofstadt pokes fun at Theresa May over Brexit speech – video  
The atmosphere in #Barcelona ahead of the referendum #1Oct 
Is Brexit going well? #BBCQT 
EU plot to scupper Brexit EXPOSED: Brussels in ‘deeply cynical’ plan to WRECK UK talks  
Russian President Vladimir Putin dodged the Kurdistan Referendum topic and did not attack Kurds today in Ankara. #think 
Catalan Foreign Minister in Brussels: Parliament will declare independence if 'yes' wins referendum  
Are the Brexit talks stalling?  
'We can put tariffs on them!' Labour Brexiteer warns EU in rant about trade after Brexit. German cars 200% tarriff!  
#Spain Why Israel should oppose the Catalonia referendum by Juan Carlos Girauta  via @Jerusalem_Post @GirautaOficial 
Here's everything you need to know about Catalonia's independence referendum:  
EU says no 'sufficient progress' in Brexit talks despite Theresa May's Florence speech creating 'new dynamic'  
I wonder who knows better whether the Catalonia referendum is illegal?SNP MP Joanna Cherry or the Spanish Government?  
With thre EU openly conspiring to bring down brexit we must demand we walk away now. This behaviour is criminal bordering on outrageous. 
Oh boy, @CityWestminster is now really holding @The3Million hostage in the #Brexit talks. No measure too low. I wonder what this half-veiled threat will mean for #London image when this sings around Europe? #tourism 
.A special gift for the DUP from the European ParliamentHow's that Brexit working out for them?#BoughtAndSold. 
Banks are continuing to plan for an exodus from London as Brexit uncertainty goes on  
My short film about gold, trade, and another Brexit claim gone wrong. Been working on it for a while. Hope you enjoy  
ATTENTION | End of AssemblyTomorrow we begin to defend the polling stations. Meet at 11am at the Plaça de la Vila. #GarantimDemocracia #Catalonia #Referendum  
Post-Brexit UK trade deal status: Trade war threatened Copy & paste EU deal As frictionless as poss see  see  see  
What an amazing thing. Our neighborhood meeting of the "Referendum Defense Committee". We're organizing to guarantee democracy. Amazing country.#Catalonia #WeWILLVote #Votarem 
Brexit reality #BrexitReality 
Tomorrow's front page: Groundhog Day as EU says UK STILL can't give Brexit bill clarity and Dutch minister criticises 'lack of realism'  
Mark Carney tells Theresa May that he won't shut up about Brexit  
"Spain must respect fundamental rights in response to Catalan referendum". @ONUHumanRights 
Gamechanger..Brexit: European Parliament to propose Northern Ireland stays in single market | The Independent  
Dear @foreignoffice, I too would like to use your facilities to launch a new non-partisan think-tank, The Institute to Halt Brexit (IHB). 1/  
Our neighbors use weapons, fighters and money to spread anarchy in the Middle East. Kurds vote in a referendum, and the world punishes us. 
Exclusive: You know that Brexit claim UK exports far more outside EU than inside? Turns out that’s not true either:  
#BrexitReality If Brexit is so good and the arguments so strong, why doesn't every EU member country want one? Because it's a myth. 
Demonstrators in Brussels demand an end to Ireland's near-total ban on abortion after referendum set for 2018 #marchforchoice #repealthe8th 
BREAKING: Goldman Sachs has predicted the Yes vote will storm to victory in the Catalan referendum on independence on Sunday. 
Important take home message from the #BrexitReality debate: #brexit voters feel negotiation going badly & that they were mislead. 
Catalonia's "accidental" leader says he is determined that an independence referendum will be held Sunday  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT. #brexitlive #BrexitRef2 #RemainandReform 
As an EU national in UK I am, by now, far too used to Brexit rubbish. But once in a while there is something so outrageous that it makes 1/ 
Quick poll.Is the whole Brexit thing too complicated for a simple Yes / No answer? Choose 'Yes' if you disagree. 
Why do these far right Tory morons appear on every TV Debate ? #brexit  
Catalan leaders call an independence referendum but only 41% are likely to vote yes@TheEconomist explains whypic.twitter.com/PjbW8O0eml 
Catalonian police say they won't enforce Spanish court orders to block Sunday’s independence referendum  
It seems Verhofstadt is behind the latest EU shenanigans designed to frustate Brexit. We must fight fire with fire. 
People in Barcelona are in the streets to protect Catalonia's right to vote in Sunday's independence referendum  
Art. 255(1)(g): A REFERENDUM must be held to alter the OPERATION/independence of the Judiciary, commissions and independent offices. 
This is so true - Brexit HAS stopped Government governing & wasted huge resource, whilst Labour avoids Brexit debate. 
Catalonia independence referendum: All you need to know  
Guy, never thought I'd see an EU country gerrymander a referendum to allow a lunatic fringe to take away rights & prosperity from so many.  
Euro-area economy is forecast to grow by 1.7% this year and 1.8% in 2018  
#brexit not the best idea then  
Verhofstadt: Brexit is a waste of time and energy  
If I was EU #Brexit negotiator I would stall & stall & stall so UK had to take a crap deal. Can YOU not see that @theresa_may?  #WalkAwayMay 
With the uncertain nature of Britiain leaving the EU & the unreliable leadership tasked in doing so, should we have a second referendum ? 
Catalonia: The messy reality of the referendum Spain wants shut down  
#Brexit we need one senior Statesman  to propagate concept of no deal as possible best option..so far no takers... important for debate 
Daniel Hannan MEP - "The delay is not on our side. We’ve come up with all sorts of ways of breaking the deadlock on all issues." #Brexit  
Best reason to cancel Brexit is the irresponsibility of Brexiters. 40 years of campaigning and not even 40 minutes of planning. Failures.  
ICYMI: Catalan parliament president says Spain is repressing basic rights and freedoms to stop referendum  
Tonight's topics. 1. Capitalism vs Socialism 2. Brexit "progress" 3. Islam beyond criticism.  
“I think it’s a bit rich of the Labour party to call the Tories confused and weak on Brexit” #BrexitReality 
Wow. This is really the extent of the 'Brexit is actually good' argument?  
'Illegal' Putin condemns Catalonia referendum and will continue to treat Spain as one  
Beautiful pics by Bûyer of celebrations in Qamişlo after KRG referendum got huge Yes vote percentage of 92%  
That's exactly the irony of Brexit. The places which voted Leave are going to suffer the most. #BrexitReality 
I'm not surprised an Old white man believes in Brexit. Though the old man would not like me saying that! 
Did I just hear that a benefit of Brexit is that we'll be able to train more curry chefs here? #GiveMeStrength #BrexitReality 
Almost all these people firmly - firmly - believe that #Brexit will deliver an end to a decade of stagnant wages and better jobs. #BrexitReality is going to be v v politically turbulent 
'Tusk needs to take a walk!' UK must dictate Brexit terms to EU chief, blasts UK MEP  
Only 3.6% of NHS staff are from the EU #BrexitReality 
"I feel embarrassed at how ill-informed we were during the Brexit debate." Disillusioned voter on #brexitreality debate #c4news 
#StopBrexit. Anti Brexit march.Be in Manchester this Sunday 11am Whitworth Park 
On the 'Brexit bill': “We need to say ‘this is what we’re doing, we’re not going to pay.’” #BrexitReality 
Brexit Poses 'Substantial Threat' To Every Part Of The NHS, Lancet Study Warns  
One of the 1st tankers of #Kurdistan crude to leave Ceyhan since the referendum is called 'Mabrouk'. -via @OilSheppard.#Kurdishreferendum 
Calls for Boris Johnson to be sacked after 'breaking ministerial code' with hard Brexit event  
Just the sort of pesky interference by *Brussels* that the Brexiteers want to rid us of.  #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Premier League fans and the #Brexit vote. Chelsea were top; 3 of the 'Top 5 Remainers' were south coast clubs; a gulf between #LFC and #EFC 
.@phil_goff "doesn't want a campaign of Māori bashing disguised as a democratic referendum" says @simonbwilson 
#Catalonia: New instructions for voting in Sunday's referendum released.#Catalunya: Noves instruccions per votar #1o #Catalunya 
Arthur Scargill accuses Theresa May of betraying Brexit voters  
Banks are pressing on with plans to move staff from London because of Brexit  
UN: "Spain must respect fundamental rights in response to Catalan referendum". By @MariaMacia via @Elnacionalcaten 
Mark Carney lectures Theresa May on Brexit at BoE conference  via @FT 
Brexit negotiators issue traffic light progress document on citizens' rights: - interesting detail, eg disagreement on criminal checks:  
We will seek a new relationship between the EU & the UK that is beneficial to both #LSEbrexit #Brexit 
Theresa May's brexit shambles so desperate she has to bring in criminals like HSBC's Rona Fairhead. #corruption 
Former ECJ judge calls on EU to abandon Brexit sequencing: tactical choice with no obvious benefits & mounting costs  
It is perfectly possible to be a Londoner, English, British and European at the same time #LSEbrexit #Brexit @MayorofLondon 
Tens of thousands take to Barcelona streets in pro-Catalan referendum protests  
For me EU citizenship isnt the by-product of one’s nationality. Citizenship is about together building the EU of tomorrow #LSEbrexit #Brexit 
People say make the best of Brexit. I don't see there's anything to make the best of. It gets worse every day.  
48% voted #Remain.This is not a minority one can ignore. In politics, all significant opinions shld be taken on board #Brexit #LSEbrexit 
My article @spectator looks at #Kurdistan independence referendum, famed Machko teahouse @heminhawrami @FalahMustafa 
My piece for the New Statesman on Brexit and the Single Market   
Can anyone name one authoritative professional organisation which thinks unequivocally that #Brexit is a good idea? 
Theresa May says she will be talking to Nicola Sturgeon in a bid to end the #Brexit deadlock  
Good to see @SadiqKhan at #LSEBrexit talk w/ Guy Verhofstadt about future of Europe. Its good our mayor takes  Brexit/EU situation seriously 
I bet she voted for Brexit  
#BREAKING 700 hundred directors commit w/ opening their schools on #1oct as polling places in #Catalonia #referendum  
The Future of Europe post-Brexit @GuyVerhofstadt speaking shortly @LSEpublicevents, @RochDW live tweeting #LSEBrexit @LSEEI @LSEnews 
Spanish police confiscates 100 ballot boxes of the Barça elections believing they were going to be used in the referendum. Ridiculous. 
About to start my speech on "The Future of Europe Post #Brexit at LSE. You can watch it live on Youtube  #LSEBrexit 
Baghdad suspends all foreign flights to and from Iraqi Kurdish capital in retaliation for independence referendum  
UK Gov called election & #Brexit while prepared for neither. Is there anybody left who thinks Scot cannot Gov self?  
Solidarity with Irish women*! All strength for next years referendum. You will rock! #repealthe8th #marchforchoice 
In a rare joint statement, employers and unions ask for a Brexit deal on EU citizens' rights  
OK, I didn't want to get this far, but you've left me no choice: Brexit is plagioclase's fault; it fractionated all the EU from the UK. SAD! 
Mark Carney tells Theresa May that he won't shut up about Brexit  
NEW #BREXITCAST featuring @Open_Britain's @Alison_McGovern on Brexit and #Lab17 & the latest Barnier / Davis news.  
“Hard #Brexit will hurt EU more than #Britain”  Really?A look behind the Telegraph's wilfully misleading headline 
Strange times we live in when we rely on the Lords to be the main Opposition to the Government on all things Brexit. 
Brexit: Withdrawal bill gives 'excessive' power to ministers, peers warn  
Don't miss part 1 of #BrexitReality live debate. with room full of Brexiteers. Are they getting Brexit they wanted?  
Oh did I mention? Sign this petition for a second #referendum? Surely everyone wants to vote on #BrexitReality deal?  
The message to Rajoy and the Madrid Government is this: “The whole world is watching what you do.”Thanks, Owen. #Catalonia #Referendum #1Oct 
Brexit promotes self-defeating jingoism and an absurd view of UK's place in the world while simultaneously creating a myth of victimhood.  
£10bn of our brexit bill will fund pensions for eurocrats. Accounts show payments rose to £58.9bn in 2016 up £3bn in a year.#WalkAwayMay 
People in Barcelona are in the streets to protect Catalonia's right to vote in Sunday's independence referendum  
Barcelona firefighters protest Spain's censorship crackdown in the lead up to Sunday's independence referendum. #1o 
The U.S. needs to tell its allies to back off the Kurds following the independence referendum.  
Another nail in coffin of Brexit - as I've said consistently, legislation won't get through Lords even if it scrapes through Commons  
NO #JeremyCorbyn WE DON'T WANT YOU S&M STYLE SELF-HARMING #BREXIT! Pre-order the single on Amazon get it in UKTop40!  
What does the world say about Catalan independence? (Thanks, by the way, world :)#Catalonia #Referendum #1Oct  
UCDSU President Katie Ascough will face an impeachment referendum in early October  
How's Devolution a Failed experiment?UKLabour in #Scotland is dead#Brexit wont help them come bk 2 life eitherYou're deludedAs is corbyn  
PM @HaiderAlAbadi outlines to MPs the @IraqiGovt’s response to the illegal referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan:  
#c4news is in Wakefield, setting up for a special programme. Hear what Brexit voters here want to happen next. Tonight at 7 #brexitreality 
Police will deploy at polling stations Sunday to prevent people from voting in the Catalan independence referendum.  
Tonight's 8pm  1. Capitism vs Socialism. 2. Why Brexit "progress" is not really progress. 3. Islam is beyond criticism. Join me! 
KRG rejects all measures taken by Iraq in response to referendum  
I welcome Sadiq Khan’s call for a referendum on the Brexit deal. Shame Labour cabinet has voted for a Tory Brexit. 
.@RachelAFranklin finds reasons to be more optimistic about #Labour opposing #Brexit : 
No plan for a snap general election, no plan for Brexit. Party interest before the national interest. That sums up the state of Theresa May. 
Catalan students went on strike today taking to streets in support of the independence referendum to be held on Sunday. #CatalanReferendum 
All set for Sunday's stop Brexit march in Manchester #liverpool4eu #nevergonnagiveeuup 
UN rights experts: Spain must respect fundamental rights in response to Catalan referendum  
May's only chance now is to turn her back on Ukip-tinged nationalism and be realistic about Brexit  
Good to talk to @DerSPIEGEL about Brexit talks. "It's as if one side is playing cricket and the other soccer"  
Isn't a stupid vote without the complete information in the explicit spirit of brexit? 
Catalan President Puigdemont, has made it clear to Spanish Gov today that he won't suspend the planned referendum. Spain must respected it  
I understand Theresa May will have a discreet Brexit bilat with Angela Merkel in Tallinn tomorrow. Big news if Mutti is re-engaging on this. 
Good work. If brexit was so 'glorious' they'd release the studies. Sign petition here & follow @MollyMEP #RemainAndReform #StopBrexit 
Pleased to meet @NicolaSturgeon  today to discuss mutual Brexit challenges for Wales and Scotland.  
After meeting to discuss Baghdad’s reaction to the referendum, the KRG has rejected all decisions from the central gov’t and parliament  
.@yanisvaroufakis on #Brexit, the future of Europe, and the recovery of the eurozone. Full interview at  
If I recall she was smugly telling tv viewers she would be at home “preparing for Brexit negotiations”Time well spent, there 
'MPs and members of the House of Lords were told that the referendum was advisory only' - @acgrayling 
From On the Brink: Jürgen Klopp speaks about Brexit, the significance of results and the legality of weapons.  
UN rights experts say measures taken to halt independence referendum appear to violate FUNDAMENTAL individual rights#LetCatalansVote #Catalonia 
EXCL George Osborne's family firm loses hundreds of thousands of pounds due to Brexit 
MEPs schedule vote on 'no sufficient Brexit progress' for an hour before May's Tory conference speech. They're not a subtle bunch, bless 'em.  
The Catalan Government welcomes the opinion by @UNHumanRights on Spain's “worrying” efforts to halt the #referendum  
Brexit is backed by fascists, racists and white supremacists. Not every Leave voter is a facist. But every facist voted for Brexit. #Antifa 
The next 48 hours will make if break @UKIP Only @AMDWaters can take it forward post-#Brexit If she fails, UKIP is doomed to extinction 
David Davis IS Swiss Toni. From my sketch on the Brexit talks:  
Brexit divorce bill 'will be even higher' as talks get tougher  
Tweety Bird has become the symbol of the #Catalan referendum.Background:  
These Manchester Brexit march posters are superb. Download, print, protest  
John Wooten and John Carlos refuse to allow #TakeAKnee to be reframed as a referendum on “The Star-Spangled Banner.”  
#Barcelona police seize ballot boxes ahead of Catalan #referendum, which Constitutional Court has ruled illegal  
Instruccions per votar #1Oct #Referendum(Instructions for voting in #1Oct #Referendum a #Catalunya)#cantstoplaughing 
Just spent 2 days in European Parliament. Almost everyone is v sad about terrible damage Tory #Brexit will do to NHS, jobs, incomes .. 
Malkin: Roy Moore's Victory Is a Referendum on 'Swamp King' Mitch McConnell  #DrainTheSwamp #MAGA #United4Trump #tcot 
We're now in compromise period. If Leavers can wean themselves off nationalism and accept a limited eventual Brexit, they can make progress. 
Extract from the excellent 'On the Brink' by @Simon_Hughes__ as Klopp talks Brexit and life in Liverpool #LFC 
Catalonian referendum: The Key that Opens the Lock  @cupnacional @ignasibernat @CaminoCielos @bellacaledonia 
WATCH: @M_AndersonSF to be international observer in Catalonian independence referendum. #indyref @sinnfeinireland  
UN human rights experts: Spain's “worrying” efforts to halt Catalan referendum violate fundamental individual rights  
You can achieve peaceful co-existence when you allow people to decide through #Referendum not by military force   
By trying to stop Catalonia’s referendum, they’ve sparked something much bigger  
#TORY Brexit supremo David Davies taking 'decisive steps' ........ #brexitshambles #BrexitReality pic.twitter.com/7HX6bONz8d 
The Tories divide between those for whom a Corbyn government is a price worth paying for a Hard Brexit, and those for whom it is not. 
Klopp on Brexit, life in Liverpool and why it's all about the results in England. Interview by @Simon_Hughes__ 
The issue isn’t whether if there were an election Labour could beat a Brexit-paralysed Tory Party. The issue is what then? 
My Column: regardless of Brexit, the UK economy is severely challenged. (Brexit makes it worse)  via @FT 
UN: Spain must respect fundamental rights in response to Catalan referendum. #1o  #catalonia #Cataluynia 
Henry VIII stuff is clearly going to go. But key issue in the Lords will be the argument for a referendum on Mrs May's Brexit terms  
There’s far more agreement on the terms of Brexit than the pundits suggest | @DanielJHannan 
Spain blocks Catalan independence websites to in bid to prevent referendum  
ToriesNot prepared for BrexitNot prepared for GENot prepared for FMQsNever prepared for their surgeriesNot a trend? 
.@UNHumanRights experts call on Spain to respect fundamental rights in response to Catalan referendum #LoveDemocracy  
Prof Tridimas from @KingsCollegeLon on #brexit negotiations:  -No agreement on what Leave is-No political representation for Remain (48%)  
I haven't felt like this since the Brexit vote. It's so important. The country has a chance to wake up and smell the coffee with @AMDWaters 
The LI Bureau of has issued a statement concerning the scheduled 1 October referendum in #Catalonia. Read it here:  
EU Parliament resolution on Brexit endorses call for Special Status for the North of Ireland – @mattcarthy  
This will be known as The Brexit Negotiation Bench.  
Catalan independence websites blocked by Spanish government in bid to stop referendum  
A Tory Govt who BELIEVES it has a #Brexit mandate - is a *roaming beast*You HOPE it won't do BAD thingsBut somehow you KNOW it will. 
Nigel Farage watched a right-wing nut stab an elected politician to death, and STILL said that he'd pick up a gun if Brexit doesn't happen.  
Thousands of Catalan students strike in support of #referendum. Follow our on the spot reporting here . 
A must read. Absolutely right - we can't sweep #Brexit under the table, we must lead the national debate on it  
The Spanish government in Madrid is trying every way it can to stop Catalonia's independence referendum Sunday  
It is always good to receive @jaalberda . Exchanged views on latest developments. Stressed our position to deescalate, ready for dialogue with Iraq on Post referendum.  
Catalonia's Firefighters standing by Catalans and in favor of Catalonia's referendum this Sunday #HelpCatalonia_USA 
do u ever just think about how bad brexit is going to be  
One of the ironies of the current status of Brexit talks is that the UK is arguing for free movement for Brits to continue after Brexit  
We can't have EU Court ruling over our Courts after Brexit @MichelBarnier  EU citizens living in U.K must live under U.K law @DavidDavisMP 
DailyFX Morning Digest: USD Rally Stalls; GBP Recovers on Brexit Optimism  
Spain blocks Catalan independence websites to in bid to prevent referendum  
CBI and TUC jointly urge government to unilaterally guarantee rights of EU nationals after Brexit - Politics live  
EU extended transportation of live animals must stop. Brexit will allow the UK to ban this awful practice 
.@M_AndersonSF arrives in Barcelona to begin her duties as an International observer during Catalonian Independence referendum #indyref 
There was a three-parter at @FT called "Brexit by timetable" which set this out...back in April.  
Strong, united and progressive- me on how we must unite to stop hard Brexit | Progress   
Backing down from #brexit may be embarrassing, but also demonstrate a maturity and humility that Britain sorely needs. 
Millions of #Kurds brace themselves for coordinated blockade by Iraq, Iran and Turkey after referendum. Are you affected? #KurdistanBlockade 
This is the sort of quote where it dawns on you our current PM may actually be a moron, completely lacking in all self awareness. #brexit  
The Premier League fanbase most in favour of Brexit revealed 
We students want to choose our own future! #oct1 #referendum #catalonia 
From Brexit to Catalonia, referendums get a bad rap – but we need them | Richard Russell  
Angry & unusual joint CBI/TUC statement on EU-UK citizen rights post Brexit. End the 'human poker'. Do read.  
Catalonia's police force is being asked to prevent an independence referendum, but many could let the vote go ahead  
Pro-independence and unionist students demonstrating together in Figueres to support the referendum. This is Catalonia.  
“the big change is that, with Brexit, the Tories have normalised all forms of radicalism” Spot on, @rafaelbehr  
My statement with @cbicarolyn on EU/UK citizen rights after #Brexit talks. Stop playing poker with people's lives  
Awesome aerial picture of students demonstrating in Barcelona in favor of holding a #referendum on Catalan independence on #1Oct 
Spanish legal experts and judges critical of state response to referendum 
We need a #CLEAROUT of all the #Brexit #TRAITORS! @theresa_may @PhilipHammondUK @AmberRuddHR! #BRITAIN DESERVES BETTER! #BBC #TORY #SKY #EU 
One of my favourite statements on Brexit ever. Don't think she meant it ironically.  
Most MPs and most Ministers know that Brexit is a disaster. But they are scared.Time for courage to save the country before it’s too late.  
MFA Koenders: ‘Big Ben stands still, but #Brexit clock is ticking. Realism in negotiations is no luxury, but necessity'  
#BREAKING: Turkey is working with Iran & Iraq in seeking coordinated action against Kurdistan Regional Government following referendum — PM.  
#BREAKING Thousans of students march to defend #Catalonia's #independence #referendum in front of @UniBarcelona HQ 
The more @theresa_may opens her mouth, the more she lies. The subversion of #Brexit has begun!  #BBC #SKY #TORY #UK 
Barnier points out that no progress has been made in Brexit negotiations - and May and Davis can't agree... again. 
We had a referendum and voted for Brexit So if no deal is likely Great Britain needs too walk away 
86% of panels since referendum have been dominated by remainers...  
Startling : joint statement by UK trade union federation AND business lobby on outrageous post-Brexit citizens rights fiasco  
Theresa May has warned the EU against attempting to diminish the City of London during Brexit negotiations  
Pretty astonishing, to be honest, that @EmmanuelMacron has said more in terms of offering dignified retreat from Brexit than UK politicians 
Shameful: Brexit divorce bill to fund €14m worth of 'free gap years' 4 teens  436K kids had foodbank parcels last yr. 
Since the referendum Remain panelists have outnumbered Leavers by 137-72, nearly twice as many #bbcqt  
Let's not forget the Petition for a Final Deal Referendum now over 110k!#StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
Tories caught off guard by decision to call snap election, says Tory leader who called snap election. See also: Brexit preparations.  
#Canada to continue with its plan to arm the #Kurdish Peshmerga troops despite referendum  
Must see: @gannemans MEP tells @CorePoliticsTV that the EU's negotiation strategy is to sabotage Brexit! Spurred on by @GuyVerhofstadt 
Draft resolution on Brexit: lack of sufficient progress on divorce terms. Check out the press release  
What really went on with #Brexit at #Lab17 - my take with @Alison_McGovern for @TheNewEuropean @laboursinglemkt  
Thousands of students take to the streets in defense of the #1Oct #Referendum #Catalonia. I heard it stretched from Plaça Catalunya to Plaça Espanya! Two of mine are there :) 
Banks are pressing on with plans to move staff from London because of Brexit  
They've parked the first tractor next to the polling station in Borges Blanques to defend the #1Oct #referendum in Catalonia. #estàpassant 
Finally a metaphor for Brexit that Tory MPs will understand  h/t @markxdavies 
This!Farage telling a caller on @LBC: "If #Brexit is a disaster, I will go and live abroad, I'll go and live somewhere else."#Patriotism 
Boris Johnson is completely right to call for a short transition so that we can enjoy the benefits of Brexit sooner 
Catalan students on strike are marching in support of the Oct 1 independence referendum. "Let's go on a general strike," they chant  
'Deliberate restriction of the franchise is gerrymandering: the EU referendum was gerrymandered' - @acgrayling 
European Parliament draft #Brexit resolution essentially endorses special status for the north. Good work by @sinnfeinireland & @GUENGL team 
#Brexit - citizens, Ireland and financial settlement - what was agreed and what more needs to be done  
Cat Brexit talks in Ste Agnès FranceUK:"We're not paying £10bn for Eurofatcats' pensions"Monsieur Barnier Le Chat: "Yawn"@thecatreviewer 
Landed on one of last flights into #Erbil before they're suspended in response to #Kurdish referendum. Pressure mounting from #Iraqi govt 
Surely there must be a police inquiry into the clearly concerted effort to stifle attempts to promote #StopBrexit in #Manchester. #Brexit  
Euro-area confidence surges by more than forecast to the highest level in a decade  
Nationalist morons think Brighton Pavilion is a mosque. The cultureless fearing their culture will be lost.#Brexit 
Read @MichelBarnier's statement following the 4th round of #Brexit negotiations:  
This is a major development. Was insane and utterly impractical to expect those with permanent residence documents to re-apply after Brexit.  
The Government must take animal protection seriously in the #brexit process: ? 
While the Spanish state has censored more than 140 websites (including those outside of Spain by bullying Vondafone, Orange) carrying referendum "where to vote" info so far they have not managed to censor @WikiLeaks hosting of it: 
Catalonia referendum: Police block store for ballot boxes  
Media bias in Brexit:UK press coverage of EU Referendum campaign dominated by pro-LeaveMe via @Byline_Media 
Coveney: we'd like next All-Island Civic Dialogue on Brexit to be in NI & in format unionists wd be happy to engage with #allislanddialogue 
FIREMEN joining students demonstration in favour of the Catalan official Referendum on independence #1oct #Unstoppable #Democracy #YES 
Firefighters for Catalan independence, stand with the people, like always. #1Oct #Referendum #Catalonia  @bomberscat 
.@realDonaldTrump hard line on #bombadier shows futility of #specialrelationship with #USA post #Brexit. #EU will confront bully; we cant. 
Hopkins is begging kids to ask their schools in Wales and Scotland to let her come and discuss Trump and Brexit.DONT LET THIS HAPPEN  
European Parliament will fight to protect EU/UK citizens' rights in Brexit negotiations @SophieintVeld @GuyVerhofstadt @ALDEgroup 
Why does Catalonia's independence referendum matter? Here's all you need to know:   
LIVE: Student mass rally in Barcelona for independence referendum on Sunday #Catalonia #Cataluynia #o1 
#EU announces backlog of payments equaling €238.8 billion to be cleared by 2020.  Just in time for #Brexit 2021 then. UK share = €31 billion 
EU negotiator Michel Barnier says "sufficient progress" hasn't yet been made in Brexit talks  
What kind of patriot is so utterly ignorant about their country and its history!#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Images from the peaceful student demonstration in Barcelona going on right now in defense of the #Oct1 #referendum#Catalonia 
"We are not yet there in terms of achieving sufficient progress," EU's negotiator Michel Barnier on #Brexit talks  
“The referendum, which has no legal or actual basis, does not benefit anyone.” 
May opened door to progress in Florence, but no sufficient progress yet. No EU and UK citizens should be punished as a result of #Brexit 
I think we should hold a referendum on straight marriage, they need to be stopped.  
This is how an Iraqi newspaper described the Kurdish referendum - the little girl is “Kurdistan” the men are Iran. Syria, Turkey, Iraq...  
There would be a delicious irony in Corbyn's election as PM being the direct consequence of a number of greedy media tycoons backing Brexit. 
The #FAKE #CONSERVATIVE @PhilipHammondUK MUST GO! @theresa_may must sack #PhilipHammond! #BBC #SKY #NEWS #RT #TORY #MP #PM #BREXIT #UK #EU 
1/ Quitlings claim Brexit is a trade opportunity - oh yeah?200% tariffs on Bombardier planes just the beginning ..Other opportunities .. 
"We're making decisive steps forward" in talks with the EU says #Brexit Secretary David Davis  
Illegitimate referendum in Northern Iraq: “The recent situation in Northern Iraq, however saddening, is not an issue we cannot overcome.” 
Brexit, spoiler alert.  
Catalonia's police force is being asked to prevent an independence referendum, but many could let the vote go ahead  
My Brexit leads to a democratic, free, prosperous, global Britain, Barry. What does YOUR Brexit look like?  
Received the Chinese consul general. Exchanged views on post referendum process. Our position,no retreat from results,no escalation from our side, ready for dialogue with Iraq  within a time frame on how to be 2 good neighbors.  
The more she opens her mouth, the more she lies. The subversion of Brexit has begun.  
Corbyn’s Labour seemed cool until they voted to renew Trident, backed hard Brexit, prioritised hurting the SNP over fighting Tories... 
European Parliament may vote to reject "sufficient progress" on Brexit - so no trade talks yet - about an hour before PM conf speech on Wed  
#Hammond and #Rudd already pushing for even lengthier #Brexit transition'. Public voted Out in 2016!  #BBC #SKY #TORY 
#BREAKING Thousands firemen to give support to #Catalonia independence #referendum #1oct. Rally in #Barcelona today: 
The Spanish government in Madrid is trying every way it can to stop Catalonia's independence referendum Sunday  
George Soros wants to "make migrants receive milder criminal sentences for the crimes they commit" and other Hungarian referendum highlights  
an aside: shadow cabinet members now concede in private that Labour Brexit is almost identical to Tory Brexit in terms of actual policy 
“This should be a wake-up call to those who view the U.S. as our trading savior after Brexit,” @FrancesOGrady 
#EU spending at all-time high of €209bn & rising.No wonder they're worried at the post-#Brexit budget shortfall. 
Looking forward to delivering my speech 'Why Brexit is Great for the UK & the USA' next week @Heritage in Washington D.C. on 5th October. 
I'm looking forward to tonight's #LSEBrexit lecture with @GuyVerhofstadt speaking his mind on Brexit & EU post-Brexit @LSEEI 
I will be talking about #Brexit today on Galaxy 102.5 FM at 13:00 (London)Looking forward to your questions on air  @imjussayin2 #Remain 
The EU referendum was gerrymandered  
Another day, another Labour Brexit position  
The Government needs to take a #Brexit stance in accordance with the referendum & start acting like equals, not begging to an EU regime. 
Breaking - EU Parl. #Brexit resolution says no to creative or bespoke transition deal. All EU law/courts must apply  
People celebrate in Arbil after Iraq's Kurds announce a massive "yes" vote for independence in a referendum that has incensed Baghdad  
Every journalist covering Brexit.  
Articulating the @SDLPlive position on BREXIT, @ClaireHanna on stage with Taoiseach @campaignforleo & @simoncoveney . #AllIslandDialogue 
You know the government is in disarray when even Theresa May is making speeches condemning Theresa May's Brexit strategy...  
What is Labour's Brexit Policy? @Urban_Country explores their approach... 
Defra refuses to release Brexit food impact & quality abandoned, EU moves on quality for allMe for @Byline_Media 
When will Tory&Labour moderates realise UK is in mortal danger from hard right & hard left? And hard Brexit wd be final nail in coffin 
A joint resolution on Brexit agreed by political groups in the European Parliament after significant input from @M_AndersonSF and SF 
The EU Will never do a deal with Britain As this will deter others from leaving this Dictatorship 
Shorter Carney: "BOE independence good, Brexit will probably hit the supply side of the economy, sorry there's not much I can do about that" 
In Bxl on fact finding mission on Brexit. Met with @BMW this morning. Sobering stuff I'm afraid. I'll continue to fight for local jobs 
Live Bank of England @theresa_may " Creating needless new barriers to trade helps no one" .....Well why are we leaving then? Why #brexit ? 
Just told by guy across the street that his business is "Stuffed". He voted Brexit and said at the time "I know this will hurt my Business" 
Sat down with BMW. BMW will want to sell cars here post #Brexit. But will they make them in the UK when #Brexit makes them less competitive? 
'Early morning, West Hartlepool' 1963 by Don McCullin. The reality of pre-EU Britain. #Brexit is rooted in a yearning for a mythical past.  
Bank of England 'can't be expected to nullify the likely hit to the economy from Brexit, but could influence how it's spread' - Mark Carney  
Emmanuel Macron launches SAVAGE attack on David Cameron for failing during Brexit campaign  
Speaking this morning at the 3rd #allislanddialogue on #Brexit. This evening I travel to Tallinn to meet with EU prime ministers.  
Bank of England’s Carney: Brexit to Hit UK Incomes, GBP/USD Slides  
This sounds correct - most banks say March 2018 is the point of no return in their #Brexit planning  
#ProlePoll #Remainers - have you given up - or are you still prepared to keep fighting #Brexit ? 
Isn't karma delicious?#Ryanair #Brexit  
With Spain attacking and blocking Catalonia Referendum and Iraq waging war because of Kurdistan Referendum, respect for democracy is dead. 
Kurds vote overwhelmingly in favor of independence from Iraq in disputed referendum, officials announce  pic.twitter.com/E5sZH0o13H 
Macron offers us a way out of Brexit mess  
Even if Brexit is secured, Macron offers a way out the mess   
US Gov decision on Bombardier shows we can’t rely on post-Brexit trade with the US  
Between the devil Corbyn & the deep sea EU, full & early Brexit is the  way to go!  
Tonight : a load of Brexiteers debate how to Brexit. Is May backsliding? Is referendum result being betrayed? #C4News 7 on C4 and Facebook 
My recent article @Jerusalem_Post looks post-Referendum reactions in #Kurdistan region “why doesn’t West support us” 
EU plan to erase digital borders will further isolate Brexit UK  
It'll be the same narrative when the Brexit talks collapse, it'll be the "EU bullying Britain" Dacre, et al will know how to spin it. 
The next stage of Brexit will be bogus victimhood: Why is America being mean? Why won't the EU give us what we want? Waaaah. It's not fair.  
Stop the press people, time to #MAKEMANCHESTERMASSIVE all day this Sunday don't miss it #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain @Mcr4EU @StopBrexitMarch 
If the @realDonaldTrump is happy to do this to our Aircraft Industry then a free US trade deal is a just another Brexit fantasy. #StopBrexit 
Iraqi Govt response to 92% yes in Kurdish referendum - cutting flights, threatening war - totally counterproductive. Peaceful talks needed 
Is there a regressive politician anywhere in the world who hasn't found employment out of Brexit?  
Blow to Rajoy's strategy - Court orders Prosecutor to stop taking action with regards to the #1Oct #referendum  
Dear Boris JohnsonWe uncovered your plot, we're prepared for the #BrexitBut you really are not#NationalPoetryDay 
Britain facing NO DEAL Brexit: May urged to get ready to walk out on stubborn EU  
Iraqi Kurds vote to split from Baghdad in landmark independence referendum  
House goes on sale tomorrow as I move to France to escape Brexit.Using Freedom of Movement while it still exists. #Brexit 
. @BorisJohnson on collision course with Remainer @PhilipHammondUK as he calls for swift Brexit to 'unshackle' UK  
Corbyn - we want to hand power back to the people, but not when it comes to Brexit & a second referendum. #2ndEURef 
Am hearing about an important expert paper in @TheLancet this week demonstrating negative impact of Brexit on our NHS #StopBrexit 
The only place in d constitution we have referendum is ONLY on STATE CREATION- Sen AbaribeSo why did you not educate your boy & his boys?  
Michael Gove accused of covering up report on the exploding cost of food caused by #Brexit  via @EvolvePolitics 
SHOCKER: Just 2% of voters think government performing "very well" in Brexit negotiations. Pretty bloody dire!  
It is time @PeoplesMomentum and @jeremycorbyn took off their rose coloured glasses and saw Brexit for what it really is. #Lab17 #StopBrexit 
Spain's government is trying almost everything it can to stop an independence referendum Sunday in Catalonia  
My survey is now complete, 1000 checks.The referendum split is public sector 85% remain, private sector similar leave.That's the divide 
Post-Brexit trade negotiations going well I see  
Labour MP urged to resign after Harry remarks ’betray’ vow of loyalty to the Queen 
#brexit is reckless per se  
Theresa May's concessions have finally started to ease the Brexit deadlock  
.@SkyNews new "Brexit Forensics" takes a look at Cars and the Customs Union #brexit . Worrying! via @audioBoom 
Read this thread for insight into the worrying extent of the hatred for Kurds stirred up among Iraq's Arabs by the independence referendum.  
Donald Tusk says that UK has dropped its cake-and-eat-it approach to Brexit but Theresa May thinks EU shld shoulder burden #BrexitShambles 
What new barriers can EU citizens expect in their daily lives after Brexit? 
Russian President Vladimir Putin is slated to visit #Ankara today, discuss #Syria, the Kurdish referendum & the S-400 missiles with Erdogan 
Referendum result is legitimate, we congratulate the peoples, political parties & administrative bodies of the KRG.  
A Brexit thread from the Pro Leave @LeaveHQ predicting a walkout by May & co in the near future. Something  @J_amesp & others have been saying for some time. 
The historic Kurdish independence referendum, explained:  
Not a single one realisable if the hard Brexit he advocates goes ahead.  
The EU will continue to defend its producers robustly. After Brexit, UK could be the target rather than beneficiary of EU’s defences. /11 
A follow-up to my thread on #Bombardier yesterday. #Brexit means losing protection of EU’s trade umbrella, but it gets worse. /1 
Boris Johnson defies Theresa May’s Brexit strategy calling for short transition period. Boris' leadership bid further exposing Tory disarray  
UK new car output drops again as Brexit worries weigh - SMMT  
Spain's government is trying almost everything it can to stop an independence referendum Sunday in Catalonia  
Early Morning start for busy day of media ahead after yesterday's #Brexit negotiations. @BBC @BloombergRadio & city presentations 
He's right, referendum based on spurious detail and lacked reasoned information, hardly surprising we're no closer.  
Call for all-Ireland environmental protection to feature in Brexit talksvia @IrishTimes 
Boris & Hannah flip flop on Brexit again. Fantasists haven't spotted Boeing bullying Bombardier is US "free" trade  
Why is UK Gov cravenly caving in to EU over #Brexit?UK has all the cards but we're allowing ourselves to be pushed around by EU dictators. 
From Saudi Arabia lifting the ban on driving to the Irish referendum on abortion  
We'd be really screwed after #brexit if the USA finds some subsidy in our jam making industry...Here's to free trade #StopBrexit 
Brexit parallels-  
2,861,000 Iraqi Kurds decisively back independence in referendum72.61% voted yesWill this spark more civil war or   
A "government in waiting" which won't even debate and vote on Brexit.  
100 years after the Sykes-Picot deal, the northern Iraq referendum could divide the Middle East yet again. What are the consequences?  
Mrs May's flight of fancy about Trump's 'very big & exciting trade deal' with UK crashes to earth giving Northern Ireland new Brexit shock.  
Which sums up Brexit to perfection:  
Kurds vote overwhelmingly in favor of independence from Iraq in disputed referendum, officials announce  pic.twitter.com/Qq9ecDh0Lk 
Ireland Will (Finally) Hold a Referendum on Its Absurd Blasphemy Law Next Year 
Fourth round of Brexit divorce talks enters final day  
Familiar Russian IT names may have plied their hacking skills on the Brexit vote. Putin hates the EU, NATO & Clintons.  
Why the referendum on Catalan independence is illegal  
BofA is in talks to secure an office in Paris for part of its post-Brexit trading operations  
Still live 27th sept 2017 #IPOB in #Israel  protest against ongoing killings of Biafrans by #NigerianArmy #StopBiafrakillings #Referendum  
40. Those with ink on their finger, evidence of having voted in referendum, are sent back. "Go back to your country," they're being told.  
May threatens US with trade war over Boeing v Bombardier. Is the same US she claims is just gagging to sign a post-Brexit trade deal ? 
Nature News: Many #Catalan researchers say they will vote ‘yes’ in the #independence #referendum  
Heading to a supermarket near you, when we get this amazing trade deal with US. The Brexit future looks yummy.  
1-Iraqi newspaper Al-Nahar published following photo on Sept26 in reference 2 repercussions awaiting #Kurdistan aftr independence referendum  
33. The Assyrians, whose Christian towns are named in the Bible, are now living in areas that, according to the referendum, are Kurdish.  
We didn't come back to LabourWe're never coming backWhat do you offer Scotland?#LatestJackieBailliePish ?You can ram that up your Brexit  
Brexit: UK imports and exports in six charts  
From #Scotland to #Catalonia to Iraqi #Kurdistan to #Kashmir. referendum as expression of popular sovereignty  
Brexit Britain - the downwards  slide continues  
#Iraq's Kurds vote 'yes' to independent state in referendum – official results  
It's curious to see so many who don't respect the outcome of a referendum calling for another one.  
SundayManchesterMarchBrexitEUBe heard 
See these are his 3 goals#PutinPlaybook - The Geoplitical future of Russia.1-Annex Ukraine2-Brexit3-Create chaos is the USA  
Sadiq Khan is Labour’s only remaining hope of surviving Brexit  
Roy Hodgson Brexit Football incoming, 38 losses on the trot 
Brexit is just so . . . fucking . . . JUVENILE 
A&M students vote today on a referendum to bring back annual UT vs. A&M game. Would you like to see it come back?  
Ireland says it will hold a referendum on the country's abortion laws, which are among Europe's most restrictive  
Catalonia referendum: Barcelona firefighters promise to DEFEND polling stations  
The problem with fighting Brexit is that you have to alter your tactic AGAIN and AGAIN each time Labour lets you down. 
Theresa May 'took dictation' from Brussels in keynote EU speech when she agreed to pay Brexit divorce bill #premium 
Another damning report on Brexit implications for Farming which DUP Ignore & about which Tory Gov doesn't care  
Catalan leaders compare Spain to North Korea after referendum sites blocked  
Theresa May must show the UK is ready for No Deal   #Brexit 
Tonight's Tory Farce:1) Boris launches new Institute of Free Trade to herald life after Brexit2) Theresa May threatens USA with trade war  
The #bombardier trade dispute shows the world is mercantilist.Even before #Brexit the UK and US are at odds on trade  
Reason UK politically stable & economically successful for so long: learnt in C17th not to let ideology drive national policy. Then Brexit. 
Apparently you need to be a Bletchley Code Breaker to understand the @uklabour position on Brexit 
Petition for a Final Deal Referendum now over 110k. Let's keep it rolling #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
Corbyn is completely deluded if he thinks he is going to PM on anything other than an anti Brexit ticket 
Good, this is the reason we need to #referendum.LEAVE or REMAIN #Biafra #Nigeria  
I just listened to Corbyn's full speech. On Brexit... it was good. I was impressed.  
Catalonia referendum: Goldman Sachs predicts victory FOR independence 
Spanish TV Debate condemns Catalan referendum, concludes self determination is valid in colonial situations. I'm watching from #Gibraltar! 
Diane Abbott: ‘When I demanded ‘all-black candidates,’ I meant NEW ZEALAND RUGBY PLAYERS  via @Your Brexit 
Theresa @theresa_may if you do not show strong leadership next week and stop fannying about over Brexit, putting the EU first, you're toast. 
If Spain prevents the referendum, that suggest Spain knows that they would lose it. Spain is faced with a bad and a worse choice. 
Geldof says he will do everything he can to stop brexit. Drugs, death in the family - he would do better sorting himself out and pissing off 
Geldof says Brexit was a 'MISTAKE' and vows to 'do everything to try and PREVENT it'. WTF has it got to do with him  
Could we add in another £800m to the Brexit bill? It's only money, after all.  
Yes they'll all be queuing up for their post Brexit trade deals with UK after this...  
Exit from Brexit! Sadiq Khan suggests Labour may back second referendum on Brexit  
I can't imagine Mrs May has any other hopes for the Tory conference than that she gets through it & the Brexit protest doesn't drown it out 
Don't you think there should be a second referendum? Just in case the Kurds change their minds in a year or so? ;) 
Gove accused of covering up report on the exploding cost of food as a consequence of Brexit  via @EvolvePolitics 
Brexit feels like the satanic child in The Omen. It could well pass from May's care into Corbyn's, but it will continue to cause misery. 
Heard Corbyn's speech. Lots of promises, some I agreed with, but how are you going to pay for it all after the Brexit he's pushing through? 
Wait, so, we've gone from Brexiteers promising US will bail UK out post-Brexit with trade deals to now UK threatening US with trade war?   
EU Commission silent as Madrid shuts down websites ahead of Catalonia referendum  They interfere when it suits them. 
If you have any doubt that the Bombardier-Boeing ruling contains a dire warning about post-Brexit trade, read this thread.  
Kurdish referendum on independence from Iraq approved by more than 92 percent of voters, officials say  
Iraq's Kurds celebrate a massive "yes" vote for independence following a referendum that has incensed Baghdad  
He just wants a Brexit for Boris Johnson. No concern whatsoever about the national interest. Obvious he never actually talks to businesses.  
Not long now until the big Stop Brexit march in Manchester. We're going, but the organisers need money & help if...  
The nub of Brexit. Tax dodging, trade, the environment, in defence, terrorism, combating capitalism. We are stronger together weaker alone.  
Catalonia's referendum has provoked a constitutional crisis. No matter what, fixing Spanish unity will be difficult  
Is this a #Brexodus or a #BrAvoidance?"Bank of America picks top executive to run post-Brexit EU hub in Dublin". 
Radical idea! Stay in the EU.Brexit, we can't afford it.  
Mrs May @theresa_may, how about putting the interests of Britain first? Cancel Brexit, we can't afford it. 
Britain's trade prospects, post #Brexit.#Bombardier #Trump #StopBrexitHour #MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #4EU 
Boris reopens Cabinet's Brexit spat by demanding Theresa May only agrees to a short transition period; 
Leading #SNP figures (incl. a QC!) to speak at rally about a 'referendum' declared illegal by constitutional court of a democratic ally.  
Good to see @ZacGoldsmith setting out how we can deliver a truly Green Brexit.We can do more for environment+animal welfare than ever before  
If I get 'vox-popped' during the #StopBrexit march on Sunday, this is what I will say...   #Brexit @Mcr4EU @acgrayling @Scientists4EU 
We are travelling the length and breadth of the UK, talking to businesses about Brexit.Hoping they’ll tell us something we want to hear. 
Catalonia referendum: Julian Assange says vote a ‘struggle for self-determination’ #1OCTReferendum #HolaDemocracia  
BREAKING: Senior Tory says government must prepare to WALK AWAY from Brussels without Brexit deal  via @Your Brexit 
What they mean is, it's not in UKGov's interest for the public to know the likely effect of Brexit on food prices.  
Macron on US election and Brexit: "I'm not saying it's true but (Clinton) was pictured as a candidate of the elites"  
Some more thoughts on what we were trying to get at with our @thenation article about Catalunya and the referendum:  
Brilliant thread. A taste of life after Brexit. (Warning: Contains expertise. May offend those who consider expertise a personal affront)  
Leader of Britain's opposition party, Jeremy Corbyn, accuses PM of 'bungling' Brexit  
Iraqi Kurdistan independence referendum passes with 92%. Baghdad says it refuses to accept the result.  
Remember. The BEST Brexit deal is NO deal. Walk away. No 'divorce payments. Zero tariffs IF reciprocated. Just say hello wave goodbye. 
Catalan referendum triggers hard choice for politicians: punishment from Spanish courts or anger from some voters?  
And why no Brexit would be even better @Labour4EU 
This mentality smacks of antagonism against the people of Kurdistan. It's such statements and marginalisation that led to the referendum. 
Dear #Brexit fans.More good news. #Airbus (10k UK employees) is seriouslyconsidering its position here. Well done!  
While the row rumbles on about a Brexit bill, here is what the EU Parliament Budget Committee signed off last night:  
EU Parliament sets some red lines for Brexit  
Excellent, well-informed, clear thread about the #Bombardier issue and #Brexit.WARNING to Brexiters: contains facts and actual expertise.  
The US' tariffs on Canada's Bombardier shine a light on Brexit Britain's future.  
Senator @SenSchumer support for the Referendum. Thank you senator, Kurdistan people will never ever forgets friends like you.  
I congratulate the people of Kurdistan on the overwhelming victory in the referendum on independence. A new chapter is now upon us- mb. 
Independence? There's an app for that: Catalonia's president promotes app for voting info after extensive internet censorship by Spain of the voting locations for the Oct 1 referendum  
Referendum "should be recognized and respected by the world," Schumer says. "The Kurdish people of northern #Iraq have my utmost support." 
I could be in a persistent vegetative state and as God as my witness, I'd still be resisting brexit 
Brexit drags UK below Turkey/Poland in Expatriate rankingClarity and certainty on #citizensrights after 2019 needed 
Some thoughts on Corbyn/ Labour conf/ Brexit Thread: 1/10: Leadership calculate 2017 manifesto will yield majority, as centre shifts left 
If you think a bishop's intervention on the HPV vaccine is ill informed, unscientific and harmful, just wait until the referendum. #RepealThe8th 
We welcome outcome of the Iraqi #Kurdish referendum. Int’l community should support the just & longstanding quest for Kurdish independence. 
1. If the Tories have done their sums they know there is no possibility Brexit being concluded before the election. 
If you're against Brexit as you say, there's only ONE relationship with EU - as members.We are members now, and must #Remain. 
Top YPG/SDF official Mazlum Kobane: We support the independence referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan   
I will be flying to Barcelona tomorrow as an official observer of Sunday's Catalan referendum. #CatalanReferendum 
Britain falls to 35th in list of best countries for expats as Brexit hits confidence  
Well don't count on my vote @Keir_Starmer , @UKLabour can go whistle while Corbyn supports Brexit.  
70% of #WestPapua population have signed a banned petition calling for a referendum on independence from Indonesia 
 The debate about the Catalan referendum is so intense that it’s spread outside the Spanish borders  . 
Sorry to disappoint you Brexit wotsits, this is unfinished business by a long way. Not getting over it any time soon. Let's keep resisting! 
Call of Duty: Piolin’s referendum wars 
.@EmmanuelMacron: David Cameron didn’t “properly defend” remain in the Brexit referendum. “It was a ‘remain, but…’"  
'We can't afford to not trade with England!' Irish politician warns EU over Brexit talks  
We certainly understand that some in Spain might want to hold a referendum. I get that. Other countries have done that as well. We would regard that, though, as an internal matter that’s up for the people to decide. (H.Nauert. US State Department spokesperson) 
UPHOLD BREXIT TOBLERONISM  
JACOB REES-MOGG on Newsnight saying we need to leave the ECJ for a TRUE BREXIT!!  WATCH NOW!   
President @EmmanuelMacron’s take on why Clinton lost and Brexit won.  
#OhJeremyCorbyn if only you'd put half the effort into #Remain as you put into Labour's version of Brexit but then #Brexit was what u wanted 
I put Pennywise into the Brexit song and he doesn't even look out of place.  
"The dog ate my #50SecretStudies" and other excuses for not publishing #Brexit impact studies:  #Brexitshambles 
The Brexit revolution opened to door to Corbynism. Tories have become their own grave diggers.   
100 years after the Sykes-Picot deal, the northern Iraq referendum could divide the Middle East yet again. What are the consequences?  
For all those doubting that Mrs Thatcher would’ve voted Brexit.  
.@michellemalkin: @MooreSenate's Victory Is a Referendum on 'Swamp King' @SenateMajLdr  
Nigel Farage - "They may have managed to reverse the Irish referendum & Danish referendum but ultimately we are going to leave." #Brexit  
It's the thing Labour use to decide what this week's Brexit stance is. @WingsScotland 
I suppose it's still considered rude to ask either party how many billions they're prepared to chuck down the black hole that's Brexit.  
"You call for democracy, but u don't support it," Kurds in #Erbil wonder y intl community did not support referendum  
Labour's Barry Gardiner tells me that Labour would immediately prioritise a Free Trade deal with the USA after Brexit. Just like the Tories! 
Michael Gove accused of covering up report on the exploding cost of food as a consequence of Brexit  
Freight transport (y'know, the people responsible for moving goods in/out of the UK) get real & frank on #Brexit  
Brexit + America First = 220%(Show your workings) 
"Coming up next on POTUS sports radio: Why LeBron will never be Jordan, how liberalism killed the Spurs, and ESPN's town hall on Brexit."  
92% of the people living in northern #Iraq voted in favour of independence for #Kurdistan in Monday's referendum  
There are some goods from Brexit.For example, I really had no idea of the filth that hides among the rank & file of the @Conservatives 
Iraqi Kurds vote to split from Baghdad in landmark independence referendum  
The results of the Kurdish independence referendum are in: 92% yes. Iraq's Parliament is talking of sending troops.  
My Tory Westminster contacts generally say Amber Rudd/Ruth Davidson/Jeremy Heywood are main people undermining Brexit. More so than Hammond. 
Sadiq Khan Pushes for Labour to Back Overturning Brexit so MORE Syrian Refugees!,- Breitbart      #fo2eu 
The Kurdish referendum prompted a confrontation with the government in Baghdad, which has called the vote illegal  
Even the Daily Telegraph is reporting on this story. Theresa May ‘took dictation’ from EU when she agreed to pay Brexit bill.   
Kurds voted overwhelmingly to secede from Iraq, with 92.7% approving a controversial referendum.  
I'm bewildered by how international community can come out against Kurdistan's democratic referendum but not against Baghdad's sanctions. 
JC wants: "A jobs first Brexit" - but Brexit will destroy jobs.TM wants: "Best possible deal" - but can only get that by staying in the EU. 
1/ I congratulate citizens of #Kurdistan after they overwhelmingly voted Yes in the independence referendum. Their will has to be respected 
Moore win a referendum on Mitch McConnell?  @MorningsMaria @FoxBusiness 
Catalan Minister of Health @toni_comin fires directors of health consortia and takes control of clinics (some are polling stations) four days before #Oct1 #Referendum in #Catalonia 
Labour who nodded through thousands of EU Directives between 1997-2010 are now insisting on parliamentary scrutiny during Brexit. 
If anyone doubts that the #UK will be #BetterOffOut, please share this with them. #RT #Brexit  
'Bombardier case..should disabuse UK from any belief that the special relationship will insulate it from US action in the post-Brexit world'  
Why the referendum on Catalan independence is illegal  
Post-Brexit free trade deals will help us cut prices and boost growth, says @DanielJHannan @IFTtweets 
With the US imposing 219% tariffs against Bombardier, it is clear that Theresa May cannot rely on US for a post Brexit trade deal. Pls RT  
Catalonia's Referendum. Europe, help us! @EuParlament 
Problem for SLab is without Indy, they will never be able to act with Scotland's interests at heart. Brexit being the biggest example 
Oxford Uni's Reuters report on coverage of EU referendum is fascinating.  Concludes that was significant pro-Leave bias in press. But some of details are *really* fascinating 
Brexit has zero chance of boosting UK trade says Nobel laureate trade expert. David Davis says, "yay, Brexit!"  
We don't need 280 characters to say "Fuck Nazi's, Trump and Brexit". 
#UPDATE Massive 'yes' vote in Iraqi Kurd independence referendum angers Baghdad, sparks international concern  
Corbyn's speech makes it clear there will be Brexit under Labour. No ifs or buts, vote Labour get Brexit. This is no home for Remainers. 
Please retweet if you would support a campaign to make sure Tories & Labour pay at the next election for their damaging pro Brexit policies.  
Spain's violation of #HumanRights in #Catalonia to be challenged in European Court of Human Rights #1O #referendum 
Peter Thiel is a founder of Facebook. He is a major investor and board member.He advises Donald Trump.Trump backs Farage and Brexit.  
My cartoon - Bombardier hit by Boeing tariff. Who needs the #EU when we’ve got the #US?#Brexit#Trump#r4PM 
Catalans compare Spain to North Korea after referendum sites blocked  
Wrong. Listen to my radio shows, attend the rallies, etc. It started being about this (below), but ended as a referendum on McConnell.  
I've gathered links to a couple of my twitter threads about #Brexit & #trade in this blog post. 
Official result from referendum shows Iraqi Kurds have voted overwhelmingly in favor of declaring independence  
So as tory britain goes touting for brexit trade deals...remind me just how many independent country's we invaded,robed & brutalised again  
Corbyn denies that his speech was too long, but is pleased Brexit finally happened. 
No, you should focus on calling Brexit off, now 
Trade: US style. That's why Brexit focus should be on strong UK/EU trading agreement.   
Tomorrow on #C4News the first of 2 big debates on Brexit. First : Brexiteers talk hard, soft and changed-my-mind. 
Petition for UK to leave EU WITHOUT TRANSITION PERIOD doubles to 20,000 in just three days  via @Your Brexit 
The government needs to start acting like equals – and not beggars to the EU   #Brexit 
Kurdish independence referendum receives overwhelming support in vote  
After Brexit, we will not have our EU friends to back us up... like we did in 2003 when EU forced US to stand down on illegal steel tariffs.  
The Catalonian Foreign Minister wrote to thank me for my support in holding their referendum. Everyone has the right to self-determination!  
Kurdish referendum on independence from Iraq was approved by more than 92 percent of voters, officials say.  
Iraqi Kurds back independence in referendum - BBC News  
93 per cent vote yes in Kurdish independence referendum  
92% Voted For Independence In Iraqi Kurd Referendum.  
Ireland Will (Finally) Hold a Referendum on Its Absurd Blasphemy Law Next Year  
Status in #Catalonia #1O It's illegal to campaign for the #referendum & in favor of it, but it's NOT illegal to campaign AGAINST it. Super.  
The results are in: 92 percent of Iraqi Kurds voted in favor of a split from Iraq in this week's referendum. 
Brexit has opened the door to Corbynism. One day, Tories might miss the restraints the EU imposes on governments...  
More evidence that fact checking does not counter public support for the populist right (or, I wd bet, Brexit)  
There is ZERO chance of a transition taking only two years. #Brexit 
#Kurdistan Independent High Elections and Referendum Commission just announced that 92,7% voted in favor of independence.  
The Spanish government has closed down more than 200 webpages related to the Referendum in the... BUT 'Músic Day'   
Wondering what the hardest, most damaging #Brexit looks like?@LiamFox launches libertarian Institute for Free Trade under @DanielJHannan 
When you’re a pro-EU lefty in a party of hard Brexit Corbynistas.  
*Brexit Apocalypse*  
Jeremy Corbyn talks Brexit in his big speech earlier today. He says it "cannot be reduced to repeating fairy stories from the side of a bus"  
Oh dear; Iraqis seem to have taken their lead from UK Remain hardliners & are demanding Kurds ignore own referendum vote  
Sadiq Khan Pushes for Labour to Back Overturning Brexit  
As Labour leader Corbyn should be fiercely fighting a #Brexit which in whatever form will harm all but a wealthy minority. #StopBrexit 
US must take back #ICANN @CommerceGovCommission silent as Madrid shuts down websites ahead of Catalonia referendum  
#BREAKING 92% of the 3.3 million Kurds and non-Kurds who voted in referendum supported independence  
The gov’s top Brexit civil servant has had enough of David Davis and Brexit. I think we’d get on well. 
The Catalan parliament president says Spain represses basic rights and freedoms to stop the independence referendum  
Kurdistan referendum results out now.Turnout 3.305 m %72.16.YES vote 2.868 m %92 N0 vote 224,000 %7.27.A strong Yes VOTE congratulations. 
Amazing how those who keep shouting about democracy can't accept democracy gave them an advisory referendum.  
I told the taxi driver that I had come from Miami to vote and he said, "The fare's on me."#Catalonia #referendum  
92 per cent vote yes in Kurdish independence referendum  
Ireland agrees to hold a referendum on their absurd blasphemy law.  via @ 
RT @AJENews: Iraqis Kurds overwhelmingly back split from Iraq in contested referendum, electoral commission says  
Finally - #Bombardier raises questions about what UK loses in terms of trade leverage from #Brexit. Being part of a big, rich club gave UK serious heft. Now will often be smaller player in any negotiation so more easily pushed around  
#BREAKING 92 percent of voters at the Kurdish independence referendum cast a “yes” ballot, elections commission says  
BREAKING: 'Yes' wins Iraqi Kurdistan independence referendum with 92% of vote 
JUST IN: Kurds vote overwhelmingly in favor of independence from Iraq in disputed referendum, officials announce  pic.twitter.com/rq2lo6aRZP 
EU commissioner says Boris Johnson ‘completely out of the loop’ on Brexit 
US has imposed 220% import tax on UK BombardierUS was formerly stopped by EU retaliation, not now due to Brexit 
#BREAKING 92 percent "yes" vote in Iraqi Kurd independence referendum: officials 
#Kurdistan Region’s election commission announces result of referendum, an overwhelming 92.7% voted in favour of independence from #Iraq. 
Official Results of Kurdistan Independence Referendum. The YES vote 92,73%The No vote 7,27%.Number of participants 72%. Big congratulations 
*IRAQI KURDS CHOOSE INDEPENDENCE IN HISTORIC REFERENDUM: RUDAW 
On the Kurdish referendum, Pakistani Millet stands with Turkey. Whatever Turkey decides, Pak millet & army will support...even fight for!  
#Corbyn spoke a lot about handing power back to the people, so let them decide on the Brexit deal too #Labour #lab17 
The EU needs to cut out the amateur dramatics over Brexit and prepare to talk trade, says @HenryNewman 
Jeremy Corbyn accuses Tories of “self-interested Brexit bungling”, arguing that Labour’s Brexit bungling is entirely altruistic. 
Hard not to love this reader comment in the FT... #Brexit  
Sorry Kier will never vote Labour again while Corbyn leader or while party supports Brexit. Suspect I'm far from alone in feeling that way. 
You won't be getting my vote (or that of many other tactical Remain voters) until you change your stance on #Brexit . GE2017 was a one-off. 
Another nail in the Brexit coffin. Brexit wil destroy British aerospace industry. No more spitfires from GB. #brexitref2 #RemainAndReform 
The Hoff slaps down Amber Rudd, reminds her the UK is still in the EU & illegal deportations could stop Brexit deal  
David Attenborough: “The decision to call a referendum was an abrogation of parliamentary democracy .... because we didn’t know the facts,"  
Bank of America is understood to be in talks to secure office space in Paris after Brexit  
If you don't offer #exitbrexit my hope is not with Labour. You (personally) know that Brexit is (already) ruining lives and economy. Stop it 
£20m EU funding for the transport hub at the old Waterside railway station.  Funding that will be lost post #Brexit unless north stays in EU  
Catalonia’s Independence: Much Worse than Hard Brexit  by @joseareilza 
Together with @BritishInEurope in Brussels we fight for the right outcome on EU nationals' #citizensrights post Brexit  
#BREAKING: Kurdistan Region’s independence from #Iraq referendum results to be announced shortly by the election commission.  
In few minutes, the election commission will announce the official results of the Referendum. 
.@michellemalkin: Roy Moore's Victory Is a Referendum on 'Swamp King' Mitch McConnell @foxandfriends  
Kurdistan will respond to Abadi at 5pm, by announcing the results of the referendum. No turning back now. 
Not a word of criticism from Corbyn about the Mail's support for Brexit, however. On that issue, he and the paper's editor are comrades.  
Disappointing so many other MPs prepared to bring the austerity of #Brexit to their voters. Many thx David @EK_EuropeanMove @Labour4EU 
For people who still pay attention to experts, here's the excellent @ottocrat on #bombadier and #brexit and why we should be very afraid.  
Don't ask Jezza about Brexit he's headed doon the Caravan #janeygodleyvoiceover #labourconference2017 
Brexit is basically tattooing a massive spiders web on your face to see what it looks like and then everyone trying to pretend it looks nice 
But as shown on Brexit at conference, the new grassroots robotically do whatever an app controlled by Momentum HQ tells them to.  
Is this a way out of Brexit?  
Rescuing Brexit would be like sailing through the drowning crew to rescue the ship.   
I no more trust Jeremy Corbyn to sort out Brexit than I do Theresa May. #Corbyn 
Ratings agency roasted for downgrading Brexit Britain as economy soared  
So @Theresa_May you're "bitterly disappointed"by the US Bombardier tax. You can hardly say you weren't warned, over & over again.#Brexit 
Evidence that the UK's top broadcast journalists are massively biased against Brexit 
Commission silent as Madrid shuts down websites ahead of Catalonia referendum  
Here's what you need to know about Catalonia's controversial referendum on independence from Spain  
Britain must finally come up with substantial proposals for #Brexit. The time for cherry picking is definitively over.  
BREAKING: Barcelona firefighters offer to make a security cordon in the polling stations to guarantee the referendum. 
But it is Brexit - and @jeremycorbyn's assault on the Tories failure to get it right - that could get him to Number 10   3/3 
Corbyn: "The Tories' version of Brexit is a shit sandwich. Well let me tell you, a Labour Government would use artisan bread!" #Lab17 
If my stance on Brexit is unclear let me say this- strong message here- it is VERY different from Tory's in ways I'll never fucking clarify. pic.twitter.com/QckMjijI37 
Yes Brexit is a selfish and destructive act which can only serve to damage the entire European family sadly.  
Might get a brew. An hour in and so far the main takeaway message is Corbyn is committed to Brexit, but his will somehow be wonderful... 
Scottish Labour are being reduced to a Brexit lapdog thatwould rather bash Nicola Sturgeon than target the real enemy that is the Tories. 
Boris Johnson Hosts Launch of Hard Brexit Pressure Group. GO BORIS! - Bloomberg  #fo2eu 
If you're Male and vote " NO " in the repeal the 8th referendum you can fuck off , it's not the 1920's pull your head out of your arse. 
For Russia, internal division in West = win. See US, #Brexit and now Catalonia  
Key line in Corbyn speech - makes clear the economic policies he will promote at next GE require Brexit to happen. Remain Lab won't like it.  
.Jesus Wept....Corbyn Wants To RESCUE BrexitNot rescue UK from madness of BrexitHe WANTS to RESCUE Brexit . 
For the avoidance of doubt, respecting the result of the consultative EU referendum and cancelling Brexit, are entirely compatible. 
Did I miss the bit where Corbyn actually committed to a fundamentally different Brexit policy to the Tories? 
Both Labour & Tories accuse the other of having no credible Brexit policy and no agreement on what it would be if they did. Both correct. 
Fantastic to hear this. But then why not join @TheGreenParty and others in making the positive case for freedom of movement? #Brexit  
Again, Corbyn speech has no clear structure. Leaping around random issues. Brexit, shadow cabinet pat on the back, renationalisation... 
Corbyn just pretty much ruled out staying in the Single Market, and the hall applauded. FFS, he's like the Brexit Pied Piper. #Lab17 
On Brexit, mostly platitudes. But don't think Corbyn pledged "unimpeded" access to single market before. Obvs impossible without membership. 
Liked JC whack at Mail. Not enjoying pitch on Brexit. No matter how much the Tories screw it up and no matter the cost he is backing LEAVE 
On Brexit: The Tories are more interested in posturing for personal advantage than getting the best deal for Britain. @jeremycorbyn #Lab17 
Since the Referendum Labour's had 10 plans on Brexit in 15 months. Just what is their position? #Lab17 
At this point I’d love to know how Labour are going to deliver a Brexit Remainers don’t feel despairing about. Details please, Jeremy. 
Brexiteer Nigel Farage lashes Juncker and Barnier for damaging Europe with Brexit hardline  
'Guarantees access to the single market'. How? The rhetoric is anti Brexit. But the substance facilitates it 
Absolutely agree. Then why not give everyone in this country a final say on the deal? That's proper security against a Tory #brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn on #Brexit: Respecting democratic decision "does not mean giving a green light to recklessness" #Lab17  
He's actually saying the Tories are disunited (they are) on Brexit, but Labour is not? Even Blair was never this shameless. #Lab17 
POLL shows overwhelming 79% DISAPPROVAL of Elizabeth May on Brexit Handling. She must RESIGN NOW!  #fo2eu 
Irony is being redefined. Condemning abuse, but allowing it to flourish in the party. Attacking Brexit but allowing it to happen. #Lab17 
Labour have changed their position on Brexit 101 times – they have no plan for Brexit and are unfit to govern  #Lab17 
IKRG Referendum: “Flying Israeli Flags Won’t Save You”  
I've been pondering Sadiq Khan’s suggestion that Labour may back a second referendum on Brexit.... 
Release the Brexit impact studies! 
Comment by the Information and Press Department on the referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan  
.@michellemalkin on Roy Moore Winning the Alabama GOP Senate Runoff: "This was a referendum on Mitch McConnell." pic.twitter.com/KYX4f8ybMe 
Eurocrats gloating they "pretty much dictated" parts of May's #Brexit speech, but still haven't made ANY concessions  
The govt is selling out on Brexit & the opposition have turned into a weird cult hailing a Marxist terrorist sympathiser.Lord help us all! 
A transitional deal with Freedom of Movement and EU budget contributions is NOT what we voted for! Don't let the Tories sell out on Brexit!  
Will Jeremy Corbyn finally set out his position on Brexit? #Lab17 
Dugdale has gone from “folk are sick of referendums!” to “there must be a second EU referendum!” She’s only a few steps from IndyRef2 now. 
Brexit seems to be one big game for Labour. When will they take it seriously and decide on a position? #lab17 
"Trade war" with US is not exactly the "fastest trade deal in history" that was promised post-Brexit.  
Independence for Iraq's Kurds is 'inevitable', says minister Falah Mustafa  #Arbil #Kurdish Referendum 
[Thread] People saying #Bombardier is a warning about life after #Brexit: you are right. Let me explain. /1 
Tom Watson on further Brexit referendum: ‘We’re not ruling it out’ - 
Left wing cranks feed off right wing cranks. @rafaelbehr on how Brexit empowers Corbyn  
Prime Minister Barzani to Turkish Media: The referendum is not a threat to #Turkey in any way. 
My future pm can wear a bloody dress as long as he stands for what he believes and picks us up after brexit 
Bilbao will have 30.000 fans hold Catalan Referendum posters during the 17th minute of their UCL match today.  
Protecting EU citizens' rights is a red line in Brexit. The work done by @The3Million and @BritishInEurope is essential. EP is on your side 
What Brexit? London crowned top global city  
What have Labour MPs been saying about UK policy towards the EU after Brexit?  
So much for US being our premier trade partner post-#Brexit. What you get for trusting a man who assaults women & incites hate #Bombardier 
Labour just hinted they may back a second referendum on Brexit  
Last day of the bollocks to brexit campaign outside the labour party conference in Brighton. Huge numbers of stickers and EU flags given out  
Confirmation of earlier comments re referendum timing are welcome. It’s been a long road.We have a long way to go yet #repealthe8th #ItsTime 
Nothing I have said can be construed as "Hard Brexit." Nonsense. Not anti European but accept we're leaving. #brexit #Lab17 
But the job of a party leader IS to say what they think of the big issues like Brexit.  
@vpartal Catalonia debatuda al Senat irlandès. " The response to the referendum has been a Franco style crackdown by the Spanish Goverment"  
.@SadiqKhan calls for separate Brexit deal for London as 'only region to have voted to Remain' *waves*  
Kurdish PM #Barzani says the world should ask #Baghdad why they pushed us towards a referendum instead of asking us why we held it.  
Ireland says it will hold a referendum on the country's abortion laws, which are among Europe's most restrictive  
#BREAKING: Kurdish Prime Minister says #Kurdistan's independence referendum is not a threat to Turkey's national security.  
But, but, but we will do the biggliest of biggliest trade deals with US after Brexit.....  
Caller on @mrjamesob “You wouldn’t leave a good job because you don’t like the coffee. That’s what we’ve done with Brexit” Hear, hear. 
Lib Dems welcome Sadiq's call for referendum on Brexit deal  via @LibDems 
Sadiq Khan is Labour’s only remaining hope of surviving Brexit | Gina Miller  
Iraqi Kurds voted in their independence referendum, rejected by US, Iraq, Iran, Turkey. Now what? 
Ireland will hold a referendum in 2018 on whether to change abortion laws. Abortions are only legal if the mother’s life is in danger.  
If you don't like the Labour Brexit position that Corbyn sets out today, don't worry, they'll have another one soon.  
First class clarity from @ph_lamberts on Brexit and Ireland. UK position remains flatly incredible, dangerously so.  
Liberal Party 1975 referendum leaflet, front page "A political union strong enough to save democracy and the values of Western Civilisation"  
TANKING: Approval for government's Brexit approach down after May's Florence speech. Just not good enough!  
Can't believe it's an appropriate use of public money for Johnson & co to use the Foreign Office to launch hard right #Brexit "think tank". 
‘Embarrassing!’ Ratings agency ROASTED for downgrading Brexit Britain as economy soared  @AMDWaters @UKIP 
May must stand up to Trump's protectionist bullying on Bombardier. Shows we cannot rely on a US trade deal to save us from Brexit 
Labour's conference will end today but after 4 days it's still far from clear what their Brexit policy is. #Lab17  
European Parliament releases Brexit resolution tomorrow at 11am. Will criticise handling of citizens' rights. Vote next Tuesday. 
The iconic, historic Machko #tea house in #Erbil where people gathered after independence referendum 2 c new page in history @tgoudsouzian 
The Kurds in Iraq have voted in a referendum. But will that actually translate to independence? 
Kezia Dugdale on 5 Live says her resignation "speaks to a lot of internal problems in Lab Party." "Frees me up 2 say what I think on Brexit" 
*extremely world-weary British voice* "ah, a referendum. we invented those last year you know." 
Ireland will vote in a referendum next year on whether to lift or ease the country’s constitutional ban on abortion  
More Brexit good news - The UK economy is at its most competitive for a decade  
Special relationship my arse. The much vaunted post Brexit trade deal with the US looks more frightening by the day.  
EU Commission silent as Madrid shuts down 140 websites ahead of #Catalonia referendum #1o 
I won't vote for any party that supports Brexit. There are millions of others like me.  
He is so right:"The referendum was "an abrogation of parliamentary democracy" because of a lack of facts."  
Johnson hosting the launch of a hard Brexit think tank reminded me, with due proportion, of this anecdote from the French election:  
The UK has tumbled in a ranking of top destinations for expats following the June 2016 vote for Brexit  
Brexit will cut prices, stimulate trade and boost the economy. My column in @TheSun on today's launch of @IFTtweets. 
"Hang in the public will go our way and we won't go into the nightmare of Brexit" @PaulFlynnMP #lab17 
A bracing lesson for UK on how ruthlessly US acts to protect interests. Should prick complacency bubble on post Brexit UK-US trade deal.  
BREXIT: 89% OF BRITONS WANT DUAL CITIZENSHIP AFTER LEAVING EU, FINDS SURVEY 
Bombardier reveals exactly the kind of trade arrangements we might expect from Trump&USA post Brexit. So much for being 1st in queue 
Breaking News: Brexit breakthrough. EU allows UK to return to pre '74 food. Spam, Vesta curry, olive oil from chemist, Fray Bentos to return 
Great read from @rafaelbehrBrexit Tories opened the door to revolution. Corbynites walked through | Rafael Behr  
Sadiq Khan calls for Labour to back a second Brexit vote  
Catalan high school students cut off main Barcelona thoroughfare in first day of student strike for #Oct1 #referendum in #Catalonia 
This. #Brexit #ProudtohavevotedLeave 
Thank goodness for Brexit! Macron calls for more EU integration with shared military and asylum policies  
Lib Dems welcome Sadiq's call for referendum on Brexit deal...  
This what Maliki and most Iraqi leaders think about the Kurdish referendum.  
A question of etiquette:462 days since we voted for Brexit. Tories say another 4 years, if ever.When are pitchforks acceptable? 
130 banks to apply for UK licence ahead of #Brexit#fintech #insurtech #blockchain #frankfurt 
Brexit was quite literally created by a racist, who chums around with white supremacists and Facists.  
Corbyn's preparation for a run on the £ makes him MORE credible. Remember how Cameron refused to prepare for Brexit? Let's not do that again 
Labour can't back hard Brexit and end austerity.   
US just put 220%tarrifs on #Bombardier factories in NIre. Welcome to the wonderful land of WTOrules #Brexit folk. The penny must drop soon.. 
I got a lot of stick yesterday for suggesting that Labour is being ambiguous on Brexit. Can anyone tell me clearly what their aim is? 
Gosh, 115k of you.Including 114k Russian pornbots, sitting all there in rapt awe like Minions, as I explain the complexities of Brexit. 
This thread by @pmdfoster is must-read if you want to understand current state of play in Brexit negotiations.  
And we wonder why public has lost faith in journalism. Par 3 of *this* story. "The damage would lead to a 4.48% drop in UK GDP and 1.54% in EU GDP". Headline: "Hard #Brexit will hurt EU more than Britain". Nonsense  
Must-read by m'coll @rafaelbehr - Brexit Tories opened the door to revolution. Corbynites walked through  
REAL BREXIT BILL: Brussels now demands UK pays £10BILLION for Eurocrats pensions  @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may 
It comes down to choices. Police and NHS or the money pit that is David Davis's Brexit dept?  
Mayor of London Sadiq Khan calls for Labour to back second Brexit vote  
Banks rush to apply for UK banking licences ahead of Brexit.  
People are saying the US trade decision on Bombardier shows Theresa May can't rely on Trump after Brexit 
EU furious as UK embarks on ‘Brexit diplomacy tour’ of Europe states to BYPASS Brussels #brexit  
The cost of #brexit continues to grow - not what we were promised! 
People already denying they voted Leave. If #brexit happens in a few years the greatest abuse would be to be called a "leaver or Brexiteer"  
Dear Citizens of the UK, do you want to know what government commissioned reports say will happen to our economy after Brexit? I do.  
Guess who is in the driving seat? (Clue: It's not Britain). The EU hold all the aces. Brexit is an act of national self harm. #StopBrexit 
How Brexit hurts NHS:*EU staff leaving*Fallen £ hits NHS purchases*Cross-border care*Weaker economy*EMA gone*EU medical collaboration 
Theresa May taking "dictation" on her #Brexit Florence speech tells us a number of important things 1/Thread 
It's World School Milk Day. We're backing @NFUtweets' call to ensure schoolchildren still receive milk post-Brexit. #WSMD17 Supermoo agrees! 
Erdogan threatens Iraqi Kurds with famine over referendum  
Khan attacks Brexit. He cannot accept democracy.  
Great tragedy is that Labour, by also supporting Brexit, is actively helping destroy opportunities/future for young  
As we persevere with Brexit, we'd all better get used to waking up to the news our PM - be it May or Corbyn - is 'bitterly disappointed.' 
ICYMI - a great read by @RichardAngell: What is Labour’s position on Brexit? It’s time Corbyn told us  
The Kurdish referendum may be Iran’s biggest challenge since its conflict with Iraq.  
36% of EU citizens working in East Midlands could leave after Brexit. It's the young & in demand most likely to go.  
My cartoon - Bombardier hit by Boeing tariff. Who needs the #EU when we've got the #US?#Brexit#Trump#r4Today 
It's the 'point a finger point three at myself' game they play, ably illustrated when Tories suggest Labour will borrow £500,000,000,000 
‘Brussels told May to say UK would pay Brexit divorce bill’  
Britain's treatment of foreign nationals could ‘colour' MEPs’ view on Brexit deal  
French President Emmanuel Macron has signalled Britain could be part of a reformed European Union after #Brexit  
More than 20 per cent of staff at the Brexit department have left in the last 14 months  
So much for the US being a trade friend post Brexit.  
Today Johnson & Fox are hosting in FCO launch of Dan Hannan's new think tank dedicated to pushing for hard Brexit - @Hannah_McGrath scoop 
#Brexit nowSave net £10bn a yrTrade with EU on WTO termsMeans we'll be £7bn a yr better off£17bn a yr bonus to spend on NHS etc#WhyNot? 
So May, Fox &co look to the US for a trade deal to make up for Brexit; US responds with a 220% tariff on a UK product  
JUST IN: Russia says it supports united Iraq in wake of Kurdistan independence referendum  #kurdishindependence 
All MPs now have a duty to explain to their constituents that Brexit will make us poorer, isolated  and vulnerable #Bombardier 
I seem to be retweeting more criticism of Brexit by Leave campaigners than by Remainers nowadays. Ho hum.  
Even the most dedicated of #Brexit hacks now seem to be getting a little weary @JamesCrisp6 @BrunoBrussels @mattholehouse @MargSchinas 
If you are morally able to perpetuate the Tory deception that the EU is the stalling party in #Brexit talks then you're pond life. 
Despite fierce opposition from Madrid, Catalonia is to hold a referendum on independence on Sunday  
Spain orders Catalan police to clamp down on officials facilitating a contested independence referendum on Sunday  
#Leicester join us in #MakeManchesterMassive to protest against #Brexit this Sunday. Get in touch to co-ordinate transport. @1Day_Leicester 
Funny to see "free trade" rebadged as a menacing "hard Brexit".   
And try telling Bombardier workers this morning that post Brexit we'll be striking 'easy' free trade agreements with the US! 
Labour seduced by Lexit  @MESandbu on why the left wing Brexit arguments are as daft as those from the right... 
So according to more and more people on here May will walk out of Brexit talks this week, possibly today. ... Have a good day everyone.  
#Trump slaps huge tariff on Northern Ireland plane maker killing off UK jobs. #AmericaFirst #Brexit #Bombardier 
The sunlit hills of 220% trade tariffs from our closest "ally" outside the EU. Brexit: the comedy that should never have been written. 
Kurdish leader says 'yes' vote won independence referendum  
Because free trade with the US after Brexit was going to be so easy, wasn't it @LiamFox 
So much for a free trade deal with the US. So much for the special relationship. A Brexit fantasy wrecked  
Time to defend the workers of Bombardier. Trump isolationist, protectionist Brexit-style politics have  trumped any 'special relationship'.  
Ireland is to hold a referendum on whether to scrap its ban on abortion, Prime Minister Leo Varadkar has announced  
If you still believe US will be the trading savour of UK post #Brexit just take a look at the #Bombardier case. 
Michael Gove faces a showdown meeting with Head of Food and Drink Federation over Tory's terrifying lack of planning for trade after Brexit.  
Lib Dems welcome Sadiq's call for referendum on Brexit deal  via @LibDems 
AFP Graphic showing legal grounds for abortion in selected OECD countries. Ireland plans abortion referendum in 2018  
A salutary lesson as to the importance of the #EU to us and the dangers of the #brexit myths, our new "buddy" #USA will hang us out to dry. 
The vote’s been declared illegal by Madrid, but Catalans plan to cast ballots in an independence referendum anyway  
A Furious Mandy Baldwin on May, European Armies & Magna Carta #csm #Brexit  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately  38,000 Signatures for the #Brexit we voted for RETWEET 
The people "on the Brexit side" were in AL campaigning for bigot Roy Moore. The people "on the Brexit side" have a history of bigotry.  
Brexit Tories opened the door to revolution. Corbynites walked through  
This is false. Farage on Bannon "greatest political thinker of our time,"  The "people who brought you Brexit" R Bannonite ethnonationalists  
Boeing ruling v Bombardier upheld, what power has #brexit UK to push back? NI about to feel the chill of trading with the "World " 
The Kurds in Iraq have voted in a referendum. But will that actually translate to independence?  
I am frequently told allegedly factual reasons for backing #Brexit which turn to dust when subjected to basic scrutiny  
Le Brexit negotiator in Hyères, France, demands head rub before we can get down to trade talks. 10/10 for "No Rub!No Deal!"@thecatreviewer 
There’s no Brexit in the national interest, most MPs know it, which is what makes the failure of parliamentary democracy unforgivable. 
UK & US R tied in a Gordian Knot. People who brought UK Brexit & US Trump are still at it. Bannon/Mercer/Kassam/Farage/Mensch/Wigmore/Banks 
The Kurdish independence referendum means that in practice "Iraq" no longer exists - Peter Van Buren @WeMeantWell  
Brexit Britain drops from 6th to 8th place in the World Economic Forum's Global Competitiveness Report 2017-2018  
In 2016, 'porn' was briefly overtaken by 'Brexit' as the most searched-for term on the internet. 
Top-ranking European politicians turned their backs on Theresa May's big Brexit speech.  
Catalonia referendum: Spanish security forces move to 'neutralize' polling stations  
Oxford School District $38 million bond referendum passes with 83 percent voteThe Oxford School District’s $38...  
Trump endorsed Strange, but it’s best to see the race as a referendum on McConnell and the establishment.  
A poet for the age of Brexit: revisiting the work of A. E. Housman, by Adam Kirsch  
#alabamasenaterace was a referendum on @SenateMajLdr #McConnell. #Moore evidence that #maga #Americans are GOING to #DrainTheSwamp! #BOOM! pic.twitter.com/4nqK5uyQ5F 
The Roy Moore win was not a referendum on President Trump, it was a referendum on the Establishment and the Republican Party. 
The voters of Alabama have sent a message.This is a referendum on your failed presidency.. b'bye Donny!!#SoMuchWinning#TrumpRussia  
No it's NOT about #Brexit it's about TERRORISM taking over. Sharia being allowed to run rampant 
Any Alabama Republican who supports the Constitution will not support Roy Moore. This is their referendum on the supreme law of the land. 
The UK has tumbled in a ranking of top destinations for expats following the June 2016 vote for Brexit  
THANK YOUTonight our community voted to approve the facilities referendum that provides needed repairs to our 24 schools.#HTSDreferendum 
Before #MSM led by @CNN call this a referendum on #Trump,I'm calling it a referendum on #McConnell that'll lead2 #Moore winning4 POTUS!   
The column: Roy Moore victory was not a referendum on Trump  
Every election for the forseeable future is going to be, in part, a referendum on Trump.  
REFERENDUM PASSES!! 732-518! THANK YOU CRESSKILL COMMUNITY! #CresskillPride 
The landlocked Kurdish region of Iraq is bracing for potential economic fallout from its independence referendum  
Holy shit, @Annette_Taddeo has just flipped #SD40! Anti-Trumpism referendum. Congratulations!  
The Brexit bill may have just gotten even bigger  
If the truth got out the uproar would destroy them & Brexit. They're running scared. I just hope someone on the inside does the right thing. 
#kurdishindependence referendum is blow against idea of mythical Islamic "ummah." Human culture & diversity triumph totalitarian religion.  
Iraqi Kurdish leader says majority voted “yes” in referendum  
Where is our Referendum on Water?@horseymatilda @LegalEagleStar @babsbear @SaorAgusGaelach @caulmick @annfarrelly32 @angiebeeb @nbuckley529 
You have to wonder why so many staff are leaving the Brexit department. Wonder if @DavidDavisMP knows the answer? #StopBrexit 
Mass-reporting by the Brexit brigade.  
Groups haven't been campaigning for a referendum for years because they think the public should get a vote on womens human rights 
We need to have a referendum because that's the only way to change the Irish constitution 
What Brexit? London crowned top global city  
List of things Russia did:Elected TrumpBrexitCatalonia rebellionGerman AfD gainsAnd by the way, where's my cat?  
Grim for NI, and two big Brexit lessons: 1/ new tariffs can cost real jobs, 2/ (NB Jeremy) no chance of 'unfair state subsidies' outside EU  
Labour are in denial. In denial over the election result, Brexit, antisemitism and the fact they’re not united. It will come back and bite. 
The BBC which, after all is supposedly the British Broadcasting Corporation, keeps on referring to our side in Brexit talks as 'the British' 
FINALLY Ireland is having abortion referendum. Its in 9 Months & we need to make sure they go thru with it.Wait, this feels like a trap? 
The Kurds in Iraq have voted in a referendum. But will that actually translate to independence?  
lads use "Muslim men control women" as an excuse to hate Islam and then will go and vote no in the repeal the 8th referendum 
#Brexit + #Tories ^ Gove = Terrifying lack of Food Planning 
Theresa May, I was born in London in 1945. I have always felt at home in the EU.#brexit #bremain #remain #leave #eu 
16 (Don't @ me that HO is putting ppl off because a simplified system will come with Brexit. Nothing stops HO simplifying now.) 
Irish women: 'We demand a referendum on #repealthe8th!'English feminist: 'no you can't have it, men might vote no' 
14 (Imagine if EU were claiming now British citizens perm residence docs in Spain & France will be automatically invalidated on Brexit!) 
Ken likes Donald Trump. Ken is a racist. Ken doesn’t understand democracy. Ken supports Brexit. Don’t be like Ken.  
The Spanish government sends thousands of police officers to Catalonia in the run-up to Sunday's planned referendum  
.Is Theresa May preparing to Throw Britain Under The Brexit Bus?.  
NATO chief slams EU bureaucrat Juncker for #EU Army'Nato has a proper sense of direction and leadership'#Brexit 
Good talking to @jeremycorbyn again tonight. A Labour leader who cares about Ireland matters during #brexit discussions  
9 HO threat to invalidate is opposite to what UK & EU cits needs - calm   managed transition to Brexit. And it's completely avoidable. 
Time for a big last push to crowd fund the #StopBrexit march at the Tory Conference, Manchester Oct 1 #Brexit 
8 invalidating EU residence cards at Brexit leaves those EU citizens & family with no proof of acquired rights. 
6 So Home Office has no legal basis to tell public what the status of EU permanent residence cards will be after Brexit. There's no law. 
Now here's a thing. Whilst Brexit was marginalised at #Lab17, the Pro-EU strength of feeling in our Party grows every day. We're optimistic. 
It's been declared illegal by Madrid, but Catalans plan to vote in an independence referendum anyway  
When & if Scotland has a referendum is gift of people through electoral mandates -there is one now...& there is no finite number. #scotnight 
A general election could deliver a very nasty shock to Labour if Corbyn persists with current approach to Brexit. #Newsnight 
I believe the Catalan independence referendum has sufficient momentum to succeed. Catalan leadership have done sufficient preparation. 
Brexit: Donald Tusk says not enough progress in talks  
Ireland finally announces a referendum on the 8th amendment and Twitter doubles the character limit. This is going to get ugly isn't it? 
A foreign country's illegal referendum has nothing to do with our Scottish government. SNP support should not be paid for by the taxpayer... 
Ireland says it will hold a referendum on the country's abortion laws, which are among Europe's most restrictive  
Wednesday's Express: "Britain facing no deal Brexit" (via @MsHelicat) #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
I blame Brexit for this  
.Oh yesLabour = A Brexit Government in Waiting. 
More than 20 per cent of staff at the Brexit department have left in the last 14 months  
Take-aways from #FDDay in Paris:*Macron & team making a huge pitch for start-ups & tech from UK. *Brexit seen as a massive own goal. 
Spanish Civil Guards close 140 websites supporting #Catalan independence #referendum planned for Oct. 1  
BREXIT vote was a disaster. To be more specific since then UK has suffered humiliation and capitulation. Stop Brexit  
Allow me to just emphasise this point. 526000 is the population of Sheffield. Not exactly a "jobs first" Brexit is it @jeremycorbyn?  
Things Corbyn doesn't know: SNP scrapped tuition fees Scotland didn't get all powers promised after #IndyRef His position on Brexit 
My interview with @jeremycorbyn on Brexit and Venezuela. Watch!  
Kurdish leader, Iraqi PM engage in war of words day after Kurdish independence referendum  
Labour would fall apart if it actually had to take charge of the Brexit talks #premium 
The Irish PM has called a referendum on the decriminalisation of abortion. The time has come to #repealthe8th. 
Leader of the Irish #Labour Party at #Lab17ِ #LabourConference warns that #Brexit threatens to destroy #Ireland 
NO NO JEZZA! Stand up to BREXSHIT don't take sides with #trump and #farage! say no to #JeremyCorbyn's #brexit  pic.twitter.com/xU8eNYAytU 
"Police will be deployed at polling stations to prevent people from voting in the Catalan independence referendum."  
I'm reminded daily by Brexit that Scotland could have chosen an outward looking and internationalist path by making its own decisions.  
.@marianorajoy asked for a #referendum in 2006,saying that a democratic gov should never turn its back to the people,who should be heard #1O 
(1/19) A thread for 'leave' voters and why you more than anyone should be demanding a vote on the final Brexit deal. 
People bang pots from their balconies across the country to support the referendum. Impressive!  
In any case, we’re stuck between May throwing us off the Brexit cliff or the equally mad Labour party remodelling us on Venezuela... 
If there was a referendum on Final Brexit deal how would you vote? Please RT for bigger sample. 
Finally found the fabled Vision of Brexit and it's pure nightmare fuel  
The referendum question should have been "Are you angry?" 17.4m misfits could have answered 'Yes'... with no harm done. #Brexshit 
Spain orders police crackdown on Catalonia referendum officials  
We look forward to a firm commitment to a specific date for a straightforward referendum to #repealthe8th @ailbhes 
There’s a lot more small farmers in NI than GB. 88% of income from EU subsidies. Also major DUP constituency... #brexit  
'Why the referendum on Catalan independence is illegal'  @TheEconomist 
"Sauce for the goose is...."  : rerun one referendum in which the electorate were duped & you have rerun the other...not going to happen! 
The Conservatives are undoubtedly a successful political party. It'd not look great if they tripped up at their highest hurdle: Brexit. 
Britons happier now than before Brexit vote  
#Iran-ian raid squads working with intelligence agencies going through Saqqez #Rojhelat arresting people who attended referendum celebration  
Yes. The question is who IS paying?I'm trying to find out who was paying these people to promote Brexit too  
This isn't about the flag or the troops. Trump has turned a non violent protest of police brutality into a referendum on "spoiled Black men" 
Ojej! Theresa, you said we would have a cake and eat it! Where is the cake? Don't tell me that oaf Johnson ate it all!!! #brexit  
he does speak for us all - never been a fan of IDS but hes spot on over brexit Im impressed  
“Go get 'em”: Crowd chants Spanish police officers leaving for #Catalonia in the run-up to the Oct 1 referendum . 
NEWS! UK Brexit negotiating team exhausted after spending day chanting ‘We can do this’  
The abortion referendum will be the nastiest referendum in our lifetimes. Hopefully people choose logic and humanity over fear. 
Picking up rumours that #May will be walking out of #EUNegotiations for #Brexit Once again proving #Tories cannot put #CountryBeforeParty 
Great news! This is going to be a tough fight but I think we can do this!Ireland to hold abortion referendum in 2018  
This may be the best analogy for Brexit yet.  
Another Labour Brexit position. It’s changing almost daily now.  
A referendum is always the best "accurate numbers and accurate polling", Mr. @realDonaldTrump. 
Can’t vote Labour as they are pro-Brexit.Lab: Ssh! Corbyn’s a remainer playing a long game.Ok I voted Labour.Lab: Brexit it is then. 
Let me just put down a marker for 2022. If Labour pushes Brexit it won't form the next Government. 
Fearing run on the pound if Labour wins? Tory Brexiteers never bothered to war-game disastrous plunge in sterling caused by their referendum 
Brexit Diary: What does Donald Tusk mean by "realism"?New by me at @JackofKent:  
Despite fierce opposition from Madrid, Catalonia is to hold a referendum on independence on Sunday  
On Mon delegate said anti-Brexit march cooked up to undermine Corbyn. Now Len says antisemitism charge the same. Maybe Jews behind the demo?  
Brexit: trivial thing that’s going to screw UK economy & decimate public services.But up the unicorn revolution! 
Iraqi Kurdish leader says 'yes' vote won independence referendum @Reuters  
Irish government announcing there will be a referendum on abortion next year is a major step forward for woman's rights  #repealthe8th 
Ah fuckin referendum right now ya cunts #Begbie4Democracy 
Ireland to hold referendum on abortion laws next year  
Iran-Iraq-Turkey warning #Kurds of repercussions & war over the referendum.The trio as part of OIC demands plebiscite in Kashmir. @MEAIndia 
Interesting (& good) to hear this Potus advocate for unity in Spain after supporting Brexit & signaling support for anti-EU party in France 
Five Nobel Peace Prize winners, @yokoono, @itspetergabriel, @IrvineWelsh and others suporting Catalan referendum  
London mayor Sadiq Khan breaks ranks to demand new Brexit referendum on final terms 
Una bona feina, via @POLITICOEuropeCatalonia referendum: How did we get here?  
Macron lays out vision for 'profound' changes in post-Brexit EU  
London Mayor calls for SECOND referendum on #Brexit !#EUref2 #BrexitShambles #Article50 #BrexitExit #StrongerIN 
Iraq: Kurdish leader Barzani claims win in independence referendum  
It is scandalous that people you elected don't publish the reports on #brexit. They should be prosecuted, just for that 
Iraqi Kurdish leader says "yes" vote won independence referendum  
Trump's was for Brexit. Now says Spain should "stay united." 
Spain has "lost the plot" in trying to stop the Catalan #referendum on independence #lovedemocracy 
Why the referendum on Catalan independence is illegal  
Indeed, makes you wonder if there isn't a solution which prevents job losses and promotes job creation, a cohesive union of European states? 
DUP voters seem only now to have realised this problem. Their leaders, who urged Brexit on them, are either unhinged or equally slow-witted 
@LBC My son is 21, voted Brexit & supports Tories/UKIP. It's impossible for him to be open about it either at Uni or work. #FarageOnLBC 
Saving UK autonomy in #defence after Brexit.Our event with @the_tpa at #CPC17 Mon 2 Oct 1300: 
BIAFRA: THE NIGERIAN GOVERNMENT REFUSAL TO OBEY INTERNATIONAL LAWS ON BIAFRA REFERENDUM: REASON WHY NIGERIA SHOULD…  
It would be great stuff if those values led him to the same conclusion rather than supporting Brexit, which is the exact opposite.  
Welcome announcement by Taoiseach @campaignforleo to hold a stand alone referendum on the 8th Amendment in May/June. 
 It will be no ordinary referendum this Sunday. Yet the Catalan government refuses to give in  . 
Emmanuel Macron says Britain could be part of reformed EU after Brexit  
Brexit, for most Thickiteers, is no longer about the EU. Europe is merely a scapegoat for everything wrong with their worthless lives. 
A Nobel laureate economist just said there is 'zero chance' Brexit will make Britain better off  
Dugdale wants another EU referendum but adamantly refuses another Scottish independence referendum. Hypocrisy at its finest. 
Spanish nationalists burnt Catalan flags during a face-off with Antifa in Valencia over Catalonia's upcoming independence referendum.  
If you have #repealthe8th in your bio and you don't vote in the upcoming referendum purely because you think it'll go through, unfollow me. 
Gathering flow of rumours May is going to trigger a walk out of Brexit negotiations as early as tomorrow. Single Market trigger in question. 
Keir Starmer says second referendum on Brexit not practical because by time we know shape of final deal we'll have been out several years 
Ireland to hold abortion referendum weeks before pope's visit  
Dear curious outsiders, Don't look at this as a referendum on Trump. It's a referendum on McConnell, who's for Strange. Love, Alabama 
BREAKING: Kurdish leader Barzani says 'yes' vote won in Kurdistan independence referendum  
A doctor from a clinic run by the Chaldean church describes what the Kurdistan referendum means to #Christians:  
Well done Ireland!Better late than never, I guess...(They're having a referendum on abortion next year.)#repealthe8th 
Mays capitulation an insult to Brexit voters, EU like Oliver will always want more. Tell them OUR terms take it or leave it, if no deal walk 
Juncker wants a superstate. Macron demands it.  Good luck with any second referendum Clegg and co  
This discussion on exiting #Brexit is worth an hour of your time. With @jameschappers @iandunt and @rupertmyers  
A day after the referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan, Iran announced that Turkey's military chief of staff will be visiting Tehran next week. 
#BREAKING: Kurdistan President Masoud Barzani claims victory for 'yes' vote in independence referendum  
Make sure you're registered to vote for the #RepealThe8th referendum next year!! 
Sadiq Khan suggests Labour may back second referendum on #Brexit.Sure fire way of making themselves unbeatable  
The idea that #Brexit is patriotic is laughably pathetic.  
What does Jeremy Corbyn personally think about Britain and the EU? #brexitRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
'We'll leave the EU therefore we can't be in the Single Market on same basis'says @Keir_Starmer @faisalislam 'Brexit mired in semantic soup' 
'Profound transformation': Macron lays out vision for post-Brexit EU  
President Barzani: Thanks and gratitude to all people of Kurdistan, referandum committee & security forces for the success of Referendum  
A referendum on #repealthe8th is confirmed for next year. Join us at #ARCMarch17 to show the Govt that we want #freesafelegal 
Brexit "risks destabilising a peace process that ended the Troubles which cost 3000 lives.That would be a tragedy" 
Looks like hapless May has wasted another 2 months in Brexit talks. When she's already wasted 6 and only got 12 left, that's quite something 
I'm sweating like the Catholic Church when the abortion referendum in Ireland was announced 
Good luck if you imagine Labour in Brexit Britain will deliver anything but less devolution and Indy never.  
After a campaign to #repealthe8th, the Irish government announced a referendum on abortion will be held next year.  
Ireland to hold referendum on abortion in 2018  
Since Brexit, the UK has gotten happier!  
Labour 2017: woman journalist requires a bodyguard, no debate about Brexit, anti-semitism so bad the venue threatens to ban party in future.  
The Oct 1 #referendum on Catalan independence explained by The Financial Times:  
Sadiq Khan Is OUT OF CONTROL. Trump, UBER, Brexit, Acid, FGM. Totally lost the plot. I fear for his sate if mind.  
.@BenPBradshaw – The public have a right to express a view on the final Brexit deal  
Labour wrong to suggest nationalisation of public services is not possible within the EU/Single Market, writes @MollyMEP. #Brexit #Labour17 
Invitation from @EmmanuelMacron for UK to remain in substantially reformed EU potentially massive gamechanger in Brexit debate #stopbrexit 
Govt's mishandling of Brexit means they're running out of time and risk crashing out with no deal. People must be given say on final outcome  
As leader of the Irish Labour Party, I'm sick of being ignored while Brexit threatens to destroy Ireland completely  
So a plummeting pound is good when caused by the Brexit vote but very, very bad when posited as a theoretical consequence of a Labour Govt? 
-Council For National Policy-FaceBook Hacking-Climate Denial-Voter Machine Rigging-Brietbart-Brexit/Calexit-Constitutional Convention  
Amid hysteria about @UKLabour & the £ @jeremycorbyn reminds media sterling has suffered its biggest fall since 1949 due to Tory #Brexit. 
Tom can't see the irony that Murdoch and the Sun decided Brexit which they now slavishly support  
My 8pm  returns tonight. We will discuss: 1. Labour economic insanity 2. Tusk on Brexit. 3. Bend the Knee or grow a pair? Join me. 
"The Spanish govt should allow the referendum" Susan George (@attac_fr) #Catalonia #LetCatalansvote 
"I find the Spanish govt efforts to stop the referendum anti-democratic and counter-productive" @JodyWilliams97 #Catalonia #LetCatalansvote 
Sophie, a #Dane living in #Britain, wants to go home after the #Brexit vote but can’t. Read why and please re-Tweet:  
Yazidis displaced forced to vote "Yes" for #Kurdistan #Referendum , this what #UN and tens people in FB ensured. 
Maybe it is 2early to say it but I have the impression Barzani will stand down and be happy with just a #referendum in #Kurdistan: good show 
Ireland is FINALLY holding a referendum on abortion. That's amazing news. This is why -->  
Brexit becoming very real. This is a notice to business owners concerning plant protection sent out by Commission today  
'Israeli flags won’t save you': #Erdogan threatens Iraqi Kurds with famine over referendum  
Ireland to hold 2018 referendum on repeal of abortion ban...a few weeks before the pope visits 
The Kurdish referendum may be Iran’s biggest challenge since its war with Iraq.  
 Just say it as it is Man ! @theresa_may was never in control of Brexit, the EU27 have kicked sense right up her UK 
Catalonia’s Independence Referendum: What’s at Stake? my NYT guide to understand a complex and uncertain conflict  
Corbyn pours cold water on Lib Dem proposal for referendum on deal. He doesn't want to give people final say with chance to exit from Brexit  
Call me soppy but genuinely I wonder if Brexit would be happening if we'd had this in place for the last 20 years.  
Brexit transition period could last as long as 5 years, Irish authorities think  
Talk to me again about that predicted post-Brexit exodus of financial service businesses.  
Actually Macron has confirmed Brexiteer warnings were right. If Brexit is reversed the UK would become part of a United States of Europe 
Catalan president congratulates Kurdish counterpart on referendum(happy) 
Voice of half British people is ignored. We want to stay in & reform EU w our partners. Brexit based on lies. Please help us. Aidez nous SVP  
Brexit negotiations not ready for next stage yet, EU's Tusk says  
The @FT get it, but will Leave voters ever realise they have painted us all into a corner by opting for Brexit?  
.@RoisinShortall today called on the Taoiseach to call a referendum to amend Article 43 to tackle the housing crisis #LeadersQuestions 
Whatever your views on the referendum, Kurds delivered a PEACEFUL vote. Others threaten violence & instability  
Dear Theresa, You may want to watch Macron's EU speech. Has big plans to move on. So EU unlikely to spend a lot of time on Brexit. Just FYI. 
Defra says its not in the public interest to know the likely effect of Brexit on food prices  
There's only one way to protect Scotland's interests during this chaotic Brexit process and it's not by supporting Brexit backing Labour. 
If there was to be a new Brexit referendum then LAB voters would be overwhelmingly for REMAIN  
#UPDATE Ireland will hold referendum next year on whether to repeal constitutional ban on abortion in almost all cases, government announces 
Nigel captioned "Brexit leader". Should someone tell Fox News there's no such fucking thing, and even if there is it's called Boris?  
Ireland's holding a referendum on abortion in 2018, so basically asking a 50% male group whether they think women deserve bodily autonomy 
 REPLAY - Watch Emmanuel Macron's full speech presenting his vision of post-Brexit Europe  
Ireland just announced it's holding a referendum on abortion   
Brexit will be to Labour what Austerity was to the LibDems. A huge mistake that they may never recover from. 
Brexit is not about damage control it's about getting rid of the shackles and damage in which the EU has ensnared us for the last 44 yrs.  
Driving in #Erbil #Kurdistan the day after independence referendum #music and #Kurdish flags everywhere 
You can't have a policy you can't define, can't cost, can't ever benefit from and which causes nothing but division and chaos. Bin Brexit. 
#BREAKING Ireland says will hold abortion referendum in 2018 
Thomas Cook. Holidays to go up 10% as a result of fall in pound following #Brexit vote. Well done #Leavers 
Taoiseach tells the Dáil the Government has agreed an "indicative timeline" for a standalone referendum on the Eighth Amendment  
While everyone’s distracted by Brexit, Tory austerity continues to cripple public services  via @thecanarysays 
Catalonia referendum timeline: How did we get here?  
Spain signals the Catalan president is set to be ousted if the referendum goes ahead  
This would have been such a good policy in the UK. Hopefully it will apply to the Brexit transition deal  
I'm Dutch (born Brit) and I endorse #Brexit & #Nexit because we can be united only in freedom, sovereignty and rule of law 
New edition of Which? shows where Brexit price rises are hitting UK consumers - cars, cereal, butter,coffee, jam, wine, laptops, holidays...  
The EU cannot force us to join any army. We have VETO!They can make one by themselves. But Brexit doesn't stop that!!! 
Pity the @UKLabour leader doesn’t believe we need a second referendum. But, like most Brexiters, he knows his side would lose this time.  
I thought the coolest night in British political history was the 1945 Labour landslide. But no, it was Billy Brexit's fucking disco.  
Country is terribly divided, 1st Ref was won on lies, Brexit will be disastrous. Only zealots wld oppose this vote  
Conor McGinn quotes an anonymous Irish MP: "Brexit feels like you're shooting yourselves in our foot." 
130 banks to apply for UK licence ahead of Brexit, says Bank of England - The Telegraph  
The Taoiseach has confirmed an abortion referendum on the 8th amendment to the constitution will take place in May or June next year. 
Int. elex monitors find KRG referendum ‘free & w/out probs.’Int elex monitors found Turkey ref “unfree & unfair.”Which is illegitimate? 
BREAKING: Catalan government sends notifications to the October 1 electoral agents, defying Spanish police anti-referendum operation. 
The UK has got happier since the Brexit vote  
In 8 or 9 months Ireland will go to the people for a referendum on abortion. Here are the 6 referendums just confirmed by the government:  
Regarding Catalonia: any area that holds a referendum for independence using free, fair, and secret ballots must be respected. #liberty 
The problems of the Brexit transition  
Brexit Hero Farage in Alabama: Judge Roy Moore 'Not Going to Be Sucked into The Swamp' - Breitbart  
Boris Johnson’s Brexit intervention has put the focus back on statistics, and the actual numbers do not look good -  
Starting a new Brexit club night. Parasite Farage 
Video: Catalonia's referendum explained  
Sadiq 'Khant' calls for a 2nd. Eu referendum at Labour conference.....Errrmm... can we also have a 2nd London Mayor vote please?!#useless 
& America needs a convo about Bannon, Mercer, Farage, Banks, Wigmore, Kassam, Mensch. They brought U Brexit & us Trump. They haven't quit.  
Let's be real, NFL wouldn't be on knees or elbows if Hilly had won the election. This is a referendum on Trump and a symbolic war on USA . 
Starmer talks nonsense on free movement - but then fails to rule out a Brexit referendum on final terms 4 times  
As the leader of the Irish Labour Party, I'm sick of being ignored while Brexit threatens to destroy Ireland   
Today I’d say there is no "sufficient progress" yet. But cautiously optimistic about @Theresa_May constructive, more realistic #Brexit tone.  
I have been calling for a referendum on the terms of the final Brexit deal since last June. Fully support @SadiqKhan 
Confirmation from the Taoiseach that any referendum on repeal of 8th amendment will be “standalone”; blasphemy, women in home next October 
Nou bot de Whatsapp per saber on pots votar. #sensepor #referendum #votarem #ref1oct 
TUSK: 'Brexit is about damage control & insufficient progress has been made in negotiations'. Absolutely outrageous. 
Remainers said #Brexit uncertainty after a Leave vote would mean fewer travel opportunities, but more Brits than ever in Fuerteventura...  
Meanwhile - in SW1 important from Donald Tusk - he says there hasn't been 'sufficient progress' to move to next stage of Brexit talks 
Inducing kids to denounce dissidents. Today, in schools,  instructions for the Catalan separatist referendum.  
"No sufficient progress yet but we'll work on it" - @eucopresident Donald Tusk on #Brexit talks with PM @theresa_may  
Spanish police beeing cheered by crowds shouting "Go for them!, go for them!" in Andalusia before going to Catalonia to stop the referendum.  
EU's Tusk: Idea of Britain 'having cake and eating it' on Brexit coming to an end  
“Sorry but they're going to have to arrest me to keep me from exercising my right to vote in Catalonia's referendum on self-determination."  
.@OwenJones84 - the Brexit vote was complicated, but immigration became a scapegoat for inequality #classlab17 #lab17 
#BREAKING No 'sufficient progress' in Brexit talks so far: EU's Donald Tusk 
Crowds across Spain chant #AporEllos ("Go get 'em") to police officers leaving for #Catalonia in the run-up to the October 1 referendum  
If Brexit inspired US & EU right-wing nationalism, wouldn’t it be noble if we reversed it and gave the world a positive example to follow?  
Tusk in Downing Street: ‘Brexit is only about damage control’ 
Important thread on the madness of the "no deal" Brexit option  
The problems of the Brexit transitionNew at @FT, by me:  
The famous "#Brexit bill" is actually zero - or even negative.The EU seeks not a single cent on top of the existing liabilities.1/THREAD 
Sigh. Study estimates hard Brexit would reduce UK GDP by 4.5%, EU27 GDP by 1.5%.  
 A must-read on the Catalan issue: 400 Int'l Law professors debunk the false legal basis of the independence referendum. #TheirLiesOurFight 
2nd referendum warranted given stakes, misinformation advanced by Brexit advocates during first vote, what now known re Brexit consequences 
Gone with the Referendum: a Kurdish man destroying his Iraqi passport on the day of #KurdistanReferendum#kurdistan #iraq #Kurds 
Sadiq Khan suggests Labour may back second referendum on Brexit  
Let us be clear: we would like to deny that the Brexit negotiations are an “awful complicated mess.”We will do so once we are able. 
I would quietly note that @kezdugdale and @SadiqKhan's call for a vote on the final terms of Brexit entirely accords with UK Labour policy. 
'We are Catalans': Scots voice referendum solidarity  via @yahooNewsUK 
Sadiq Khan suggests Labour may back second referendum on Brexit  
David Attenborough just accused #Brexit'eers of spitting in the faces of ordinary people & I agree  
The barrage of media lies over Brexit have made people impervious. Time to release those 50 impact studies? 
Brexit: Theresa May meets Donald Tusk for talks. What will May give away now?  
Iraqi Kurd referendum: Erdogan warns of sanctions hunger  
BREAKING: Turkish foreign minister says a joint operation with Iraq, in response to Iraqi Kurdistan referendum, is possible. 
Art 127 and ending Brexit with @jameschappers  Giving power to people w @normanlamb My Lib Dem Conference blog day 3 
Sadiq Khan calls for second referendum on Brexit  
Barnier spurns May offer: accept all #EU rules during post-Brexit transition.Govt must prepare now for No-Deal exit 
New research: The European Union will lose more than twice as many jobs as Britain after a “hard Brexit”  
As Labour tries desperately to ignore Brexit, they're missing the concerns of Remainers who will vote elsewhere.  
Britons are HAPPIER since the historic EU referendum despite political turmoil over Brexit  
This is massive. British Labour now supporting special status for the north. Irish gov must seize momentum  #Brexit 
WHY DID YOU FUCKING VOTE FOR BREXIT THEN?!!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?!? 
One thing Barzani did since yesterday £referendum: tremendously improved  relationship between Haidar Abadi & #Iran. 
Sadiq Khan breaks ranks to demand new Brexit referendum on final terms  
A very encouraging development! @sadiqkhan joins @vincecable in calling for a referendum on Brexit deal v Remain. 
Starmer vs Reality on a Brexit Customs Union  
There isn’t appetite for a second EU referendum in Scotland because we voted correctly the first time. However, we do need to have IndyRef2.  
Bollocks to Brexit stickers flying out at the Labour party conference. We can't give them away (and EU flags) quick enough.  
#Brexit aside, at a certain point @LBC will have to address issue of their employee Nigel Farage campaigning for Nazis in US & GER @IanDunt 
It continuesWhile everyone's distracted by Brexit, Tory austerity continues to cripple public services [OPINION] 
Those are not Labour values. Plus: there is nothing revolutionary about any of them. So obsession with Brexit? Yes! It is our duty. 10/10 
European Council President Donald Tusk is at Downing St to discuss #Brexit with PM @theresa_may 
An appeal to members by Peter Whittle: UKIP must save Brexit  
Press conference with David Davis today. Looks like brexit is going to be ok after all as unicorn finally appears. #BrexitFail 
Make no mistake: Brexit trumps everything else. There is no UK #ForTheMany if Brexit goes ahead. 6/ 
BREAKING: Sadiq Khan calls for second referendum on UK's withdrawal from EU  
A Catalonian friend to me: The world must understand that holding a referendum is a RIGHT not a RIOT @StateDept @foreignoffice 
Brexit is a "net positive" for EU banks outside Britain, ex-Barclays CEO Bob Diamond says  
Kezia Dugdale slams Jeremy Corbyn for his Brexit stance, and calls for second EU referendum in her newspaper column.  
Perhaps you should worry more about the unintended consequences of Brexit Henry 8th powers in the hands of Stalinists?  
Salih Muslim: The [Kurdistan] referendum is a right. If there is an attack on our people there, we are ready to help in military defence.  
#Brexit is an ECONOMIC DISASTER with 'ZERO CHANCE' to BOOST the UK TRADE!says the Nobel prize-winning economist, not me #remain 
Kezia Dugdale has hit out at Jeremy Corbyn over his Brexit policy. The former Scottish Labour leader now wants another referendum on Europe.  
Sadiq Khan just called for a second referendum on Brexit  
Friends! With immediate effect, the former "Hard-Right scab Skinner, who voted with the Tories for Brexit", is once again:"Our Dennis".  
Iraq's army and Turkish forces conduct joint military drills after divisive Kurdish referendum  
Brexit No Deterrent As Italians, Greeks Still Seek Jobs in UK Mr Carney, that's endorsement of confidence in UK!  
Brexiteers want One Vote, Once. Never allowed to review it or change our minds. This will be a first Referendum on the so called deal.  
Lets show the brexiteers the door. I don't support May or Corbyn on brexit. We need an #exitfrombrexit 
Trump / Mercer / Bannan / Brexit / Farage / supremacists are a transatlantic team and we need to catch up fast to tackle what they're doing.  
BRUSSELS BOMBSHELL: Europe would lose TWICE as many jobs as Britain under no-deal Brexit  
Introducing the #Brexit box set. Delighted to announce the arrival of my book on Brexit and Ireland, in shops Oct 5  pic.twitter.com/esgkoyMWob 
Analysis: Iraqi Kurds voted in their independence referendum. Now what?  
Iraq refuses to discuss Kurdish independence after referendum  
Tony abbott 2018:in retrospect, I do regret making it a referendum on headbutting me [is headbutted for the 6th time that week] 
.@iandunt on pettiness of Lab & Con politicians leading Britain to a post #Brexit pickle.  via @politics_co_uk 
Farmers Assembly calls for a Tractor vigil to defend the polling stations and ballot boxes for the referendum. #oct1 #Catalonia 
We are all embarrassed by @UKLabour for their utter lack of principles on the defining issue of our times #Brexit #nationalism  
.@SadiqKhan suggesting referendum on Mrs May's Brexit terms a decisive moment. Real prospect now that the Brexit catastrophe can be averted 
No vote on Labour's #Brexit policy here in Brighton. But leadership's attempts to shut down the pro-EU wing of the party not working  
#TuesdayThoughtsWe need to protest at the injustice & damage of BrexitBe in Manchester on Sunday 01/10 at #ToryPartyConf to #StopBrexit 
"We overturned direction our political class had taken us in & voted against all the lies we'd been told by big business. We voted Brexit!"  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard on the Brexit talks  
Today’s @EveningStandard: exclusive interview with Khan in which he raises prospect of 2nd EU referendum + Lampard on @ChelseaFC 
More videos from Spain, crowd cheering Guardia Civil on their way to Catalonia to repress #1Oct #referendum We are an occupied colony  
Like Brexit, you mean.  
BIAFRA: FAILURE OF THE NIGERIAN GOVERNMENT TO CONDUCT REFERENDUM BEFORE OCTOBER 1ST: NIGERIAN GOVERNMENT IS NO MORE…  
From the @AMI_cat we thank @MMacDonncha, Lord Mayor of #Dublin, support to the catalan mayors who defend the referendum  
Petition: End the export of live farm animals after Brexit.  
The leadership have other plans.The road to reversing Brexit may have just begun at Labour’s conference fringe  
HO will drop demand for private health insurance for EU cits with NHS cover - but only AFTER Brexit. Why not do it now? 1/  
Labour cannot be centre ground & anti-European. Pity @CarolineFlintMP veered off to Hard Brexit. Also strange for ex Europe Minister.  
Kurdistan and Catalonia: Direct democracy by way of referendum is best guarantee of a…  
I’m calling on the Govt to replace the tens of millions of EU funds that will be lost in the capital after Brexit.  
 Lol. Don't tell all the gloomy twats at #Lab17 or the anti brexit mob on suicide watch :) 
Day 7 of this simple question. Does the SNP support this weekend's proposed illegal referendum in Catalonia? 
Petition: Leave the #EU immediatelyWhy wait another 18 months?36,674 signatures - can we make it 100,000 ?#Brexit 
Iain Duncan Smith in @ConHomeBrexit. Why the Government must prepare for no deal now  
The road to reversing #Brexit may have just begun at #LabourConference fringe says @Manuel_TSSA Cortes#labour17 
After Kurdish referendum, both US and UK have softened their language of opposition to the vote, saying ties with Kurds will continue  
May’s Brexit breakdown: UK must settle ‘divorce bill’ says EU’s chief negotiator   
Great discussion with @RupertMyers @IanDunt - I argued Brexit will founder when MPs and peers vote on single market   
Far from damaging the UK economy, Brexit could end up permanently boosting GDP, says top economist   
I can see Brexit is causing some labour people to have some wobbles about #Corbyn. I just wish his extreme views and unsuitability had too 
BREAKING: Turkish President Erdogan calls Kurdistan referendum treacherous, says he did not expect it to proceed - @RudawEnglish 
They had the chance to offer change before the vote. They failed. Juncker's arrogance increased the brexit vote imo. 
LIVE— Erdoğan: If KRG holds the referendum on its own, with only Israel supporting and PKK celebrating it, then there is no legitimacy  
WATCH: Jacob Rees-Mogg dismantles the governments transitional period plan LIVE on the BBC | Your Brexit  
Brexit: Why the government must prepare for no deal now  
Manuel Cortes increasingly crucial voice in Brexit debate. This is excellent.  
Carson's words beginning to haunt the DUP? The Tories have already betrayed them, says @fotoole.#Brexit 
How many white nationalist groups does Farage have to address around the world before the BBC & Sky stop using him as a Brexit pundit? 
The Vice President of the European Commission stripping away the desperate rhetoric of the Brexit Elite.  
Brexit and data protection lawAnalysis of the Data Protection Bill & UK/EU data transfer, by Elif Mendos Kuskonmaz:  
We are only going to be able to make globalisation work for our communities by working with other countries. #brexit #lab17 @LabourList 
I haven’t seen an issue which has had such an emotional reaction in my community. People are worried. #streatham #brexit #Lab17 #@LabourList 
It seems that the Kurdish referendum in Iraq has strengthened the hand of the PYD in Northern Syria  
Owen Smith, Labour Shadow NI Secy,  says Northern Ireland should remain in the EU after Brexit. Template for Scotland?  
NEWS! Government to make Brexit more popular with rebrand to Brexity McBrexitface  
Superb piece by @IanDunt - this is the best you'll read on Labour's emerging spectrum of Brexit options vs Tories.  
.@Alison_Mcgovern: "I don't want Brexit to finish what Thatcher started. End of." #Lab17 
It now stands out like dogs balls that May is attempting to or already may have done so, renegue on brexit means brexit bulls*it. Out out. 
The core voters who support Brexit have been abandoned, says JACOB REES-MOGG  
Bumped into the @MyMonese bus in Paris. Literally the £350m Brexit Lie Bus, but repainted. #stopbrexit 
Everyone on my train seems to be ill. This never happened pre Brexit #stayhealthystayput #BrexitIsBatshit 
#Kurdishreferendum result 93.29% for & 6.71% against. I hope Baghdad opens negotiation on this referendum and not put it aside #independence 
If you say 'Brexit was possibly a bad idea' in the mirror three times an egg appears and tells you to fuck off 
Irish Labour leader Brendan Howlin says final deal on Brexit must be put to a referendum.  
Italy's finance minister says Theresa May's speech in Florence was "moderately helpful"  
ALABAMA: @Nigel_Farage and Steve Bannon take aim at anti-Brexit, anti-Trump 'establishment enemy within'.  
Brexit-backing #Tory MPs caught with their snouts in the expenses trough again, bring on the moat cleaners.  
It's never been so key to learn a language & a new perspective.Speak to a stranger in their language & they are no longer a stranger #Brexit  
This from just two weeks before the advisory referendum.  
David Attenborough voice"Sadly this group of Brexiters can't understand EU law, and will not survive the coming Brexit."  
EU snowflakes. My son's friend (Uni educated) voted Remain because she thought that NANDOS would have to leave UK after Brexit  
Bonjour! Guten Tag! I speak two European languages fluently. I support #Brexit. Love Europe, hate EU #EuropeanDayofLanguages 
Just want to make it clear, i'm against Brexit, EU has its problems but it's better to create a PR to fix than fork a framework. 
Discussing progress of #Brexit talks with EU27 negotiator @MichelBarnier before meeting @theresa_may in London today. 
Iraqi government refuses talks with Kurds about referendum results, calling it 'unconstitutional'  
Not Polish people who should be changing their accents but some English people who should be changing their bigoted views. #Brexit 
Thank you. And God Bless and all your well-wishers. BiafraExit via Referéndum Biafrans will decide. Self-Determination a universal Right @UN 
I invite you to think. That's all i ever do.Why have the Brexit talks got stuck? Think about that. There is no reason for them to be stuck. 
Pete Wishart: Independence 2.0 ... why we need to update the prospectus to get our referendum and win it  
72 percent of voters cast vote in independence referendum  
Catalonia referendum timeline: How did we get here?  
Did people know that Brexit meant leaving the Single Market? Two weeks before EU ref, only 22% of Leavers thought full access was at risk.  
Labour conference: Former Scottish Labour leader says Corbyn partly to blame for Brexit - live  
Claims the NHS is in for a huge windfall after #Brexit are based on ‘fantasy statistics’  
The road to reversing Brexit has begun at Labour’s conference fringe & I'm in that road with @Manuel_TSSA 
Brexit deadlock returns as EU says UK must settle ‘divorce bill’  
#Lab17 #LPC17 #LabourConference We need a vote on the final #Brexit deal, argues the #Labour mayor of #Liverpool 
Would you like keep your EU citizenship after Brexit? Please sign!  
Dugdale says Corbyn partly to blame for Brexit. Clearly she convenieniently forgot how Blairites tried to marginalise his leadership #Lab17 
Important thread. Will Ireland learn lessons from #brexit referendum’s dark money and unregulated online advertising?  
Brexit dividing minorities @thetwerkinggirl "This is not gonna help, this is not gonna help" Lab17ِ 
Davis: 'No excuse for standing in the way of progress' as negotiations begin | Labour row after Brexit vote blocked  
Yes, it's a complete #brexit, isn't it? But have the decency to admit it was your government that set this appalling brexit in motion.  
The brilliant @thetwerkinggirl on Brexit "We own Gibraltar, no you don't love, no working class person owns a thing" #Lab17 
One #Kurdish woman says she did not expected U.S. opposition to referendum, adds that #Kurds fought on behalf of #US against ISIS. 
EU wants more from Britain if there's to be any hope of trade talks next month  
Brexit should be negotiated for benefit of whole country, not just those who voted for it. It’s like 68 million people suddenly don’t exist. 
The sad thing is that this country was really up for a sensible, accessible, compassionate, practical, anti Brexit, listening Labour Party. 
High turnout for Kurds voting in an independence referendum in northern Iraq  via @MichaelGeorgy1 @MaherChmaytelli 
More than 20 per cent of staff at the Brexit department have left in the last 14 months  
How to simultaneously debate and not debate Brexit whilst winning an election by losing it. Labour 2017. Fantastic.  
 Interesting timeline: Catalonia referendum: How did we get here? Via @POLITICOEurope #1Oct 
KRG referendum: A dangerous precedent with consequences. 
Latest poll again shows public mood moving against Brexit.Support growing for referendum on Deal v Remain 
READ:Why Brexit is spiralling out of control and what Labour should do about it  
Ooft. Kezia Dugdale has used her Daily Record column to lay into Jeremy Corbyn over Brexit. #Lab17  
The parallels with Brexit...and this is not mere coincidence: what's rotten in both our hijacked polities has emerged into the light of day.  
The EU's main Brexit man ruled out a "transition period" until divorce terms with the UK are settled  
Day 2: We can see that KRG oil exports are still unaffected following the referendum vote and Erdogan’s threat of oil flow closure. #OOTT 
Brexit is goodEU is badYou have no voiceYou have no opinionWe know bestSit downShut upWelcome to the Labour Party- Momentum#Lab17 
British ministers play up a "security surplus" in Brexit talks as if it were a bargaining card  
May and Corbyn’s continued deliberate ambiguity to the British people about Brexit is cowardice and a betrayal of the democratic spirit. 
Catalonia plans to hold a referendum on independence on Sunday, defying Spanish authorities: how did we get here?  
Former Catalan president fined €5.2 million for referendum  
#Kurdistan: Erbil city celebrates independence from #Iraq referendum results.  
Important contribution on the damage to the Scottish legal system & our rights being done by present @GOVUK approach to #Brexit  
Lack of consultation with @scotgov re #Brexit threatens devolution, Scotland's separate legal system & your rights  
Sadiq Khan hints Brexit might not happen  
If you live in #Yorkshire, join #Leeds for Europe on the Stop #Brexit march this Sunday. Email info@leedsforeurope.org for details  
A Nobel laureate economist just said there is 'zero chance' Brexit will make Britain better off  
"Next Sunday's meeting is canceled. We'll be on the streets, defending the referendum."—Anti-eviction Group  
UK: Support growing for second Brexit referendum 
.Brexit "SO TOXIC that it [has] fractured relationships within the UK itself, and even within families in the UK". 
Iain Duncan Smith: Brexit. Why the Government must prepare for no deal now.  
Donald Trump is impatient with Theresa May's Brexit delays. He wants a deal asap so he can put America First... #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
BBC News -  @Kurdistan referendum: High turnout in independence vote  @KrgEuro @AlynSmithMEP @DCBMEP @CharlesTannock 
Support grows for second Brexit vote between #BrexitShambles or continued EU membership, as is @TheGreenParty policy 
WE WILL NOT PARTICIPATE IN ELECTIONS IN BIAFRA LAND AGAIN TILL REFERENDUM DATE IS ANNOUNCED - Biafra Music Members…  
And yet another renowned intellectual speaks out on the sheer folly of Brexit.Yet our politicians only heed the yobs, the fools & the greedy 
#Brexit making u poorer - senior economist @asentance in @thetimes @UKLabour should oppose increases in poverty @EK_EuropeanMove @Labour4EU 
If I wasn't aware that the vox pop re Brexit on @bbc5live was at the Labour Party conference I'd have assumed they were right wing Tories. 
Have a great Tuesday everyone today!!! Be great if we had some good news on TV  or radio.  Instead Brexit bashing every bloody day please. 
Catalan leader Carles Puigdemont could face arrest over referendum  
Iraqi Kurds voted in their independence referendum. Now what?  
Tensions Escalate One Week Ahead of Catalonia Independence Referendum  #CatalanReferendum 
Splitting bits of Europe into shards. Putin's handiwork, at the core, I suspect. #Catalonia #Calexit #Brexit = disunion.  
UN chief concerned about “potentially destabilizing effects” of #Kurdish independence referendum  
Angela Merkel's hollow victory complicates Theresa May's life and Brexit talks  
Talked to  Iraqi refugee from Salahadeen who fled to Syria. "we don't care if Kurds have independence referendum, at least we are safe' (1) 
Brexit Hero Farage in Alabama: Judge Roy Moore ‘Not Going to Be Sucked into The Swamp’  @3lectric5heep 
Spanish officials: Through seizing millions of ballots and electoral materials we've ruined Catalonia's referendum.  
ICYMI: Falah Mustafa Bakir, Iraqi Kurdish Foreign Minister discusses the Kurdish independence referendum.  
GQRR poll finds 70% of LAB voters wanting some form of 2nd referendum on Brexit. Amongst all voters it is 50%  
The referendum was within the frameworks of the Iraqi constitution. Why did you not support the Iraqi constitution in the case of the Kurds? 
Lebron, how do you feel the Kurdish referendum will affect the sovereignty of Iraq and its tribal conflicts? 
Positive message from US State Dept regarding Kurdistan referendum: Bilateral historical relations will not change.  
Interesting 24 hours for TrumpTrumpcare down in flamesAmerica's Team takes a kneeIf ALABAMA goes blue.. it's a total referendum on Trump  
US: Our 'historic relationship' with Kurdistan wont change despite referendum  
If only he wasn't an expert ☞ Nobel laureate economist Paul Krugman: zero chance of being better off after Brexit 
Softer statement by the US State Department on the Iraqi Kurdistan Independence referendum  
Iraqi Kurds Head to Polls for Kurdish Referendum Vote  #KurdistanReferendum 
Just-in: US says its 'historic relationship' with the Kurdistan Region will not change despite referendum  
Spanish Guardia Civil bans @assemblea's website as the judge interprets that it was promoting the catalan referendum. Censorship continues!  
We will fight until we can't fight anymore. Judge Roy Moore's going to win, Brexit will set Britain free, &we will make the West great again  
The US is disappointed in the Kurdistan Regional Government’s decision to conduct a referendum on independence:  
@J_amesp's book #AlternativeWar ties it together on Kremlin's interference with #Brexit and #TrumpRussia 
The establishment are doing all they can to undo the 2016 successes of Brexit and Trump. We have to go on fighting!  
Labour Party should be 'embarrassed' by no genuine Brexit debate. Our greatest challenge in 40 years marginalised.  
If it looks like a fix it probably is a fix and it is no good claiming otherwise. Time to stop a @UKLabour Brexit. #Lab17 #StopBrexit 
It cld be even harder for GOP to win Collins's vote for a future bill if Maine voters choose to expand Medicaid in the referendum in 6 weeks 
Roy Moore has tried to explicitly turn the GOP’s Alabama Senate primary into a referendum on McConnell’s leadership:  
So many Corbynistas saying "We can't abandon Labour, it would let the Tories in". Err ... They're in. The next GE will be AFTER Brexit. 
Iraqi Kurdistan’s independence referendum Monday has returned its renegade oil industry to the spotlight  
Home from a very lively Full English Brexit meeting tonight. A strong mood for UKIP to get back to the basics of campaigning for Brexit. 
Wonderful watching a nation exercise its right to self-determination. Eventful day included meetings with the youth & referendum festivities  
#BREAKING US State Dep statement says US disappointed about KRG independence referendum,but notes that KRG-US relationship won't be affected 
You have to be strong & stand together... between #brexit #trump I'm loosing the will to live  
Tam Dalyell said Labour MPs should "have the balls" to stop Brexit. It is what the majority of Labour voters want. #Lab17 #StopBrexit 
Logically then, that would also mean that the Labour Party should also support a second independence referendum #ScotRef @theSNP @DundeeSNP 
Greece: Eurozone Membership Referendum, Metron Analysis poll:Remain: 80% (-7)Leave: 20% (+7)#btw17 #nrw17 #AfD #Greece 
.@kezdugdale: I am 'embarrassed' by the Labour conference and the party should support a second EU referendum  
The Thickiteers threaten that, if they don't get their Brexit, then they'll never vote again. Result! 
Iraqi Kurdistan referendum: High turnout in independence vote  
A Nobel laureate economist just said there is 'zero chance' Brexit will make Britain better off #brexitwontwork 
#BREAKING - Videos showing dozens of ballots for 1 person taking place in #Kurdistan referendum, frauds shown off on Snapchat social media  
Exclusive: Support for a second Brexit referendum is growing among British voters amid pessimism about negotiations  
#BREAKING - Ballot stuffing now confirmed in #Kurdistan referendum a,  international observers seemingly not necessary for this campaign  
David Attenborough: “The decision to call a referendum was an abrogation of parliamentary democracy .... because we didn’t know the facts," 
BREAKING: Iraq's PM rejects Iraqi Kurdistan referendum result and says it is the central government's duty to protect all citizens there. 
Example of Kurdistan referendum flawed: Dahuk population one million, voters=994,427; which means most eligible voters are over 18 years old  
1) Potential Voter Fraud in KRG referendum: I am receiving many DISTURBING reports from #Yazidi IDPs in KRI camps saying that they were >> 
I actually agree with this. The UK is going down the #Brexit tubes as we speak. @theSNP has to step up to the #Indy plate & quick! 
“I don’t think there’s any plausible case that Brexit is a good thing for the British economy.” (Nobel Prize economist Paul Krugman) 
Pro-EU Labour members should cancel their membership in protest over Brexit policy. Can still vote in a GE, but the protest may focus minds. 
Dear Jeremy, Gutted that we don't get to vote on Labour's Brexit strategy. Is that because it's secret or don't we have one at all?  
Sadiq Khan hints Brexit might not happen  
The reason why opposition to Brexit hasn't diminished, contrary to what the govt had assumed, is because it's so manifestly irrational. /1 
Brexit: There is 'Zero chance' leaving EU will make Britons better off, Nobel laureate economist Paul Krugman says.  
Top-ranking European politicians turned their backs on Theresa May's big Brexit speech.  
With Labour & Tories offering same mess on #Brexit...are there really still people in Scotland who think we are better governed by Westmin? 
140 websites related to Catalan referendum have been closed by Spanish authorities. Freedom of speech? @JulianAssange @Snowden 
If NZ needs contemporary example of why Māori seats referendum is a terrible idea, look no further than Aus marriage equality postal survey 
Abortion Referendum in Ireland next year. Facebook will be main vector for ads. Who's paying for them? From where? Who will see them? 
#MostWatched Catalan human castles displayed to support independence referendum during #Barcelona's traditional La Merce festival 
#BREAKING - "Kirkuk is Jerusalem of Kurdistan, foreigners out" graffiti in #Kirkuk as increasing race tensions forms over #KRG referendum  
Video allegedly showing celebrations in Sanandaj, Iranian Kurdistan in support of Iraqi kurdish referendum which Iran government opposes.  
Some Kurdish residents in Irbil seen celebrating KRG referendum waving Israeli flags 
Britain would have to accept all EU rules during Brexit transition - Barnier <- prepare for No Deal  
Let's never forget the hard-right violence during the referendum campaign, the racism and hatred that led to the murder of an MP 
Kurds celebrate the independence referendum with  #Israel flags on the streets of #Erbil 
Devastated I couldn't be in Erbil today for referendum but proudly wore my Kurdistan flag today. Now off to celebrate with Kurdish friends.  
The road to reversing Brexit may have just begun at Labour’s conference fringe  
To be fair, @nick_clegg is actually a lovely man with whom I agree on many things. He's just horribly wrong about Brexit.  
Kurdish democracy:Iraqi Kurds are taking to social media to show off the fact they used multiple voter cards in today's referendum.  
He endorsed the losing "remain" side in Brexit. But he's campaigning for a UN security council seat, so he dares not offend Iran or Turkey.  
New face of Iraqi Kurdistan - a pic from today in Kirkuk polling station during independence referendum  
Project Fear didn't work before the EU Referendum and it certainly ain't working now. 
You're one helluva guy, Guy!  This means so much for all of us who've have been placed in a precarious position because of #Brexit 
Not an isolated incident:More footage of Kurds casting several votes to sway referendum result. Corruption galore.  
#Brexit explained...  
EU27 again showing they're not falling for the Bullsh*t. Just unfortunate that Brexit is based on nothing but  
I'd have thought the 'Stop Brexit' campaign outside was to stop Brexit.Besides, it's usually the folks inside who like to undermine Corbyn  
IMPORTANT:Footage of multiple cards being used by Kurdish voters during today's referendum to sway the decision.  
IRAN |Thousands of Kurds in Iran protesting tonight in support of KRG independence referendum:  
A Nobel laureate economist just said there is 'zero chance' #Brexit  will make Britain better off  
Meanwhile, at Brexit.  
#Breaking: 72% turnout in Kurdistan referendum: election commission  
This Brexit railroad has branches. We're a sovereign nation. If we change our minds, who can stop us? Not the Brexit Elite. #remainandreform 
In Scotland, which held its own vote for independence in 2014, supporters of the Catalan referendum hold a rally  
Who to believe - Nobel Prize Winning economist or Jacob Rees Mogg ? #Brexit  | The Independent  
More footage of Kurds in Iran tonight protesting in support of KRG independence referendum:  
Disgusted at undemocratic calls for a democratic vote on Brexit. 
If Labour doesn’t take a position on Brexit, then their position can’t be opposed - James O’Brien  
Labour: having collaborated to bring about Brexit now wants to pretend it doesn't exist. A truly disgraceful party. 
See the Lunacy, Support a Solution!  #StopBrexit #Brexit @mikegalsworthy @Scientists4EU @RichardDawkins @jk_rowling @jameschappers 
Pictures of celebrations in #Qamishlo city to support the #independence referendum in #Kurdistan.Qamishlo#Rojava_Photo \ @BedirAhmed0 
Voted for Merkel: 15,461,932Voted for Brexit: 17,410,742  
Had loads of emails 2day. Many from Corbyn supporters saying I shouldn't criticise for not debating Brexit & many more from upset voters 1/2 
Hate #Brexit? Subscribe to #Remainiacs podcast where the good fight is being fought – @ApplePodcasts 
Brexit: 'Zero chance' leaving EU will make Britons better off, Nobel laureate economist Paul Krugman says  
I am a fully paid up member of Momentum I have  not received a message telling me to stop Brexit being discussed U need to retract this now  
The great historic day has come. Overjoyed to vote at borderline for #KurdistanIndependence #Referendum, only compensation to our sacrifices  
Kurdish flag raised in Sanandaj, eastern #Kurdistan in support of independence referendum. #TwitterKurds #Rojhelat #Bashur 
Bizarre headline from @Telegraph.  Study cited says: "We find that Brexit hits the UK relatively harder than the EU-27"  
Kurdish people in northern Iraq headed to the polls today to vote in an independence referendum:  
NEWS.North Korea?Donald Trump?Brexit?Terrorists Attacks?Naa ere in Yorkshire....   
Canadian PM says he will respect the process of the referendum in #Kurdistan #twitterkurds 
Voting polls for the referendum on Kurdish independence have closed their doors, and the counting of votes has begun  
Independence referendum celebration continues in #Iran'ian occupied #Kurdistan. #Rojhelat #Twitterkurds #Bashur 
According to Rudaw, the latest situation in the #Kurdistan independence referendum is this:Yes 97.08 percentNo 2.92 percent  
New Tory doctrine / delay Brexit for 5 years and stay in under another name. Meanwhile a city the size of Birmingham will move here by 2021  
EU makes it abundantly clear that it has more important issues to worry about than Brexit  
Spain closes the first non-governmental site on referendum. It showed printable posters and meetings to put them up. @BBCNews @guardian 
Iraqi Kurds begin count in independence referendum  
Letters I: If Corbyn could only get his act together and work with the SNP we might just be able to salvage Brexit  
More determined than ever to hold gov to account after packed @BestForBritain panel - no Brexit is better than a bad Brexit! #Lab17 
Nation Gearing Up For Level-Headed Abortion Referendum With No Dirty Tactics Or Scaremongering  
This is a very powerful allegory for Brexit. We are the pigeon by the way, in case you are a Brexiter thinking WTF?  
 25-Sept-17 TV News: 'Final week before the referendum’ Watch it here  . 
Referendum on Kurdish independence. Kurds courageous enough to save Iraq from Daesh & boldly fighting in Syria deserve self-determination. 
Taoiseach should prevent Brexit talks from moving to next phase – @GerryAdamsSF  
Iraq's Kurdish Region Votes In Controversial Independence Referendum  
The road to reversing Brexit may have just begun at Labour’s conference fringe 
VIDEO: #Iran-ian Kurds celebrate independence referendum #TwitterKurds #KurdistanReferendum 
Labour have now betrayed people on:-BrexitTuition fees1950's women's pensionsLying toads are naval gazers only interested in power. 
Iraqi Kurds vote for independence referendum, amid threats  
#PYD #YPG & Kurdistan flags waved together as #Kurdistan Region's independence referendum is celebrated in #Qamishli  
Podemos MP Isidro Lopez on the Catalonian referendum.  
Labour hasn't listened or learned from its disastrous approach to EU Referendum, now leadership compounds this by avoiding democratic debate  
The British Public voted to #LEAVE.  The #EU is in complete denial that they are going over a cliff. I Don't want to go with them. #BREXIT  
Will the Kurdish referendum spiral into violence? @RuwaydaMustafah: "What we want is democracy" 
These sad, pathetic Brexit boneheads who don't recognise the Brighton Pavilion probably also think that Sunni and Shia were a 1960s pop duo. 
Something incredible. Kurds in Iran take to the streets to celebrate the referendum held in Iraqi Kurdistan - how will this end?  
Kurdistan supervisors begin counting votes in independence referendum  
Thanks to @labourirish for a fine, if hot, reception & to @BrendanHowlin TD for a fine, short speech. We agree: No border in Ireland #Brexit  
Turnout in the Kurdish independence referendum reportedly reached 78%; ballots are now being counted; results expected in 72 hrs. (Chan 10)  
#Turkey's argument that it's merely fighting #PKK and not all the #Kurds is collapsing with its opposition to Iraqi Kurdistan referendum. 
How is the Kurdish independence referendum different from Catalonia’s?  
The polls for Iraqi Kurdistan's independence referendum closed at 7PM GMT after voting was extended for an hour  
Some quick thoughts about the KRG referendum and the conundrum it poses for the West  
Tens of thousands of Kurds in #Iran'ian occupied #Kurdistan celebrate the independence referendum in Bashur. #Twitterkurds #Rojhelat 
Referendum results on village-level in Ninewa:Bashiqa town:Yes: 98%No: 2%Omar Qabchi:Yes: 96%No:4%Fadhiliyah:Yes: 98%No: 2% 
A funny thing about brexit.No-one has ever sat down 2 negotiate a trade deal where both sides move further apart.#brexit #BrexitShambles 
BRUSSELS BOMBSHELL: Europe would lose TWICE as many jobs as Britain under no-deal Brexit  
If you are interested in the Kurdish referendum and aren't following @sfrantzman then you're making a big mistake. 
A British MP explains on Russian news channel how unpatriotic the BBC is for not unconditionally loving Brexit  
.@Nigel_Farage is live from the US taking your calls on Labour and Brexit. Watch:  
What are the shenanigans around a debate on Brexit at the @UKLabour conference really about? @bbclaurak explains. #Lab17 
Catalan Health Minister @toni_comin "This is no longer about independence,it's about democracy and civil rights." #Catalonia #1O #referendum  
"Seen searching for serious information on the referendum".#MVT6Dias1O  
Exclusive: More than half of British voters support a second referendum on Brexit  
Irish PM puts May on the spot to explain solution for Irish border post #Brexit. Response: We're working on it  
We are now buggered.EU asks UK for more progress before talks on Brexit transition  
#Jewish-Kurds in the Kurdistan Region cast their vote in the Kurdistan independence referendum.#YesKurdistan 
Overlooking Brexit at #labour17 has been like overlooking inflowing water on board Titanic. I've a sinking feeling now about Capt Corbyn. 
Yes, sadly: "Labour will be remembered as the opposition that let the Tories do what they want with Brexit."  
The road to reversing Brexit may have just begun at Labour’s conference fringe | Manuel Cortes  
Kurds in #Rojhelat ask for freedom from #Iran as they support independence referendum in southern #Kurdistan. #Twitterkurds 
This charade must end now. Making offers to EU27 is like shovelling tissue-paper into an insatiable furnace. UK shd prepare for Hard Brexit.  
Tens of thousands of Kurds defy the Islamist regime in #Iran to support the independence referendum in #Kurdistan.   
Kurds hold independence referendum to split from Iraq  
DUP support for Brexit & propping up Tony cuts agenda risk loss to UU of €20m Eu funds +£ms cuts #Brexit is incompatible with uni expansion  
Good question. I was wondering the same. NYT said he planned to go abroad to Kurdish referendum.  
Graham Stringer MP reminds @labourleave that 70% of Labour constituencies voted to Leave at the referendum  
'Today we will finally have our state': Iraqi Kurds vote in historic referendum on independence  
I know Brexit means we need more doctors, but this is taking it a bit far..."Lavinia Woodward"  
People in eastern #Kurdistan defy #Iran & sing the Kurdish national anthem to celebrate  independence referendum. #Twitterkurds #Rojhelat 
High turn out for independence referendum in #Kirkuk #KurdistanReferendum 
Iraqi Kurds vote in a referendum on independence today. Explore our interactive guide for more on the Kurds:  
At #Lab17, @BrendanHowlin and @columeastwood are speaking at @labourirish reception - both arguing for protecting Ireland from #Brexit  
Kurds in Mahabad, eastern #Kurdistan raise the Kurdish flag in support of the independence referendum in Bashur. #Twitterkurds #Rojhelat 
A reminder for when referendum campaigning steps up, that Youth Defence one parked this outside the Dublin Rape Crisis Centre. #repealthe8th 
Referendum polls closed in most areas at 7:00pm local time after a one-hour extension  #KurdishReferendum 
Brexit as it was sold to UK voters is impossible @ChukaUmunna tells @CER_EU event at Labour Party conference 
Big clap for @ChukaUmunna: "Brexit is not the solution to the UK’s problems. Immigrants are not the reasons for our problems either" 
The Kurds have managed to unite the entire Middle East against them with this referendum in a way not even Israel could. 
Colin Firth has been vocal in opposing Brexit, and he is taking it a step further, becoming Italian dual citizen  
Patriot Michael Caine speaks on why he backs Brexit  
Today, the Kurdish people in northern Iraq are voting for their independence in a non-binding referendum. 1/ 
CBI's Carolyn Fairbairn says 40% of members are postponing or cancelling investment because of Brexit uncertainty.  
Tens of thousands of Kurds defy the Islamist regime in #Iran to support the independence referendum in #Kurdistan. #Twitterkurds #Rojhelat 
We factchecked whether 10,000 jobs have been lost in the financial sector since Brexit  
BRUSSELS BOMBSHELL: Europe would lose TWICE as many jobs as Britain under no-deal Brexit  @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP 
New "Printers for Democracy" group offers to print Catalan referendum ballots for @Catalangov #lovedemocracy 
#kurdishindependence referendum: @RT_Erdogan says Turkish army at Iraqi border and is ready to take 'necessary steps' (File Photo) 
Kurds in Iran marching in support of today's KRG referendum on Kurdish independence - which Tehran strictly opposes.  
ShockerBrexit: 'Zero chance' leaving EU will make Britons better off, Nobel laureate economist Paul Krugman says  
Labour basically asking the SNP to pay for all their mistakes while doing nothing to stop the biggest: brexit  
#BREAKING: Voter turnout for Kurdistan Region’s independence referendum estimated to be 76% at 5PM earlier today.  
'Today we will finally have our state': Iraqi Kurds vote in historic referendum on independence' | via @telegraph 
Find all our position papers, negotiating documents and more, on our dedicated website: #Brexit  
4th round #Brexit negotiations started. Agenda:citizens,financial settlement&Ireland. "This should be the moment of clarity",@MichelBarnier 
Our view on Catalonia’s referendum 
Thousands of Kurds in #Rojhelat defy #Iran and supports #Bashur Independence referendum. #Twitterkurds #Kurdistan 
#BREAKING: Ballot boxes sealed as Kurdistan Region’s independence referendum ends, results to be announced soon. #KurdistanReferendum 
EU chief Brexit negotiator says no talks on transition deal until divorce bill is settled  
Incredible; gross betrayal of most Lab voters. @LibDems say there's no way #Brexit can be anything other than much worse than #Remain. 
.@Keir_Starmer on Tory Brexit: "There is nothing patriotic about joy riding our economy off a cliff!"#labourconference2017 #Lab17 
EU "keen and eager" to understand how UK will translate PM's speech into #Brexit negotiations - @MichelBarnier  
#Brexit Secretary David Davis MP says the UK will honour financial commitments made during EU membership but in context of new relationship  
Kurdish independence referendum turnout 76 percent one hour before closing of station  
Labour have lost my vote purely on Brexit stance or lack of. #StopBrexit 
Syria rejects Iraqi Kurdish independence referendum.  
"Grrr Labour aren't discussing Brexit ... grrr" This is now or later today  
Game over for 'discredited' Catalan referendum, Spanish officials say  
He's absolutely right:"The referendum was "an abrogation of parliamentary democracy" because of a lack of facts."  
Kobani people in Rojava N Syria also curious about referendum. "All Kurmanc are for yes" shop keeper said.  
Kurds in eastern (Iranian) #Kurdistan take to the streets to congratulate southern Kurdistan on their independence referendum. #Twitterkurds 
LISTEN: On @talkRADIO with Brexiteer @thecarolemalone talking May, Brexit & Money. We've paid the EU enough money!  
BloggedUK/EU Security Cooperation after BrexitAnalysis of UK govt papers on foreign policy and criminal law:  
How this played out in the Brexit vote. Percentage of foreigners vs vote for Brexit.  
A poet for the age of Brexit: revisiting the work of A. E. Housman, by Adam Kirsch  
Interesting that so many are signing this petition: "My vote for Labour was NOT a vote for Brexit!" … via @UKChange 
"Iranian leaders are quietly panicking over the Kurdish referendum"  @AEIfdp #Iran #TwitterKurds #KurdishReferendum 
#BREAKING: Kurdish independence referendum turnout 76 percent an hour before closing  
Court summons 14 people for duplicating #referendum website . 
The above effect was seen in Trump's election results and in the Brexit referendum results too, fwiw. 
EU27: Brexit talks must go through EU's Chief Negotiator Michel Barnier and trade talks cannot begin until sufficient progress has been made 
I wonder why leaving the EU is so appealing to a number of Brexit influencers? 
BREAKING: EU27 say Brexit negotiations must go through Michel Barnier, well that's a nice kick up the arse for Theresa May 
According to election commission, until 5 PM, the turn out for the referendum was 76%. 
Tories are in civil war Labour can't decide on #Brexit UK economy is doomed 3 years after #indyref pls tell me how we are Better Together? 
The #Labour Party, 2017.#Labour17 #labourconf #Lab17 #LabConf17 #LabConf #Brexit #StopBrexitHour #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexitshambles #4EU 
Well on a positive note we probably won't have to worry about Brexit now. 
For me, Brexit is all about nostalgia. I pine for the good old days. You know, anytime before June 2016. 
Labour delegate just said ‘When power returns from the EU’ They really are now the Brexit party, they have accepted all the Tory lies. 
Polls just closed in #Kurdistan Referendum: 76% Participation. High. #Iraq 
Southern Kurdistan's Referendum: Self-Destiny doesn't need Permission  
Hard Brexit will hurt EU more than Britain, warn university researchers as divorce talks begin in Brussels  
There is no need to share the result of the #referendum in #Kurdistan: the World knows it already. 
So tired of having English men explain to me why Labour's stance on Brexit is actually brilliantly clear and very very good for me.  
Uncertainty among Kurds as they vote in referendum on whether to support independence from Baghdad  
DYK that in a referendum this year (2017), my inhabitants overwhelmingly showed a preference for statehood!  /4  
People of #Sanandaj, Iranian Kurdistan, defying strict security measures, poured to streets to celebrate the #Referendum in Iraqi Kurdistan 
"Hang in the public will go our way and we won't go into the nightmare of Brexit" @PaulFlynnMP 
Philip Hammond is holding Brexit back, writes @JLongworthLML 
READ | Arron Banks expresses outrage at regulator's contempt for Brexit.  
Labour not debating Brexit in 2017 is like not debating the Black Death in 1349. 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
IMAGE: Iraqi Kurdistan independence referendum ballot paper  
Dear friends, you'll find in this book all the keys of the referendum from the Independentist Left movement 
I'm going to show my anger at the injustice & destruction of #Brexit. 17 million wrongs don't make a right - we need to fight #StopBrexit 
With 5 days left of the referendum, I would like to remind you: @telediario_tve @noticias_cuatro @sextaNoticias @A3Noticias @informativost5 
Iraqi Kurds have started casting their ballots in a controversial independence referendum  
A Nobel laureate economist just said there is 'zero chance' Brexit will make Britain better off  
#BREAKING - 4 ballot papers put in by 1 person in #Kurdish referendum, selfie taken. A large absence of international observers in votes  
Read this for quick-and-dirty guide to tariff rate quotas and how they make life difficult for Brexit Britain in WTO  
A hard Brexit could see 80,000 Scottish job losses in 10 years. It's profoundly wrong that the official opposition won't talk about it. 
Useful discussion with @MaireadMcGMEP about #Brexit, devolution and Scotland's Place in Europe . Thanks..  
The referendum result was: 37% of a gerrymandered electorate voted Leave. Respecting that means remaining in the EU.  
What are your views on #Brexit? We'd like you to get involved in our new video project. Here is how  
Same story as the Brexit referendum? Most immigrants = London. Only remain region = London. 
Six reasons to prove why Brexit will be stopped.  
Syria rejects Kurdistan's referendum, will not recognize it, the country's foreign minister stated. #KurdistanVotes 
Video highlights of PM @HaiderAlAbadi’s address to the Iraqi people about the illegal referendum in Kurdistan region.  
BrexitCentral’s editor @isaby at #Lab17: membership of the single market and customs union is not “compatible with delivering Brexit.”  
.@Keir_Starmer refuses to accept that Brexit has to be worse than staying in EURead this then, Keir:  #Lab17 
Voting began in northern Iraq on Monday in an independence referendum organised by Kurdish authorities, ignoring…  
Consultations with EU27 in #GeneralAffairsCouncil, ahead of 4th negotiating round with #UK #Brexit  
No clue what you are talking about! for a regulator in Gibraltar to attack the foreign sec and Brexit publicly is awful @andywigmore  
Great to see top @EalingLabour activist @deirdrecostigan speak passionately on Brexit and Tory lies re Irish border at #Lab17Conference 
Imagine the outcome of the Scottish independence referendum if the UK had acted like Madrid over Catalonia. Column  
Taoiseach Varadkar met with Prime Minister May this afternoon to discuss a range of issues including Northern Ireland and Brexit.  
Sack him now. Philip Hammond is holding Brexit back: Theresa May must show who's boss by giving him the sack.     
Iraqi Kurds are voting in an independence referendum today, amid rising tensions and international opposition  
Irish Taoiseach Leo Varadkar pushes Theresa May for 'specifics' on Brexit border issue  
'Zero chance' Brexit will make UK better off, says Nobel laureate  
#Brexit only big issue where Jeremy Corbyn is in conflict wth Labour membership. (So let's not vote on that one)  
This would get my vote:#brexit  
The infamous Brexit Bus is now being used to promote a #fintech startup  @fintechrockers @kuriharan @NeiraOsci 
Some countries at WTO trying to use Brexit process to increase export opportunities to UK and EU27  
Reports that Kurdish security forces are forcing Yezidi IDPs in UN camps to vote yes in the referendum. 
Exclusive: Half of UK voters want a second Brexit referendum, according to a new poll  
In Germany,if you vote @AfD you get AfDIn UK many #UKIPPERS voted Tory to stop Lab reversing #BrexitWith PR we can vote for our 1st choice  
“I don’t think there’s any plausible case that #Brexit is a good thing for the British economy…” says @paulkrugman  
Labours decision not to hold a real Brexit debate and vote at the conference is a ploy designed to try hide how split they are on the issue 
Coming up in the Parliament this week:  → ECB president Mario Draghi  → Migration  → Football leaks  → Brexit 
Jon Tricket MP telling conference that Labour's position on Brexit is 'crystal clear'. Wonder which one he's talking about.  #Lab17ِ 
"The Kurdish referendum is a declaration of war on the unity of the Iraqi people."  
1) hard brexit2) destroy current trade3) ????4) profitThat is that actual plan. Of both main parties. 
Iraqi Kurds have started casting their ballots in a controversial independence referendum  
Scottish Government says Brexit talks with UK ministers “constructive” but they still won’t back withdrawal bill 
Remainer Labour MPs are 'on the rampage' over the Brexit boycott at Labour Party Conference  
Whether you agree or disagree with Brexit, there's no comparison with the disastrous economic consequences of a Corbyn govt. @ChrisGiles_ 
Iraqi Kurds vote in an independence referendum in defiance of Baghdad which has warned of "measures" to defend Iraq's unity  
So Labour seems to be busy intimidating reporters, preventing folk debating Brexit and mocking folk who want to debate Brexit. So democratic 
At @Keir_Starmer fringe this lunchtime, he told audience he thought a Brexit deal could be achieved that was better than being in EU. 
#Iraq’s parliament demands troops be sent to disputed areas with Kurds as controversial referendum proceeds despite warnings, says AFP pic.twitter.com/zV55fONM2l 
Elderly man looks to find his name on the voting list as #Kurdistan Region’s independence referendum vote is underway. #KurdistanVotes 
When you're preparing for Govt and someone asks about Brexit #LabConf17 
The UK to circulate draft post-Brexit WTO commitments 'next year'. Talking has started in Geneva, but slowly  
Brexit can be 'comfortably' negotiated in two years: Johnson  
.@alanwhiteheadmp "our understanding is it would have been perfectly possible to remain part of Euratom post #Brexit" #Lab17 
#Lab17 dare not debate #Brexit.Its Remainers can't risk Comrades' wrath by telling them #EU state-aid rules would rule out nationalisations 
The hostility of @CBItweets reaction to bad-for business Labour contrastswith its gush of praise for May's bad-for business Brexit plans  
. @Keir_Starmer 'We must leave options on the table not off the table' #no #brexit should be one of those options! #LPC17 
An explainer on NI #Brexit issues.  
May admits no one has a clue what Brexit is about and that they are making it up as they go along.  
After May's failure of a speech last week, here's a timely reminder that the referendum ballot paper did NOT look like this...  
#UPDATE Turkey's Erdogan threatens to close border with northern Iraq, block Kurdish oil over referendum vote  
Wish someone had the guts at #Lab17 to shout out: put your hands up if you think Brexit is a load of bollocks 
NEWS! Hard Brexit will be ‘brilliant for Britain’, insists complete f*cking moron  
'The facts have a remain bias'. @rafaelbehr demolishes absurdly simplistic & over-optimistic vision of post-Brexit Britain #Lab17ِ 
If you were on edge of your seat... lab has finally released its statement on EU, safely after the Brexit debate was finished 
WTI Hits 4-Month Highs Over $51 Amid Kurdish Referendum Concerns  
Membership of the Single Market matters when it comes to workers rights! Its a social, not just economic issue #Lab17 #Brexit @UsdawUnion 
Kurdish referendum: I urge all parties to remain calm & work together to defeat Daesh. Iraq’s future lies in dialogue. UK ready to help 
Great question Angela. Why are the SNP using taxpayers' money to promote an illegal referendum in  Catalonia?  
To Leavers I say - Why should Remainers embrace a policy which we consider to be destructive to our country? You wouldn't. We won't!#Brexit 
Labour is playing the *long game* on #Brexit & they are RIGHT to do soPolicy on the hoof - is NO policy at allEvidenced by Tory Manif GE17 
iranian kurds express opposition to kurdistan regional govt referendum in iraq  
We can now say there are different Labour & Tory Brexit proposals tho. They don't have positions. They have spectrums of possibilities. 
Labour could've been a far more effective & corrective force against the Tories if they weren't clearly so conflicted by Brexit themselves! 
Labour can’t afford this and Brexit. #RealityCheck 
Huge crowds for @EuroLabour debate on #Brexit at #LabConf17. Panellists @keir_starmer @BrendanHowlin and our own Marije Laffeber 
"Who are the authors of this Tory tragedy?"Labour’s Sir @Keir_Starmer blames David Cameron, Boris Johnson and Theresa May for Brexit.  
The mainstream media continues to turn against the Tories as they go into meltdown over Brexit  via @thecanarysays 
I've once again wasted emotional, intellectual and spiritual energy working out what Labour is saying on Brexit  
Labour clueless about BrexitTories clueless about BrexitMaybot clueless about BrexitCorbyn clueless about BrexitBrexiteers just clueless 
Read the full statement from @JohnSwinney following latest Brexit talks with @cabinetofficeuk here  
"@BorisJohnson​ doesn't like paternity tests but maybe we need one for #Brexit" Emily Thornberry​ suggests he goes on @itvjeremykyle #lab17. 
'Overwhelming' show of hands at #LabConf17 against move to change party Brexit policy. 
Thoughts on Turkey and the KRG referendum: 1) TR influence w/ KDP and KRDP allied Arab parties Ninewa has never been higher 
May wants us to back her Brexit.So why isn't she publishing impact assessments that *support* a Free Trade deal scenario or even "No deal"? 
#Lab17 Speech Highlights Hilarious take on #Brexit, Boris, Gove and £350mn per week!! @emilythornberry 
Sharks circlingThe mainstream media continues to turn against the Tories as they go into meltdown over Brexit 
Philip Hammond is holding Brexit back. Theresa May must show who's boss by giving him the sack.  
Better hope Brexit goes exactly to plan (whatever that is) and has zero impact on borrowing costs, or things could get interesting *fast*. 
Turkish FM Cavusoglu says Turkey will intervene militarily if Turkmen are targeted in Iraq, as KRG holds referendum in north of country  
Iraqi Kurds vote in independence referendum, which the U.S. has warned may destabilize the region amid ISIS fight  
#BREAKING - #Iraqi Parliament votes on draft resolution to persecute any official or state employee that participates in #KRG referendum  
Hard #Brexit will hurt EU more than Britain, university researchers warn as divorce talks start in Brussels 
McDonnell: ‘We will respect the referendum result’ @UKLabour the #Brexit party. Remainers who lent their vote to Labour take note. 
Why Israel supports Kurdish referendum (and why the rest of the world should too). Read my op-ed @HuffPostPol 
Kurds in Iraq vote in an historic referendum  
WATCH: the only way you can have a jobs-first #Brexit is by staying in the Single Market, argues @ChukaUmunna #LabConf17. Please RT: 
The #Brexit issue is a dynamic process will run for a considerable time. The Govts postion is unclear  IMO Labour's position is very clear.  
1. Labour are supposed to be a "Government in Waiting".2. Labour supported the referendum bill.3. Labour supported triggering article 50.  
.@EmilyThornberry showing serious SERIOUS sass. #brexit #borisjohnson 
Babies are welcome at #SGPconf in Edinburgh on 21-22nd Oct, we'll also be talking about #Brexit, book your place at  
Brexit is the majority view of over-45s. We're not all planning on dying any time soon, thanks, Nick.  
Proud & Privileged to have voted YES in today's historic #Referendum on #Kurdistan's Independence. It is an unforgettable moment in my life! 
An unguarded @Keir_Starmer on Brexit. As a father of three, I feel you, Keir (). 
Intl overreaction made it harder to postpone referendum; overreaction now will make it harder to manage its cnsqs.  
As Dennis Skinner goes on about working with 'Poles and Lithuanians and the rest of it', remember he voted for Brexit #Lab17 
Met harsh critics of Barzani's referendum, still felt compelled to vote yes: "I saw my village destroyed 3 X. Of course I want independence" 
You support hard Brexit. You cannot simultaneously claim to want to build a Britain #ForTheMany. Brexit is destructive.  
Utterly damning report from @Lawscot on Brexit impact on health matters.  
great marketing by @MyMonese! The infamous Brexit Bus is now being used to promote a #fintech startup  
Macron EU plot to take advantage of lengthy transition, “a serious effort to stop Brexit is now underway".  
#Lab17.Subjects we'll not have discussed:1) Gang Rape of UK girls.2) Brexit.3) Anti-semitism.4) Tuition Fees raised by Labour in Wales. 
EU 'wants €50billion from UK' as part of Brexit negotiations, according to senior diplomats  
Spain's Guardia Civil searching several local city halls in Catalonia for referendum documents 
EU demands more Brexit detail after PM's 'wordy and unclear' speech  
Excellent speech to #Lab17 by @EmilyThornberry - Brexit is Boris Johnson's child. To which I would say let Labour not be its midwife! 
BREAKING: Spanish police raids 31 Catalan town halls looking for independence referendum information. 
One minute, gloating and sneering at the European Parliament; the next he's whining and playing the victim. This man personifies #brexit.  
I like it that she uses the past tense. Quite right. Brexit is over bar the shouting. But the lies: will the liars ever be held to account?  
 @MhairiBlack: It's astonishing that we still don't know what #Brexit will mean.  
Funny how 'patriotic' Brexiters who rant about WW2 are all to happy to cheer on Europe's fascists. #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
Kurds in Iraq vote in historic referendum for independence  
BREAKING: Turkish army at Iraqi border and ready to take 'necessary steps' - #Erdogan  #referendum #Kurds 
Young delegate: Brexit takes away our opportunitiesOld delegate: I don’t give a toss#ForTheMany #Hmm #Lab17 
Man shows his support for Kurdistan independence as self-styled "Captain Referendum,"#TwitterKurds #KurdistanReferendum #Iraq 
KHAN: UK should stay in Single Market. Theresa May's disastrous Brexit transition is boosting Remoaner hopes!  
'We have seen injustice, killings and blockades': Iraqi Kurds shrug off threats to stage independence referendum  
Have to say Starmer's speech was a virtually substance-free zone. No clarity on how to deliver the referendum outcome he says he "respects" 
Sadiq Khan wades into Labour Brexit row with single market demand  
I voted Labour because I oppose Brexit. Labour not discussing it is a betrayal of the millions who gave the party their votes at the GE 
The infamous "Brexit Bus" has been revamped to promote a pro-Europe startup  
Labour would "remain in single market during transition" - Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer #lab17  
The way the Tories are handling Brexit tells you a lot about their willingness to put other people’s jobs at risk. @Keir_Starmer #Lab17 
"There is nothing patriotic about joyriding our economy off a cliff" says Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer 
Organisations officially supporting Brexit EDLAFDBNPKKKLe Pen's Front NationalGeert Wilders' Party For FreedomUKIPLabour Party 
Labour are the grown-ups in the room on Brexit. We stand ready to take charge of the negotiations. @Keir_Starmer #Lab17 
Brexit the Elephant arrives at the Labour Party conference. #Lab17 
Brexit is racist.And a Socialism which requires the isolation of Brexit in order to function is extremist. Ask anyone who lived in the GDR. 
Our approach to Brexit is based on co-operation; solidarity; a belief that we achieve more together than we do alone. @Keir_Starmer #Lab17 
Labour’s approach to Brexit respects the referendum result and puts jobs and the economy first. @Keir_Starmer #Lab17 
Labour Brexiters say the EU is a capitalist club blissfully unware that the world ouside is a brutal capitalist jungle. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Brexit SupportersVladimir PutinDonald TrumpNigel FarageRupert Murdoch Paul DacreKatie Hopkins Theresa May Jeremy Corbyn 
Kier Starmer (on Tories and Brexit) "Constructive ambiguity is now their policy" *he actually said this apparently unaware of the irony* 
Keir Starmer: 'constructive ambiguity is now Tory policy on Brexit'. Not entirely dissimilar to Labour's #lab17 
The infamous Brexit Bus is now being used to promote a fintech startup  
Starmer says Government is "too divided" to negotiate Brexit and that "constructive ambiguity" is their official policy 
Taking the Brexit Bus across Europe offering €350m worth of free money transfers to celebrate our European launch #freemovement @MyMonese 
Labour conference: Brexit differences won't ruin the party - BBC News  
As ISIS is on the verge of defeat a Kurd Referendum will throw the Middle East back into turmoil. Didn't think it would happen this fast.  
Emily Thornberry in full stand-up mode, riffing on Boris Johnson needing a paternity test for Brexit.  
Shadow Foreign sec Emily Thornberry jokes Boris Johnson is trying to deny Brexit paternity, should take a test and pay £350m/week upkeep 
#UPDATE Iran has shut its border with Iraqi Kurdistan in response to its independence referendum: foreign ministry  
#honestpoll Has #labour #betrayed its voters by supporting #brexit? Pls #Retweet and #commment. Follow me for more. #letstalk #voiceofUK 
Dear delegates to #Lab17We know you're not allowed to discuss Brexit at the Labour Conference.But maybe you can secretly consider this:  
As Syrian Armenian, I refuse any attempt to divide Syria. If Armenians decided to do referendum in Syria, i go against them 
Emily Thornberry names Labour’s Brexit team: Barry Gardiner, Keir Starmer and herself. That’s three different positions right there.#Lab17 
If Labour doesn't want to talk about #Brexit then it might as well disband. 
Emily Thornberry: "I know Boris Johnson doesn't like paternity tests but maybe we should have one for Brexit" 
Now that is a superb gag from Emily Thornberry. "I know Boris doesn't like paternity tests but maybe he needs one on Brexit." 
Very pleased to announce that I'm starting a fortnightly column on Brexit for @theipaper - beginning in tomorrow's paper. 
What do the German elections mean for Brexit and UK? All potential government parties support hard EU-approach, and their voters agree.  
Brexit is no longer dominating the EU's list of things to worry about  
Quite outstanding interview by @Feorlean patiently explaining how the UK Govt seem intent on using #Brexit to undermine devolution  
I'm taking the knee for Brexit. I disrespect the will of the people. 
Labour is now a Brexit party.Labour is now a Hard Brexit party.Labour is now a Tory hard Brexit party.Repeat    
#Brexit is THE most important issue this country has faced in decades yet delegates at  #labourconference2017 won't be allowed a vote on it 
Are you rattled @Nigel_Farage? What'ya gonna do if Brexit doesn't come off? Nowhere to hide your money? Nowhere to escape to? Try Russia RT  
‘The EU is falling apart!’ Brexit and weak pound to see trade boom for UK - top economist  
I accept result of referendum. I do. But I expect & demand Labour fights for the future of Britain. Lead on this. Lead this debate." 
The Government's handling of Brexit is damaging the UK's reputation - they don't represent the country we all love. My speech to #Lab17. pic.twitter.com/bvIn93mGeG 
A 90 years old #Christian voted Yes in the #Kurdistan Region's independence referendum. #TwitterKurds #YesKurdistan 
Ireland's referendum on abortion laws provisionally scheduled for May or June of next year  
VIDEO: #Iran holds artillery drills held near Iraq border ahead of Kurdish #referendum  
Is Mrs Merkel now 'too weak to negotiate #Brexit' ? 33% and 2 coalition partners.Mrs May slated in UK media for 42% and 1 partner.  
.@BayanRahman on today's #KurdistanReferendum: I don’t know why Scotland can have a referendum but for us it's almost considered a crime pic.twitter.com/V6XdpZzddw 
we have made it! Casted my vote today in a historical Kurdistan referendum.  
Your employment rights at risk through #Brexit explains @The_TUC General Secretary @FrancesOGrady#Labour #LPC17 
Labour ignoring Brexit.  
Bizarre. A delegate just suggested an anti-Brexit march was an attempt to undermine Jeremy Corbyn. #LabourPartyConference 
Another Labour delegate says it's good there's no conference vote on Brexit because "we would have disagreed" 
A demonstration in support of Kurdish independence in Jerusalem yesterday. Israel has been the only vocal supporter of today's referendum  
Priorities:1.) Jeremy2.) ???…?.) Brexit, and the thus the economics and social future of the UK  
Brexit? What Brexit?  
Iraqi Kurds shrug off threats to stage independence referendum  
Looking fwd to catching up with friends at #Lab17. I'll be talking about my CJS review, Brexit, housing, Grenfell and combatting xenophobia 
Lab activist Cameron Clack jeered as he says: 'We'll be remembered as the Opposition who let the Tories do what they want" on Brexit. #Lab17 
Most speakers in the hall at Labour conference in Brexit debate making passionate pro-remain speeches. Vote might have been interesting! 
Yesterday a tsunami of misinformation about NOT debating Brexit at Labour conference was spread. Here's what is actually happening at #Lab17 
Sadiq Khan hints Brexit might not happen  
We must have the ability to control our borders after Brexit!  
With my Parliamentary Colleague @Michael4MDNP observing the referendum vote in Erbil. Feels reassuringly familiar.  
Delegate asks conference to refer back Brexit section of the party manifesto - debate getting going, people waving EU flag on the floor 
Must read: As a Kurd, I know tomorrow's independence referendum is crucial after the oppression we've suffered  
I'm bemused by politicians who state: "we all accept that Brexit is going to happen". Do we all accept that nuclear war is going to happen? 
BREAKING: PM THERESA MAY HAS BEEN ARRESTED FOR TREASON AGAINST THE REFERENDUM VOTE , NIGEL FARAGE BECOMES THE NEW PM  
I’ve said it before but it really is staggering how, for many of the ‘moderates’, politics only really seemed to begin with Brexit. 
What should we make of the Florence speech?My Brexit diary, at @JackofKent  
The German vote, coming after #Brexit and @realDonaldTrump's win, was seen as a test for mainstream parties 
The vote that has potential to change History and Geography of Middle East: Kurdistan referendum  via @RudawEnglish 
One wonders what issues will be debated in Brighton today to avoid talking about #Brexit? It's the Achilles' Heel of @jeremycorbyn 
It is a privilege of a lifetime to vote in today's historic referendum on Kurdistan's independence. We have waited so many years- mb.  
What a load of bollocks. John McDonnell: Labour members did not want to split party on Brexit  
One tying Brexit really dealt with is my instinctive sense of British superiority. Previously I'd have said we froze out extremists too. 
My timeline is 50% the US president shouting at athletes, 45% Labour pretending Brexit isn't a problem and 5% weather. Happy Monday! 
13% of voters backed AfD alike UKIP in 2015 - Cons referendum pledge and 2017 campaign both devoted to courting them. Hardly excluded.  
52% voted #LEAVE in the biggest democratic vote in history of UK.Now ALL parties, except @UKIP, have betrayed us over #Brexit@AMDWaters 
BREAKING: Turkish PM: We are considering imposing sanctions on Iraqi Kurdistan after decision to go ahead w/ referendum - @AlArabiya_Eng 
Democracy dies in the dark. Labour's refusal to debate Brexit at conference is a sign that Corbyn fears the truth being revealed. 
#LPC17 #LabourConference The British #Left should lead in resisting #Brexit via @labourlist 
I would love to debate #Brexit but my brother Piers told me Zionist moon-lizards would eat us all alive with mustard if we do. 
97 year old Kurdish patriot says he feels like he has been born again amidst Independence Referendum. Waited for this day his whole life.  
This is a poor speech. To pour generic hatred at 'the rich' & then say you want 'unity'. Also, btw, "the one thing we can't afford" = Brexit  
Best wishes to everyone voting in the Kurdish independence referendum! You deserve sovereignty and peace.  
We're not debating #Brexit because the vital motion to stop gender bias against gerbils must be debated. 
People here who routinely appeal to bogus patriotism when discussing Brexit are now cheering and/or misrepresenting Nazi advances in Germany 
Why is Spain so desperate to stop an independence referendum?  
Brexit is real, and in a year and a half from now, the European Union will treat Britain as a fully external foreign country. 
Well it's not like other eight topics probably depend on this one topic is it #brexit  
As far as Europe is concerned, Brexit is a formal legal process of Britain's expulsion from the European Union. And that is all it is. 
I thought "out meant out".  Why do you want a deal?Is Brexit bad or something?  Are you getting the jitters about a hard Brexit? 
I wish good fortune and peace today to the Kurdish peoples in Iraq who hold a referendum today on national independence (from Iraq). 
#JohnMcdonnell & Labour have got all the answers . This is why they won't debate #Brexit. #Clueless 
Iraqi Kurds vote in historic independence referendum, shrugging off threats. @ewither reports.  via @ReutersTV 
As Kobani was the symbolic start of destroying the myth of ISIS, Kurdistan referendum is start of destroying the myth of Qasem Soleimani. 
Let’s deal with getting Jeremy our next PM and then ameliorate our differences over Brexit or we will have the Cons for ever. 
A few thoughts on why Labour should be debating Brexit this week...1. It's the biggest issue facing the country2. That's it 
John McDonnell: Labour members didn't want to split party on Brexit  
Tanaiste says post-Brexit world offers opportunities for Ireland in Asia  
Labour learning that it can't keep fooling all of the people all of the time about its leadership's hard Brexit agenda. 
Is hard Brexit like religious fundamentalism? @Urban_Country compares the two... 
Iraqi Kurds vote in historic independence referendum, shrugging off threats @Reuters 
Some time very soon John McDonnell is going to have to discover irrefutably that his plans to transform UK will not be possible with Brexit 
BLOCKERS: Hammond and Rudd already pushing for even lengthier 'Brexit transition'. Public voted Out in 2016!  
Labour MPs furious over lack of Brexit vote at its conference | Hilton boss: UK experiencing “golden age of travel”  
John McDonnell say labour is a Democratic Party and is consulting members on issues. All issues that is except Brexit. 
Abortion referendum set for May/June next year. #repealthe8th 
The Labour Party can't discuss #Brexit because their party position is an omnishambles and it would only highlight that #Lab2017 
What do Iraqi Kurds think of the independence referendum?  
Labour ‘stitch-up’ wipes Brexit off the agenda as the party is described as a 'laughing stock' by its own MPs 
This statement by @Conservatives is particularly hilarious given there is no way they would ever let a member vote on Brexit affect policy  
Everything John McDonnell says sounds great except his ideas around Brexit, which are completely unrealistic & delusional #r4today 
I'm told the NEC statement on Brexit has just been agreed. And yes it's a fudge. 
No regional results to be given for Kurdistan referendum, monitors say. So no way of telling how areas in disputed territories voted. 
. @realDonaldTrump  tells @theresa_may  to HURRY UP on Brexit: UK must be free to sign 'best' trade deal by 2020  
Voters near the border with Iran in the town of Kalar, north of Khanaqin, participate in the Kurdistan Region's referendum #KurdistanVotes 
I will no longer take lectures from @jonlansman and @PeoplesMomentum about member democracy after this stitch and fix #Lab17 #Brexit  
Iran, Turkey hold separate massive drills on border with Iraq as #Kurds eye independence in #referendum (VIDEOS)  
Stitch+fix may have seen off today's Brexit motions but @laboursinglemkt goes on with @SadiqKhan calling for permanent SM membership today 
In Kurdistan, voting for a historic independence referendum has started now.  
"The first rule of Do Not Talk About Brexit club is: you do NOT talk about Brexit"  
"No to referendum in Alqush" a town of 100% christian population this morning, Nineveh plain, Iraq. They want to stay part of Iraq  
GALLOWAY: 'Zombie' May to use transition period to scuttle Brexit, UK needs General Election now - @georgegalloway. 
Labour NEC apparently agreeing Brexit statement by email - no meeting this morning 
Kurdish city gassed by Saddam hopes referendum heralds better days @Reuters 
The Latest: Turkey says it rejects Iraqi Kurds' referendum.  
Abortion referendum set for May or June of next year #RepealThe8th 
Chancellor @masrour_barzani votes during today's historic referendum on independence. #YesKurdistan 
Someone needs to tell the Labour leadership about the Streisand Effect: keeping Brexit off the agenda *guarantees* everyone talks about it. 
Brexit negotiations restart today. Will UK honour Theresa May's new pledge on citizens' rights?   
Corbyn's refusal to allow a proper debate on Brexit has left you 
Theresa May's government is still dithering on Brexit and her big speech wasn't much help  
David Davis says Boris Johnson has had no influence on Tory Brexit policy - he isn't backseat driving. Cabinet in disarray! #BrexitShambles 
Shadow Chancellor John Mcdonnell tells Sky News "solution" to Brexit will be "some sort of compromise" after referendum left Britain divided 
#BREAKING: Turkey said it will take "every measure" under int'l law if the Iraqi Kurdish independence referendum endangers national security  
Good on @johnmcdonnellMP holding his own on .@SkyNews. News anchor so desperate to push a row over #Brexit but it just ain't happening. 
the british national anthem was spice girls 2 become 1 until 2010 when a referendum decided giggs talking da hardest was our nation's hymn 
Watch: Kurdish Israelis celebrate ahead of independence referendum Monday  
MEP, paid by Euro funds, campaigns for US candidate alongside Steve Bannon. I assume favour to Bannon/Mercer for Brexit help. Anyone else? 
It's hard to be a member of a party which doesn't think Brexit is the most significant thing happening to the country, affecting everyone. 
Strange that some Labour MPs don't know Brexit is being debated for 3 hours this morning. Why are they insisting otherwise? Oh, I get it now  
Iraqi Kurds vote in independence referendum amid international opposition against poll  
On the day #Lab17 have a debate on Brexit the usual suspects moan about #Lab17 not having a debate on Brexit. 
"Leave voters are dying off so we need a 2nd EU referendum"- @nick_cleggSo are WWII veterans, shall we hold another war to settle it, Nick? 
London Mayor @SadiqKhan isn't afraid of Brexit, ISIS or telling Donald Trump he's wrong  
It's not an 'embarrassing vote' Labour are avoiding, it's further exposure of their complete absence of coherence on Brexit.  
You're not wrong:It's those on low incomes who will suffer MORE if you allow Brexit to happen #Lab17 
BREAKING — Turkey closes its Habur border gate to crossings from northern Iraq as voting is under way in KRG's independence referendum  
#Turkey calls #Kurdish referendum null&void. But relations w #KRG strong: oil & opposition to #PKK. Is private message different to public? 
Labour MP brands own party a 'laughing stock' after conference voted not to talk about Brexit  
Clive Lewis trashes Labour's manifesto committing Labour to leave EU, and brands 35% of Labour supporters that voted for Brexit as RACIST.  
The British government's Brexit department has lost 20% of its workers in 14 months  
Labour grown-ups on #Brexit ? With no debate/vote at conference and no clarity on post transition, what would squabbling children look like? 
Increases prospect of an agreement between Britain, France & Germany to avoid Brexit. We need each other and face similar challenges  
Labour's #Brexit views dominate the news I'll be distributing these leaflets with @Labour4EU to today. Come & say hello & support us. 
My friend just voted in a historic referendum that will hopefully lead to the secession and thereby the independence of Kurdistan from Iraq!  
Iraqi Kurds vote in historic independence referendum, shrugging off threats  
It’s a map of Brexit.  
#Brexit: "We must press our advantage and boldly make the case to abandon this mad escapade before it’s too late."  
BREAKING: Turkey threatens to 'take all measures' against Kurdistan as voting on independence referendum begins 
The Kurdistan Region's security chief, Masrour Barzani, votes in the independence referendum. #KurdistanVotes 
German elections: Merkel mob and Social Democrats combined barely reach 50% primary vote. Outsiders thriving, like USA, Brexit, France, NZ!! 
Iraqi Kurds have started casting their ballots in a controversial independence referendum  
Words cannot describe my emotions after voting in Kurdistan's referendum on independence #KurdistanReferendum 
Deputy Prime Minister Qubad Talabani votes in the referendum #KurdistanVotes 
#BREAKING: President @masoud_barzani just voted in historic independence referendum.#KurdistanReferendum #TwitterKurds 
Despite what #r4today is telling you, there is much healthy #Brexit debate at the #Labour party Conference 
Also yesterday referendum in Berlin on whether to keep also Tegel airport open. Result: Yes. I'm in favour!  
I have no statistics but it seems majority of Syrian Kurds also back independence referendum. Non-PYD and PYD supporters. 
If your are 1 of the 17.4m who voted for  #brexit this lot betrayed you, they don't believe in democracy. #nextGEwewontforget 
5.4 million people will cast their vote in the independence referendum in the #Kurdistan Region. From 8AM to 6 PM.#YesKurdistan 
Voting starts in Iraqi Kurdistan's independence referendum  
Spanish government bans referendum posters. Catalans respond with street art.  
Press Release Regarding the referendum that is being held in the KRG  
Polling stations are open #Kurds #referendum #independence 
Voting begins in Kurdistani's independence referendum. Long queues outside polling stations. 
Labour can’t afford to get emotional over Brexit | Zoe Williams  One worth reading this morning 
Historic referendum on independence leaves Iraqi Kurds polarised  
Referendum kicks off in Kurdistan Region, ballot stations are open.#Twitterkurds #KurdistanReferendum 
Cost of Brexit has now got even worse with downgrading to AA2 UK can't afford this. #StopBrexit #StopBrexitMarch 
WATCH LIVE: #Iraq's Kurds vote in #independence referendum  
People queue to cast their votes on Kurdistan independence referendum  
Whatever result of referendum is, Kurds already won as they are united in holding ref despite all pressure & send a strong message to world  
While Kurds in Iraq work for referendum, Kurds in Turkey, Iran, Syria strongly support them. HDP is only party in Tr parl to endorse refrndm  
'The grown ups', Britain's Labour, ready to lead Brexit talks  
Good morning, Kurdistan! Happy referendum day! #TwitterKurds #KurdistanReferendum 
French overtake British as top tech investors amid Brexit frets @LaFrenchTech @ConsulFranceNYC @FrenchTechNYC 
The U.S. & West should support Kurdish independence. Analysis of Kurdish referendum, to be held on Sept. 25  
All ears: Brussels awaits detail from Davis on May's Brexit plan  
Polls will soon open in #Kurdistan Iraq for Independence Referendum. Big juncture in Mideast, history & geography once again clash. Getty:  
Labour conference denied a Brexit vote, so much for giving members more say @jeremycorbyn 
Clegg: 'You can't end austerity if you don't end Brexit'  
Geopolitics of the Kurdish #referendum  
Boris Johnson's talk of optimism betrayed suggests the beginning of the stab-in-the-back theory of Brexit  
If you don't follow EU regs, you can't sell to the EU☞ Britain will diverge from EU regulations post-Brexit  
We have arrived at a place now where the 2018 congressional election will in essence be a referendum on impeachment. He's already done it. 
Colin Firth takes Italian citizenship after Brexit decision  
We need a new party for Remain MPs NOW☞ Remain MPs are furious after Labour conference voted NOT to debate Brexit  
from the ireland 2015 referendum.  
Brexit: Fresh round of negotiations to take place  
Hundreds gather in Montréal to denounce the exception state of Spain over #Catalonia.#Independence #referendum #1Oct #ReadyToVoteYES 
Brexit: drifting toward a catastrophe #Brexit 
Donald Trump's UK ambassador backs Brexit as the 'RIGHT decision' in US relationship boost  
Thoughts on Kurdish referendum, @benshapiro? 
Iranian Kurdsprepare to defend Kirkukafter referendum 24/09/17 Alex MacDonald | MEE via @MiddleEastEye 
Jeremy Corbyn, the great Socialist.No mention of support for the Kurds.No mention of support for the Catalans.No mention of Brexit. 
Jamie Foster on May's Florence speech @1jamiefoster #Brexit #Brexitbetrayal #csm 
#CarolineFlint #MP says open borders after #Brexit would be unacceptable.   #BBC #SKY #UK #EU 
KISS OF DEATH: #DianeAbbott endorses #TheresaMay's 2 year transitional #Brexit. That's a bad sign!  #BBC #SKY #TORY 
BAD language alert... justified!SHARE: Jonathan Pie reports on The Big Brexit SpeechPie is very very bored of #Brexit@JonathanPieNews 
What you need to know about the Catalan independence referendum  
Whatever result of referendum is, Kurds already won as they are united in holding ref despite all pressure & send a strong message to world  
Every country has circa 20% hardcore racists. The trick is to never let them dictate agendas. UK forgot that. Germany won't.#Brexit #BTW17 
Following the decision at #Lab17 not to make #Brexit #SingleMarket debate a priority, we will take it to every CLP in next 12 months (1/2). 
Hitler's Nazi granddaughter won 13% of the German vote and some Tory brexit MPs are celebrating, think about it 
The Kurdish referendum is a long overdue right for a people that has suffered injustice and genocide under oppressive regimes. 
Labour ‘stitch-up’ wipes Brexit off the agenda as the party is described as a 'laughing stock' by its own MPs  
The number of different positions supposedly covered by the Referendum question represents a miracle of modern drafting. 
It was held together (infuriatingly) by carefully avoiding ever describing what Brexit would actually mean. 
Despite "journalists" at the Guardian &BBC having said the opposite, Brexit is being debated at #Lab17 &at many Lab conference fringe events 
Abortion referendum set for May or June of next year  
everyone? remember sargon was the guy who predicted that Le Pen would win the french elections. I predicted brexit would be a shitshow!  
And we think the Russians did nothing to our General Election or the Brexit vote?  
Australia's damaging YES/NO vote is how a referendum on Māori seats would play out & vulnerable people especially young would be hurt most. 
While Kurds in Iraq work for referendum, Kurds in Turkey, Iran, Syria strongly support them. HDP is only party in Tr parl to endorse refrndm  
Populists: What do you have to lose?-Brexit close win-Trump close winEveryone: To lose? A lot. No thanks-Marcon big win-Merkel big win 
All Kurds of Iraq are united to participate and vote in tomorrow's historical referendum day. Again doubters & skeptics are wrong. 
1. What shameful politics; UK trapped btwn a #Tory Govt pursuing a ruinous #Brexit & a #Labour leadership wanting it 2 fail 2 gain power. 
It is 'disappointing' that Labour have 'ducked' the issue of Brexit, says @MaryCreaghMP: 
Merkel's legacy: to put the European Union, post-Brexit and in the age of Putin, Trump and Erdogan, on a stable path  
..and yet old fashioned political control freakery has been used to stop any Brexit motion being debated on the floor of conference.Terrible  
Iraqi Kurdistan is ready for referendum. In addition to backers, many Kurds startd supportg it after Tr, Iran & Iraq showd strong objections  
Angela Merkel lost the popular vote (less than 33%) yet still claims to 'lead' Europe. #democracy is mirage. It died. #brexit hard and quick  
May+ Corbyn both need to go. Next GE will be another Brexit election. All remainers+regretters must now support @vincecable and the @LibDems 
BREXIT SABOTAGE: Macron and Merkel to unleash plot to tie UK to Brussels FOREVER  
Labour appear to be treating Brexit like Voldemort - if they don't say its name out loud maybe they won't have to deal with it. 
Every country has racists. But unlike the UK, Germany doesn't let them dictate policy.#BTW17 #Brexit 
Sounds like text of NEC statement on Brexit pretty much agreed - Labour moving overnight to head off embarrassment tmrw 
Hope people attending the Brexit session in the morning have a great time  #Lab17 
Corbyn is a hypocrite criticising Tories for not having a Brexit plan. He's almost as bad himself.  
Great start to the Labour Party conference with a vote on Brexit policy off the agenda. Afraid of the truth Jeremy or just absolute control? 
Hey Labour Party, everything you 'agree' this work will be blown out of the water by Brexit. Yet you don't want to discuss that? 
This genius discovered the perfect metaphor for Brexit  
The document presented to journalists by #Kurdistan president’s office before referendum #YesKurdistan 
Footage of ongoing #Iranian military drills along the #Iraqi border as #Kurdistan prepares for independence referendum.  
.@HassanRouhani , Erdogan discuss Kurdish independence; note that not cancelling the referendum will bring with it chaos to the region  
Well, you don’t end austerity by supporting Brexit, that’s for certain. Brexit will screw our economy and public services will suffer. Fact.  
"Will the Kurdish referendum be followed by Christian and Yezidi referenda?"  @dcexaminer @AEIfdp #KurdishReferendum 
It's as if once a month @Keir_Starmer reminds @jeremycorbyn what to say on Brexit, & 3 weeks later he always forgets  
I am so angry that Corbyn won’t oppose Brexit. What a total shit and a traitor to the tactical voters and young people that voted for him. 
Before I go to bed tonight, I want to wish everyone in Iraqi Kurdistan a safe & successful referendum tomorrow.Your courage is inspiring. 
McGurk pushed Mattis & Tillerson to go against Referendum - he thought he had leverage with KRG to delay it - McGurk should go after vote 
We have to do it again!I'm Dutch and I endorse #Brexit  because we can be united only in freedom, sovereignty and rule of lawShare#Nexit 
CCHQ has also issued a release criticising Labour's lack of Brexit debate in Brighton - so might we get one in Manchester next week....? 
#brexit, #trump & now the rise of #AfD in Germany wake up world-nativism & fascism are on the march and ignoring it won't make them go away. 
The EU does not power-grab. The EU is just the sum of its member countries trying to find the best ways of working together.#Brexit #Remain 
Labour not voting on Brexit is like Snap and Crackle pretending Pop doesn’t exist. 
A simple question for a massively complex topic. A 37% vote by a rigged electorate driven by lies  & disinformation! Respect? NO!#Brexit 
Brexit!! When do we want it?In many years time!!  :))  
When you see a Govt & an Opposition so implacably opposed to common sense over Brexit you'd normally be forgiven for thinking of conspiracy 
I’ll again vote @LibDems next time if @UKLabour continues its stance on Brexit.  
We're not debating #brexit because ... well, you're not old enough #Lab17 
The AfD gets 13% in German elections. Watch Establishment commentators blame Russia as they've done for Brexit,Trump, unrest in Catalonia... 
Brexit means....  
Glad to say the SNP conference will feature Brexit. A Scottish Govt with a vision for Scotland that means staying in the single market.  
Today @jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour ignored the views of millions of Labour voters. Labour voters don't want Brexit. #Lab17 #StopBrexit 
How can Corbyn talk of the Single Market blocking some Labour plans, when leaving it would shred all Labour's hopes!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Brexit is goodEU is badYou have no voiceYou have no opinionWe know what is bestSit downShut upWelcome to the Labour Party- Momentum 
May’s Florence speech confirmed it: we need to ditch Brexit | Hugo Dixon  
Message to Labour supporters: don't use Brexit as a stick to bash Corbyn! You are playing the Tories' game. 
Whether you are pro Brexit or anti Brexit, to not debate it is to stick your head in the sand to phenomenal proportions.  
Nice to see the @BBCNews just now giving some good coverage of the #StopBrexitBrighton march. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
What you need to know about Kurdistan's independence referendum #KurdistanVotes 
And after Brexit / Trump there were fears of far right wave over Austria, Netherlands, France and Germany. Didn't happen. Center holding.  
The PM’s proposal of a Brexit transition period risks pleasing no one | Dominic Lawson  
thank god no papers of record made the 2016 election a referendum on what constitutes proper email protocol for government officials  
Big moment for the Middle East tomorrow. Iraqi #Kurdish KRG to hold referendum on independence. Has huge local support.  
"Likely to"?!Fuck "likely". Pledge to ditch Brexit NOW or admit you're on board with the Tories on this one.  
Not with #Brexit, you won’t...  
THERE IS NO "LABOUR BREXIT" OR "TORY BREXIT". THERE IS JUST BREXIT. It'll fuck up the country whichever gang of idiots implements it.  
Corbyn doesn't have the guts to allow his position on Brexit to be challenged and the membership don't have the guts to make him. 
I can't believe some Labour MPs want to let the Tories off the hook by deliberately splitting the Labour Party over Brexit. Actually, I can.  
EU has turned a blind eye to gross violations of democratic standards in #Catalonia referendum @LasherasBorja  
Who would win a #Brexit referendum if it was held now? #Brexit #EU #Euref Please RETWEET POLL after you vote for a larger sample. 
Despite all my criticism and reservation on the referendum itself, tomorrow I will vote yes for Kurdistan independence. 
Monday's THE DAILY TELEGRAPH: "Boris 'simple minded' on Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Colin Firth becomes Italian citizen following Brexit  
If I was Irish, or from Northern #Ireland, I'd be furious.  Same for #Scotland.#Brexit  
Brexit is everyone's problem. The Tories put party before country and now Labour are doing the same. Shameful. 
Taking the fight to the Tories, delivering a Brexit that works for Wales, and #StandingUpForWales - @AMCarwyn at Welsh Night #Lab17 
Anger at Labour conference Brexit vote  
Gorran releases statement on referendum: The people of Kurdistan are free to do as they choose #KurdistanVotes 
Anger at Labour conference Brexit vote  
Labour MPs accuse Corbyn of ducking discussion about Brexit  
The fact Labour refuse to talk about political prisoners in Spain and Brexit at their conference just shows how gutless they are. 
Things Labour won't talk about at Conference:1) Brexit2) Spanish Fascism 
I am staggered & angry that LP conference will not be debating #Brexit. This is the most important issue in UK politics for more than 40 yrs  
From the same people who bring you ‘Brexit is really straightforward’.... (and journalists ‘should be more patriotic’)  
'Soft' brexit is when everyone else loses their jobs.'Hard' brexit, is when you do, too. 
No, sorry, you're not a Remainer.Cannot square "I'm a remainer" & "I support a hard Brexit leader"  
Fury after 'bitter' Nick Clegg says elderly Brexit voters are going to DIE  
The government has been given a clear democratic mandate, it's quite simple & they can't be allowed to twist the context to fit.#Brexit 
For many Kurds in Iraq, a vote for independence in a referendum would be a step toward realizing a national dream  
Germany's Far Right echo Leavers' slogan "take back control' - a reminder of how #Brexit vote energised the Far Right in the US & Europe. 
I think you're a backstabbing bastard. I used to be Labour, now look where you are. Supporting Brexit? Trident?  
In the first 6 months of 2016 inflation averaged 0.35% per year. In 2017 it has averaged 2.5%. Pain free #Brexit anyone? 
Treasury predicts Brexit will harm UK. Moody's downgrade UK credit rating. Treasury attacks Moody's for pessimism. Go figure. 
Remoaners demand final #Brexit deal must be approved by Parliament vote, so why was there no vote on Cameron's EU deal to remain? I'll wait. 
So Labours official Brexit position is:La-La-La we are not listening. 
Keir Starmer: Labour want another election before Brexit negotiations are finished so they can strike the final deal 
#Iran is deploying thousands of #IRGC terrorists to Kurdish cities to prevent support for southern #Kurdistan's independence referendum.  
In Switzerland they get a referendum on raising women's Pension age. In UK they don't even give us notification they have raised it #WASPI 
All #Kurdish are now united in support of referendum. #Gorran is in, too. Great achievement. #Kurdishreferendu 
How Brexiters picture Brexit vs actual Brexit  
Merkel wins another term and the world breathes a sigh of relief. Since Brexit / Trump, Putin is on a losing streak. 
Hope CLPs will ask their delegates tough questions if they didn't vote for debate on Brexit in priority ballot. 
May’s Florence speech confirmed it: we need to ditch Brexit | Hugo Dixon  
NEC meeting 7.30 tmrw morning, likely to make a statement on party's Brexit position 
With @ChukaUmunna at the #labourconference2017 sabotaging #brexit  #stopbrexitbrighton @MrDominicBuxton 
If we are a party for the 'many and not the few', then we have nothing to fear from the division over such a dividing issue as Brexit.  
#Lab17 ignoring #Brexit is a disgrace, & anyone parroting "jobs-first Brexit" should know it's as rational as "books-first library closure". 
Labour is enabling the Tories' disastrous Brexit. We won't be able afford the police we currently have, never mind any more.  
"This government is one of the rich, by the rich, for the rich...any Brexit deal they make will reflect that" says @jeremycorbyn 
I have total faith in @Keir_Starmer re. #Brexit.All those frothing at the mouth are quick to forget: Brexit will be discussed constantly. 
Catalan separatists take to the streets ahead of referendum  
We must stop this mad Brexit escapade before it's too late - my column in  @guardian  
Time for straight talking: Corbyn is wrong on EU & Single Market (not the same) & on state aids & privatisation. #Lab17 needs Brexit debate.  
Incredibly disappointed that Brexit is not going to be debated at #lab17. It's unquestionably the biggest issue we currently face. 
Schulz asked if EU27 should grant UK a two-year transition after Brexit: "absolutely not." #BTW17 
The need for a strong patriotic party is of utmost importance & urgency judging by haplessness of those charged with delivering clean Brexit  
Labour dont need to debate #Brexit, as they will, as ever, do whatever the Tories decide!!!#Lab17 
In Erbil #happeningnow #Kurdish region prepares for independence referendum in morning #Kurdistan #YesKurdistan 
Labour Party is as divided as the UK, and it remains a great sadness that we have lost this party to Brexit, when it should be wholly pro-EU  
Very disappointed that Labour are ignoring Brexit. Biggest issue facing the nation for a generation.  
Kurdistan KRG President Barzani vows “peaceful, democratic” referendum will go ahead promises long process to independence today  
They share a position on Brexit closer to Tories and UKIP, rather than the SNP. It jars with the 'progressive' image they try to project.  
#AwfullyBritishCompaniesBrexit Sandwich Toaster 
Nigel Farage 'to form new political party after Tory disaster' to continue Brexit fight  
I have the feeling that tomorrow's referendum in Kurdistan will spell the beginning of another armed conflict in the region.Hope I'm wrong!  
Interesting the way the media attention is on Corbyn re Brexit: as if it's his problem! As if the Cons aren't likely to rupture over it! 
Im a pro Corbyn remainer & Brexit isnt the defining issue for me. Dealing with inequality & putting society back together is more important 
No votes on Brexit at Labour Party Conference. Will any Lab MP please explain to the 2/3 of Lab voters who voted Remain, why this is?  
Europe is our home, we're stronger, wealthier, healthier & safer together.Brexiteers rejected the EU not us.Labour should reject Brexit. 
Are we seriously saying that a 'government in waiting' isn't debating Brexit at its Party Conference? If so, not serious. #Lab17 
'Will it be #Brexit that ends the Jeremy Corbyn honeymoon? asks @itvnews 
So Corbyn blocked discussion of Brexit at LP Conf.The French would know what to call him after their experience in WW2.Collaborator. 
Jess Phillips on Labour Brexit debate avoidance: “Frankly it’s fucking ridiculous” #Lab17 
If you're not debating Brexit at your party conference, you're not participating properly in British politics. 
* @CarolineLucas at #stopbrexitbrighton - Since when did it become an affront to democracy to change our minds? #StopBrexit #Brexit 
* @CarolineLucas at #stopbrexitbrighton - Britain is better than Theresa May's mean-minded #Brexit.  
Furious Labour source on Brexit vote: "Biggest stitch-up in recent history... members' right to voice extends to chanting leader's name..." 
There will be discussion of Brexit on conference floor tmrw but no votes on any of the contentious issues 
Source says it's a 'swindle' to suggest there will be proper debate + vote on Brexit this week 
Europhile MPs genuinely aghast at "control freakery" of Momentum using app to whip its (mostly Europhile) members to prevent a Brexit vote. 
The "English Scots for Yes" crowdfunder for sending people to observe the Catalonia referendum has this corker at the bottom of the page.  
It's Jazhn [#Eid] in #Kurdistan Mosques in Duhok welcome the independence referendum. Churches will ring bells  
But #Labour's going  be the next government.And they're not debating...#Brexit?   
BloggedBridge over troubled water?Legal issues of the Brexit transition period, including registering EU citizens:  
#Russia interferes in liberal #democracies - AGAIN.Brexit, Trump, France (LePen), Germany (AfD)...#PutinAtWar 
#LabourConference #labour17 #LPC17 decided not to adopt a new resolution on #brexit, so last year's resolution still stands :  
Prime Minister @Jacob_Rees_Mogg & Brexit Secretary @Nigel_Farage.Carlsberg doesn't do #Brexit negotiations but if they did ....  
After Brexit, USA Elections, UK elections are the German elections another example of how the public of Earth are stupid & racist? #BTW17 
Party sources say there WILL be a vote and debate on Brexit tmrw on existing manifesto policy (remember policy has changed since then) 
Still completely gobsmacked that Labour's official stance at conference on Brexit is LA LA LA NOTHING'S HAPPENING LA LA LA LA LA 
This was powerful fringe which captures one reason why Labour doing well in polls. But is it clever that conference won't debate Brexit?  
My timeline full of morons saying the leadership banned a vote on Brexit. It was delegates who voted not to have one. #Lab17 
May’s Florence speech reaffirms what a mad escapade any kind of Brexit is | Hugo Dixon  
Corbyn: "I want to end austerity."Labour delegates: "But Brexit will make it worse."Corbyn: "Shut up, right now." 
Brexit will shape Britain for decades to come-whatever final deal. Will keep fighting with labour colleagues to shape that day in day out. 
The British people are sleep-walking into a totalitarian corporatist dictatorship and need to wake up fast. Please RT far and wide. #Brexit  
fuck brexit, fuck donald trump und fuck afd. unsere arme welt.. 
Labour MP brands own party a 'laughing stock' after conference voted not to talk about Brexit  
The politically dispossessed that Corbyn and May have created in relation to Brexit are too big a demographic to be ignored indefinitely. 
You are somebody!Do something about Brexit: march on the Tory conference, Manchester 1/10/17!#StopBrexitHour 
Then let me ask you this: what more does it take to wake up to the reality that @UKLabour is as much for hard Brexit as are the Tories? 3/ 
Labour simply have no plan for Brexit.Corbyn’s #NewKindOfPolitics turns a once proud party of opposition into a laughing stock. 
What a time to be alive ... #Lab17 will not see any votes on Brexit. It’s the biggest issue of our time and will *not* feature. 1/ 
PM Al-Abadi chairs National Security Council meeting which outlines measures to be taken in response to proposed KRG referendum 
It's conference season, there is already a row, (same for all parties) - 1st row here over lack of debate about Brexit 
Stand up for democracy and freedom! #Catalonia Referendum demonstration Tuesday, September 26th #WashingtonDC #USA #Catalan 
Kirkuk governor Karim: Kirkuk is ready for the independence referendum. Life in city is normal, all necessary precautions taken for voting  
The Labour Party belongs to its members (except when it might embarrass the Leader over Brexit)?  
Momentum managing to shut down a conference vote on Brexit is a manoeuvre New Labour would have been proud of back in the day. 
Corbyn accepts the 'will of the people' in a questionable referendum yet won't accept the will of the Labour Party at its own  conference. 
Momentum delegates deliver another stunning victory to Dear Leader #labour17 #brexit #abdicationonthebigissue 
Brits outside London that voted Brexit...Rural voters in US that voted Trump...East Germans that voted AfD...There's a pattern here. 
At @theSNP conference 2 weeks today #Brexit is the first resolution on the agenda.  By contrast Labour Conference isn’t going to debate it 
Labour have no plan for Brexit - they don't even want to discuss it  
A nuanced take on #BTW17:1) Just so it's out of the way: the result will have 0 impact on Germany's Brexit position 
Appalling decision by Lab Pty Conf Arr Cttee not to put anti-Brexit motion on Conf agenda. Not respecting mood of Party & Conf. Undemocratic 
Packed to the rafters @Labour4EU meeting with @SebDance @maryhoneyball Lots of passion in the room to mitigate against a destructive Brexit  
Keeping #Brexit, biggest issue of our time, off our #lab17 agenda is silly and undermines the claim that we are listening to our members. 
Congratulations AfD: 13% & 89 seats. In 2015 UKIP won 13% and got 1 seat. If UK had a fair voting system Brexit would look very different. 
Remain MPs are furious after Labour conference voted NOT to debate Brexit 
Anti Brexit Labour MPs now face the same dilemma as Tory counterparts: actually doing something about it or just lolling around Soubrying. 
Vote Labour and stop Brexit? Momentum won't even let Labour conference debate it. 
I can't believe no Brexit related motion is being debated at #Lab17 tomorrow. We should not be ducking this debate -we should be leading it 
Labour clearly in #Brexit denial. Really quite incredible from a so-called "government in waiting"  
Excluding of Brexit as a topic for a vote at Labour conference is mainly down to Momentum recommending their delegates vote for other topics 
Labour to Officially Ignore Brexit at Conference #LOLabour  
#LabConf17 deciding not to have a full and honest debate on Brexit just lost - and worse disillusioned - many millions of young voters. 
No Brexit vote at #Lab17 conference?! How utterly ridiculous. Many members will be shocked at manoeuvring to avoid biggest issue of our time 
Labour in complete Brexit denial, abdication of political responsibility  
Don't normally break rank: Brexit is the single biggest issue for this conference. It's bigger than the party. This is a terrible decision.  
I have left the party. Utterly shambolic stance on brexit. 
Astonishing that Labour conference has decided not to debate/ vote on Brexit. If you don't talk about an issue, doesn't mean it goes away! 
Jeremy Corbyn: the Labour Party should be more democratic. Also Jeremy Corbyn: no votes on Brexit please, the outcome might not suit me. 
Another victory for the new style of politics. there will be no vote on Brexit at Labour conference. Leadership would lose the vote 
So Labour won't be having any debates on Brexit at its conference. What is the point of a conference if delegates can't debate big issues? 
I am gobsmacked. How can @uklabour not have a full & proper debate on #Brexit policy at #Lab17? We will be a laughing stock. 
No vote on Brexit is huge blow for pro-Europe wing of party, now no votes on single market or free movement that could have shaped policy 
Labour conference has just decided there will be no votes on Brexit at this conference, it's not among eight topics selected. 
Extraordinary, Momentum block any vote happening on Brexit 
Censorship in the EU ahead of Catalonia’s independence referendum.Spain learns from Turkey. Will EU remain silent + complicit?  
Site (in English) documenting tools used by Spanish govt to censor Catalan sites ahead of Oct 1st referendum. 
How ready is the UK for Brexit? Here’s the score so far.  
I do wonder if the core issue holding up the Brexit negotiations is the UK truly believing it is a negotiation between equivalent powers. 
#TakeAKnee supports:Military1st AmendmentRacial equalitySocial justiceAnd is a referendum on the Trump presidency#JesusWouldTakeAKnee 
Big Merkel win...but populism in Europe remains v strong:Brexit in UK & Corbyn resurgentMacron polls downAfD 13% in Germany 
Love it! Bride interrupts her wedding to join an anti-Brexit protest... #StopBrexit @LeedsEurope #StopBrexitBrighton 
LibDem members outside #Lab17 refusing to debate and chanting 'bollocks to Brexit' whilst all the public ignore them. Quite fitting, that. 
No Theresa May the people you serve will not stand by and let you delay and destroy Brexit, you've been warned. !  
The referendum is unconstitutional, threatens Iraq & peaceful coexistence amongst Iraqis and is a danger to the region 
How many times do we have to tell Leavers that it is a core democratic right to campaign against any government, majority or policy.#Brexit 
So.... I've been asking my German friends about their reaction to Theresa May's #Brexit op-Ed in Welt am Sonntag on the day of #BTW17. 
Referendum posters hanging from walls and buildings throughout Catalonia after rallies. Spain brands posters as "illegal"  
Now that it has become a symbol of the referendum, the Spanish are trying to cover up Tweety Bird on their ship. Too late!  
1 L'Tunes cruise hired to lodge thousands of police sent to stop #1O referendum. 2 People joke3 They cover Tweety4 #FreeTweety becomes TT 
The more people say and believe that Brexit can be stopped, the sooner it will be stopped:  
Britain's biggest problem? Brexiteers see Brexit as a WW2 fantasy, says @stephenkb 
Well done to all the people that turned up in Brighton to show their support for demanding an end to Brexit. #StopBrexitBrighton 
Please can someone in @UKLabour sit down with @jeremycorbyn and educate him on the key concepts of the EU and Brexit?@RCorbettMEP 
Second Brexit referendum needed because Leave voters are dying off, Nick Clegg suggests 
"I think we should...keep the option open of stopping Brexit"@RCorbettMEPLabour Against Brexit Event#Lab17 #StopBrexit #LabourFringe 
2nd referendums show big swings to pro-EU when the result of the 1st referendum makes people really sit up & think. 
19) Their goal: A joint manifest in defense of civil rights and fraternity, and a proposal for a legal, negotiated referendum in Catalonia. pic.twitter.com/hXZhESC48p 
Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit stance is betraying his party's traditional voters in industrial heartlands  
Not a Clegg fan, but on Europe and Brexit, he is spot on.  
"What is Brexit if not a by-product of internal Tory squabbles?"@RupaHuqLabour Against Brexit Event#Lab17 #LabourFringe 
No. The people. In a referendum. June 23rd last year. Prick!  
Iran halts Iraqi Kurdistan flights ahead of referendum  
How can someone in their right mind really think that abolishing the police and removing all border control is going to solve brexit  
Catalan separatists take to the streets ahead of referendum  
"Brexit is Racist" March Kicks Off Labour Conference | Activists Demand: "Abolish the Police, Smash the Borders"  
Bride interrupts her own wedding to join Brexit protest  
8) This referendum (called for October 1) is unilateral and there are doubts about it's democratic guarantees and consequences. 
Britain must stick to all rules during transition, EU's chief Brexit negotiator says  
7) If the situation didn't look dire enough, it's become worse since the independentist Catalonian government has called a referendum. 
Sneering Farron says no one in their right mind would live in UK post-Brexit. No wonder the LibDems are so unpopular  
"At its heart this is a battle between an open society and a closed society"@IanDunt Labour Against Brexit Event#Lab17 #LabourFringe 
When will devo-friendly No's see how #Brexit subverts Scotland? Or do they actually wish 2b freed from such angst?  
What you need to know aboutThe Catalan independence referendum - ABC News  (via @ABC)#LoveDemocracy#SerensiPacífics 
BREAKING: Iraqi PM says Iraqi Kurdistan independence referendum threatens the unity of Iraq and the stability of the Middle East. 
Over 35 Millions of Kurds spread across middle east support South Kurdistan' referendum by heart& this should be known by friends & enemies.  
Paul Sinclair compares a referendum on the right of self-determination to an illegal war which resulted in over one million people dying.  
Erdogan’s top adviser calls Barzani ‘a dog’ for referendum and 'servant of Israel’. Threatens Barzani: ‘you won’t too wait too long!'  
Iraq’s Kurdish Region to Go Ahead With Referendum Vote Tomorrow 
KISS OF DEATH: Diane Abbott endorses Theresa May's 2 year transitional Brexit. That's a bad sign! 
Trump is keener on #Brexit than May is!  
Every anti Brexit Labour member , Corbyn fan or not, needs to understand this is weapons grade bollocks.  
Britain must stay in EU's single market after Brexit: Labour lawmakers  
KRG's Masoud Barzani says this referendum is not for drawing borders"We will negotiate with Baghdad for 1 or 2 years" #Kurdistan_Referendum  
Fantastic turnout for rally in #Brighton #Hove - opposing the mean minded Little Britain on offer from government #Brexit  
Iran wants all of Iraq - the Kurdish Referendum says no to that 
It is not EU nationals who are tge problem, it is the venal, greedy, lying, incompetent #Brexit elite.#StopBrexit #Remain 
A controversial independence referendum is being held in the Kurdish region of northern Iraq  
Flags of #PKK and PKK leader Öcalan raised in #Kirkuk prior to #KRG referendum  
Hundreds of protesters descend on Labour conference shouting 'Brexit is racist' 
The government hasn’t moved on for slogans, we need to fight a bad Brexit for Brighton and Hove, says @peterkyle at #proEU #Lab17 rally. 
Colin Firth takes Italian citizenship after Brexit decision  
The Iranian war games comes a day before Iraqi Kurdistan's independence referendum. More:  
My grandad is 97 today. I'm not going to use him in the #brexit debate. I just wanted to show off   
Live: Kurdish Regional Government President Masoud Barzani says referendum does not mean the drawing of new borders  
The Big Brexit Speech:  via @YouTube 
Labour want another election before Brexit negotiations are finished 
Moody's downgrade to two notches below #AAA. Low growth and exodus of high paid #EU nationals after #Brexit mean less cash for #Government . 
It's time for Labour to dump Corbyn and save the UK from Brexit. 
Never mind banging on about Brexit. Never the football. I WANT THE ICE CREAM YOU'RE EATING.  
Michael Caine: 'I voted Brexit. It was about freedom, not immigrants'  
As a Kurd, I know tomorrow's independence referendum is crucial after the oppression we've suffered  
Tomorrow, I will have the honour of being present in the referendum of the South Kurdistan . #KurdistanReferendum   
True, very true! My vote for @UKLabour was NOT a vote for Brexit!!! @RemaininEU   
Tomorrow Iraqi #Kurdistan will have an independence referendum. I believe it will pass! #KurdishReferendum #Kurds  
Pulling out never works! #stopbrexitbrighton #StopBrexit #Brexit  
My latest: The Kurdish Independence referendum does not undermine the fight against ISIS  
#UPDATE Iran blocks all Iraqi #Kurdistan flights ahead of referendum at request of Baghdad: official  
.@BorisJohnson deserves praise for principled Brexit stance. It would be crazy to accept new rules without MEPs & we must get on with FTAs 
My personal #Brexit protest was to take out German citizenship and I have my Einbürgerungsfest (the ceremony!) on Thursday -- join the ride 
Cancel Brexit!This is all too much to bear...  
Nick Clegg suggests UK could stay in EU as elderly Brexit voters are dying  
#stopbrexitbrighton flags outside the Labour conference. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
I think you will find the 'Division' started the day you Libs decided to ignore the Referendum result!  
Sea of EU flags outside the Labour conference. #stopbrexitbrighton #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Corbyn has always wanted to leave EU and Single Market. Now he's using his old anti-EU arguments to defend Labour’s endorsement of Brexit  
No wonder Labour are split on Brexit. @jeremycorbyn has been in favour of leaving the EU all his political life 
First of the #stopbrexitbrighton marchers reach the Labour conference.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
And still we keep on coming to say pants to Brexit no doubt the BBC will say nearly 100 came@BHforEU#StopBrexitBrighton #iameuropean  
Iran blocks all flights to and from Iraq's Kurdistan at the request of Baghdad, one day ahead of referendum  
Farming Leaders Warn of £250m Cash Shortfall from Tory Brexit Plans  
Boris doesn't believe in Brexit, he knows it's bad for Britain but he will pose as the Hardest of Brexiteers to further his ambition. #TWAT pic.twitter.com/GZJEqcQISb 
This is a big protest!  Well done to all involved in #stopbrexitbrighton #StopBrexit #Brexit  
The Tories inflicted Brexit on us because they put partisan politics before the country.Momentum are doing the same  
"Its against freedom it's against the rights of everyone we need to stop Brexit" @followMFJ #lab17 
"These Tories are going to destroy everything" @prentoulis #brexit #lab17 #TWT2017 
British Government suppressing report on Brexit food prices - @ChrisHazzardSF  
Brexit isn’t a new Black Wednesday. It’s far darker than that  
Anyone still believe Corbyn voted Remain in the referendum? I have a bridge to sell you  
'Brexit for the things that don't exist yet' is my favourite Brexit so far  
RT if you think @realDonaldTrump should support Kurdistan's referendum vote for independence.  
Irony: If I wasn't saddled with fighting Brexit, I'd be fighting to fix the EU's issues.  
Labour gained seats in the election because of pro-EU tactical voting – so it’s time they opposed Brexit  
As @jeremycorbyn continues to back #Brexit at any cost @UKLabour unveils the party's new slogan. #labourconference2017 
Lots of noisy Remainers in Brighton now! #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit  
TICE: May's Brexit speech was bad for immigration, trade deals and the legal system @TiceRichard. 
Protesters in Barcelona challenged Spanish govt and justice distributing 1 million Oct 1 referendum ballots . 
#Iraqi Ministries & official institutions cancel holidays & ask members to boycott #Erbil referendum in contested areas v @hushamalhashimi 
#StopBrexit march underway in Brighton. #Brexit #Remain 
WATCH | @CarolineFlintMP says open borders after Brexit would be unacceptable. A Remainer who accepts the result! 
Brexit: 'May speech not changed by Boris Johnson article'  
Special Status for Northern Ireland would be a 'huge step forward' - @Martin_Kenny tells #twip #Brexit  
Established businesses are naturally pro-status quo. In our Brexit aims, we need also to think of the businesses that don't yet exist.  
Best side effect of Kurdistian Referendum is AKP conspiracy outlets having a mental breakdown (h/t @arisroussinos ) 
May must now ensure that her government is ready for No Deal on #Brexit. Or it won’t last.  via @conhome 
We voted to leave, brexit means brexit, therefore we will stay another two or three years in the EU.  I think that´s  stuffed you Mrs May ! 
#BREAKING Iran blocks all Iraqi Kurdistan flights ahead of referendum: official 
People back in UK wonder why I give a damn about #Brexit, given that I've escaped to Sweden and bagged a Swedish passport. A few reasons: /1 
Getting ready for the start of #StopBrexitBrighton! Let's show @UKLabour that stopping #Brexit means a better future for us all!  
#BREAKING: Statement of 3 Kurdish parties: The referendum to take place tomorrow in all regions, including Kirkuk  
Then stop Brexit as it's going to cost us £trillions in lost revenue & the poor will be hardest hit @Labour4EU 
Brexit ultimately fail. After that, a new more pro EU Britain will prevail as people understand what they were losing and embrace it. 
Brexit bill could rise to £40BILLION: PM agrees to 'honour all financial commitments'  
#BREAKING: Iran closes its airspace to Kurdistan Region ahead of tomorrow’s independence referendum at the request of Iraqi government.  
Pants to #Brexit . . . #StopBrexitBrighton  
With @ct4europe, #Brighton @UKLabour Conference. Stop #Brexit @Labour4EU 
Unprecedented scenes at #Lab17 - hundreds turned away from @labour4europe @laboursinglemkt fringe shoes huge strength of feeling on #Brexit  
What is clear, is that Labour members want to discuss Brexit. Let them!  
Hundreds protest in eastern Iraq against a planned referendum on the secession of northern Iraq's Kurdish region  
Big Sussex health workers demo pro NHS outside Labour conference passes small far left anti-Brexit one  
#BREAKING: PUK, KDP, KIU reaffirm holding the Kurdistan referendum tomorrow, on time, in #Kirkuk. #KurdistanVotes 
Mp's are betraying the referendum vote and are insulting the "will of the people" and they should all be sacked it's embarrassing  
#nickclegg just doesn't get that austerity helped create #Brexit 
Members of the Scottish Parliament from SNP, Labour, Lib Dems and Greens call for Spain to negotiate and allow referendum in #Catalonia 
His arse must be so sore from sitting on the fence. Wish he would just admit that he wants Brexit & be done with it. 
Very important meeting between KDP,PUK, ISLAMIC UNION. Unanimously decided, referendum in Kirkuk is on time. No change No delay. Vote YES 
Spain, Catalonia clash as 'illegal' independence referendum nears 
Brexit isn’t a new Black Wednesday. It’s far darker than that 
Britain must stay in EU's single market after Brexit - Labour MPs  
Your words during the referendum show you KNEW leaving the Single Market was harmful.Isn't it your patriotic duty to stop Brexit now?  
#BREAKING: Kurdistan Region's Referendum Council says vote will proceed as scheduled in #Kirkuk.#TwitterKurds #Iraq #kurdistanreferendum 
#BREAKING Major pro-independence organizations distribute 1 million official Oct 1 referendum ballots at a Barcelona rally  
Hey UK gov, how about you focus on fixing your own Brexit mess, instead of trying to convince EU citizens it was actually good? What a joke.  
I've been on Sunday Politics NW w/ @NinaWarhurst about Brexit & transitional arrangements. Lab will fight 4 the best deal for jobs & workers  
#IamEuropean. Regardless of #Brexit, my #Citizenship and ALL #CitizensRights must be protected under #Article20tfeu  
As Democratic Socialists, we believe we are stronger together than we are apart.#JeremyCorbyn #StopBrexit before #Brexit stops #Labour 
Britain will diverge from EU regulations post-Brexit - David Davis  
British star Colin Firth becomes Italian citizen following Brexit decision  
Remoaner MPs demand a Parl vote on final #Brexit deal but how many demanded a Parl vote on Cameron's EU deal to remain? Not a single one.  
An absolutely brilliant piece on what #Brexit has taught the world by @KuperSimon 
I'll be chairing the @cardiffuni and @EdinburghUni #Lab17 fringe Mon at 6:15pm. Pls join us to discuss "Will the Union Survive #Brexit?"  
UPDATE: Pep Guardiola has stepped forward to defend the October 1 referendum  
#BREAKING: Former Armenian PM Sargsyan among hundreds of international observers of #Kurdistan’s independence referendum — Armenian media.  
DOUBLE or NOTHING!EU chiefs demand DOUBLE Theresa May’s €20bn exit feeNO DEAL - NOTHING is fine!WTO Rules#Brexit 
Brexit swept under the carpet by Conservative, Labour & the LibDems The British people no longer have a voice in the future of this country 
We have a mandate for another referendum Alex RowleyWe don't have to seek anotherWe have oneYa turnip 
.@CarolineFlintMP argues that freedom of movement must end after Brexit. "People voted to leave to control immigration" #bbcsp 
#Tories keep asking #Labour, where's the money coming from?With an £18bn #Brexit bill, it's the Tories who need to enlighten us!#bbcsp 
'You're saying Brexit voters are DYING OFF?' Marr stunned at controversial Clegg swipe. Like Blair, Clegg is dead.   
Confused about Labour's position on Brexit? @ElizabethGlinka has been taking a look at all the different stances  #bbcsp 
.@labourlewis on why Britain should continue free movement of people after Brexit #bbcsp 
Makes sense: Hammond, as chancellor, is for softer Brexit while Boris is sticking to the Leave line he picked by coin toss. Men of principle  
"Theresa May is sticking two fingers up at Brexit voters"  
Nick Clegg says elderly Brexit voters are going to DIE meaning vote can be reversed in a second referendum  
The Tories are trying to push a 'final deal' so far down the road that we'll be out of the EU before there is one. Referendum NOW therefore.  
Eastern European migration was always going to be a temporary surge. It is madness to quit the EU & Single Market for that reason.#Brexit 
Let's make sure we get #Brexit contemporary resolutions to the top of the priorities ballot.  
Clegg: 'You can't end austerity if you don't end Brexit'. The cost of borrowing is higher given Moodys UK downgrade  
Brexit affects everything, from businesses and jobs, to families, borders and livelihoods. Let’s discuss it at #lab17 #LabConf17 
Brexit Secretary says transition doesn’t mean EU law applies | Confirms UK to pay into EU budget during transition  
Yet again, @danieljhannan deliberately lying about the rights of EU citizens after Brexit. Shameless.  
True. On the continent, #Brexit is seen as a problem primarily of Britain, completely created by Britain, and to be solved by Britain.  
Carry On EuropeKudos to  for sharing this wee #Brexit related gem from Kenneth Williams   
Britain must stay in EU's single market after Brexit: Labour lawmakers  
Diane Abbott backs Theresa May's two-year Brexit transition plan  
The UK is being consumed by the swamp. A political class intent on denying us Brexit, grovelling to Islam, and wanting mass immigration. 
Hard to believe that more people petition to keep #Uber than for their right to have the final say on any #Brexit deal. 
16. This is what constrains us post-Brexit. That nebulous absolute sovereignty was never achievable. Exists nowhere in the modern world 
Corbyn revealed as hard Brexiter with siege economy agenda in huge shock to absolutely no-one whatsoever outside Labour#brexit  
1. Let me spell this out. The EU polices its outer frontier. On Brexit, NI border becomes part of that frontier. We become a third country 
Brexit support is about envy. Most Leavers don't have the capacity to gain anything from membership, so they don't want others to do so. 
“@CliveLewis and other colleagues should be more honest,” single market and customs union membership is not Brexit, says @CarolineFlintMP 
Labour’s response to Brexit is cowardly and shameful. That’s why I’m resigning from the party  
'You can't stop austerity unless you stop Brexit'.As usual @nick_clegg is spot on.Need to #exitfrombrexit 
Momentum losing any claim to be about empowering Labour members today with attempt to block conference from voting on Brexit 
Blatant attempt to block conference from democratic decision on Brexit policy. CLPD extremely misnamed.  
Does nobody remember any more that the EU referendum was advisory? 
I think our political leaders are betraying us on Brexit. Call 0345 60 60 973 and tell me your view.  
BREAKING: Students defy Spain and distribute 1 million ballots for the referendum at the University of Barcelona. 
Colin Firth is becoming an Italian citizen because of Brexit  
Nigel Farage 'to form new political party after Tory disaster' to continue Brexit fight. We need to support Nigel.  
Demonstrations in support of the referendum in hundreds of Catalan cities right now. #MaratóDemocràcia 
Labour should remember that the #Brexit vote was built on a mountain of right-wing press hate and lies about the EU and EU migrants.#Remain 
Madrid has taken temporary charge of Catalonia's finances, in an attempt to prevent spending on the referendum  
Clegg: 'You can't end austerity if you don't end Brexit'  
Germany: At least 3,000 former UK citizens, who left Britain after #Brexit, are voting today for the first time as German citizens. #btw17 
Corbyn does his best to help imploding Tories - "a lot" of further immigration - longer Brexit delay - illegal strikes - fibbing on Uber  
I don't mean to be unkind, but why does an unelected has been like Nick Clegg get so much airtime? On balance helpful to Brexit. But odd. 
After the Referendum I put the chances of actually leaving the EU at 50%. I think that has now slipped to 10-20%. We have to fight back! 
Excluded voters who voted Brexit  forgot that universal credit which makes poor poorer was devised by Brexit's IDS  
UK's Johnson opposes adopting any new EU rules during Brexit transition  
'It's the economy, stupid,' was once a mantra of US elections. It's astonishing that both of our Brexit-obsessed parties have forgotten that 
Are our political leaders trying to stop Brexit? #FarageOnLBC 
Little incentive for EU to negotiate seriously on Brexit, while UK govt still negotiating with itself. No UK position is regarded as final 
RIDICULOUS: Nick Clegg still thinks Brexit can be reversed. When will he accept the will of the people and move on? 
Dear @jeremycorbyn Please ensure that Brexit is discussed at this week's Labour Conference so you offer a true alternative to the Tories. 
Nigel Farage 'to form new political party after Tory disaster' to continue Brexit fight 
"I think it's impossible for anyone to put a figure on it" - Labour Leader says he doesn't know where the 2 year figure came from #brexit  
Thing that stood out for me in Tim's (brilliant) Brexit book is how UK was, and clearly remains, hostage to Tory infighting. It's not normal  
On Brexit's 4 biggest Qs - single market, customs union, free movement and paying for access - Corbyn incapable of a straight answer #Marr 
David Davis might well want a 'practical, upbeat' #brexit but his party's hardline approach is a real risk to our economy. #marr 
Nick Clegg brilliant on Brexit as always - we can give people the chance to change their minds on the facts. Shame Corbyn is so proBrexit. 
Labour’s Brexit policy...  
You cannot talk about Austerity and back a Brexit that bankrupts Britain. Delegates need to debate this. Proud Brighton a Remain city #lab17 
Brexit voters need to ask are they any richer than they were a year ago, is their country more respected, are their prospects better now?  
As @GerardBattenMEP puts it "the fight for Brexit resumes" post the PM's Florence speech. Millions of Brexit voters will agree.  
.@nick_clegg on how Brexit can be stopped  #marr 
I wish @nick_clegg was running @UKLabour. The man speaks a lot of sense on Brexit.#marrshow #marr (Cue lots of angry Corbyn supporters) 
"You can't end austerity unless you stop Brexit" says Nick Clegg on #marrOdd then that Clegg started austerity with Tories before Brexit... 
Oh, there's Nick Clegg, talking crap about #Brexit.The man who made £250k off a flat, in only 5 years at the EU trough. #Marr 
Nick Clegg describes Labour's position as "constipated ambivalence" & asks how Corbyn can end austerity without ending Brexit. 
"You cannot end austerity unless you end Brexit" Nick Clegg.He needs medication urgently. #Marr 
Looks like #Marr is following the usual @BBCNews pattern. No Scots, Welsh or NI voices to be heard on #Brexit. An English only project. 
Clegg says Corbyn must realise "you cannot end austerity unless you end Brexit" #Marr 
Nick Clegg points out on Marr that Brexit voters are "dying off". Remember how vile we were for noting the same about No voters? 
BORIS: Foreign Secretary stopped Hammond's plans for a 5 year Brexit transition. 2 years is still too long! 
Britain will diverge from EU rules and regulations post-Brexit, @DavidDavisMP tells @MarrShow  
Moody's downgrade teaches hard lesson on sovereignty: UK govt announces its #brexit intentions but the reaction of others determines results 
Cleggy says people voted Brexit as they were promised a utopia. He of course is promising a Eutopia 
And #Marr wheels on Nick Clegg to push his book on how to stop Brexit. This is pure spin, folks, the BBC is not your friend. 
David Davis interview shows that he's completely clueless about Brexit. He's literally making it up as he goes along #marr 
"It's a negotiation, they'll always say they want more" - Brexit secretary @DavidDavisMP on Brexit @MarrShow  
Brexit will, and should, be a process, not an event, a gradual reorientation toward global markets and a more competitive regulatory regime. 
Talk of a 'long transitional Brexit' is an attempt to dodge many responsibilities. Main one: to test the 'people's will' on the facts NOW. 
The patience of 17.4m people who voted for Brexit has been nothing short of remarkable in the face of incessant MSM bias & EU intransigence. 
Brexit isn’t a new Black Wednesday. It’s far darker than that  
#Brexit is the single most important political issue facing the UK today. @PeoplesMomentum are trying to stop it being debated at #Lab17. 
#marr Nick Clegg plank still doing the rounds everywhere!!!!! Do everything he can to derail Brexit. Anyone listening to this idiot go away  
If Labour betray their core voters and electoral heartlands by sabotaging Brexit, they will be punished at the ballot box. #Marr 
Ignore Brexit myths of national decline, says @iandunt—Britain’s open, diverse culture made it better than ever  
Mayor and councilors from st.Niklaas from @de_NVA in support of Catalunya #handsoffcatalonia #1Oct #referendum #democracy #time4sd 
Wonderful piece of writing here from @KuperSimon Brexit is Britain’s gift to the world -  via @FT 
This is Brexit's only Western mate. Trump! Are you kidding?  #Brexit #Remain #TakeTheKnee 
I’m in Erbil to see for myself how the Kurdish referendum goes, and what the EU can do to encourage dialogue.   
Brexit isn’t a new Black Wednesday. It’s far darker than that  A disaster waiting to happen #StopBrexit 
Lessons from John Smith's leadership on why #lab17 must fight for Single Market to stop more Brexit austerity See:  
Both support a transition deal and then Brexit. Labour have put a red bow on it and Tories a blue bow but it's the same damn policy. 
Spend Sunday listening to Labour delegates banging on about Tory Brexit before you realise both parties now have the same policy. 
Many will have seen this wonderful demolition of #Brexit arguments, but does no harm to say it twice  
There was a national referendum.  
Brexit is going to make us suffer, and we're already suffering, it must be stopped.  
Boris on election night: "Christ, Brexit. This is going to cause massive problems. We’ve f***** Brexit." 
Oh Labour Party, please don't put forward Diane Abbott to speak on Brexit in future. It's just too painful to listen to. 
#Lab17 delegates if you want a vote 2 happen at conference on Brexit then you have to ignore @PeoplesMomentum & vote 4 it in priority ballot 
Construction workers are concerned about a Brexit-induced labour shortage  
Brexit: A national disaster waiting to happen  @williamkeegan 
Germans had a brutal response to Theresa May's Brexit speech  
Brexit the new Black Wednesday? It's far darker than that.  Today's Observer column 
He wanted a 'real' referendum on EUHe got itHe lostHe whinedHe started a 'movement' to keep UK in EUHe's an idiotHe's @nick_clegg 
Labour gained seats because of pro-EU tactical voting – it’s time they respected their voters and opposed Brexit  
Do you really want to be the #Brexit party @UKLabour? Supporting the billionaire press barons and the far right of Britain & Europe. Change! 
The UK is set to become the new Greece after #Brexit;  Broke and in need of a bailout. Ordinary Brits will pay a huge price for this folly.  
Germans head to the polls in an election seen by many as a referendum on Chancellor Angela Merkel's leadership.  
Mercer gave Nigel Farage use of Cambridge Analytica (CA) to cause Brexit. Then CA helped elect Trump. Then sent Nigel to do Calexit. 
Guardiola sends a message #1Oct #referendum :"this is not about independence. This is about democracy" (video in Catalan)  
So Momentum are running a line on priority ballot which will prevent #Lab17 debating Brexit. Very democratic... 
A party that supports any form of Brexit is betraying the youth of Britain. Period. #LabourConference 
Theresa May faces Brexit backlash from her own MPs protesting she is delaying full EU departure  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage 'to form new political party after Tory disaster'  
May’s Brexit speech stirs discontent among the rebels of Rochester  
Colin Firth takes Italian citizenship after Brexit  
The Corbyn Brexit fantasy: ‘To use powers returned from Brussels to invest and upgrade Britain’s economy’ Which powers? @jeremycorbyn 
Michael Gove has DEFRA report of Brexit impact on food prices. News is so bad it seems to be in national interest not to publish #StopBrexit 
As Iraqi Kurds prepare to vote in an independence referendum, Turkey demands that the election be canceled.  
Brexit: Jeremy Corbyn pressed to commit to single market - But only full EU membership guarantees our future.  
Good morning #Rudaw readers! Tomorrow is the official day of voting for independence from #Iraq referendum in #Kurdistan Region. 
The best piece on Iraq's politics in a long while, by @fordrs58:Kurdish Referendum: Thinking, Not Threats  
Brexit: Jeremy Corbyn pressed to commit to single market  
Voting is normally compulsory and referendum results binding. Neither applies to this “postal survey”  
I wake up in the middle of the night with a feeling that there is a conspiracy element in the nightmare of Brexit. Nothing else makes sense. 
Michael Heseltine a lonely voice on the @Conservatives May & Brexit: “It’s not that I want to change the singer, I want to change the song.” 
David Davis says £40bn Brexit 'divorce bill' claim is 'made up'  
As Theresa May gives make or break #Brexit speech to almost empty room in Florence, 52% of Brits want to STAY IN EU!  
Iraqi Kurds defy warnings and threats by Turkey and Iraq to cancel an independence referendum.  
As DUPlicitous Brexiteers plan to throw UK under their bus, time for Labour to step up and close sixty seat gap. 
You're a British protectionist who voted for Brexit and work for Alex Jones. Silence.  
Rees-Mogg -worth £100m- doesn’t give a toss about UK businesses & UK citizens, he only cares for his Brexit ideology 
N Korea may drop H-BombPR floods, no elecMexico shakenUS $20T+ debtIrma/Harvey, Russia, China, Brexit…So obv, triple down on anti-NFL  
Corbyn 'betraying traditional Labour voters over Brexit to please millennials' MPs say  #JeremyCorbyn #Corbyn #EU 
Colin Firth takes Italian citizenship after Brexit  
Madrid took direct control over #Catalonia's police in order to prevent upcoming #independence referendum  
Allowing a handful of Tories to usurp a non binding referendum for their own ends, that's the real misuse of democracy.  
PLS RT In case u think this is a 'fair balanced fight'; in case u think 'yes' vote a shoo in - here r some facts & stats Beware #Brexit   
1922 COMMITTEE NEWS: Expectations Rising Over Backbench Conservative MPs To Trigger Vote Of No Confidence In Theresa May Over Brexit Breach  
Kurdish referendum on ‘Independence’ unpopular but imminent  
Britain, EU head back to Brexit negotiating table after May's speech received cautious welcome from bloc's leaders  
Turkey heightens pressure on Iraqi Kurdish leaders to cancel independence referendum  
That's the same company that targeted voters for Brexit.  
."May remains firmly lashed to the Big Lies that underpin Brexit, propagated by the obsessed right of her party." 
Oppose Kurdish independence referendum:- Iraq- Turkey- Iran- US- UK- Spain- Germany- UN Secretary GeneralSupport:- Israel 
Gay marriage vote is Australia's Brexit / Trump moment.The fed up silent masses will vote NO despite propaganda & the left will cry & wail. 
So he proves he doesn't make long winded rants about other people's tweets, by .. making a long winded rant about your tweet@MikeStuchbery_ 
Brexit Is Still Alive, after Theresa May Affirms It in Florence  via @michaelbd 
The Moody’s downgrading of the UK credit rating suggests that Brexit is going to make us suffer   
Prepare for no Brexit Jeremy @jeremycorbyn. Brexit will harm everyone but the few.  
Chris Riddell on the prime minister’s Brexit speech in Florence - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Cabinet unity on Brexit shattered tonight. Some weapons-grade briefings out there. Read all about it tomorrow... 
"Brexit means Brexit: Britain cannot leave the EU and expect to escape the consequences" #brexitwontwork 
Strong editorial from 'The Times': Spain "should allow the referendum to go ahead"  
I know it's a bit obvious, but there's a definite Brexit analogy going on here.  
Theresa May faces Brexit backlash from her own MPs protesting she is delaying full EU departure | The Independent  
Brexit the movie. With a chilling final image... 
11,151! Thanks for all my birthday wishes.  Govt must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments. Sign & RT  
No. I'm pleased that Brexit has been stopped.  
Mr. Darcy switches nationality after Brexit. Fucking brilliant. 
Not while you continue to support Brexit Jeremy @jeremycorbyn. Bin Brexit and you have a fighting chance.  
Thread and Moment about social media trolling related to Brexit in the U.K.:  
The evidence is mounting. #Brexit will be a disaster. Tragically both May & Corbyn support it.Support @LibDems & calls for a 2nd referendum 
Labour and Corbyn talking about the Tories floundering on Brexit, err you’ve flip flopped yourselves dears! Corbyn supports Brexit! 
The absolute irony is Labour, by advocating a Hard Brexit, is on the side of the 'tax dodging billionaires' not the poor. #CorbynsBrexit 
Catalonia is an ancient nation where 80% of Catalans want to vote in a referendum on self-determination. #Votingisnotacrime #FreedomforCAT 
Worth signing and publicising the petition calling for the release of the Brexit impact studies  
I signed this letter on Brexit.For the sake of us all, you can't campaign against Austerity and be relaxed about leaving the Single Market  
I see Boris Johnson, having tried & failed to get sacked & become a Brexit martyr last weekend, is having a another go at it this weekend.  
Thought for the day: Britain is a property-owning gerontocracy, and Brexit is the property-owning classes throwing a senile rage-tantrum. 
Excellent. Given loudness of the metro Remainers we need @BorisJohnson out there campaigning for REAL #Brexit  
Ok, I have been saying for ages that BRexit needs binning, but now we are losing Mr Darcy! #finalStraw #ExitFromBrexit 
British star Colin Firth becomes Italian citizen following Brexit decision  
Imagine if @Nigel_Farage had admitted that we had border controls that we just weren't using, during the referendum, instead of a year after 
Labour gained seats because of pro-EU tactical voting – it’s time they respected their voters and opposed Brexit  
Kind of obvious, no?  Anything else isn't Brexit  
We need to Leave in March 2019 and go straight to trading with EU as third country. Only that is Brexit. We should prepare for it now.  
Brexit critic Colin Firth opts for Italian passport for ‘family reasons’  
Whitepaper uncovers 13,493 Brexit Twitter bots "only to disappear from Twitter shortly after the ballot."  
Nuclear war is at least going to take our minds off Brexit for a bit. Possibly permanently. 
RIP Cabinet Brexit truce(21 Sep - 23 Sep 2017) 
*NEW*Boris's Brexit transition demands:- No new EU rules/regs- Free to sign trade deals- 2yr absolute maximum- No £ for single market 
109k signatures! Let's keep the final deal referendum petition moving! #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
If Corbyn u-turns on Brexit he’ll be u-turning on 40 years of opposing the European Union. That’s not authentic, that’s selling out. 
Demonstration in SWITZERLAND against Spanish repression against Catalan referendum and government institutions.  
.Brexit - the gift that keeps on.....taking away"Brexit is going to cause so many issues between UK & Ireland". 
Hammond leadership plan to replace May: he would run economy, DD would run Brexit, Boris would "run the shop" as front man. See Sunday Times 
Colin Firth becomes an Italian citizen following Brexit decision 
*The Cabinet Get To Read The Brexit Impact Assessments*  
Proud to have put my name to this vital @UKLabour letter to avert the disaster of a hard Tory #Brexit  
Iraq's Kurdistan government denies reports of postponing independence referendum  
We must have the courage of our convictions on Brexit and offer a clear alternative to the Tories. 
British actor Colin Firth gets dual Italian citizenship after Brexit vote  
Kurdistan and #Catalonia are voting on independence. Welcome to the age of secession.  #Referendum 
Independence referendum will be held in Kurdish areas of Iraq on Monday amid concerns about instability and violence  
Colin Firth takes Italian citizenship after Brexit  
John McDonnell (11 June):"People will interpret membership of single market as not respecting the referendum result" 
Labour should have the courage of its convictions on Brexit. Our open letter signed by politicians & organisations from across our movement.  
It's like nobody thought this through ...New Brexit rules ‘could lead to unskilled workforce crisis’   
Put this on a big red bus.#Brexit  
UK insists EU to have custody of Farage at weekends in Brexit divorce settlement 
Many states in the world may stand against #Kurdish referendum; but they stand for #YESKurdistan as they stood against Saddam and #ISIS 
Catalan police confirm they will serve citizens, as Spain seeks to stop democratic government holding democratic referendum #1Oct #Catalonia 
How would you vote, if we had another Independence Referendum, with the next 12 months?Please retweet for the widest possible sample. 
New Brexit rules ‘could lead to unskilled workforce crisis’  
A separate THREAD on how Russia annexed Crimea & helped Brexit using the same tactics. Including hacking power grids 
Leaflet (in Arabic) delivered to the door in Erbil (Ainkawa) lists 37 bad things that will happen if you vote "no" in Kurdish referendum  
Franco's fascists still live: Catalonia referendum: Madrid moves to take over local policing - BBC News  
First some background.#PutinPlaybook - The Geoplitical future of Russia It has 3 goals.1-Annex Ukraine2-Brexit3-Create chaos is the USA  
Echoing France, Germany says May offered 'nothing concrete' on Brexit  
If we had a referendum today you would have convinced most of us to leave EU now. Disgraced Mrs May must step down.  
Gove: All our data says #Brexit will be a disaster. However, we can't tell you this as it undermines our lies. 
Iraqi government threatened military intervention if the referendum happens. That hasn't stopped the Kurdish people.  
Mariano Rajoy says that the referendum cannot take place because it violates Spain's constitution  
EU immigrants are not a problem. Those who target them as scapegoats for the failures of the British elite are.#Brexit #LabourConference 
Colin Firth takes Italian citizenship after Brexit  
One thing Remainers must never do is quietly accept the commonplace assumption and lie that EU immigration is harmful.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Spain: Madrid steps up crackdown on Catalonia referendum, takes control of police  
Colin Firth announced he has become an Italian citizen due to the Brexit vote.  
What Would Bridget Jones Think? Colin Firth Becomes an Italian Citizen Over Brexit ‘Uncertainty’  
If 17.4 million voted Leave but are divided on type of #brexit whereas 16.1 voted for status quo, does that make Remain the majority? 
Following Brexit, Colin Firth receives dual citizenship from Italy  pic.twitter.com/SiM9LBDvvq 
'Slap in the Face' for May as UK Credit Rating Downgraded over #Brexit 'Uncertainty'. Should she resign?  #fo2eu 
Brussels will want vengeance on Brexit Britain, warns whistleblower who exposed EU failings #premium 
Conveniently after the referendum, Michael Gove tells us immigrants have raised school standards in London #Brexit 
Germans had a brutal response to Theresa May's Brexit speech  
SPAIN |Spanish gov't sends hundreds of police vans to Catalonia days before the referendum.  
5 things to watch on Catalonia’s referendum  
Gerard Batten: Theresa May has betrayed British public on Brexit  
Colin Firth, who is married to environmentalist Livia Giuggioli, takes on Italian citizenship after Brexit vote:  
Vardy looks really angry. Either it's because of the missed penalty or Brexit not going well. 
I'm going to #Brighton tomorrow to say 'No, #JeremyCorbyn' we don't want #Brexit! Preorder the @BrexitRage song!   
"When was there stability in ME that now u warn of instability bcuz Kurdistan R. is holding a referendum," Baydemir. 
Heseltine is right, the Brexit extremists have May and the country by the short and curlies. Time to take our country back and #StopBrexit 
Montserrat Pratdesaba (Big Mama Montse) is one of the signatories of  Manifesto against the illegal referendum 1-O    
Vardy really put the whole of Brexit behind that pen though. 
Brexit is going to be carnage for the #Strictly pro dancers. 
.@KateGreenSU on the EU Withdrawl Bill: "a shameless and disgraceful undemocratic power grab"Brexit & Women's Rights#Lab17 #StopBrexit 
My husband has British and Italian nationality; so my kids and I will be doing the same as Colin. We won't let Brexit narrow their options. 
Turkey plans security steps over Iraqi Kurdish referendum  
***NEW VIDEO***May Day May Day - Stop Theresa  We want Brexit NOW!Please RT and subscribe to my Youtube Channel. 
PETITION: The UK to leave the EU fully in 2019 and withdraw the 2-year transitional period proposal  via @Your Brexit 
BREAKING: Spain sends hundreds of police vans to Catalonia eight days before the referendum.  
Jose Luis Guerín is one of the signatories of Manifesto against the  illegal referendum 1-O  #NoParticipisNoVotis  
This referendum will begin a process of dialogue. We welcome talks to reach a managed, amicable agreement. Today's high-level visit... 
A HARD/SOFT #Brexit will be DECIDED & delivered by EU27 UK will take or leave it in the end! Current debate is only trading water #remain 
"The majority of those under 50 who voted, voted to remain in the EU"@DrAishaKGillBrexit & Women's Rights #Lab17 #LabourFringe 
Iraq, Turkey & Iran leaders know what they DO NOT want. Do they know what they want? Iraq must present a credible altnerative to Referendum 
I called on France and its allies to accept the will of the people and encourage Baghdad after the referendum to negotiate in good-faith. 
Dover customs has 6 lorry bays. Estimated it will need 1000 after Brexit. How many Brexiters will Dover have once the bulldozers turn up? 
I met France's Amb to Iraq, Bruno Aubert, to discuss the referendum in the Kurdistan Region on Sept. 25 and the country's next chapter- mb.  
WARNING: Transitional deal means Britain could miss out on Brexit benefits, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg says. 
‘Slap in the Face’ for May as UK Credit Rating Downgraded over Brexit ‘Uncertainty’  
And in the transition period, EU sets the rules with no UK input whatsoever, Britain has to pay in & we are deferring the benefits of Brexit  
Colin Firth made dual Italian citizen after branding Brexit 'disaster of unexpected proportions'  
In Amsterdam. Rally to support Catalonia's #1Oct #referendum  
No, I'm still concerned that Brexit might happen. Retweet if you agree.  
#BREAKING Referendum websites on Catalan govt social media profiles(like two announced by President Puigdemont) to be blocked by court order  
Tory MP Kemi Badenoch who's pro Brexit a proud Brit | Daily Mail Online. Great interview @KemiBadenoch @Women2Win 
+I think it is also to the benefit of the Iraqi Kurds to give up the referendum, which will inevitably cause Arab-Kurdish wars. 
CONCERNS: A transitional deal means Britain will miss out on Brexit benefits for years to come, Rees-Mogg warns. 
Once again, Spain uses its power and not its laws and accuses U.K. and Canada as not democratic when authorized a referendum. 
For all those people who are surprised that Theresa May betrayed Brexit - she never stood for it in the first place.  
Labour gained seats because of pro-EU tactical voting-it’s time they respected their voters & opposed #Brexit  
Colin Firth becomes Italian citizen after Brexit vote  
Brexit critic Colin Firth opts for Italian passport for ‘family reasons’  
Labour needs to respect their voters and oppose Tory Brexit  
Interestingly the EU negotiation team will insist on U.K. Parliament ratifying the Brexit agreement, the ultimate humiliation for May?  
Flip. The quintessential "English" actor becomes an Italian because of post Brexit "uncertainty". Flippety flip  
Germany calls May's Brexit speech 'disappointing'  
"Catalans have a democratic right to express their opinion and a referendum is the most democratic, efficient and inclusive way to do that"  
#Iraq #Baghdad considers negotiation with #Kurds #Erbil failed over halting the #Referendum despite all attempts: difficult days ahead. 
I will be speaking at 6 with @VPointon of @Labour4EU on what #Brexit means for women's rights Friends Meeting House Brighton BN1 1AF #Lab17 
Brexit bill could rise to £40BILLION as PM agrees to 'honour all financial commitments' during 2yr transition period  
Yes you Brexit chaps must be livid! Please launch a vote of no-confidence in May. Let's put this before the voters!  
Are you worried about the two-year transition deal that Theresa May talked about yesterday? Are you concerned that Brexit won't happen?  
#Brexit has done it for Mr Darcy :))  
Excellent article on the tax-dodging rich and media barons using #Brexit to avoid the EU clampdown on tax-avoidance  
UK has committed 'CARDINAL SIN': 'Vengeful' EU will PUNISH for Brexit - whistleblower  
Theresa May just BOUGHT MORE TIME to REVERSE BREXIT!  And that folks is the reality.  
How many millions are you going to spend this time to try to foist #Brexit on the British people @Arron_banks?#StopBrexit 
Fareed Zakaria argues the US should support the Kurds of northern Iraq in upcoming independence referendum @CNNI  
Actor Colin Firth becomes an Italian citizen after Brexit vote  
Britain's Conservatives are divided over whether Brexit is an opportunity to be seized or a bomb to be defused 
Catalonia referendum: Madrid takes over local policing  
,@FareedZakaria argues United States should support southern #Kurdistan in the upcoming independence referendum@CNN 
Spain ramps up efforts to quash Catalonia referendum  
Brexit critic Colin Firth opts for Italian passport for ‘family reasons’  
SLO organised referendum 1990 about independence in accordance with the Rule of law, respecting also Federal constitution. #Catalonia 
I'll vote for and campaign for whoever offers a 2nd referendum, which was  unanimously passed at Labour conf 2016 but changed before GE 
1) one undeniable, painful truth on Brexit.We had one card only, the timing of firing Article 50We blew it, triggered before we were ready  
If I supported austerity I would have voted Tory, but I've always voted Labour. If they don't offer a 2nd referendum I won't vote for them. 
Just-in: President Barzani: It’s too late to discuss postponing Kurdistan referendum 
May’s Florentine fudge simply highlighted Tory #brexit divisions.See my article in @LabourList : 
Brexit: When May said *The people decided Brexit* she was lying/mistaken & when she implemented their *will* she was abusing power.  
Austerity, Brexit, Consumption, Deregulation: the disastrous ABCD of Tory economic policy that's left their competence in tatters (again).  
Brexit and harsh visa rules are making overseas students feel unwelcome. Universities can help them settle in 
If the referendum had included thresholds, the need for a 2/3rds majority, and a vote for all those affected, I'd have accepted the result. 
Colin Firth gets Italian citizenship after speaking out over Brexit  
Indeed, that is the nature of parliamentary democracy: no #brexit agreement w/o ratification by both European and UK Parliaments. 
#EU did not declare Nationalist @Nigel_Farage and @UKIP terrorists BUT allowed #BrexitWhy can't @UN #EU #UK #USA support #BiafraReferendum 
Senior KDP & PUK officials Roj Shaways and Sadi A. Pire both confirm in Baghdad that no postponement of the referendum #KurdistanReferendum 
Michael Heseltine has said Theresa May should have sacked the Foreign Secretary over his Brexit intervention  
Barzani: the decision to hold referendum is not that of one or two parties, it is the decision of the Kurdish parliament, & ppl of Kurdistan  
This is how I feel about the Kurdish referendum. Here with my friend Rahim Rashidi of Kurdistan24 TV. #Kurds 
BREAKING: President Barzani tells French ambassador that it is too late to postpone referendum, vote will take pace on Monday, Sept. 25  
go for the leadership of the tories Jacob we need a real brexit leader  
"Dante sends Brexit to hell" - say protestors in Florence#DayofSolidarity with #EU27citizens and #BritishEuropeans 
Colin Firth Granted Italian Citizenship After Brexit Left Him ‘Horrified’   
Theresa May's keynote Brexit speech in Florence failed to make front page headlines on the continent  
As #Kurdistan prepares for the referendum #Peshmerga like #Kurdistan Freedom Party’s Hussein Yazdanpanah hold the line near #Hawija 
Of course, rather than harming Britain by pursuing fantasy #Brexit deals the government could just ditch the whole deluded project. 
We have just 1 year, 186 days and 8 hours to get #Brexit back on track. 
.@CNN's @FareedZakaria supports #Referendum. 'There are few good guys in Middle East but Kurds fit that description'  
Didn't @DanielJHannan say it would be irresponsible to scare EU migrants about their rights after #Brexit?   
Should Britain stay in the single market after Brexit? Head down to our #Lab17 event with @Open_Britain  
Brexit is not going to happen, according to one of the most senior figures in the Tories  
Womansplaining. The. 'Brexit.Bill'. is.not.a.punishment.  @GMB (Dan Hannan also came w/some gold which I'll tweet later.) 
EU bureaucrats so intent on punishing us for Brexit now have no leg to stand on, says The Sun  
The inexorable, Brexit-driven rise of the xenophobic far-right continues.  
mikeweirsnp: RT CatalansForYes: Catalan farmers with their tractors in Lleida to support the referendum and protes…  
Jacob Rees Mogg leads hard Brexit Tory backlash against Theresa May's Florence speech  
Message for @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. His Brexit extremism only represents a hard-right simple-minded fringe. SO...  
Lord Heseltine says Theresa May should have sacked Boris over Brexit essay  
Yes. Let's recall her wise words in the Referendum campaign:  
Macron Rejects May’s Brexit Speech, Demands EU Citizens’ Rights, Divorce Bill Are ‘Clarified’  
Britain is ‘sleepwalking’ into a post-Brexit food price crisis, report claims  via @LondonEconomic 
This is official: Iraqi Kurdistan's high referendum commission made a statement, no delay, the referendum will be held on Sep 25. 
Turkey plans security steps over Iraqi Kurdish referendum  
10,298 I love a good mystery don't you? Help solve the mystery of the Govt Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments. Sign & RT  
4 layers of complexity in Northern Ireland after Brexit  via @brianmlucey 
Spoke to @Khatibsky of @skynewsarabia on latest on the #Referendum, Regional & International Reactions & #KRG's Post Referendum Agenda #UNGA 
‘The EU is falling apart!’ Brexit and weak pound to see trade boom for UK - top economist  
Earlier today a PUK official claimed that Kurdish leadership agreed to the US-backed alternative to referendum, but has been denied by Erbil  
Kurdish referendum thread: PUK (KRG's second party) opposes holding referendum now, accepts US-UK "alternative plan" for negotiations. 
Brussels will want vengeance on Brexit Britain, warns whistleblower who exposed EU expenses fraud #premium 
Labour’s position on Brexit is softening - the 48% should get off Jeremy Corbyn’s back. @Natt calls for unity:  
This graph is important. It's not EU migrants, it's the upsurge of Asia that has hammered Western jobs and incomes. #Brexit #StopBrexit /1 
It is deluded to think highly talented EU workers will come in droves to a UK which treats them as barely tolerated intruders.#Brexit 
.Look!Countries of former British Empire WILL work together post-BrexitJust NOT with the UK!Empire 2.0 eh?. 
Churchill was the opposite of the narrow-minded #Brexit nationalists. He wanted a US of Europe, and by 1961 he wanted Britain in it.  
Mervyn King says he doesn't think Brexit can be reversed without another referendum  
ICYMI: climate change, #Brexit, #LDConf and our new video 
There is a way to counter this establishment coup against BrexitJoin & Support UKIP, Be a UKIP activist & Vote UKIP 
Watching Kurds on television explain why they're holding an independence referendum, well, it sounds pretty familiar. Ànims! 
#Kirkuk’s governor on independence referendum: This is a historical day for the people of Kirkuk and #Kurdistan  
Britons in EU tell May: 'Don't throw us under Brexit bus'  
Brussels will want vengeance on Brexit Britain, warns whistleblower who exposed EU expenses fraud  via @telegraphnews 
One truly remarkable feature of the Brexit debate is how little Remainers *still* know or understand of what Brexiteers asked for & want. 
That's the biggest Brit misconception of all. Europeans do not see Brexit as a 'shared challenge', just as UK shooting itself in foot 
Johnson: "We'll succeed mightily."May: "We'll build a Global Britain."Fox: "We'll be champion of free trade."Global trade: "Meh."#Brexit  
Tory minr Penny Mordaunt tells #bbcaq that ppl not allowed to re-evaluate wisdom of Brexit once know facts - had 1 chance in 2016, that's it 
EU ‘Will Want Vengeance on Brexit Britain’, Says Whistleblower  
Block the UK Govt from giving money to the EU for Brexit: An injunction could be obtained to prevent the misapplication of public money.  
A colonel of the Guardia Civil will take the command of the Catalan police to avoid the referendum. Coup d'état!  
The world reacts to Theresa May’s Brexit speech and the PM seems to have pissed off everyone [TWEETS]  
'Free movement must END' Rees-Mogg hits out at extended deadline after May's Brexit speech. JR-M for PM!  
.A definite sign of DESPERATION in the Brexit camp when they try to attack Moody's when they don't like the facts. 
#BREAKING: Senior assistant to Kurdish President says independence referendum to go ahead as planned.  
Lord Heseltine calls Theresa May's speech in Florence "completely incompatible" with those she made in the referendum campaign  
Oh God, Charles Moore on #bbcaq blames Remainers, BBC, Lords, Bxl for #Brexit negs mess - everyone except Tory govt which has wasted 15 mths 
Theresa May is first person to unite country on #Brexit. The Remainers think she's a traitor & now the Leavers think she's a traitor too. 
....and the Leave Campaign had the gall to claim that #Brexit would help the #NHS ! 
He has played British kings and lords, English heartthrobs and spies. Now, post Brexit, he is an Italian  
Iranian-Kurdish women rally in support of #Kurdistan Region’s upcoming independence referendum in Bahirkah, north of Erbil city.  
A brilliantly rageful and hilarious demolition of the Florence Brexit speech. You have to laugh or else you'd cry 
Theresa May said 'UK has never been comfortable in the EU'.How comfortable do you feel as part of EU?#brexit#florencespeech#indyref2 
British actor Colin Firth gets Italian citizenship after Brexit vote  
Clarification to all.No referendum postponement.It is on time.Our delegation in Baghdad to deliver a message: We r ready for talks after25/9 
Attending #LabourConference? Come see our fantastic panel event entitled "No Brexit is better than a Bad Brexit" on Monday evening!  
Anyone who has ever negotiated a business transaction will know hidden pitfalls arise. Brexit will have thousands of these. It's complex. 
How to do, and how not to do, Brexit.  
I started pondering your rather excellent thread. My Brexit analogy  
Kurdistan referendum voting has begun abroad, and @FalahMustafa tells us Kurdistan could be a factor for stability 
And I thought after the referendum Britain was going to "hold all the cards." Why is #GloriousBrexit being delayed?! 
Verhofstadt is the European Parliament's chief coordinator on Brexit. It's almost as though Britain should leave...  
BREXIT: Theresa May has betrayed British public, UKIP Brexit spokesman @GerardBattenMEP says. 
Really good point JK wants to reference that Brexit was run on a lie but #indyref is just tiny minded cybernats with no view of the future 
Odd how some folk make this point, then reverse the principle re: 2nd Scottish independence referendum.  
BRIEF HISTORY OF BREXITMar: Trigger A50Apr: Call general electionMay-Jun: Do nothingJul-Aug: Go on holidaySep: Beg for another 2 years 
Very interesting thread - crucial to get outside the UK news bubble on Brexit  
Racist Quisling Divide& Rule @HackneyAbbott reveals plan to frustrate Brexit after BBC host mocks Remainer demands  
British actor Colin Firth gets Italian citizenship after #Brexit vote  
Moody's has downgraded the UK's credit rating, citing concerns about public finances and the effect of Brexit  
'Free movement must END' @Jacob_Rees_Mogg hits out at extended deadline after @theresa_may 's Brexit speech  
Imagine the brass fucking plated-idiot-balls of calling Brexit a “shared challenge” to other nations. 
#UPDATE Prosecutor orders Mossos to be managed from the Home Affairs Ministry in Madrid amid referendum clampdown . 
Never seen as many people that have no fear of potentially driving country off the side of cliff via Brexit so scared of a language act 
Hard left always attack me when I criticise Corbyn for being a Brexiteer, but you can't be remotely left & a bedfellow of Murdoch on Brexit. 
‘An absolutely red line’ Jacob Rees-Mogg blasts Theresa May over 'ambiguous' ECJ position 
Could UK political landscape see a Gang of Four type mass defection from CONS LAB UKIP into new BREXIT Leave Party ? Timing is right NOW 
My cartoon Saturday @TheTimes. Nature Notes:Tuscan Wild Bore #FlorenceSpeech #Brexit  
Here is the heart of Brexit magical thinking. Imagining we can  "go back" when Britannia ruled the waves. Try telling China, India, Germany  
The Manchego Brexit  Delicious  
Tensions over Catalonia's upcoming independence referendum on Oct 1 are reaching boiling point as Spain declares it as 'illegal'.  
Are you EU remainers feeling more confident of no #Brexit after #florencespeech? @theresa_may RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
We are faced with near certainty that if #Brexit is pushed through it will be against the will of the majority. #StopBrexit 
By 2021, when May's proposed transition period ends, demographic change alone will have given #Remain a clear majority. #Brexit  
The reality of Brexit is sinking in. May has decided she cannot deliver it & the Brexiter backlash is already fading #KeepCalmAndRemoanOn 
"Brexit is seen on the continent as a baffling & rather sad act of self-mutilation which it's the unhappy job of UK government to inflict."  
And at every stage she has been cheered and clapped by those pretending Brexit easy not complex: the real saboteurs of Brexit. 
Good point. Transition period makes Brexit more dangerous, not less, as it becomes truly a leap in the dark.  
So Labour & Tories agree on soft transition to hard Brexit. Time for Labour to stop supporting Brexit.  
Labour gained seats because of pro-EU tactical voting – it’s time they respected their voters and opposed Brexit  
Read another once-sensible person touting 'need credible threat of walk away to make EU27 yield on Brexit' line again. Zombie argument. 1/2 
.@GerardBattenMEP The fight resumes: Mrs May has betrayed the Referendum decision  
@CarstenVolkery also calls @MichelBarnier the "EU Brexit Undertaker", which made me LOL:  But I'll continue. 17/ 
6/ Then, Parlt can make genuine choice between Mrs May's deal & status quo & call a referendum on 'deal v status quo' before bridges burnt. 
When the Irish got their referendum vote ''wrong'' the #EU made them vote again. The EU is Anti-Democracy. 
Catalan farmers with their tractors in Lleida to support the referendum and protest against the repression of the Spanish government!  
Tory Hard Brexiteers trussed, gagged & shafted by secret Tory remainers threatening leadership election & 2nd GeneralElection/Referendum 
4/ Parliament won't be able to make choice between post-Brexit regime and the status quo bec we will have left EU before we know final terms 
EXCL Former key adviser to Tony Blair says Brexit will not happen |  
Petition: Leave the EU immediately  19,555 Signatures to secure the #Brexit we voted for RETWEET 
IF it looks like a Duck and it walks like a Duck and it quacks like a Duck, it is a DUCK !!!#MoggMentum#Brexit  
Impact of Brexit will be more profound than expected, ex-Barclays boss Bob Diamond says  
IF we are still subject to the European Court of Justice we have not left the EU.#MoggMentum#Brexit  
The Game is up on Brexit, you list your majority , Most British People now want an exit from Brexit.Stop The Madness..@BBCBreaking 
Farage should put country first and work with AMW if elected to bring about a real BREXIT.....no time to waste 
UK's credit rating downgraded by Moody's.  I still haven't seen ONE good story about Brexit. Just ONE.  Someone?   
May Brexit speech: Like "leaving your wife of 40 yrs for Babestation presenter who once read out one of your texts"  
Brexit: Theresa May unveils plans for Britain to stay in single market five years after it voted Leave  
A UN person told me 'the UK has had a catastrophic loss of influence & respect internationally because of Brexit.' 
This is their evil and -yes- genocidal plan: the extinction of the European peoples.Wake up!VOTE #AFD#btw17#BREXITStop #merkel #cdu 
Theresa May (indeed UK) is an irrelevance to the rest of the world until we collectively come to our senses over Brexit. 
DE's @zeitonline didn't interpret is as a strong & stable Maybot: "May pleads for transition period after Brexit."  
Things may seem bad in Catalonia. But, Spain militarizing in response to planned referendum is the PERFECT scenario for independence. 
Britain's Conservatives are divided over whether Brexit is an opportunity to be seized or a bomb to be defused  
Spain to Send Extra Police to Try to Halt Catalan Referendum  
"We cannot move forward"French President Emmanuel Macron calls for greater clarity from Theresa May over Brexit  
British Prime Minister Theresa May offers Brexit details in landmark speech  
Wow. The things you learn from German papers on the #FlorenceSpeech. #brexit  
I agree with Paddy - Parliamentary mathematics mean Brexit won't happen #StopBrexit 
Symptomatic of broader British delusion: May described Brexit yesterday as a "shared challenge". That's just not how it's seen on continent. 
Britain's credit rating has just been downgraded due to Brexit uncertainty  
Brilliant by @KuperSimon: Brexit is Britain’s gift to the world via @FT 
Let's start a thread on how the European press is reporting Theresa May's Florence #Brexit speech. (If not just a newswire report). 1/ 
of this marvellous place. Looking at the scenery from the train window, nothing has changed. But of course Brexit has changed everything 3/ 
I am a Welsh European. I have far more in common with Europe than with some little Englander Brexit vision of Britannia ruling the waves. 
Long read >> Brexit: How we got here and why it must be stopped << Having to go the long way round to Edinburgh today (engineering work 1/ 
I've wrecked the UK Economy, Lost AAA Rating, caused Race Hatred, and now off to live in France ... #Brexit Morons  
'No deal is better than a bad deal' says Mrs May .... then opens the bidding with a bad deal  #Brexit 
Theresa May says Britain and Europe should come together as if in some sort of Union after Brexit 
Theresa May's Brexit negotiations.  
#Brexit will stop in two steps. Please read and share @Jon_Danzig’s editorial. Link:  
Tories and Labour both want to drag out the Hard Brexit agony until 2021. That's FIVE YEARS after the referendum! Stop the madness now! 
New post: The real obstacle for the Brexit negotiations  
Fifteen months wasted by Theresa playing to the rabid Tory gallery.  How long before public realise no such thing as a successful Brexit.  
Q. Why stage a referendum you know isn't legally binding? A. To keep a seat at the table. Renad on Monday's Kurdish referendum in Iraq  
Britons in EU tell May: 'Don't throw us under Brexit bus'  
Me too, I’m afraid. It’s like everyone that voted Remain no longer exists as far as govt are concerned. Brexit is for everyone  
The EU Was forced on the British people by successive governments on lies and deceit Britain Sovereignty will be restored by us the people 
A bride interrupted her OWN wedding ceremony in Leeds city centre to join an anti-Brexit protest outside Town Hall:  
The Kurdish referendum is due on September 25th. Why Mosul matters to both Iraqis and Kurds  
#BREAKING: Iraqi army’s chief of staff Othman al-Ghanmi in Turkey as #Kurdistan Region’s independence referendum is set to go ahead.  
Water cannons being sent to Catalonia ahead of referendum. Spanish state clearly intent on suppressing democracy in Catalonia.  
Bye! and as Brexit voters have often said to Remainers: don't let the door slam on your arse!   
Brexit is Britain’s gift to the world: The UK is now experimenting on itself for the benefit of humanity  
I was on Sarah McInerney's show on Newstalk this morning talking about the committee and barriers to a referendum   
Le Pen abandons Frexit, Greeks turn against Grexit. No one seems to want to copy Brexit...  
32 years of perfect UK credit ratingTories impose Austerity & facilitate BrexitAll 3 credit agencies demote UK to 3rd level#ToriesOut 
@AMDWaters Irish voters were ignored, Greek voters were ignored & now UK Brexit voters are ignored, this is not democracy it is betrayal 
Forget Uber, this is the petition for today: The Government must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  
It's shameful they called a referendum without even the beginnings of a plan of what a no vote would mean. Unforgivable.  
Post brexit Britain. Our currency is now home made jam. Blue passports are fired out of Big Ben.  The country is in ruins. Europe laughs. 
I plough my own furrow now, but any party or individual genuinely committed to BREXIT can rely on me .  
Over 4 decades the Tories have done more than anyone else to entrench us in the EU cesspit. Naive to think they would deliver Brexit. 
The brexit fundamentalists are destroying our economy. We need to take back control.  
#Brexit We need strong politicians more the ever!!! To sort out Brexit. Who have we got Thersa May, Jeremy Corbyn, Vince Cable! Hopeless   
1. Do not be fooled by these headlines...#Brexit is not paused..we'll still be leaving the EU in Mar 2019 unless it's stopped in 12mths.  
"... because of Brexit"Angela you forgot to mention exactly *why* the Tories are ruining usPossibly because Labour would be doing the same  
We wanted Brexit. We voted for Brexit. We won the vote. We are being forced to Remain by a traitorous political cabal at Westminster. 
One Brexit "triumph" is Blue PassportsIt will be objectively less valuable but hey, all that matters is colour, nationality & token victory  
Brits in EU wrote to Theresa May last night  pleading with her not to throw them "under Brexit bus". Not happy." 
The core voters who support Brexit have been abandoned, says JACOB REES-MOGG  
Has Theresa May made enemies of both #euremainer & #Brexiteers after her #FlorenceSpeech, and 15 months since the EU referendum?RT+VOTE 
UK never been comfortable in the EU? Two thirds voted to stay in the 1975 referendum. #TheresaMay #FlorenceSpeech 
Emmanuel Macron says that before Brexit negotiations can move forward "the question of Ireland" must be clarified 
It's impossible for her to offer anything else, you simply can't polish the turd that is Brexit. 
Listen, if you are a conservative and you voted for Brexit, you cannot support Theresa May's "Conservatives". Resign. 
ICYMI"What if the will of the people is now for a second referendum on #Brexit?"asks @karanbilimoria 
Fintan O’Toole:  Brexit, binaries and break-up speeches   via @IrishTimesOpEd 
RT UKIPcorruption: Majority of British people believe UK should stay in the EU, finds latest poll#Brexit #StopB… 
Paper Review: If you read only one article after PM's Brexit speech and Moodys downgraded UK debt, read this:  
'Low tax, low regulation economy' versus civilised society. It's the next big Brexit-flavoured ideological battle. What a time to be alive!  
#Brexit "visitors sold expensive tickets to magical wonderland& turn up to find muddy car park with brawling elves" 
#Referendum The commission calls on kurdistani diaspora to vote via  online polls opens today through Monday sept25th 
After remainer May #FlorenceSpeech 15 months since the EU referendum, should May stand down as PM after not delivering #Brexit?RT+VOTE 
May has betrayed the Referendum, and revealed the final outcome - to leave the EU in name, but not in reality. Fight back: join UKIP. Rebel. 
Ken Clarke spots that May's Florence speech is similar to her pre-referendum Remain speech, Brakes on Brexit now until 2nd thoughts rule. 
Right! This Remain voting baby boomer is 60 today. For my birthday sign to see the Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments.  
Complete lunacy! : May agrees £40bn bill for Brexit 
An equinoctial gift. On the day after the Brexit camp split asunder, I give you Trump/Russia/Brexit in one tweet.  
All of Theresa May's hopes and aspirations for Brexit sound remarkably like the EU. #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut #StopBrexitNow 
Scotland! Vote No to protect your Triple A credit rating! #indyref #brexit 
Photo taken at 2.40pm, yesterday! #EU #Brexit  
These r wise words I knew intuitively but hadn't yet articulated. EU sees Brexit as selfish&destructive act so hard for it to co-own process  
The problem: #brexit needs a clear plan to avoid disaster but May’s entire career has been built on not being clear  
."Nothing has changedBrexit remains as ill thought out & self-harming as everThe EU is as unimpressed as ever". 
Guys, we can all stop worrying about post-Brexit unskilled labour shortages...  
Macron outlines three key conditions for Brexit:1. Get real.2. Pay up.3. Piss off. 
Bloody hell, this is good: May’s breakup speech made Brexit sound magical … if you’re drinking Bacardi | Marina Hyde  
"The UK has never felt at home in the EU." Speak for yourself and your deranged jailers, you desiccated mediocrity. #Florencespeech #Brexit 
BrexitEU left in no doubt that Britain will stand strong ...  
If I'd been PM, I'd have had us out of the EU by 9 a.m. on the day after the Referendum.#StopPoncingAboutAndGetUsOut 
Our present position inside the EU is far better than anything Theresa May can negotiate...that's the only fact that matters #Brexit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg MP - "It has not been made clear whether in this implementation period we will still be subject to the ECJ." #Brexit  
Remainers in general seem way too upset about Brexit to be funny about it - but @MarinaHyde is a glorious exception: 
The harsh reality, we have a Brexit government and an opposition led by a life long Brexiteer-The fight back starts in Brighton this weekend 
Friends! Great!The poll also shows that Ed Miliband became PM in 2015, Remain won last year's Referendum, & Hillary won the US Presidency.  
By @MarinaHyde in @guardian | Santa's dead: May's Brexit is a swindler's Christmas grotto  
MEP @JordiSoleF reports @OriolFG to be interrogated for allegedly reproducing international #referendum websiteStop attacking #CivilRights! 
UK's credit rating downgraded as a result of Brexit.May's Govt will largely ignore it as Moody's are experts! 
"We never felt at home in the European Union." #Brexit #WeWe 
Theresa May is a political coward, like whole US Congress.Rather than chastising Trump, she should be emulating him.Get Brexit done. 
Have a referendum on the deal. Let parliament decide. Respect Scotland. Respect young citizens.    Honor human rights. 
Very fine from @MarinaHyde: especially calling Boris Johnson "Brexit's Special One."   
Markets went into freefall as Theresa May began Brexit  doesn't trust, neither does US, EU, UK & ROW. #BrexitShambles 
We want to sign global trade deals in 2019.  Brexit for the many, not a never-ending transition for the few.  
Treeza needs to unblock Brexit talks by using a retail marketing offer.B.O.G.O.F.  
Our Prime Minister, and how she does things.#florence #florencespeech #Brexit #StopBrexitHour #MayDUP #StopBrexit #TheresaMay #Remain #4EU 
Theresa May accused of betraying 17 million Brexit voters with two year EU 'transition' plan  
My bit on Theresa May's Brexit speech  
Moody's downgrade UK to lowest ever credit rating due to "Brexit challenges". Brexit means...higher debt payments. 
By the way, Pete, having campaigned for Brexit, is now angry Brexit being delivered is too hard not too soft, & projects blame outwards 
Moody's downgrades UK's rating on Brexit and growth fears  
Spanish fascism acts impunity against Catalans who want to vote in a referendum.Please help us. Help Catalonia!  
Meet Pete.He's angry with the direction of Brexit.He blames journalists who shd now be deprived of oxygen.He campaigned for Brexit.  
A merry Brexit, one and all!  
Here's @MarinaHyde on Brexit. You'll laugh. You'll cry. You'll go to the Irish Embassy and demand a passport. 
Barzani on the Kurdish referendum: 'We refuse to be subordinates' | World news | The Guardian  
UK's credit rating downgraded by Moody's. More proof that Brexit damages Britain. We have to abandon this folly!  
Brexit: Even the DUP leader says “The wishes expressed in the referendum should be delivered without undue delay.”  
#Moodys predict a 'further loss of economic strength' & downgrade to AA2 -lowest ever credit rating for UK - citing "Brexit challenges"  
With @AMDWaters As leader of UKIP all those who swung to labour will come back this'll be a second brexit vote with the Islam threat on top 
129 city/town mayors from Northern Catalonia (on French side of Pyrenees) and Occitania offer full support for holding referendum.  
Moody's: weakening U.K. Growth during a period in which "policymakers distracted" by twin challenge of legislating Brexit & negotiations  
Brexit means...no Brexit until 2021  which is handily when this parliament in theory ends 
Great column by Matthew Parris in the Times on TMay’s Florence speech. Brexit has a slow puncture 
Fresh hell -#florencespeech #Brexit #ToriesOut 
Macron says UK needs to clarify its position on three main Brexit issues before resuming talks  #StopBrexit 
UK lost its remaining AAA rating (S&P) 4 days after Brexit vote - but this is the first ever time a major rather has cut us to third rank 
Hours after PM speech Moodys downgrade UK debt to AA2 lowest ever credit rating for UK - citing "Brexit challenges"  
Yesterday Qassemi Soleimani spent the whole day in Erbil, met w/ PUK & KDP. PUK may call Barzani to postpone referendum today. Not clear yet 
Brexit: UK needs to clarify issues - Macron  
UK credit rating downgraded due to Brexit uncertainty>for heavens sake let's stop Brexit before it's too late   
Car with Israeli & Kurdish flags in support of Kurdistan independence referendum. Israel supports independence ref  
May pauses Brexit, fuelled by Boris optimism. £40bln divorce bill cited. Farage furious. Seen the future & it works? This one will run & run  
British Prime Minister Theresa May proposes a transition period of "around two years" after Brexit  
A Kurdish Canadian family in today’s pro-Kurdistan independence referendum in Calgary, Canada #KurdistanReferendum 
Kurdish referendum to 'go ahead' despite opposition by the Iraqi government and international powers  
See/hear  our conversation. After Brexit: Reimagining Sovereignty. Gisela Stuart in conversation wit...  
The French MP for French citizens in UK was at yday's @bigtentideas. We shd have MPs for UK citizens abroad. Might have helped avoid Brexit 
Unemployment falls, optimism rises in the EU a year after Brexit vote  
....and a betrayal of our country and of 17m+ Brexit voters.  
Actually, Europe isn't "doing alright" ex. Greece, Brexit. Also, many Erupoean countries have significantly less people than many US states 
Unsurprisingly Barnier pleased with May’s ‘constructive’ Brexit speech. May's own goal on negotiation tactics ideal.  
From the Kurdish social media world: 'Kurdistan referendum and Turkey, Iran & Syria' #KurdistanReferendum 
I salute UK guys who voted for #Brexit knowing very well they will suffer loss of jobs & economy will go down. Are we true Lovers of india ? 
An observation: Initial disunity among #Kurds about Referendum has changed in Barzani's favor due to severe reactions by US/Iran/Iraq/Turkey 
Moody’s Downgrades UK on Brexit Concerns Despite PM May’s Speech  
Theresa May told the world she was giving a major #Brexit speech. The result was 'underwhelming'  
I am jealous seeing many #Kurdistan-i diaspora cast their vote in the independence referendum!Can't wait for Sep 25 to say #YesKurdistan 
UK Government debt downgraded again by Moody's following #Brexit turmoil. AAA credit rating is on the way out  
If Anna Soubry likes the speech you know Brexit is in trouble. 
WELL WELLThe Regional Government of Sardinia offers itself to the Catalonia's Government to print and stock the referendum ballot papers 
.@ajcdeane is spot on #skypapers: It's a pragmatic and sensible approach by Theresa May to deliver an orderly #Brexit. #FlorenceSpeech 
#Turkey calls on #Iraqi Kurds to drop referendum or face sanctions 
We in Bristol are quite happy in the EU thank you very much. Voted remain and kicked out the Brexit Tory. 
Putting a remainer in charge of #Brexit is like putting a fox in charge of the henhouse. @theresa_may @Nigel_Farage 
My interview with @FoxNews on #Kurdishreferendum independence? Kurds to vote on landmark referendum  
It would help if Brits understood that in today's Europe they are nothing special so require no special relationship or deal#brexit  
#UK : May is accused of betraying referendum by keeping Britain IN Europe until 2021 | This Is England  #fo2eu  
Not interested in your & the Tory's transitional arrangements. Time to call time on Brexit. 
Nigel Farage was spot on and she keeps fcuking up.#TheresaMay cannot be #Brexit PM!#FollowFarage#florencespeechpic.twitter.com/H2Qz7tiToU 
17.4 million people have just been sold down the river by Mrs. May We shouldn't except thisRise up and show our anger#Brexit 
Moody's is not invested in Brexit and is thus free to shout truth that for most UK media dare not speak its name: Brexit will make us poorer  
A Brexit Coaltiion of Jacob Rees-Mogg, Nigel Farage, David Davis, BoJo et al plus 17.4m ppl would be coffin nails to the quisling Remaniacs.  
Farage needs to come back into politics before May finds a way to turn brexit over completely.  We did not vote for any of this shite 
#BREXIT #HARDBREXIT I want to be British  , proud of my country and my flag. #LEAVEEU #LEAVE #MAGA SO #TRUMP CAN MAKE A DEAL!! 
A belated thought about the Brexit transition period: logically the EU Charter of Rights should still apply to the UK throughout? 
NY must vote NO 11/7/17 Referendum on Election Day will ask for Constitutional Convention to rewrite constitution. We have too much to lose!  
Today? Room seemed to encapsulate shallow ugliness of Brexit, while delivery in Florence, to nobody in particular, its bizarre pointlessness 
May’s breakup speech made Brexit sound magical … if you’re drinking Bacardi  
Moody’s downgrades U.K. credit rating on day of May speech. Time for all waverers to cry out that Brexit means a (still avoidable) disaster 
We should thank you Sir. Save your country and let's hope #Brexit will bring this Orwellian project down & set us all free. #FollowFarage 
Britain's credit rating has just been downgraded due to Brexit uncertainty  
Unfortunately Moody's didn't buy the story about 'Brexit boost' and 'soaring economy'. Credit rating downgraded  
Second downgrade since Brexit vote.Every one of these costs us billions.That's money that could be spent on the NHS.Brexit costs.A lot!  
May's Brexit speech in brief: please can we have an extra two years to work out how the UK averts disaster? 
I strongly support holding the Kurdish referendum; it’s time for the Kurdish people in Iraq to give a voice to their aspirations. 
With his support for the Kurds’ independence referendum, Netanyahu put Israel at odds with most of the Middle East.  
Theresa May asks EU for two-year Brexit transition period - and does it while dialling dullness to eleven   
I took her at her word - Brexit means Brexit. But today my support ends. Need a change of leader & the sobs that agreed today's failure 
Brexit is basically Changing Rooms. Your home gets hideously "improved" by wide-eyed TV personalities who mess up everything, then walk off. 
#Brexit is the tale of how an clique of the rich elite have ruthlessly whipped up fears about immigration to slash their tax burden.#Remain 
Brexit Update!  
'Theresa May wants the BEST for UK' Quisling @Anna_Soubry welcomes 'sensible' PM Brexit speech   
Moody’s knocks UK’s rating down again, from Aa1 to Aa2, over Brexit and state of public finances  
But the UK can never be "ready" for Brexit, because Brexit is insane.  
Brexit: Theresa May's plan for EU migrant registry shot down by Guy Verhofstadt. #BrexitShambles 
Macron REJECTS May's Brexit speech: 'UK must fix THESE issues before we move on'   
Oops ...Following May's Brexit speech Moody's has downgraded the UK's credit rating yet again! What a #BrexitShambles 
So this is Labour's Brexit policy: siding with a foreign government against Britain  via @telegraphnews 
UK credit rating downgraded due to #Brexit  uncertainty following May's speech Good job May.....NOT  
Macron: UK needs to clarify its position on three main #Brexit issues before resuming talks.Oops......  
Russian bots supporting Trump, Brexit, French and German far-right, now support Catalonia's forbidden referendum 
Fact: If Brexit had required the thresholds and 2/3rds majority demanded by most democracies for constitutional change we'd be staying in EU 
#Brexit: U realise this is never going 2 happen? U have a Remainer as leader all she has done is given £20B 2 #EU & everything stays same! 
BREAKING: Moody's has downgraded the UK's long-term issuer rating to Aa2 from Aa1 amid Brexit uncertainty.  
Britain's credit rating has just been downgraded due to Brexit uncertainty  
Ratings agency Moody's has downgraded Britain's credit rating because of economic uncertainty over Brexit 
Moody’s: “no longer confident UK govt will secure replacement free trade agreement w/ EU which mitigates negative economic impact of Brexit”  
Moody's rightly say services trade particularly badly hit by Brexit & a basic FTA  
Moody's Investors Service says it has downgraded the UK's credit rating because of economic uncertainty surrounding Brexit 
Saturday's Telegraph: "Brexit delayed to 2021"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
Spain sends more police to block Catalonia referendum  
Slowly but very surely becoming the trash of Europe. What a disaster Brexit is for the British people  
Saturday's Guardian: "May calls for a two-year Brexit pause"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
BREAKING: Turkish government says Iraqi Kurdish independence referendum is a 'direct threat' to Turkey 
V worth reading. Public exhaustion of austerity + permanent cut to growth from Brexit + weak government.  
Spain sends more police to block Catalonia referendum in one of its biggest crackdowns since Franco   
Turkey warns of "serious consequences" of upcoming Iraqi Kurdish independence referendum  
Brexit negotiator says Theresa May's plan for EU citizens is 'out of the question'  
This aspect is the most unbelievable, 'the British people' didn't vote for Brexit. Brexit vote does not, and never will, represent my vote.  
.Brexit Britain going down the tubes, OFFICIALLY"Moody’s cut UK's credit rating for 1st time in more than 4yrs". 
Saturday's Times: "May agrees £40bn bill for Brexit"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
U.K. credit rating cut to Aa2 by Moody's  
Supporter of the Catalan referendum attacked by ultra right protesters in Barcelona. No violence and no oppression! 
So here’s how this plays out, the Brexit business:Negotiations collapse due to UK incompetence. May says “I made an offer”. Tick tock out. 
Weekend i: "No real Brexit until 2021"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
I think we should start calling the Brexit "implementation period" when nothing changes the "non-implementation period". #longgrass 
Labour's Brexit policy is siding with a foreign government against Britain says @MrTCHarris 
Disgrace? Yes! Surprise? No! #Brexit means Brexit ...NOT in May's case.  
NEW: Told that while Brexit means we will be leaving the Common Agricultural Policy & CFP, appears this will follow the implementation phase 
#bbcnews #Newsnight#TheresaMay produces flamboyant smokescreen in #FlorenceSpeech avoiding many key #brexit issues 
Peter Brookes on Theresa May's speech in Florence on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
If the PM met every Brexit voter for 10 seconds in her working hours, it would take 28 years and 9 months.Most would say, 'no transition'. 
Almost 10,000 EU health workers have quit NHS since Brexit vote | Society | The Guardian   
Moody's downgrades UK's rating to Aa2 from Aa1, changes outlook to stable citing complex #Brexit negotiations.  
The Guardian front page, Saturday 23.09.17: May calls for a two-year Brexit pause  
Catalonia referendum is ‘ticking bomb’ that could destroy EU  
I ask again. Does the SNP support the illegal referendum in Catalonia? Surely there is someone who understands why that is important. 
The Brexit delay only creates more uncertainty. When politicians kick the can down the road, it only means one thing. They are clueless! 
Brexit delayed to 2021 - the front page of The Daily @Telegraph tomorrow #tomorrowspaperstoday 
"May demanded 'creative' solution, pointed out problem then ran away from it...still no progress on what post-Brexit Britain will look like"  
UK downgraded by Moody’s amid Brexit pressures  
Spain: Rallies with fascist flags and symbols --> legal. Rallies asking a referendum --> illegal (and organizers charged for treason). 
I was told tonight I should back Brexit because Peroni is "foreign crap" and "Tennent's is better". That's Tennents, produced in Prague! 
Photos from Erbil show Kurdish Peshmerga holding the flag of #Israel three days ahead of the historic referendum.  
I can see why you would be confused here. #Brexit was meant to mean Brexit.  
The British prime minister aimed to reinvigorate Brexit talks by adopting a softer tone in Florence today  
Ken Clarke has suggested that Theresa May's Brexit transition period could be "quite a bit longer" than two years.  
Fundamental problem with May's speech: wants Brexit to be a shared UK-EU responsibility, when EU (rightly) see it as UK's decision & mess 
Saturday's TIMES: "May agrees £40bn bill for Brexit" #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Brexit Negotiations: Great Britain Should Walk Away Now, Here's Why 
Theresa May has 'kicked Brexit into the long grass' and 'stuck two fingers up to Brexiteers', says Nigel Farage.  
Hard Brexit, soft Brexit , single market or not,  our main priority is to kick the greedy Tories out of power . 
Marina on fire - May’s breakup speech made Brexit sound magical … if you’re drinking Bacardi | Marina Hyde  
Florence speech: May kicks the Brexit can two years down the road  via @politics_co_uk 
You're only going to Alabama cuz you know this election is a referendum on your pathetic presidency.You lose & you're toast.#TrumpRussia 
Acting on a government petition, Spain's constitutional court has suspended Catalonia's referendum law  
Thousands in Erbil held enormous rally in support of #Kurdistan referendum in the last day of referendum campaign. 
Removing music lessons from schools, Uber 40,000+ jobs at risk, brexit???!!!!! The UK needs a reset button  
Re Brexit. Given May's betrayal we MUST become the resistance. 17.4m people will not be muted. 
Lot of anger about #BrexitBetrayalTory MPs need to listenThey need to remove the PM & elect a #LEAVE PM who will deliver an early #Brexit 
Do you support the @Conservatives to deliver #Brexit by 2021? #florencespeech @theresa_may RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
That's that then. Politicians have closed ranks, Brexit kicked firmly into the long grass. May as well start tweeting pictures of cats. 
.@rustyrockets on Brexit, the last election, and @jeremycorbyn 
Tory MPS could dump the PM& they shouldShe's betrayed us & failed to deliver #BrexitWe need a #LEAVE PM who will deliver an early Brexit.  
If you vote 'Ruth Davidson opposes a second referendum' you get, well, this...   
The great Brexit betrayal continues: Theresa May in her naivety has sold the British people out to Brussels   
Immigrants are not the problem, they are the scapegoats chosen to distract from those really responsible.#Brexit #florencespeech #Remain 
And this, THIS, is the best we've got #ffs #brexit #border #NI 
When @Keir_Starmer are you going to say what you actually believe? that Brexit is mistake & as @vincecable says we need to #exitfrombrexit 
It has taken a long time for the Government to recognise the absolute necessity of Brexit transitional arrangements. 
Two large glasses of Chateauneuf du Pape later and Brexit is no closer to not being a bag of shite than it ever was. 
Brexit is so unworkable and inextricable that it's just going to be delayed until the will is there to reverse it - thankfully. 
"Santa's ****ing dead"No one will ever top this metaphor for Brexit fantasies by @MarinaHyde :  
Tory, UKIP and DUP MEPs voted against EU measures to clamp down on tax avoidance #florencespeech #Brexit #Remain 
Pointless. Delay is just more uncertainty, muddle & damage. Brand UK already catastrophically trashed. Let's stop Brexit now.  
Like an embarrassing incident on a drunken night out, let's pretend that the EU referendum didn't happen. Just blame it on a dodgy kebab. 
Theresa May's husband is an executive in a firm which makes money from from tax avoidance. #Brexit #florencespeech #StopBrexit 
Have core Brexit voters who lent their votes to support Conservatives been abandoned? 
I don't remember seeing anything about bunging the EU €20billion on my Referendum ballot paper.I put my X next to "Kick Mad Merkel's Aris".  
What frustrates me more than anything is the idea that 17.4m voted in uniform for the same thing. Brexit means diff things to diff people. 
After @Theresa_May's #FlorenceSpeech, and 15 months since the EU referendum, how satisfied were you with her proposal to the EU?RT+VOTE 
I felt much more at home in the EU than in the 'Hate Britain' that has been created since the referendum. #exitfrombrexit 
108k signatures! Lets keep the petition for a final deal referendum & real #Brexit democracy rolling. #StopBrexit 
May is accused of BETRAYING EU referendum with new climb down. Demonstrates how Not to negotiate!  via @MailOnline 
UK hasn't a clue on Brexit, it will contravene GFA in Ireland, ride roughshod straight over the will of Scotland & decimate the economy.... 
Applause on @BBCAnyQuestions for news that poll shows majority of the population reject #Brexit. 
After @Theresa_May's #FlorenceSpeech 15 months since EU referendum, are you happy with speech & proposal to stay in EU another 2yrs?RT+VOTE 
Theresa May and The Brexit Gang prepare to leave Florence.#CarryOnShambles 
The EU is so over its "Bridget Jones" blues over Brexit  
Dave Brown on Theresa May's speech in Florence on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
In-depth analysis of recent Catalan independence struggle + possible scenarios (don't agree on all but interesting!) #referendum #Catalonia 
Which artist best sums up T. May's Brexit speech today:Florence And The MachineVia Survation  (22 September) 
No one believed brexit would happen!17.5 million people said NO MORE WE WANT OUT!Time for the same 17.5 million people to say again"MAY OUT"  
May needs to be genuinely ready to walk away in order to ensure the best Brexit deal possible - Rob Wilson #premium 
If Brexiteers bow to democracy as much as they claim, why are they all against a second referendum once we know the terms of Brexit? #bbcaq 
Theresa May's #florencespeech was essentially her saying 'nothing has changed' since her Brexit speech in January:  
This is the most fair view about the Iraqi Kurdish referendum I have read in a western media so far.   
"Lexi, there's something I need to tell you..... I voted Leave." #thearchers #Brexit  
#BREAKING We need clarity on Ireland, EU citizens and Brexit financial terms - France's Macron  
And that's just a starting position!As public swing in favour of staying in EU, Govt will end up seeking a referendum & an #ExitFromBrexit 
Quintessential English actor Colin Firth fast tracked to Italian citizenship. He applied after Brexit. Got it today. Normally takes 2-yrs 
May’s Brexit speech long on aspiration but short on solutions  
It's now obvious that only one party wants the #Brexit we voted for#VoteUKIP to show the other parties that we won't be betrayed@AMDWaters 
Well said! I've always felt European. You don't speak for me @theresa_may #brexit #florencespeech We can be British & European! 
Kurdistan's independence referendum holds "very high risks which the US can't control"-Brett McGurk. By @Joyce_Karam 
Summary1)UK will be transitional member of EU for 2 yrs post 20192)But no policy voteStuffed Sense says cancel #Brexit 
Macron says UK needs to clarify its position on three main Brexit issues before resuming talks  
Here's what the EU thought of Theresa May's Brexit speech  
May proposes Hard Brexit & @BBC go bonkers. May offers Soft Brexit & @BBC go bonkers See the problem? #florencespeech 
May not to be trusted ! We aren't out until we are out ! May is keeping us in. Get us #BREXIT  
Theresa May has backtracked on Brexit. Time for a new Tory leader!  
I second that and after today's pathetic collapse of Brexit I'm sure 17.4 million would agree with me  
The Guardian view on the Kurdish referendum: a fair question | Editorial | Opinion | The Guardian  
UKIP IS THE ONLY BREXIT PARTY  
Quite. Brexit will never last four more years. Let's put it out of its misery now. #ExitBrexit 
French President says Brexit talks cannot continue if the UK doesn't clarify settlement of EU citizens, financial terms and the Irish border 
Can we just do a Brexit from Brexit? 
Have cabinet Brexiteers backed May's Brexit vision coz they assume it will flop & we're heading for no-deal exit?  
No Theresa May, you are lying. 37% of a rigged electorate in an advisory referendum is not a decision of the British people#florencespeech 
Disagree with May saying UK's never felt at home in EU? If so pls sign/RT: Hold referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Absolutely right. And let's not forget, as he grandstands tonight, that Corbyn wanted to do it the morning after the referendum.  
Brexit means Exit.May thinks it means Remain.She must go.  
Lots of people criticising Theresa May's speech regarding Brexit. Could be worse, she could have threatened to "destroy" a country. 
Never mind the bus."Brexit talks will be quick, easy and the EU will immediately cave" is the fib with the biggest karma.  
#florencespeech Well, Remainers aren't happy. Nor are most Leavers, UK ministers, UK opposition, the EU, God, my dog...Brexit! Thanks Dave 
Personally I feel perfectly at home in the EU. Brexit Tory Britain? Not so much.  
Watch the craven cowards in the Cabinet rally around #MaySpeech - knowing it IS a betrayal of Brexit. Despicable. 
US Envoy @brett_mcgurk warns Kurds of "Consequences out of US Control" if they do Referendum. #Iraq #Turkey 
May's Brexit speech is a recognition she can't square the promises of Boris and Leave campaigners with reality:  
A 21-years-old boy arrested for cloning the referendum website. Please, @JulianAssange, read this! 
Britain must stick to all rules during transition, EU's chief Brexit negotiator says  
There is no #brexit and never was as Treason May does what she does best err Treason. Brit military already locked into EU mil unification  
Labour now endorse Tories on #Brexit. @Plaid_Cymru wants to keep Wales in Single Market not just delay the pain 
In all fairness I have no idea what Labour's stance on Brexit is-and I'm a party member. 
Brexit coordinator @GuyVerhofstadt has said TM's plan for a EU migrant registration scheme is "out of question". 
After @Theresa_May's #FlorenceSpeech, and 15 months since the EU referendum, the Tories are still no clearer about their plan for Brexit.  
I'm tired of being spoken for by a PM I don't support, by a party I will never vote for, on a #brexit I will never support #florencespeech 
#Breaking: First e-vote cast in China in Kurdistan's independence referendum: GM of electoral commission Karwan Jalal #KurdistanVotes 
The story which James O'Brien concluded was "Brexit in a nutshell"  
Kurdish independence referendum: a case that deserves to be heard.The Guardian view#Kurdistan 
The long relationship between Kurds and Jews that led Israel to endorse the Kurdish referendum. @halbfinger 
Bob Moran on Theresa May's speech in Florence on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
EU celebrates Theresa May's betrayal of Brexit. 
"Theresa May" Start packing your bags, you will not insult the Brexit vote & stay in power. 
Bit rich for Corbyn to complain that May doesn't know what Brexit she wants. He doesn't either. 
What the F**k did we actually have a referendum forMay is a lame excuse of a PM 
Anyone have any idea's how to motivate 17 million people to march on parliament and get our #Brexit sorted ?@Nigel_Farage 
Theresa May tried to calm fears about Brexit chaos with her latest speech, but it didn’t exactly go to plan  
How about we just say we'll do Brexit whenever we finally expand Heathrow  
There were only two choices on the ballot paper last year. There was no #Transition choice. #Article50 #Brexit #florencespeech #TheresaMay 
Spain in crisis: All Catalan officials arrested over referendum are #1Oct 
Brexit through the medium of dance...  
Many things about #Brexit make me incandescently angry, but May’s line about not being at home in the EU really takes the biscuit. 
After today's #Brexit betrayal by @theresa_may should she IMMEDIATELY RESIGN as Prime Minister pls vote & RT for big sample 
2/2 but a damaging hard Brexit still looms unless common sense prevails and single market membership becomes the long term aim. 
Senior Brexiter: "Paul the Octupus is a better predictor of what's going on with Brexit than Osborne's deranged foam flecked editorials"  
1/2 PM has tried to kick the Brexit can a couple of years down road - proving that UKG still has no real idea what it is seeking to achieve 
Simon Coveney: Theresa May's speech does not give the answers needed to allow the Brexit process to move on to phase two of the negotiations  
Good point sunshine!We need to run the referendum againSo folk know what they are actually voting forGive it an RT if you agree  
Tory MPs brayed that Labour's requests for transitional arrangements were tantamount to 'blocking brexit'...now it's Tory policy. 
Jeremy Corbyn says he wants powers from Brussels devolved to Scotland following Brexit  
Spain sends more police to block Catalonia referendum  
."Every day of impasse in the Brexit talks is another day when global capital drifts elsewhere.". 
Theresa May says "The UK's never felt totally at home in the EU". A nationalist treating people as a herd.#florencespeech #Brexit 
The great Brexit betrayal continues: May in her naivety has sold the British people out to Brussels.         
Brexit negotiator says Theresa May's plan for EU citizens is 'out of the question'  
Well, herein lies the problem: your “answer” is just as wrong. Both Tories & Lab support Brexit, an extended cliff-edge won’t make it better  
No to any Brexit..Yes to Remain!! 
‘Aggressive EU negotiators want to damage UK’ over Brexit fumes  Arlene Foster @DUPleader  @theresa_may 
Westminster has been accused of “building a post-Brexit economy over the bodies of dead children”. #Brexit 
The United Kingdom Has been sold out 
Nigel Farage said Theresa May's Florence speech was "a huge two fingers up to 17.4m people who voted Brexit"  
Hammond : “...this gives business & our EU partners clarity”. Err..what about the 17.4m who voted for Brexit? Where’s the  clarity for them? 
My bit on May's Brexit speech   
In case you hadn't worked it out, the UK's sick and disabled will end up paying the price of the £18bn #Brexit bill.#florencespeech 
PM has failed to deliver on #BrexitTory MPs need to dump her & get a PM who will take us OUT & none of this transitional period nonsense. 
If you're just getting in from work & want to know the Brexit latest; nothing's really changed but we did ask for an essay extension 
Has Theresa May's #florencespeech changed your mind about Brexit? Please retweet for a wider sample. 
Now Theresa May sets UK to 2 sets of negotiations.1 #Brexit 2 More time to #Brexit (if EU will allow) So why did she trigger Article50? 
Catalan president: ‘We have contingency plans to guarantee the referendum'  
Meet the Scots Tory MPs part 53. Voting on Brexit was just too hard. She then voted for a Brexit Scots power grab.  
Sam Leith: Theresa May offered 45 minutes of repetitive and platitudinous abstraction in her Brexit speech  
It took British electorate just one day to decide on Brexit. @theresa_may needs 4 years to act. Please resign now. Unfit for the job. PM  
Neither Tories nor Labour have a consensus within their own parties on what Brexit looks like. Both asking for transition but then what? 
More interested in the contents of a sick bag than the Government's own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments? No? Sign!  
Time now for Labour to at least offer voters the option to Remain. Brexit is quite simply not deliverable & will do untold damage #NoMandate 
Am I the only one feeling positive about Theresa May's speech?After that pile of crap, she, Tories & Brexit are finished #florencespeech 
Sue Wilson, Bremain in Spain:May said UK never felt at home in EU. Many of us feel prouder being European than British, thanks to Brexit. 
Irish govt says speech has not unlocked next phase of Brexit talks. "Still many outstanding issues and a lot of work is still required." 
Creative solution to Brexit: give Brexiteers blue passports & their own long queues at airports. The rest of us carry on as usual. 
#StillInEUStill very firmly in the EU.Next, U-turn Brexit for good. 
Stop Brexit, you pathetic shower of cowardly sycophants. Ashamed I ever voted for you. 
Brexit is delayed until 2021 as Theresa May commits the UK to two year transition period in her Florence speech today  
At least EU Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier liked May's speech...   
Irish PM says May speech insufficient to begin next phase of Brexit talks  
Dear Mrs May, stop saying #brexit is about control our borders. We've control already but @ukhomeoffice choose not to use it #florencespeech 
KPMG's Head of #Brexit @KarenBriggsUK urges business not to take its foot off the gas after #florencespeech:  
We have a weak woman doing Brexit. We need a strong male forces type. Solution- clone Henry VIII, send him to Brussels #florencespeech 
It was all about managing divisions in her party.Brexit is nothing but collateral damage in an endless Tory civil war  #florencespeech 
Big reveal from May's Florence speech is she's still negotiating with warring Cabinet. Brexit is a disaster  
Odd that 'clean Brexit' folk are celebrating May ruling out Norway - she already ruled out after becoming PM, at conference and again in LH 
On the plus side: four more years to determine what Brexit means.On the down side: four more years debating what Brexit means. 
Theresa May is doing the job that anti-Brexit Tory MPs made her PM to do:  Engineering the total betrayal of Brexit. 
The great Brexit betrayal continues: Theresa May in her naivety has sold the British people out to Brussels 
Why are surprised that #Brexit is being betrayed? The clues were there...  
Sovereignty is owned by the people Not by the elected government We voted Brexit So get on with it Otherwise we will elect someone that will 
Spain sends enforcers to stop Catalan referendum as police unity frays  
BloggedA Renaissance of the Brexit talks?Analysis of Theresa May's Florence speech:  
.Does it count as #Brexodus if they decide NOT to come to UK because of Brexit?#NoBrEntry perhaps?#BrAvoidance?. 
I didBollocks to Brexit @albawhitewolf @No10Vigil @spaceangel1964 @BrexitBin @SarahLudford @EUflagmafia @nickreeves9876 @RemainerAction 
Some older Leavers don't understand that the money they paid on NI & taxes has all been spent. There is no govt pension piggy-bank.#Brexit 
So @theresa_may When you said 'Brexit means Brexit' what you really meant was 'Brexit means Remain'. Right? #LeaveMeansLeave 
The way May speaks, it's as if she isn't actually aware that so many companies are leaving Britain for other shores DUE TO Brexit. But how? 
Labour is proposing a transitional period followed by a hard Brexit. Any chance of an actual opposition to the Tories? That would be nice.  
15 months on from the referendum & the PM now faces the reality she'll have to look for a transition period.. Ugh!  
As a Brit, I feel I need to categorically state I didn't vote for Theresa May or Brexit. Both are a national embarrassment #florencespeech 
It's not #Brexit.It's costing us £20bn.It's delaying democracy 2 years.#WalkAwayMay 
Wishful thinking is not a policy - the problem with May's Brexit speech.  
Wile E. Coyote demonstrates imaginative new #Brexit proposal as announced in May's Florence speech. #florencespeech 
Summary of #Florencespeech : "this #Brexit thing is all a bit difficult and we weren't that honest about it"  - what a mess. 
Tens of thousands celebrate the upcoming #Kurdistan independence referendum with @HellyLuv in the Kurdish capital of Hewlêr (Erbil).  pic.twitter.com/LhJlER69qN 
I mind enormously that May speaks about the "British electorate" as if we were - or are - in agreement about Brexit. #florencespeech 
"Cliff edge" for business in 2019 given as reason to defer to 2021. But then 2021 will be the next "cliff edge". It is plan to STOP Brexit. 
PM didn't need to go to Florence to accept that Labour is right about Brexit transitional arrangements. Not much else in the speech. 
Looked like a total betrayal to me. Kick Brexit into the long grass. Remove  MEPs so removing Eurosceptic voice in Brussels. 
So when we voted to BREXIT in June 23rd 2016, it MEANS staying until 2021. Traitorous political class subverting OUR instruction. 
Arbil carnival for referendum, colourful, joyous, historical, adamant .....  
2 years of open borders post Brexit. 2 years of handing our taxes over to the robber barons in Brussels. Great job, Theresa.  
A normal world would support #Kurdish referendum; this is not a normal world #YesKurdistan 
DELIGHTED: EU chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier is happy with Theresa May's 'constructive' speech. Worrying. 
Brexiters don't understand that by working, spending, paying taxes & creating businesses immigrants boost the economy and jobs.#Brexit 
Would have helped, of course, if the PM who held the referendum had allowed Whitehall to prudently do some contingency planning & prep  
What?  She can speak for herself.  She sure as heck ain't speaking for me or Scotland's 62%!  #Brexit #ScotlandinEurope #FlorenceSpeech 
After May's fluff & fudge today we need - Petition: #Government must publish its #Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  
Florence speech: May kicks the Brexit can two years down the road 
The @Libdems will keep fighting to keep Britain in the single market and customs union and offer people a chance to exit from Brexit.  
There is a win-win option available in the Brexit negotiations, history will judge us poorly if we don't grasp it.  
I think the only truly British way to deal with Brexit is to pretend we never voted for it. 
One of the bottom lines of @theresa_may's Florence speech: #Brexit is longer and more expensive than the British people were led to believe. 
WE SHALL DEFEND OUR REFERENDUM  
10/ Find here full statement by @MichelBarnier  #FlorenceSpeech #Brexit 
Theresa May expects Brexit will take two years for implementation and the UK will continue to pay into the EU budget until 2020. 
‘May was awful, Brexit is a mess’ say Labour MPs who voted to give her a free hand with the Article 50 bill. #FlorenceSpeech#WeToldYouSo 
Alabama Special Election Becomes Referendum on #DACA #Amnesty for illegals! Support @MooreSenate if you oppose DACA! 
'Uh?' @jeremycorbyn responds to @theresa_may's #florencespeech in which she proposed two-year Brexit transition 
.@ChrisLeslieMP - Today's speech was littered with yet more broken Brexit promises. RT if you agree:  
Theresa May's message to the EU: 1. The UK isn't ready for Brexit2. The Tory govt doesn't know what to do3. The UK has the weaker hand 
May running Brexit like a freelance journalist: agrees to a project, underestimates the work required then asks for a deadline extension. 
5/ UK recognises that no Member State will have to pay more or receive less because #Brexit. We stand ready to discuss concrete implications 
It doesn't occur to Brexiters that the high level of Eastern European immigration is temporary and was always going to diminish.#Brexit /1 
Farage tells Sky News he doesnt like May's line on "we dont seek unfair competitive advantage" - why he voted Brexit  
Don't forget most of the UK doesn't want to leave only 26% of the population voted for #brexit EU Citizenship option for those who want it! 
@GuyVerhofstadt Dear EU, when May said we had never felt at home in the EU, she was speaking solely for herself and her loony #Brexit crew. 
2/ Time is of the essence. We need to reach an agreement on #Brexit by autumn 2018. The UK will become a third country on 30 March 2019. 
This really is two fingering how Scotland voted in the EU referendum!  
May's Brexit speech showed the UK is still hoping for the best and unprepared for the worst.  
Tory sell out! This takes it past the next GE which the Tories will loose so that's the end of Brexit= betrayed!  
EU negotiator Michel Barnier hails "constructive spirit" of Theresa May Brexit speech, but awaits more "explanation"  
STITCH-UP: @Tim_Aker reacts to Theresa May's Brexit speech - 'She doesn't want to bring immigration down at all'. 
.@Theresa_May "seemed to slap down" @BorisJohnson and @DavidDavisMP during her #Brexit speech, says @JeremyCorbyn 
People daring to vote for Ukip was what got us the referendum in the first place.   Only way actually to get some action. 
Ireland: 1st referendum on Lisbon Treaty June 2008 'No' 53.4% to 46.6%, turnout 53%. 2nd ref Oct 2009 'Yes' 67.1% to 32.9%, turnout of 59%. 
F*ck the EU-F*ck #Brexit - F*ck U Theresa May -F*ck the Traitors in parliament-F*ck the whole  F*cking Lot! & I don't usually swear! fumin!  
WATCH: @BenPBradshaw on the deeply divided cabinet Brexit opinions & how no deal would be a disaster for Britain. Please RT:  
#Brexit means Norway transition (pay to play), then UK paying all it owes, maybe £60Billion, all in order to get a deal that it already has. 
The #Brexit billionaire press has spent many years whipping up hatred against migrants. This from @IanDunt in 2013 
You had only one job to do @theresa_may & that was Brexit.The treachery & contempt for our democracy you've displayed is unparalleled! 
Post-#Brexit transition "nothing new" says UK opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn after PM's #florencespeech 
President Barzani in front of 200000 people in Erbil: It is too late,referendum is at the hands of this people, on 25/9 we will all Vote YES  
#Brexit is dead in the water. Now we need to find a way, and the people, to extract us from the quagmire caused by a Bullingdon prank. 
meanwhile outside Parliament right now, #EUflagmafia are making the point - #Remain is best for the UK. Brexit is a house built on sand.  
So the Tories and Labour have both cancelled Brexit. The people we elected have complete contempt for democracy and their constituents. 
So after May repeating the same thing again, how long before @MichelBarnier gives her the same answer? #brexit 
#florencespeech The only thing that's been established beyond all doubt today is that No Brexit is better than Any Brexit.  
It seems her best BREXIT deal is to Remain,Which she campaigned for in the referendum.We were never really going were we?  
Theresa May has told us her plans for Brexit - now it's over to you! Here's how you can get involved:  
All of the Brexit options are unpalatable. Might it perhaps not be easier to just stay in the EU? asks @stephenkb 
May proposes prolonging uncertainty & damage, that's all. A 'first referendum on the facts' is needed now, right now. 
We will keep fighting to keep Britain in the single market and customs union and offer people a chance to exit from Brexit 
Both Conservatives and Labour have converged on the same position, kick the can down the road and delay economic pain of an extreme Brexit 
Foreign Secretary @BorisJohnson says @Theresa_May's #Brexit speech was "positive, optimistic and dynamic"  
She almost threw away the election. Now she wants to throw away #Brexit. Might as well hand Boris Johnson the keys to 10 Downing Street now.  
Nigel says it's a good day for political class & Goldman Sachs, a bad day for 70% of people who want to get on with Brexit, more uncertainty 
Earlier, Kurdish President #Barzani said threats were received day and night to call off the referendum, but will go ahead nonetheless.  
Our plan is to talk to Baghdad about the outcome of the referendum, next steps, how to have win-win  via @dcexaminer 
If we continue along this route, we will be poorer because Govt has thrown away huge opportunity to crystallise benefits of Brexit. 
May has declared she is prepared to betray the British people by a soft Brexit that will leave EU in control of much of UK. 
The May speech forces one to ask: what's the point of this absurd Brexit farce! Just stop it. 
This is a rebadging of the status quo and is Brexit in name only. In reality, this means we are still members. 
Theresa May totally mismanaged the election campaign and has now totally misjudged the views of the majority of us on BREXIT. #WalkAwayMay 
"Pakistan should let the United Nations to conduct a referendum if noting is happening in Balochistan" @PeterTatchell at the side event 
My prayer is that the Kurdish independence referendum will go peacefully & the U.S. will stand by their decision to chart their own future. 
The currency markets show what they think of May's #florencespeech#Brexit  
I want to be European more by the day following this #Brexit shambles. She does not speak for me. #EU citizenship please! 
She fucked up at the Home Office, then fucked up the last election and now she's fucking up Brexit. Can anyone see a theme developing here?  
Those politicians who Don't should consider their position 
What’s likely to happen first?(Vote and then RT to increase the sample)#brexit 
@theresa_may You are an utter disgraceful sell-out. Resign #Brexit #EU #UKIP #NeverTrustaTory #ShouldHaveVotedUkip 
#florencespeech With the Brexit coup based on lies and misinformation is it any wonder May is left polishing a turd? 
Money is one thing, but people's everyday life is more important. EU citizens in the UK need legal certainty. #florencespeech #Brexit 
The clock is ticking and time is running faster than the government believes in London. #florencespeech #Brexit @EPPGroup 
On September 25, the Kurdistan Region of Iraq is scheduled to hold a long-awaited referendum on independence.  
A 2-year transition? No surprise there. Theresa May was always going to betray Brexit #UKIPtoldYaSo #florencespeech 
We’re still no closer to knowing what kind of Brexit the PM is fantasising about & crucially no long term security for EU nationals 
Two more years of uncertainty, two more years to derail brexit, two more years of EU rule and payments  Betrayed and let down by Tories! 
@theresa_may You are going to go down in history as the PM who deceived the voters on #Brexit & the worst Prime Minister we've ever had  
Disappointing and irresponsible of the PM to say nothing new about how she believes the Irish Border issue can be resolved. #Brexit 
I've been interviewed by @euronews on independence referendum of Iraqi Kurdistan. Watch my comments:  
If a couple buy a house, then divorce, they sell & divide it. So the real question is; how much does the #EU owe us?!#WalkAwayMay #Brexit  
Good to see universities highlighted as one of UK’s fundamental strengths in PM’s speech. UUK’s Brexit priorities  
The only people who wouldn't be hurt by a no-deal #Brexit are the rich and powerful. #florencespeech 
Spoke to @Nigel_Farage who told me @theresa_may speech was a "betrayal of Brexit" and nothing but the "status quo"  
Officials arrested and ballot papers confiscated — why is Spain so desperate to stop an independence referendum?  
The government threatening a no-deal #Brexit is like a gangster threatening to shoot the hostages - who happen to be us.#florencespeech 
Theresa May & Tories did nothing for 1 year, now says she wants another 2 years. It's all absolute bull. Only @UKIP can save Brexit. 
.@Theresa_May's vision is to leave the EU "in name only" says former @UKIP leader @Nigel_Farage #Brexit  
I went on @talkRADIO before the PM's speech on #Brexit.If this is a 'divorce', what do we get back? #WalkAwayMay 
On cue, Farage crying "betrayal". This is what becomes of PM having used UKIP's rhetoric throughout Brexit, only to find it's total rubbish. 
Shadow Brexit minister Jenny Chapman: "People will be scratching their heads and wondering what on earth was the point of that speech." 
May uses Florence Brexit speech for 'sympathetic gesture' - But not much might change til 2021   
Speaking to Breitbart London, Brexit leader Nigel Farage called Theresa May's speech a "betrayal"  
'Brexit is in doubt' UK must be prepared to walk away from the EU, claims Wetherspoon boss  
As Kirkuk simmers, Kurdistan about to hurl Iraq into turmoil over ‘independence’ referendum (Op-Ed by @MartinRJay) 
May's #FlorenceSpeech ・No to EEA or CETA・UK-EU Security treaty・2-year transition period・"Creative" Brexit deal 
6/ Anybody in UK who thought Brexit a) quick b) on Britain's terms disabused. We will be rule-takers from 2019-21 and probably beyond 
May's talk of a “creative” approach is just another way of saying she is utterly clueless about the EU position.#florencespeech #Brexit 
The Latest: British Prime Minister May says failing to reach a Brexit deal with the EU would be a 'damaging blow'  
So May's Brexit cunning plan is for Britain to abide by and pay for an EU it would no longer shape for at least two years. Genius! 
It is not Brexit. This is not leaving the EU. It is an establishment con and exactly what I expected. 
Brexit under the Tories will guarantee that your wages and standard of living will be much lower than now. #florencespeech 
Webinar: Brexit Speech and Talks to Dominate Next Week  
So, Brexit now means - paying what we pay now, abiding by same EU rules & allowing in as many EU migrants for 2 years after we Leave in '19? 
A weak and irresolute leader laying out a plan for not really leaving, and an opportunity to in effect reverse the Referendum decision. 
DISGRACE: Theresa May confirms drawn out Brexit, open borders for years to come. 
As a British and Irish citizen I've always felt part of the EU #notinmyname #brexit #MayinFlorence 
How the pound reacted to Theresa May's Brexit speech in Florence  
Once you eliminate the unworkable, whatever remains, no matter how unacceptable, must be Brexit. 
.@Theresa_May tells Sky's @Faisalislam that the UK's partnership with the EU after #Brexit would be "completely different" to that of Norway  
Theresa May tells @bbclaurak "no deal is still better than a bad deal" on #Brexit  #florencespeech 
world must know: police went to the hacktivist house that made the mirrors of #referendum web to avoid censorship  
So! We're not (really) leaving until 2021. By which time, by my reckoning, death rates mean that Remain would win a referendum  
Brexit in a nutshell: Tories don't know what they want and they are blaming Europe for not getting it 
So May sold out. EU citizens in UK can continue to claim benefits, work, use health, schools, etc. What part of Brexit did she not get??  
Strong speech from PM. Committed to delivering Brexit, reaching out to our European friends, realistic & practical #florencespeech 
Theresa May's Brexit vision is that we Leave the EU in name only. All areas of integration we have currently will be rebadged. 
15 months now since referendum. 15 months this top of the in tray. 15 months and this is best she can offer ...#florencespeech #brexithaos 
BREAKING: Britain's prime minister says failing to reach a Brexit deal would be 'damaging blow' to Europe's future. 
Aside from being a terrible idea, Brexit is also very, very, very boring. 
Top quality speech from PM. Perfect blend of pro-Europeanism, commitment to Brexit and practical compromise to satisfy both UK & EU 
Theresa May's speech takes us closer to transition deal but UK not at all clear what sort of Brexit she wants 
Theresa May calls for Brexit transition period of "around two years"  
BREAKING: Britain's prime minister signals that UK will pay a Brexit bill, saying country will 'honor commitments' made. 
Brexit betrayal. Time to march on Downing St/CCHQ. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg better be ready to be PM. 
All #Catalan officials arrested over referendum have been released with charges. Watch the full story here . 
They get it. We're staying in. Indefinitely. May's 'about two years' actually has no time limit. Brexit voters are being betrayed.  
An embarrassing collection of empty cliches, devoid of detail on how to achieve deal. Then May talks of leadership! #Brexit #Florencespeech 
Boris tried his best to get sacked so he can be some sort of Hard Brexit martyr, appealing to the Leave supporting grass roots. Didn't work 
In all our interests to find a "creative solution" to trade agreements - @Theresa_May makes #florencespeech on #Brexit  
Hi. There's another showing Remain 45, Leave 45. Others show only 27% want reverse Brexit. You have influence so if tweet polls pls balance  
UK Prime Minister Theresa May proposes transition period after 2019 to fully implement Brexit, in Florence speech  
Theresa May: "The UK's never felt totally at home in the EU"Me: "I've never felt less at home in the UK since the referendum" 
To summarise, that new Tory strategy for Brexit.  
Never in British History was so little said on behalf of so many when so much was at stake.....#TheresaMay #florencespeech #Brexit 
Theresa May: "The British people voted for Brexit."No. 27% of the population voted for Brexit and she wasn't one of them. #florencespeech 
Theresa May's #florencespeech is a match that just won't spark a good Brexit  no matter how many times she tries to strike it. 
Scotland debated details of independence for 3 year before a vote.Tories still don't have Brexit details 15 months after the vote.Shambles 
British Prime Minister Theresa May: UK will not stay in single market or customs union after Brexit #florencespeech 
Nothing about security partnership is directly relevant to the current Brexit negotiations. 
LIVE, minute by minute updates from the Catalan press on Spain's attempt to repress its Oct 1 referendum #1o 
Didn't see this one coming. #brexit #FlorenceSpeech  
I believe the movement of the pound suggests that financial markets are taking a dim view of the UK's Brexit position #news #analysis 
If we promise the EU they'll never have to endure another Theresa May speech...they'll give us any Brexit deal we want. 
#florencespeech Everything May is saying we now need we already have through the EU, talk about reinventing the wheel. 
I'm going to stick my neck out and say that by the end of this speech will won't be any closer to knowing what Brexit will look like. 
May failing to mention almost 1 in 2 don't want #Brexit and over 70% of young voted against it. Don't call us all "WE". #Florencespeech 
BREAKING: Britain's prime minister says that UK will write guarantee of EU citizens' post-Brexit rights into law. 
Sterling falling with every bloody word she says! #florencespeech 
#florencespeech Never been so embarrassed, May sounding like a kindergarten teacher telling her class a story. 
The problem with #florencespeech is Theresa May speaks in different tones to her hard brexit base-she's like Donald Trump not to be trusted. 
Theresa May does not speak for me and millions of others....#Brexit #florencespeech 
If @theresa_may was in anyway serious about welcoming migrants she’d end her Govt’s ‘hostile environment’ policy #Brexit #Florence 
May's #florencespeech now acknowledging the concern & suffering caused to EU citizens by Brexit. About time. Behaviour has been appalling. 
It's time to #WalkAwayMay.Agree? Then get #WalkAwayMay trending!#FlorenceSpeech #EU #Brexit  
I hate the things May is saying to our European friends about how we’ve never felt at home in the EU. Don’t believe her! #Brexit 
I see that we are still on "imaginative and creative solutions," for Brexit. (6 months into the talks.) 
May speech oddly recounting why UK voted Leave. So far cdve been made in June 2016, underlines the lack of progress/stasis since Brexit vote 
I feel far more European than British. In fact since Brexit, I'm profoundly embarrassed to hold a British passport. #BrexitSpeech 
May: Brexit "strengthening the role of Parliament" and devolved parliaments #irony ? 
May trying to explain why Brexit happened - we were already half out and a bunch of insular nostalgics anyway 
Speak for yourself May, millions of us feel at home in the EU. It’s the extremists on the left/right who don’t! #Brexit 
The Kurdish referendum is not an act of force. It is a right. And a debt. #Kurdistan #KurdistanReferendum 
Cannot believe that Brexit is being framed by discourse about the Middle Ages.  
Theresa May making a good case so far for EU membership. Maybe she should have given this speech during the referendum campaign 
"We want to be your strongest friend and partner" - Theresa May outlines her vision of #Brexit to the EU 
"For many, it is an exciting time, full of promise. For others it is a worrying one - I look ahead with optimism" - @Theresa_May on #Brexit  
Live scenes as Theresa May tries to unblock Brexit negotiations in Florence.  
Theresa May goes to Florence to give a speech on why it will become difficult and expensive for British people to go to Florence.#Brexit 
I want to puke already. #TheresaMay #Brexit #BS 
Point of fact: The British people did not decide to leave the EU. The referendum was non-binding. MPs decided to leave. #florencespeech 
Watch live as @theresa_may gives a speech about #Brexit in Florence 
Terry, the black cab driver who voted Brexit, is gonna go on a mad one tonight. 
It’s absolutely critical our hard-won rights & equality protections don’t diminish after #Brexit:  #florencespeech 
Crowded,hot room,found at the last minute dull back drop,Mrs May late - this Florence speech looks like another in a list of Brexit cockups. 
Watch live as Theresa May makes a speech in Florence as she attempts to break the deadlock over Brexit talks  
Theresa May delivers a landmark speech in Florence to reboot Brexit talks  
#Kurdistan: Thousands of people await speech from President Masoud Barzani ahead of Monday's independence from Iraq referendum.  
First Brexit, now @Uber get banned in London. Will Britain ban the internet & mobile phones next to keep the libraries open 24×7? #Uber 
#BREAKING Thousands of students #occupy Univ. #Barcelona HQ & sing #Catalonia natl anthem to defend indy #referendum  
EU27 don't see Brexit as a "shared challenge" they see it as a uniquely British mistake. 
A special production from our #COWARD #government - coming to a town near you, #SELLOUT! #Florence #Brexit #BBC #SKY #UK #RT #NEWS #TORY #EU 
Brexit new slogan - shared history, shared challenges, shared future ... what else are we going to share ? 
Hilarious trolling whoever put the backdrop up for May’s #florencespeech #brexit  
Theresa May to raise prospect of leaving EU before 2019 in Florence Brexit speech 
It is the #Kurds who opened the gates of #Mosul. How dare we deny them the right to a #referendum ?  #Kurdistan 
In quoting Michael Oakeshott, @ProfTimBale nails why there's something conservative in being sceptical about Brexit  
Spain sends more police to Catalonia to block referendum  
-Norway deal politically crazy-Swiss deal legally crazy-Canada deal economically crazy-Bespoke deal administratively crazy#Brexit 
Kurds in #Erbil celebrate, wave #Kurdistan flags, and dance ahead of the historic independence referendum. #TwitterKurds 
The police in Spain in charge of stopping the referendum are living in a Looney tunes ship XDD  
Wetherspoons boss Tim Martin thinks May is going to backslide on Brexit  
#BREAKING All Catalan officials arrested over independence referendum released today with charges . 
#Florence against #Brexit!  @EUflagmafia @No10Vigil @BeamaBeorg @ChelsClive @NaughtyAuntieB @EUlvis 
A normal world would support #Kurdish referendum, this is not a normal world, my blog thoughts on UNSC "concern"  
On the subject of speeches about Brexit, here's the one I gave at @peoplesmarch4eu on 9th September. 
The timidity of the international community about Kurdish referendum is shame, absurdity and historic miscalculation  
.@theresa_may has arrived for her key #Brexit #FlorenceSpeech - and in a Maserati no less. 
Venue for #florencespeech with #European & #Italian flags flying #Brexit  
#Rudaw livestream: Overflowing crowds are gathered to hear #Barzani speech as independence from #Iraq referendum is set to take place 25/9.  
Is London's decision to remove Uber's taxi license a sign that Britain is turning inward ahead of Brexit?  
LIVE: Thousands of people are expected to attend #Erbil rally in support of #Kurdistan's independence referendum. #TwitterKurds 
#Kurdistan: Thousands of people await final speech from Kurdish President Masoud Barzani ahead of independence referendum on Monday.  
No Brexit. Brexiteers won by lying. Gullible voters followed them to a cliff edge. Only a referendum on negotiations can stop the suicide 
PM's Brexit Jenga - in order to get trade talks, she needs to offer a financial settlement, which needs Cabinet Brexiteer backing: job done 
Next time someone tells you: "If the EU had just budged on immigration, we wouldn't have had to vote Brexit" .... Think about this:  
Me on @theresa_may 's anti-slavery activism, and the risks posed to it by #Brexit  
In Liberation: allowing unconstitutional independence referendum would be the end of Europe.  
I support the Catalan's right to have their referendum #CatalanReferendum and Catalonia’s right to choose. #ScotsForCatalonia 
May’s Brexit plan will see EU open borders continue for years. This must NOT stand! – Westmonster. #fo2eu 
Trump was also the first Western leader to congratulate Erdogan for rigging a referendum that destroyed the remnants of Turkish democracy.  
The complexity of #Brexit negotiations lie within the EU not wanting a viable solution, such is their worry about the UK succeeding outside. 
And lets not forget that the UK offered to secure citizens rights before triggering Article 50 but it was the EU who declined.#Brexit 
#WalkAwayMayLet's get it trending!#Brexit #EU #Florence #FlorenceSpeech #Democracy #Liberty #EUReferendum #No2EU 
Almost 10,000 EU health workers have quit NHS since Brexit vote  
Dave Simonds on Theresa May's speech in Florence on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
when decision of freedom made by indigenous ppl of #Biafra, Nigerian Gov has no choice than to follow the instructions of Referendum of IPOB  
Theresa May is flying to Florence to present Brexit plans. BUT noone of relevance will be in the audience.What is happening? #BrexitShambles 
Thread on May's speech and the the gap analysis which will tell you the current prospects of a Brexit deal.  
There are roughly 66,000 Brits living in Italy. If you're in #Florence today head down to this anti-Brexit rally and make your voice heard!  
Ridiculous!! Buckled and betrayed Brexit #walkawaymay 
Brexit. London losing Uber. Next Boris will be PM. Unless we invent a new music genre quickly then I officially declare UK pointless. 
Conservative MP has admitted she did not vote in last year's EU referendum because the decision was "very difficult"  
Watch a young patriot call out Vince Cable's anti-democratic obsession with destroying Brexit  
A special production from our 'Conservative' government - coming to a town near you. #Florence #Brexit  
"This is Brexit in a nutshell" @mrjamesob. 
Always on the wrong side of this, George. Embrace globalisation, but don't be indifferent to its excesses. That's the real lesson of Brexit.  
The PM is bending over backwards here to accommodate an EU regime intent on stalling & hurting UK Plc in hope of a #Brexit derailment. 
There are tanks at the ready to stop the Catalan referendum - now a general strike is being planned in response  
Defra: "strong public interest" in withholding embarrassing Brexit data from public as it wd "seriously mislead"!  
Chiantishire ex-pats have descended on Florence from their villas for a Brexit protest today.  
We've let them get away with Brexit. We've let them get away with Theresa May. We CANNOT let them get away with banning Uber. ??? 
Tory MP did not vote in EU referendum because choice was 'very difficult'  
Our editorial @EveningStandard on the realpolitik behind the PM’s Brexit speech today   
.@KRLS Puigdemont : ‘We have contingency plans to guarantee the referendum'  
Fears May Will Keep UK in EU Until 2021 Through Guise of 'Transition Period', Pay Hefty Brexit Bill -   
I agree! I join countless others in saying: #WalkAwayMay!#Brexit #Florence #florencespeech 
My cartoon Friday @TheTimes on a Room with a View #florencespeech #Brexit  
The Prime Minister should do what's right & sensible for #Brexit. Walk away!Do you agree? Then get this hashtag trending! #WalkAwayMay 
David Davis is either sabotaging any Brexit  deal or he is totally incompetent. Either way the man must go. It's time to #StopBrexit 
Another method of immigrant cleansing - removing their access to easy and well paid work. Brexit is live and happening.  
Can May and Davis crack the Brexit conundrum?  
Tories don't have the right people or policies to deliver any kind of Brexit. UK will sink into the mud. We need to #StopBrexitNow 
What is point becoming a representative in a parliamentary democracy if you can't even make decisions on your own behalf in a referendum?  
Anyone who's been in a negotiation will tell you that sometimes you do have to walk away. This is one of those moments. #WalkAwayMay #Brexit  
The remainiacs usually like 'experts'. But this actual expert, will be ignored at best.#Brexit #florencespeech #Florence #WalkAwayMay 
Most Britons now want to stop Brexit, poll shows  
Come clean @michaelgove, publish what you know about the impact of #Brexit on food prices. We've probably already noticed. They've shot up! 
And Barzani, the main driver behind the referendum, allied with Saddam in the 1990s, got rich smuggling oil for him. This is absurd.  
If you voted for #Brexit, Farage has just called you one of "the great unwashed". #bbcdp 
CONGRATULATIONS to TfL: by banning Uber in London you have effectively upstaged the prime minister's landmark speech on Brexit ... 
Greed is one of the #EU 's biggest flaws. @Steven_Woolfe is spot on in pointing out that this offer will stoke that greed even more! #Brexit  
I've been in an abusive relationship since the 70's, but my lawyer has cleverly negotiated me only paying £30 billion in a divorce. #brexit 
Due to fears of internet shutdown related to the #1Oct #Referendum Spain has now overtaken Germany as the country with the most Briar users. 
Fears May Will Keep UK in EU Until 2021 Through Guise of 'Transition Period', Pay Hefty Brexit Bill   
Ever since the General Election Labour has been betraying all of its supporters who voted for Brexit.  
On the Jeremy Vine show in a sec arguing about Brexit with some Ukip guy. 
18 months of #citizensrights uncertainty driving EU nationals into a process of naturalisation completely unnecessary pre referendum  
80% of @GMB viewers think £20billion for the #EU is too much. I agree! Truth is, the EU will keep taking!#Brexit 
Ah here the recently elected MP for Angus didn't bother to vote in #Brexit referendum. Her constituents did. They voted Remain  
Former Number 10 aide decries Brexit 'vagueness' on the day of Theresa May's speech  
As Theresa May gives make or break #Brexit speech to almost empty room in Florence, 52% of Brits want to STAY IN EU!  
A big day for #Brexit. What will Theresa May offer the EU? Follow the story with our BBC team in Florence 
.@theSNP leader @NicolaSturgeon​ and the people of Scotland show Catalonia solidarity over their right to hold an independence referendum.  
This Sunday we'll be speaking to Len McCluskey General Secretary @unitetheunion about Labour, Uber & Brexit. Live from 10am @ITV  
Thread on why we had a referendum, why the notification date was fixed & why we're leaving at the end of a tax year 
#honestpoll #brexit should be scrapped, May resign and #GE held. Pls #RT/comment for inclusivity x 
The Regional Government of Sardinia offers itself to the Catalonia's Government to print and stock the referendum ballot papers  
Most Britons now want to stop Brexit, poll shows  
Ahead of Theresa May’s speech today @cajardineMP has been calling for the people to have the final say on Brexit.  
Nor is Westr/Whitehall, nor my local council. @LibDems want reform at all levels of governance. But no kind of #Brexit is as good as #Remain 
The Tories got us into this mess - with Austerity & Brexit - they are NOT the ones who will get us out #LeaveNow #BrexitShambles 
Masterstroke by remainer @SadiqKhan to knock the PM's Brexit speech off front page with an Exocet at key part of lobby lifestyle 
Civil Servants are covering their backsides. They know how bad Brexit is going to be and they don't want fall guys. Time to #StopBrexit 
Kurdish independence referendum: ‘A stronger and safer Kurdistan benefits the world’  
"Vince, you will never be prime minister of this great country".   #VinceCable scolded for anti-#Brexit campaigning.  
Catalonia referendum is ‘ticking bomb’ that could destroy EU  
Brexiters fail to understand that WW2 was not a victory of one nationalism over another, but a victory over nationalism. #Remain #Brexit 
Moves to Belgium to be closer to Brussels. Destroying the EU from within. Like Farage. Proper concrete Brexit man  
Releasing Brexit food price data would "seriously mislead"public says HMG. Is this worst-ever reason for FoI refusal? 
Explaining #Brexit in the trade city of Florence is like going to to Munich’s Oktoberfest to preach abstention from beer. #theresamay 
Overheard re #Uber losing its licence to operate in #London "This is worse than #Brexit!" 
#Lunch #LifeStories @hilarybennmp talks #brexitMay Florence Speech#May #Florence #FridayFeeling Chris Grayling #friyay #AllOutPolitics 
By what freak of illogic do Brexiters think it reasonable to want the EU to do a deal which will suit Britain and not the EU27?#Brexit 
Outrageous accusation. Gove clearly suppressing this report because it shows food prices will plummet after Brexit. 
How much is this fake #florencespeech costing? Flying out the media & cabinet. Paying 4 use of the venue. FoI anyone?! #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Why would Theresa May choose Friday afternoon for her big Brexit speech?Obviously so you could knock off work and play bingo.  
Dear Leavers,You won. You had your chance. You couldn't deliver. Brexit's finished. Get over it.  
"You must be more imaginative and creative" says the British leader who coined the phrase "Brexit means Brexit" 
#UNGA For Buhari, These Words Mean:1 Freedom: Act Of Terrorism2 Self-Determination: Treason3 Referendum : Waging Of War#Biafra50YearsOn 
Catalonia will declare independence within 48 hours of a “yes” vote in next month’s controversial referendum  
Welcome to Brexit purgatory, where it’s Groundhog Day all over again | Jack Bernhardt  
Barzani on the Kurdish referendum: 'We refuse to be subordinates'  
Here's the line hinting it's v bad news: publication of Brexit food price study wd 'seriously mislead the public' ' 
"Strong public interest" in withholding info (paid for by public) about impact of Brexit on food prices. Apparently.  
Brexit is a fraud and a power grab "won" on lies and propaganda.Its architects WILL be exposed and brought to justice.Tick tock.  
Exclusive : Govt sitting on secret report on how much food prices will rise due to Brexit.  
Third day of protests. Hundreds demand release of #Catalan high officials arrested in anti-referendum operation . 
Brexiters - Don't blame the EU. Blame yourself. You voted for it.#Brexit 
And I bet the people who elected @Kirstene4Angus are most intrigued to know that she didn't vote in the EU referendum because it was hard. 
Michael Gove accused of suppressing report into whether Brexit will cause food prices to rise  
British people have turned against #brexit, according to a new poll released ahead of Theresa May's brexit speech 
Michael Gove is apparently keeping secret a Defra report on whether food prices will go up after Brexit  
"Kurds should remind the West about the mass murder in 1988. Who spoke up? No one spoke up" but now West wants to cancel referendum.  
#BREAKING Catalan high official arrested in anti-referendum operation leaves post after Spanish Constitutional Court fines him €12,000 a day 
She didnt vote in the EU referendum, her constituents voted Remain as did Scotland, and she's now arguing for a hard Brexit. Principles, eh?  
Details of the anti brexit & pro EU events in Florence today greeting Mrs May. You cannot escape us remainers TM. X  
Brexit was not a rejection of British decline, but of British success. Remain must be rooted in patriotism  
If the Brexit process is going to continue - we have to have another referendum. One decided to leave, need one to decide the destination.  
Important now to read /watch media which presents the growing shift AWAY from #Brexit. End media & political #oligarchy of the #Brexiteers 
Brexit won't happen, according to senior Tory figure  
Jeremy Corbyn can create a game changer by announcing in his conference speech that he wants a 2nd EU referendum on the actual Brexit deal. 
UK draws record overseas tourists after pound's Brexit plunge  
Two years not long for a Brexit transition. As I recently reported, David Davis believes new EU trade deal could take five. 
"We've got a Del Boy Brexit" - @mrjamesob 
It's time for Johnson and his like to go. Their fantasy Brexit is damaging our reputation beyond repair. Time to #StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/IMRWKx0SLL 
Am I the only one who thinks the EU stalling on Brexit is deliberate in the hope the the Remainers like Blair can turn it round? 
Spanish Minister of the Interior informs that he's sending "police reinforcements" to #Catalonia so "to act in case there is #referendum" 
Britain's biggest problem? Brexiteers see Brexit as a WW2 fantasy, says @stephenkb 
Our Secretary of State missed an important meeting yesterday - leaving Scotland with no voice on #Brexit. 
The majority now want to remain in the EU. As such, there should be a second referendum on any final #Brexit deal. 
The Spanish Home Affairs minister announces he is sending more police officers to Catalonia in case referendum plans go ahead  
Rejecting the Tory right’s vision for a job-destroying Brexit would be in the national interest, and restore good will between the UK + EU. 
THREAD: Theresa May will be making a speech on Brexit in Florence today. This is one of her best chances to get negotiations back on track. 
Cable spoke complete sense about Brexit on #bbcqt. It's the most important issue facing the country. That's why I'd prefer him to Corbyn 
The will of the people.#Brexit  
More spineless attempts of Ruth Davidson and her team to distance themselves from Tory Brexit. It's on you so own it  
#Brexit Delayed till 2021: May to offer TWO YEAR transitional EU deal in Florence speech  
Breaking: Mrs May to take time out in Florence to go house hunting. "We're getting the hell out after bloody Brexit" she explained. 
Govt thought people would rally behind the #Referendum result, but they haven't - majority wants to #StopBrexit 
This is a purely subjective view, but Remainers and Leavers do seem united on one thing: Both worried that Brexit isn't going very well. 
Why is Theresa May going to Florence for her Brexit speech? 
If the #Brexit preparation plans were any smaller, they'd occupy negative space and Theresa May would receive a Nobel prize for physics. 
Brexit: SNP's @StephenGethins calls out "tosh" over EU "goodwill payment of £20b", stating "the UK gets so much more back from the EU" 
Remain would win if the referendum was rerun, shock new poll claims  
Nigel, we need your leadership now. Brexit is being pulled out of our grasp slowly but I feel surely. It will be Brexit in name only. 
Not too late to #unbrexit RT #Brexit: Majority of British people believe UK should stay in the EU, finds latest poll  
Brexit: "We've wasted a year in these negotiations, we've had meaningless phrases from the PM, and the British people are paying the price"  
If you can’t vote in a referendum because it’s a “difficult decision” then you’re not fit to be an MP  
My dream: May arrives in Florence today in this jacket, rips it off, revealing this lovely dress & says "Bollocks to Brexit, we're staying".  
Is a rumoured proposed 20 billion euro Brexit offer to the EU actually against UK law?  
Poll: Most Britons now want to stop #BrexitWell that's that then. Will of the people and all that. Cancel it  
NEWS! Donald Trump tip-off sees Theresa May strike up post-Brexit trade deal with Nambia  
Brexit *advice* shld have been rejected on @jameschappers groundsGov & Parl derelict in DUTY to act in UK interests  
Brexit is entirely a UK affair. The EU & the fictitious 2016 ref 'mandate' are a DECOY. This is a UK fringe-right coup d'état we MUST stop. 
Best Stop Brexit wedding picture of the month just got better. @NewEuropeans @IanDunt @JolyonMaugham @RCorbettMEP @acgrayling @LeedsEurope 
Theresa May will tell European leaders "eyes of the world are on us" as she attempts to break deadlock over Brexit  
Happy Theresa May Big Brexit Speech Day!She's on soon after 2, apparently. Better get anything important done before then... 
It's 'like Merkel heading to Cambridge to patch up her coalition'. Some on May's team are baffled by the location of today's speech. #brexit  
GBP Coiled Ahead of Make-or-Break Brexit Speech  
Not clashes, what we have is #Genocide.Nigerian Army killing Biafrans for demanding #SelfDetermination #Referendum #FreeBiafra #Biafra @UN 
This seems to be the title for every Brexit thread this morning.  
Great article attempting to explain issues Biafran Jews & Christians have faced & are currently challenged by. Give them a referendum!  
This is a superb thread, listing the key Brexit negotiation guides from both sides. Do read & save.  
We are extremely disturbed by the measures taken by the Spanish government to prevent the referendum  
WATCH: @heidi_mp and how she finds it 'absolutely staggering' PM has only just realised, after 12 months, the need for a #Brexit transition:  
Stay angry, fight Brexit. Your essential weekend reading is waiting for you in shops, or get a digital copy at  
After Brexit, next trick is to say wages must stay low to compete with the world, while newspapers will go on blaming it on immigrants 
Britain's trade prospects.  #Brexit #StopBrexitHour #florencespeech #MayDUP #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #leave #4EU 
"Brexit has re-energised and reshaped the debate about a united Ireland." @MaryLouMcDonald #WBBB17 
Tories really don't want to release their Brexit Impact reports. They'll show full horror. Sign the petition now: 
Strong editorial from 'The Times': Spain "should allow the referendum to go ahead"  
Join me @brightdome on 24 Sept with @BHforEU, @britainforeurop, @pollytoynbee & @IanDunt for a #Brexit event -  
Can someone let May know that the world is aware that the majority in the UK now no longer want #Brexit. If they ever did. Dead horse. 
Reason why the Cabinet are still infighting is because there's no good Brexit model. Nothing ticks boxes of promises & reality at same time. 
Real, serious issues affecting people every day. But the focus won't return to these issues whilst we press extended pause for Brexit.  
Me for @Greenpeace Unearthed, on how Brexit will make a bonfire of our futures (). 
My question after listening to Rajoy is "if the referendum has already been disarticulated, why do hundreds of police troops keep arriving?"  
'Accept our rules!' German EU dictator politician insists transitional Brexit Britain must bow to EU  @DavidDavisMP 
Or to put it better:Brexit is now between the "what the **** are you doing?" and the "what the **** do we do now?" camps. 
At 2.15pm UK time, Mrs May will deliver her long-awaited 5,000-word speech hoping to break the deadlock over negotiations with EU #brexit 
I have given up watching #bbcqt .It's absolute torture knowing the education system has failed so very many. So much #Brexit bullshit. 
They said it would be easy - but Brexit is massively complicated with only miniscule chances of success. We need to pull back from the brink  
My birthday breakfast and I think the  Bargaining Chip is telling me something about our post-Brexit plans.  
Michael Heseltine: Brexit won't happen and we'll end up joining the Euro  
Whether you are Leave or Remain. I think most of us agree.Theresa May needs to go. She's making a shambles of Brexit. 
May's #florencespeech will be like a customer finally agreeing to pay the bill for the food they ordered instead of doing a runner#Brexit  
#R4Today Misha Hussein does tenacious job making Chris Grayling wriggle over details of May's Florence speech on Brexit: reality encroaches 
England, a country where the young are hated almost as much as foreigners. Who will chose and staff #Brexit voters future care homes?  
Brexit isnt about leaving Europe (geographically impossible) but better managing our relations with Europe #Florence 
Can't cope with @BBCr4today plumbing intellectual shallows of Chris Grayling. Brexit is job creation in Govt for the otherwise unemployable. 
Chris Grayling on Brexit. My own personal hell. 
Guess which Gov Dept has worst record currently for replying to FOI requests? DExEU, granting just 10% fully. Hiding the true #Brexit cost. 
Anti-Brexit TV! Don't miss it. We'll pack the audience with angry, shouty, ill-informed, lefty, anti-Brexiteers for YOUR entertainment!  
Core problem with Brexit so far - UK negotiates so much with itself that gov beliefs EU27 will follow once it has found internal compromise  
The EU's strategy is to delay the leaving process until the next General Election (2022 at latest) so the Referendum can be reversed. 
May goes to Florence to save Brexit as Britons say they no longer want it.  
Friends! Thank heavens for Our Bono!Without him, there'd have been a vote for Brexit, and Trump would be President. 
I will be on Talk Radio, Julia Hartley Brewer show 12-1pm, talking about Brexit & what Mrs May might say. It's looking like being a sell-out 
As #50SecretStudies on Brexit are withheld, see this by @instituteforgov on @DExEUgov blocking FOI requests #secrecy 
Brexit debate is increasingly between the "what the **** are you doing?" and the "what the **** are we doing?" camps. 
Brexit overwhelmingly against wishes of younger British voters. It's UK gov't policy. It has some explaining to do beyond EU blame-game.  
May speech drinking game:'creative' - DRINK'will of the British people' - DRINK'brexit means brexit' - FINISH BOTTLE 
The country is starting to come to its senses. But will it be quick enough to avoid #Brexit train crash? #StopBrexit 
Demand that Gov't make public the #Brexit Impact/Risk assessments. Why are they hiding them? If you want #StopBrexit please sign & RT  
The Leave campaign was a tissue of lies and xenophobia, and did not hint at the chaos Brexit would involve. 
Former lead prosecutor in Superior Court: "Holding a referendum is not illegal. It's a political not criminal matter." #Catalonia 
From @Independent | Most Britons now want to stop Brexit, poll shows  
All polls show there is no great enthusiasm for Brexit. In such a situation to press ahead with it is foolish.  
Mobilization starting at 9am in front of the Spanish courthouse in Barcelona, Catalonia, demanding people arrested for referendum be freed.  
As Theresa May prepares for the Brexit speech, her mandate is even less clear. Latest poll numbers show majorities for Remain. #StopBrexit 
Brexit is Britain’s gift to the world  by @KuperSimon 
BORDERS: May's Brexit plan could see free movement of people into Britain continue until 2021. 
Are you more or less certain that a complete #Brexit is essential one year on? 
If the referendum is ilegal according to them... What is not hearing to hundreds of thousands of Catalans demands? IMMORAL and OPPRESSION!  
Hey @MarkZuckerbergF, I was wondering if you'd be kind enough to release the Russian ad data relating to Brexit.Ta. 
We don't need EU! Brexit effect brings UK borrowing down to lowest level in DECADE  
Big Brexit day so we're chatting on @GMB in a mo about Theresa May's Florence mini-break 
 @JohnRedwood says nothing we get from EU worth 20 billion, @borisjohnson #boris johnson #Brexit Said Boris right. 
Theresa May tells EU leaders they have 'profound responsibility' to next generation to make Brexit work #premium 
That May speech in full. 'Please believe in unicorns, every time you say a good Brexit is impossible a unicorn dies'  
May must realise many "lent" our vote to the Tories cos we believed her re Brexit. 2yr Transition = remain & end of Tory gov at next GE 
‘We are seeing (Brexit) arsonists flee a burning building, having set it ablaze’ @ianbirrell 
What's wrong with London? Or Edinburgh? Santa Maria Novella in Florence nice, but odd place for UK PM Brexit speech.  
Have a great Friday everybody today. No Brexit talk today please !!!! Here's 4 from the magnificent 60s. The greatest era for music ever   
UK's bright future: May to give key Brexit speech TODAY – and PM will maul EU doom-mongers  
#Brexit: Majority of British people believe UK should stay in the EU, finds latest poll  
Labour's enabling of Tory Brexit makes anything the Lib Dems got wrong in coalition look miniscule.LDs forgiven before Labour Brexiters. 
How the U.K.'s Brexit stance has evolved since January  
Theresa May faces revolt from her own party as she preps for Brexit  
Inaction in Scotland will lead us right over the Brexit cliff and likely cost us independence for decades. Time to motor people. 
The Catalonia issue-It's an unsanctioned "referendum"! Why would Spain allow it? What's it got to do with Scotland? Let alone @theSNP? 
.@theresa_may is going to say EU leaders need to show "creativity" over Brexit  
Complete Preview Of Theresa May's "Florence" Brexit Speech  
May will propose a period of transition after Brexit takes effect  
Buongiorno Firenze! #Brexit road trip live on @business @BloombergTV with @ManusCranny 
Is almost £20 billion too much for Britain to be paying in a #Brexit 'divorce bill'? 
Brexit: Japanese companies set to leave London  
Dear parents, Today is our trip to Florence! Don't forget the lunch-boxes. Theresa will talk about #Brexit. Boris: please behave. Back at 6. 
Here is my two cents on the Kurdish Referendum - @SharqForum. #KurdistanIndependence #TwitterKurds #Iraq #Kurdistan 
Ahead of the Catalan independence referendum on October 1, read Tobias Buck's recent account of a divided region  
Why hasn't 'Leave EU' been exposing Theresa May for the EU puppet that she is?Her "Brexit" will actually be Remain - dressed up as Brexit. 
All eyes on Theresa May as she prepares to spell out key #Brexit demands  
1. The one saving grace of Brexit..The @Conservatives are finished. Their party dying out with their members. 
Just In: #Erdogan and #Trump rejected KRG referendum in meeting held today. #TwitterKurds 
This has aged well, a leopard never changes it's spots:The road to Brexit was paved with Boris Johnson’s Euromyths   
Kurdish referendum fervor as bright in diaspora as #Kurdistan #TwitterKurds #KurdistanReferendum 
I will definitely renew my UKIP membership if May goes against the Referendum! Not one penny to the EU! No transition period,end free mov't! 
Spoke to @nytimes #Baghdad Bureau Chief @nytmargaret about the upcoming #Referendum, international reaction and plans for the day after 25/9  
Brexit: Majority of British people believe UK should stay in the EU, finds latest poll  
Kexit? Iraqi Kurdistan referendum explained  
As ever, it's basically 50/50, still a year later. And apparently this a massive mandate for an extreme hard Brexit. 
Trump and Erdogan reject Kurdish independence referendum.  
UN Security Council Warns Iraqi Kurds Against Referendum#KurdistanReferendum #Iraq #UNSC 
The #Brexit tragedy continues to unfold because frankly May doesn't have it in her to pull off the impossible!  
who would've guessed the kurdish referendum would even rattle security council!!! where was it when we were gassed? 
UN Security Council expressed concern over "potentially destabilizing impact" of Kurdistan Regional Govt plans to hold unilateral referendum 
Thank your lucky stars we weren't subjected to the horror of a referendum on ssm. Imagine people voting on whether you're human.   
Almost daily, the Iraqi Kurds are hit with a new demand to cancel their referendum on independence  
Independence referendum carnival preparations in Hawler. Last day of #KurdistanReferendum campaign 
I really don't want to live in the UK anymore. And I'm 100% British, can trace family back to 1604.#Brexit  
This country is known for its #CommonSense.It's kicking in.#Brexit 
Theresa May using security issues as blackmail for trading rights will not work with the EU & shows her desperation. #Brexit#bbcqt 
David Mundell  trade trip leaves Scotland with no voice at vital Brexit meeting  
"Now Britain backs Remain"Well, for goodness sake Britain, demand that the young who couldn't vote in EU referendum do vote on final deal.  
Brexit would still be very damaging, and is still a stupid idea. I fear we're in the phase of just avoiding catastrophe now though. 37/ 
Petition: The Government must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  
Hello mate. I'd prefer a centrist MP calling for a 2nd ref over a closet pro Brexit like Corbyn. 
And the lifetime EU pensions for UK's 13 UKIP MEPs is part of the #Brexit divorce bill. That should be axed without further ado. 
Theresa May has a new plan to offer more legal protections for EU citizens in the UK after Brexit. Here's what it is  
B) Fin settlement: UK accepts liability for its share of payments on outstanding commitments from annual budgets (RAL) as of Brexit Day 13/ 
“Last year a new UKGov was left with the referendum result and no plan by the previous Gov or Leave campaign of how to proceed 3/ 
Brexiters: We voted for our own imagined versions of Brexit.  We want all those mutually incompatible Brexits - otherwise it's undemocratic! 
#HelpMayWithHerBrexitSpeech "Will of the People, Strong & Stable, Brexit means Brexit...Blue Screen Error: c000021a Fatal System Error..." 
It’s time our businesses got behind Brexit & stop slowing the process down & tell the Government to get on with it or walk! 
The tide has turned on #Brexit but when will @theresa_may and Co accept that there should be a new vote on the deal?  
.@afneil Why don't you ever challenge anyone who talks about a Brexit dividend? You must know dwindling tax revenues will outweigh it #BBCTW 
If Tim Martin of JD Wetherspoon is the eloquent voice of #Brexit, then we're in a worse mess than I thought #BBCTW #ThisWeek God help us! 
Time isn’t on her side: Theresa May must set out her Brexit plan this week | Anand Menon and Jonathan Portes  
Olesa de Montserrat now; a pro referendum boy have been detained; people resisting in front of the police HQ  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
I support democracy, the October 1st referendum, and an independent Catalonia! 
Bloke on #bbcqt said that post Brexit UK will be able to have a trade deal with China.  We already trade with China you blithering idiot! 
Its wrong for any state to deny the democratic right to hold a referendum & important for Catalonia to express its will #cataloniareferendum 
This audience member says that Vince Cable will never be the Prime Minister because of his stance on Brexit #bbcqt 
WATCH | "Vince, you will never be prime minister of this great country". Vince Cable scolded for his anti-Brexit campaigning.  #BBCQT 
#bbcqt there is certainly no way I will forget or forgive the Tories or Labour under Corbyn for their divisive stance on Brexit. @LibDems 🖒 
NHS now has 40,000 jobs that can't be filled as EU workers leave for fear of #brexit #brexitwontwork 
The clash in Catalonia preparing to vote on secession—The discontents and divisions behind an illegal referendum 
Tories called the referendum, lost the referendum and are now screwing up BrexitAny chance we can stop saying it's Labour's fault?#bbcqt 
Brexit shouldn't be a game of guesswork, everybody poised to work out govt position from speech to inadequate paper to embargoed speech. 
Watching Question Time - lots of Brexiters in audience. Really can't understand why penny hasn't yet dropped that Brexit will be a disaster. 
The constant problem of this government on Brexit is that it sees it as more important to persuade domestic press than EU27 of its position. 
I wish this lady on #bbcqt was running #brexit So intelligent reasonable, articulate.And HONEST !  
Thank you @CBItweets team brilliantly organised dinner in amazing venue of Ely Cathedral. So much energy against the Brexit madness 
"There's no sign of this quietening down" - @TomBurridgebbc reports from Barcelona amid further Catalonia referendum protests #newsnight 
A majority of Britons (52 -48pc) now want to stop Brexit.The right direction but not yet a head of steam.  
Don't be fooled by Cable's warm words. His sole intention is to overturn the result of our democratic referendum. #bbcqt 
#bbcqt Cable ended the debate on Brexit saying the most sensible thing any panel member made and a handful of people clapped. 
Don’t forget Cable’s #LibDems stood in the #GE2017 on a specific reverse-Brexit platform.They got 7%.#bbcqt 
Odd that Remainers who predicted Brexit would be a disaster are being blamed when it becomes a disaster #bbcqt 
This audience member says that she has been doing her 'homework' on the EU for the last 10 years and voted for Brexit #bbcqt 
The main thing we're learning here is that the #bbcqt audience, amazingly, does not have a plan for brexit negotiations 
.If you mean Labour's trying to force through the SAME damaging Brexit as the other 'Mainstream' party- then Yes . 
Theresa May trying to negotiate a deal with the EU. #Brexit #BBCQT 
Strong editorial from 'The Times': Spain "should allow the referendum to go ahead" on @Elnacionalcaten 
This audience member says we should all work together to get the best Brexit deal, regardless of you voted in the referendum #bbcqt 
The Tory right could never get their low tax, low regulation Britain via a general election, so they are smuggling it in via #Brexit. 
Whatever you think of Tony Blair, he is entirely right that the Tories see #Brexit as an opportunity to create a low tax, low regulation UK.  
Thread on what you can read to follow the Brexit deal.No need to be reliant on spin, partisans, and pundits.  Read the docs for yourself.  
The Lib Dems say the public must be trusted to have the final say on whether they want to "exit from Brexit" #bbcqt 
The rows of empty seats for Theresa May's speech to the UN this week was a visual metaphor of what to expect after Brexit #bbcqt 
Summary of the Left position on Brexit "We want to pay the EU as much of your taxes as we can" ...oh and "austerity" #bbcqt 
Theresa May's Brexit strategy will be finally revealed tomorrow...#bbcqt 
Sorry, we did NOT vote for a transit period. This is a con by the political class and their media soothsayers. Brexit means EXIT #BBCQT 
.Look Brexiters - Even MORE Broken Brexit Promises!Let's just Bin Brexit entirely #BanishBrexit. 
And this is before the full costs of leaving have been felt. We can and must stop #Brexit. Join the @libdems to help us save the country 
If the Florence speech is to move Brexit forward, May needs to be short on flowery adjectives  (deep, special etc) & long on actual detail. 
."British people have turned their backs on Brexit". 
Exclusive: Most Britons now want to stop Brexit, poll shows, as May heads to Florence for EU speech  
The EU introduces a plan to curb tax avoidance, and within a month Cameron changes his mind to favour a #Brexit referendum.#StopBrexit 
Revealed: EU laws and migration for two more years, + £20bn, for a free trade deal after. PM's Brexit grand bargain; 
Today in Barcelona Atmosphere was electric ,it took me back to our Referendum  
Transitional Brexit deal is complete madness. All it will do is add 2 more years of no progress. Extension will happen automatically. 
I'll be on Good Morning Britain tomorrow after 6am ahead of the PM's #florencespeech talking Brexit. @GMB 
Brutal...." #Spain and the #Catalan #referendum " | Letters  
Who do you reckon originally thought up the idea of the hell that is Brexit 
1.  Thread on the key Brexit deal documents to read to date. 
Reminder.  Everyone following Brexit should read Barnier's speech of today in preparation for May's speech tomorrow.Essential background.  
When he's done that can he do the same for the Brexit vote.  
SNP MSPs call on European Commission to condemn Spain and defend Catalan referendum  via @TheCommonSpace 
Ex-Bank of England Governor urges UK @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP to WALK AWAY from Brexit talks & trade on WTO rules  
One Cabinet minister: For Brexit deal to be sustainable, needs to work for our young people, or they'll reverse it in a decade or two 
I wonder who had the idea of Brexit first? Boris Johnson or the Barclay Brothers who have paid him so very well over the years? 
If she can get £57m for Costa in a market with only one buyer, we should put Marina Granovskaia in charge of Brexit negotiations. 
Some of us absolutely love and live in a rustic town with the  family butcher. Some of us really don't like pompous, superior pratts #Brexit  
.Oooh Jeremy Corbyn..... Supporter of Brexit that will eventually finish the NHS. 
On the eve of Theresa May's speech in Florence a serious question. Are you genuinely optimistic about our post Brexit future? #bbcnews 
Paul Manafort is currently working on the Kurdish independence referendum, which the U.S. opposes.  
Lovely letter from @raulromeva to myself & SNP MSPs. We respect Catalonia's right to self determination & free unfettered referendum.  
And how likely is no Brexit deal at all?  
So this is Labour's Brexit policy: siding with a foreign government against Britain  via @telegraphnews 
What precisely is May's transition to full Brexit?  
May's speech in Florence tomorrow will be the beginning of the end of UK's Brexit negotiations.They are going nowhere except... No Deal. 
The Tories have brought in some new #brexit negotiators, especially for Article 127 leaving the single market #thicktories 
Zuck:"I don't want anyone to use our tools to undermine democracy"So, give us our sodding Brexit ads back.  
Tomorrow's front page: SNP say Mundell's absence from key Brexit Cabinet meeting leaving Scotland with no voice proves he has zero influence  
Catalan president Puigdemont announces polling stations for 1st October referendum on @Elnacionalcaten 
Speculation among EU officials in Paris tonight that Macron speech on Tues will propose some of things Cameron requested before Referendum 
A new blog from me; sick of all the nay-saying about Brexit I've decided to take an optimistic view of it. 
"No, I said no turning back Theresa, Brexit means Brexit! Now go and stand in the corner!"Theresa May and Boris Johnson at the UN  
Not willing to negotiate: NO ONE from Euro Commission to attend May’s Brexit speech  
Sinn Fein reveals Guy Verhofstadt rejects EVERY SINGLE Brexit paper produced by UK  
- So we've done 50+ studies into the impact of Brexit- What do they say?- It's going to be a huge success!- Ok. Don't publish them... 
It seems a pretty simple question whether the SNP support the illegal referendum in Catalonia. Someone should ask them. 
Kurdistan Region Foreign Minister @FalahMustafa makes strong case for Kurds to have a better future via referendum @KRG_USA 
An audacious king would: ask R to step down; negotiate referendum. But Madrid is captured by tight, blind, nationalist nomenklatura & media.  
No-one cares what May will say. It's obvious: (a) she'll be gone by the end of October and (b) Brexit won't happen. 
Tim Martin - "Five years for #Brexit is quite a long time. It’s a partial step to not leaving the EU, that’s how I see it."  
Spains finance minister offers Catalonia a better deal if it calls off the referendum, beware the VOW.  
Follow this thread about the experience of two young Irish @UNYouthIRL who took on BJ on #Brexit- I would rather have either of them as FM  
You know how active I was during referendum campaign but I believe as reality dawns people deserve a ratification referendum  
If PM gets her way it will be 2022 5-6yrs since referendum before we leave the EU, completely unacceptable & a huge betrayal, come on UKIP. 
Petition: The Government must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  @carryonkeith @JolyonMaugham #GetOnIt 
Manafort Working on Kurdish Referendum Opposed by U.S.  
It's time for EU nationals to raise up and speak up on Brexit - @roaringnurse blogs  
International diplomacy is the job of the UK Parliament and Government, as decided by referendum. Scottish Govt should focus on its own job.  
Is Brexit the greatest tragedy to affect the UK since WW2? 
Better hope indictments come quick because Manafort is planning to leave the country.. Kurds referendum is on Sept 25th @AGSchneiderman  
Kurdistan supporters from all over the world have a message: "Yes to Kurdistan's Independence Referendum."  pic.twitter.com/QJw8iMbKJ8 
I've thought since the referendum that the most likely outcome of Brexit is that we stay in the "transition" phase indefinitely. 
Apparently @NicolaSturgeon backs an independence referendum. But not for Scotland.  
Hard-hitting anti-Brexit speech by @campbellclaret tonight  
What a venue. @CBItweets dinner Ely Cathedral - won't swear but will tear into Brexit  
Almost 10,000 EU workers have quit NHS since Brexit vote. Govt must take urgent action to stop a further exodus  
38 Degrees did a survey of 70,000 supporters. How many felt their voices were being heard on #Brexit? Not very many it seems...  
Ben Jennings on Theresa May's Brexit speech in Florence – cartoon  
Almost 10,000 EU health workers have quit NHS since Brexit vote  
#Brexit: ‘Anything democracy decides, democracy can undo’ said @Jon_Danzig for his talk for @stratford4eu Story:  
Britain must stick to all rules during transition, EU's chief Brexit negotiator says  
Almost 10,000 EU health workers have quit NHS since Brexit vote  
People say that if Brexit is halted, no-one will ever trust politicians again.I'm sorry... AGAIN? 
Ex-Bank of England Governor urges UK to WALK AWAY from Brexit talks & trade on WTO rules  
Boris mayhem. Pay-Cap backlash. Brexit woes. Still the Conservatives poll 40%. 
British MPs as well as more than a hundred academics denounce Spain’s attempts to block the referendum in #Catalonia 
Theresa May has a new plan to offer more legal protections for EU citizens in the UK after Brexit. Here's what it is  
There may be a slight problem with Britain doing a post-Brexit deal with Canada...  
.@VinceCable calls on May to take urgent action as it emerges 10,000 EU workers have quit NHS since Brexit vote 
Please read the opinion of the Supreme Court of Canada on the Quebec referendum. You may choose b/w French & English. Thanks.  
It is predicted that Britain will have the lowest growth of the G7 economies in 2018, and that's before Brexit really kicks in.  
#LordKing calls on govt to prepare for 'No Deal' #Brexit: UK has to be ready to leave and trade on WTO arrangements.  
#Catalonia Referendum: "It takes two to tango, but it only takes one to divorce"   
I’m calling on the Govt to replace the tens of millions of EU funds that will be lost in the capital after Brexit.  
The real cause of Brexit.  
Interested in the impact of Brexit on women's rights? Attend this meeting on Brighton on Saturday #proEU 
Protesters in Glasgow show solidarity with Catalonia as Sturgeon tells of 'concern' over referendum ban  
What should the PM include in her Brexit speech? I'm live from Prague.  
Remember also this is the speech for which the EU agreed to delay the fourth round of Brexit talks. 
Brexit means Boris, and Boris is Boris. Yes, you're right we're doomed. #HelpMayWithHerBrexitSpeech 
Almost 10,000 EU health workers have quit the NHS since Brexit vote  
Sinn Fein reveals Guy Verhofstadt rejects EVERY SINGLE Brexit paper produced by UK  
EU tells Britain to 'settle the accounts' and speed up Brexit progress  
The "Great Brexit Future"  
Boris Johnson's lawyer wife backs Hard Brexit to take the power back from Euro judges  
Don't want another "divisive referendum" coz you can't be arsed? Time to wake up. It's Scottish welfare, democracy and rights at stake now!  
What should the PM include in her landmark Brexit speech? @Nigel_Farage is live from Prague 
It's actually the Brexiters who are "talking the country down" - towards an act of national self harm on an epic scale.#Brexit 
"We owe our support to the Catalans. They gave us so much support during our referendum." @SandraWhiteSNP #thankyouscotland #Catalonia 
Hi @OwenJones84 Given your stance on Scottish independence post Brexit, Isn't this slightly at odds with that?  
Should Britain stay in the single market after Brexit? Why not come to our #Lab17 panel with @Open_Britain  
We need a fresh referendum on the final Brexit deal. No one had a chance to vote on these options. Sign the petition  
Patrick Blower on Theresa May's speech in Florence on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
.@thetimes joins @lemondefr and @nytimes asking for a referendum in #Catalonia 
Good Friday Agreement should be protocol in any Brexit withdrawal agreement - Gerry Adams TD  
.@DoireOSF opposing Spanish govt repression against the Catalan people & referendum at Free Derry Corner. Visca la terra!  
Sometimes you have to stand up and be counted if you want JUSTICE Even if it's the Establishment you are up against 
Corbyn says disagreements about Brexit don't happen in Labour. He fired frontbenchers for voting against SM, then backed it. Delusional. pic.twitter.com/3bbuh0fG0V 
In #firenze for @neweuropeans #dayofsolidarity with #eu27citizens #ukexpats whose lives are in limbo thx to #Brexit 
When you see the BBC coverage of May's speech about Brexit, remember this; the BBC don't do criticism of their Tory mates.  
Turkey, Iran, Iraq consider counter-measures over Kurdish referendum  
There are better ways than a referendum to address the region’s legitimate grievances @TheEconomist 
"In order to prepare the citizens of the UK for #Brexit, we have a campaign all sorted...." #HelpMayWithHerBrexitSpeech 
'He has no mandate' Barnier has NO POWER until he gets UK to pay Brexit bill. Let's have audited accounts!  
Ex-Bank of England Governor urges UK to WALK AWAY from Brexit talks & trade on WTO rules  
Looking forward to making the case for Labour to resist Brexit @Labour4EU #Labour2017 
Douglas Carswell: The government is missing a Brexit back-up plan  
."For those who care to look, the signs are everywhere. Brexit is dissolving Britain's status in the world.". 
If I don't see 100K on this petition! Why would you not want the Govt to publish its Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments?  
In Catalonia, Thousands Protest Spanish Attempts To Stop Referendum Vote  
What a sensible & pragmatic person JD Wetherspoon's Tim Martin is, when discussing merits of BREXIT with BBC'S Jane Hill - Calm & plausible 
And which is going to face enormous collateral damage from Brexit  
Strong editorial from 'The Times': Spain "should allow the referendum to go ahead"  
We need referendum 2 force Congress to be in the healthcare system they want to impose on us!In all 50 states.RT if agree.#IWasHealthy 
If you oppose Brexit, read this and act now - before it's too late.  
Read:”You know we’re f**ked. We know we’re f**ked. Everyone knows we’re f**ked. But Brexit is going to be amazing!” 
President @KRLS "Spain’s attempt to block Catalonia’s referendum is a basic violation of our rights"  
Labour MP for Vauxhall and Eurosceptic @KateHoeyMP accuses the BBC's #Brexit coverage of undermining Britain.  
Civil servants 'highlighting Brexit concerns in official emails to guard against Chilcot-style inquiry' 
I'd go further -cancel A50, address concerns raised in referendum (many to do with UK not EU). Never have referendum again Learn lessons 
Minister @simoncoveney speaking @IrelandinNY, reminding his audience that after #brexit #Cork will be the 2nd English-speaking city in #EU. 
So this is Labour's Brexit policy: siding with a foreign government against Britain - @MrTCHarris #premium 
It's hard to believe Brexit can go much further without ministerial resignations. May surely can't keep them all happy. 
.@Nigel_Farage - “During Brexit we didn’t vote against Europe. We voted for the concept of the independent nation state” 
"To go-it alone seems like a denial of decline" - author Martin Amis on "self inflicted wound" of Brexit #r4today 
REVEALED: Figures show 465 'child refugees' were OVER AGE & LIED to gain entry to the UK 
#PDKI held a rally in support for southern #Kurdistan's independence referendum. #Twitterkurds #Rojhelat #Basur 
26 SNP MSPs call for European Commission to take an "interventionist" position on Catalan referendum  
If @Theresa_may pays any Brexit bill money to the EU would you ever vote Tory again? 
Despite Spain's efforts to stop referendum, Catalan President announces website where all citizens can check where they have to go to vote  
Nicola Sturgeon backs Catalan referendum calls  
I wonder if we could perhaps organise for a longer transition period for #Brexit. I was thinking maybe 100 years to begin with?  
Joris knocks it out of the park again. Consistently my favourite commentator on Brexit.  
Pre-revolutionary France was dominated by a tax-dodging elite who ruined the country in their attempt to avoid taxes. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
What did the cabinet decide on Brexit today?  
Brexit matters more than anything else. Labour's programme can't happen if country is skint. Mr Corbyn is a hard Brexiteer so can't support 
Sinn Féin MPs and MEPs join Oireachtas colleagues at special Dáil sitting with Euro Parliament Brexit Co-ordinator  
Barnier speech tl;dr: 1/ UK leaving 2/ UK needs to get act together 3/ no cake-&-eat-it option 4/ life for EU goes on, Brexit is a sideshow.  
Puigdemont in The Guardian: Spain's attempt to block Catalonia’s referendum is a violation of our basic rights.  
Brexit Coordinator Guy Verhofstadt addressing members of the Irish parliament in Dublin today →  
EU tells Britain to 'settle the accounts' and speed up Brexit progress  
Germany’s BIGGEST Brexit fear: Will Britain STOP buying German exports after EU exit...  
If you're anti the transition proposal (2 years, full payments, time to work through future deal) then let's see your hard Brexit plan. Now. 
#BREAKING: Macron demanded Barzani to postpone Kurdistan Referendum, but Barzani said vote will go ahead, talks to continue after vote  
Brexit will provide a huge opportunity to boost overseas investment by British companies | @LiamFox 
Remember the #LeaveLies about Turkey.  We will never respect a referendum result built on such lies. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
#HelpMayWithHerBrexitSpeech"Ordinary Brits will suffer as a result of Brexit, but it's a price worth paying to appease the far-right" 
President Barzani told President Macron in a phone call: Referendum can not be delayed.It is our people 's cause.Ready 4 Dialogue post-25/9.  
Looks like another empty room! No one from the #EU is going to Theresa May's big #Brexit speech  
Danielle Anson of Kent, you win my @TheNewEuropean Brexit letter of the week. (Excuse the pub ‘photoshopping’)  
For anyone outside the UK, it's been over a year since the vote and we still have no idea what brexit is. 
Britain must stick to all rules during transition, EU's chief Brexit negotiator says  
You can find my speech before the Oireachtas Committee on EU Affairs here  #Brexit @OireachtasNews 
May fires the starting gun on Tory civil war, ' BREXIT MEANS SLOW BREXIT'-possibly leading to NO BREXIT as full horrors are revealed, 
It is official: in it is final meeting earlier today, KRI's High Referendum Council decides the referendum will be held on time, on Sep 25. 
Why people need to support and use @torproject ? Catalan referendum is an example. Pictures of a hidden service  
110 MILLION border crossings last year in Ireland alone.  Brexit - you really could not make it up.    
Help fund a Scottish Observer delegation to the Catalonian independence referendum on 1 October!  
Officials arrested and ballot papers confiscated. Why is Spain so desperate to stop an independence referendum?  
Absolutely spot on from @MollyMEP. Government must release its #Brexit impact analyses now.  What can it possibly be afraid of.....  
More Brexit delusions, no Single Market without Free Movement. How many times does May have to be told?  
Guy Verhofstadt, the European parliament’s Brexit negotiator and former Belgian prime minister, commenting on the border  
Barcelona dock workers refused to supply cruise ships the Spanish government chartered for 5000 police sent to suppress Catalan referendum  
Breaking: #Kurdistan Referendum Comission makes final decision on referendum: it will take place Monday, Sep 25th. 
Nicola Sturgeon has backed the right of the Catalan government to hold an independence referendum.  
Speech – Why I find it impossible to ‘get behind’ Brexit, and why MPs and business need to fight harder against it  
The High Referendum Council has decided the referendum will be held on time, on September 25: president's chief of staff Fuad Hussein  
Spain’s attempt to block Catalonia’s referendum is a violation of our basic rights | Carles Puigdemont  
May's Florence speech can't hide her Brexit indecision  
More you look at primary sources rather than secondary bluster and partisan punditry, more you understand why Brexit is in its current mess. 
Catalan leader accuses Spain of violating rights in referendum row  
Irish citizens in the North must retain full EU citizenship post-Brexit @NiallSF  
Spain's right-wing government orders brutal police crackdown on Catalan independence referendum 
#BREAKING 4.000 students protest in the campus of @UABBarcelona with official #Catalonia's govt #referendum posters  
If politicians/pundits in UK just read and took seriously what EU said on Brexit (even if to disagree) then Brexit would be in better shape. 
John Longworth: Civil servants are the biggest threat to Brexit  
No one from the EU is going to Theresa May's big Brexit speech  
Michel Barnier, speaking at the Italian parliament just now, making it plain that 'cake and eat it' is not on the menu for Brexit.  
Independence campaigners in Barcelona clashed violently with riot police after a Government crackdown on the planned referendum vote  
.@NicolaSturgeon backs the right of the Catalan government to hold an independence referendum #FMQs  
London stands to lose tens of millions in EU funding after Brexit. I’m asking the Govt to replace this vital cash  
Good to see debate about Article 127 - the key to unravelling Brexit - kicking off after I raised it at #LDConf 
Hard Brexit could lead to the next financial crisis, says Deutsche Bank  
FactCheck: how Boris has changed his tune on Brexit  via @FactCheck 
Stand by for the bloodiest CON Brexit battle of all time. Good from the Speccie  
EU's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says there is "only one year left to swiftly reach an agreement on the UK's orderly withdrawal" 
Worrying....LibDems up to 9%.... must be their plan to save the nation from Brexit that's resonating....   
Guys, you're going to need those documents for a while even if the referendum passes! Replacing them will be a nightmare.  
#HelpMayWithHerBrexitSpeech 'Brexit is going to be.........LOOK! A benefits claimant!' 
Some Kurdish people burn Iraqi passports and identification documents ahead of independence referendum in Kalar city, #Kurdistan Region. 
Catalonia referendum: Protesters gather outside court  
Protesters gather in Barcelona as Catalan referendum dealt a blow  
Turkey, Iraq, Iran agree on "joint precautionary measures" over Kurdish referendum  
Productive exchange w/@MOFAUAE @ABZayed on #KRG #UAE relations, political developments, #Referendum & #Emirates' humanitarian contributions. 
I’m calling on the Govt to replace the vital EU funds that will be lost in the capital after Brexit →  
Spain’s attempt to block Catalonia’s referendum is a basic violation of our rights | Carles Puigdemont  
1. If you look around the Tory Brexit Twitter bubble it's easy to see the core misapprehensions in play. 
.@ClareBaileyGPNI joined us at Leinster House today to discuss #Brexit as @GuyVerhofstadt addressed the Dáil. Clear message: no hard border! 
No one from the EU is going to Theresa May's big Brexit speech  
#Kurdish #Peshmerga Farhad Amin. His brother killed fighting #IS. Referendum means he will be reborn, he says  
UK sees dip in European research applications after Brexit vote:  
Spain’s attempt to block Catalonia’s referendum is a basic violation of our rights  El meu article a @guardian #1Oct 
As he faces possible indictment, Manafort signs on with Kurds pushing referendum opposed by US @kenvogel @Jo_Becker 
Now. The Referendum committee is in meeting. Assessing final preparations and the way forward .  
The case against "Lexit" - @AnthonyBarnett engages seriously with leftist argument for Brexit and finds it wanting.  
A country in waiting - Our story on the #Kurdish #independence referendumBBC News  via @YouTube 
There simply isn't a workable solution without NI's continued membership of the Customs Union. What's the point of Brexit, I've forgotten? 
Brexit is a massive crisis - we need to collaborate with all anti-brexit supporters incl cable and blair regardless of past disagreement  
Dragonball Z Xenoverse 2 is $50 (£37) on the US eShop, £55 ($74) in the UK. Thanks, brexit.  
Northern Ireland could stay in the EU single market and customs union post Brexit, says Guy Verhofstadt  
We can’t afford to let vested interests wreck Brexit | @JLongworthLML  
Ireland is crucial to the EU. The Irish border & all things related to it, are a priority in the #Brexit negotiations 
We will listen attentively & constructively to PM May's important speech tomorrow in Florence @MichelBarnier #Brexit 
"pro lifer" hungerstrikes against ProChoice referendum. In answer to that people now donate their lunch/dinner money to @freesafelegal <3 
Astonishing and revealing, the 27 other sovereign EU nations are more united on Brexit than the British cabinet. 
No one from the EU is going to Theresa May's big Brexit speech  
@MichelBarnier continues tour of EU capitals, updated Italian parliament #Brexit. Calls on taking away uncertainty.  
Over 100,000 signatures already so parliament must discuss ratification referendum on #Brexit deal.  #StopBrexit #EU 
Scaremongering economists were wrong about Brexit  
U.S. oil firm Chevron starts drilling oil wells in #Kurdistan Region after a two-year gap despite the upcoming independence referendum.  
Second round of protests. Thousands demand the release of Catalan officials arrested in anti-referendum operation . 
Asked ScotGov about the talks with Willie Rennie about a Brexit deal referendum. They have no idea what he's talking about; no talks planned  
This puppy knows more about Brexit than David Davis.  
I saw this cartoon on the morning of Brexit and it hit me hard. Nothing has changed...  
May's Florence speech. 'Don't ask me why, but I'm still here. Strong & stable. Brexit means Brexit. Here's a few billion. Is that ok,Boris?' 
If Brexit was such a good idea Why isnt Trump erecting trade barriers betw 50 states of America? @TheNewEuropean @dontbrexitfixit @BrexitBin 
Brexit means perplex itBrexit means apoplecticBrexit means hex itBrexit means oh shit#HelpMayWithHerBrexitSpeech pic.twitter.com/BfzIOiMdC9 
This is what being patriotic about Brexit really means - @mrjamesob  
Within 24 Hours Solidarity/AAA/Socialist Party have shown support for a referendum in Catalonia while opposing one in Ireland...  
Poor @theresa_may struggles with coherent words. We've had Brexit means Brexit and red white & blue Brexit. So #HelpMayWithHerBrexitSpeech 
Boris Johnson's lawyer wife backs Hard Brexit to take the power back from judges  
A sensible approach to Brexit, instead of trying to go over Barnier's head would recognise he's a great asset to UK:  
Honoured to be asked to share fave bits of brilliant new book from @AnthonyBarnett on how to respond to #Brexit & #Trump 
Any transitional arrangements after Brexit will be in favour of the EU, rather than the UK. Let's stop Brexit #proEU 
Nicola Sturgeon Has Thrown Her Support Behind The Catalan Referendum  
“We are not afraid,” chants Catalan Parliament president to crowd in today's rally in BCN against raids and arrests related to referendum 
#EU set to REJECT Theresa May's £18billion Brexit offer - Tell CowMerkel to  get stuffed!  And #fo2eu  
Live now discussing Theresa May's big Brexit speech tomorrow:  
Why MPs wanting a soft Brexit have been offered a lifeline by an obscure clause | Jonathan Lis  
John Redwood: What we want from #BrexitIt's time to remind ourselves of why a majority in UK voted to leave #EU... 
The Lure of Greatness: the best book about Brexit so far  via @IrishTimesBooks 
Theresa May to make "open and generous" Brexit offer to EU  
*Brexit Transition Period Explained* Pic via >@prodigalbum 
Martin Amis: Brexit 'a denial of British decline'  
Protestors in London show support for Catalan independence referendum 
Hearing about the protests in Catalonia over the planned 1 October independence referendum from @AlfredBosch and @CharlesAblett #bbcdp 
#BREAKING Protest of @bomberscat firemen in #Catalonia against Spain #CoupdEtat & to defend independence #referendum  
The government won’t release its analyses of Brexit’s impact. We have a right to see them - @MollyMEP 
#TheresaMay will be accompanied at her #florencespeech by Boris Johnson, David Davis, Philip Hammond. So she'll have an audience. #Brexit 
Contrast Spain & Catalonia with UK & Scotland.Spanish police raid Catalan Government Offices and declare Independence Referendum illegal. 
EU Brexit negotiator attacks Boris Johnson's 'old-fashioned' views on identity  
Nicola Sturgeon has backed the right of Catalonia to hold an independence referendum, saying she's concerned by events there.  
Here's a full list of the 111 powers vulnerable to Westminster's Brexit "power grab" #FMQ 
A perceptive look at the prevailing views of the EU-27 ahead of #TheresaMay #florencespeech on #Brexit. Worth a read 
Ahead of the Catalan independence referendum on October 1, read Tobias Buck's recent account of a divided region  
"It is a disgrace that ... Catalans are being forced to organize their referendum in a clandestine fashion"  
This morning's cabinet meeting discussing Brexit has lasted more than two hours - Boris has had to leave to go to the loo twice #kitileaks 
Some people really don't like jokes about #Brexit mansplaining.  -- But, I'm definitely adopting the modern face of narcissism" as mine.  
Catalan government spokesman calls for public to trust in referendum plans despite the Spanish police operation  . 
The PM must make clear that she will not accept clandestine efforts to undermine Brexit | @GiselaStuart 
Turkey, Iran, Iraq consider counter-measures over Kurdish referendum: Anadolu  
Good Friday Agreement should be protocol in any Brexit withdrawal agreement - @GerryAdamsSF  
The leaked report on post-Brexit immigration 'contains nationalistic ideas & is based on false facts'  
Corbyn’s cunning EU plan ends in abject failureOn #Brexit Labour had more positions than can be found in Kama Sutra 
.@aaltafaj: We call on @EU_Commission to take a stance on recent acts of repression by Spanish Gov #Catalan #Referendum @EA_CoR briefing 
EU fears Theresa May 'will not be able to uphold Brexit pledges'  
Oops - Germany's European Commissioner says Brexit talks 'stall'  
Some civil servants fear Brexit could turn out so badly it results in Chilcot-style inquiry, @JGForsyth reports 
Read this mini-thread (5 tweets) about what happened when Irish youth delegates at UN talked Brexit to #Boris the not-so-lovable buffoon ffs 
I look forward to the day when the "enemies of the people" are MPs who knew Brexit was going to fuck the country but did nothing to stop it. 
.@VinceCable: When we know what Brexit means, the people should get the choice: The government deal or an Exit from Brexit. #ExitfromBrexit 
This says a lot about where Brexit Britain sits in today's world. Most seats at the UN to hear @theresa_may are empty. 
Catalan students mobilize to defend Catalan institutions and the referendum.  
The 'Brexit-induced' wave of hate was a concoction of those who wanted it to happen to fit their narrative.  
Brexit is Britain's gift to the world — Simon Kuper  
If anyone had wanted to make a success of Brexit, they wouldn't have been so dumb to get themselves into the position of starting from here. 
Spoke to @OANN about the upcoming #Referendum, Post Referendum Negotiations between #Erbil- #Baghdad, Role & Reaction of the Int'l Community 
Even Spaniards who oppose Catalonia's referendum vote on Oct 1 should watch closely as the Spanish deep state is forced to surface. #1Oct 
Great summary of where Brexit negotiations are currently at and not at)  
Unlike the Spanish government, the Tory government did actually hold a referendum. And the independence side lost. Get over it.  
Ex-Bank of England Governor urges UK to WALK AWAY from Brexit talks & trade on WTO rules  
A Brexit reality check.  
Err....hello, we had a referendum! : Ex-Blair advisor: ‘I don’t think Brexit will happen’  
UKIP Leader: Britain should walk away from Brexit negotiations until EU drops ransom demand  
Bilateral meeting between @aaltafaj and @KarlVanlouwe before the @EA_CoR lunchtime briefing on Catalan #Referendum of #SelfDetermination 
What happens to these pallbearers for the EU when we reach Brexit?Do they just go back to delivering the news?Will they EVER stop crying?  
See no Brexit problems. Hear no Brexit problems. Speak no Brexit problems.  
Some of Sinn Féin's All-Ireland team at Dáil this morning for an address by European Parliament's chief Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt  
I'm in Catalonia next week on fact-finding mission and to observe arrangements for referendum. My comments below.  
The Treasury's reluctance to even "mention the positives" of leaving the EU risks Britain getting a bad Brexit deal  
Herdsmen: We kill hundredsIPOB: We want referendumGarba Shehu: IPOB is a terrorist grp, herdsmen r notMe:???  
I am one of Sinn Féin MPs who have joined MEPs and TDs who are engaging with key EU negotiator on Brexit #NorthernMPsneedspeakingrightstoday 
A more powerful argument to justify pursuing the so-called "hard-#Brexit" it would be difficult to imagine....   
Guy Verhofstadt tells the Dáil that the EU will not allow Ireland suffer due to Brexit  
Altho even kittens are fucked under Brexit because without regulatory continuity on veterinary medicine, we'll get them years after EU & EU. 
Ignored at the UN. Sneered at in Canada. Downgraded at the OECD. Welcome to the reality of Brexit Britain  
Ready to print ballot papers for the #Referendum #Democracy #Freedom #HumanRights !!! We will vote !!! #CataloniaNextStateInEurope 
New £10 note worth £8.60 compared to pre #Brexitmoney #brexitwontwork 
#Brexit is not patriotic. It is driven by tax-dodging foreign based billionaires and those who would sell the UK to Trump.  
Listening to Guy Verhofstadt in Dáil ; Brexit isn't just about trade, GFA isn't just about non violence & identity isn't just lines on maps 
Petition: The Government must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  
"I don't really care about the consequences anymore": referendum supporter in Catalonia   
Adonis to be hauled before MPs over concerns his Brexit views are clouding his judgement as Britain's infrastructure tsar @CharlieElphicke 
When you think Brexit couldn't get worse and you're told the government know how bad it will be and are refusing to release their papers...  
"If you two don't stop bickering back there, I'm going to turn this country around and there'll be no Brexit for anybody."  
Bizarre. The only negotiation that is compromised by revealing the full cost of Brexit is the one between the government and UK public.  
Precisely.  Rich can buy residency in EU. Normal people having right removed by #Brexit. Bankrolled by destructive billionaire types.  
What we want from Brexit:  .The EU is not offering anything we need pay €20bn for! 
- Conservative party rifts- 10,000 UK finance jobs affected- May to make high-stakes speech#Brexit newsletter:  
Pls join me and sign this Petition: End the export of live farm animals after Brexit.  
Anti #brexit event tomorrow in Florence, same day as May's speech. Please RT, share widely... #UKtoStay #TakeBackControl 
Nice summary of the Brexit Experiment.  
It's quite something to watch Scottish Nationalists, who were given a legal referendum, vicariously living as Catalan freedom fighters. 
TODAY'S DEBATE: Does Britain need men represented on its Brexit team? Or is gender irrelevant? 
Eye-popping line in @JGForsyth's Brexit piece   
I wished Assange and WikiLeaks covered the coup in Kiev and the ATO against #Donbass like the referendum in Catalonia...  
NO DEAL: UKIP's Interim Leader says Britain should walk away from Brexit negotiations until EU drops "ransom demand"  
Spain has refused to allow Catalonia to have any referendum whatsoever and is storming government buildings. An embarrassing comparison. 
Meeting @GuyVerhofstadt of @Europarl_EN this morning with @hmcentee at @merrionstreet to talk Brexit.  We have same priorities for Ireland  
Brexit: like a mad scientist, UK is experimenting on itself for the benefit of humanity. Me:  
Jeremy Heywood is a dedicated & brilliant public servant. Contemptible that the authors of Brexit shd now try to destroy the civil service  
Oppose Kurdish independence referendum:- Iraq- Turkey- Iran- US- UK- Spain- Germany- UN Secretary GeneralSupport:- Israel 
The Brexit Negotiating Team  
Theresa May can't stick her head in the sand and pretend Brexit doesn't exist won't make it go away  
Rees-Mogg’s idea that Brexit should be more Red Rum than Eeyore falls at the fence that its benefits are harder to find than Shergar 
The idea that "reasonable interrogation of the consequences of Brexit" is so easily rebranded as "talking down Britain" is a depressing one. 
The UK Trade Forum is here to provide expert opinion on UK trade after Brexit and a space to learn, discuss and more  
BREXIT: 'Britain should walk away from EU negotiations and trade under WTO rules' - Mervyn King, former BoE chief. 
GREEDY: EU set to reject £20 billion Brexit offer and demand even more. Scandalous!  
An Englishman, a Scotsman and an Irishman walked into a bar.The Englishman wanted to go, so they all had to leave.#Brexit 
Peshmerga troops rally behind #Kurdistan Region’s upcoming independence referendum, scheduled for 25/09 despite Int pressure ( AFP).  
Nothing says "declining influence" like the PM making a UN speech to a near-empty room - but y'know, Brexit  
'The #brexit experiment' Great article by @KuperSimon. We have forgotten the cost of change. 
I've written a prose 'migration map' for Goodbye, Europe, abt Brexit. Never thought I'd share pages w/ J Rees-Mogg: 
I have two legs I don't need a positive vision for remaining bipedal as I inherently know the alternative is shite; it's called common sense  
woah now, let's not besmirch the good name of the Liberation Of Iraq by associating it with something bad like Brexit  
Justin Trudeau pledges Canada’s trade with Britain will be ‘undisturbed’ by Brexit.  
FARAGE: If May thinks public will be happy to pay big Brexit bill she might just have another thing coming.  
#Barcelona port workers vote not to operate #Rhapsody, a vessel to house #Spanish police ahead of referendum, "in defence of civil rights".  
PM finally tells Trump climate change is threat to global security. But not one mention in her post-Brexit foreign policy plan 10 days ago! 
#Brexit #Britain tumbles into economic slow lane: 
"To go-it alone seems like a denial of decline" - author Martin Amis on "self inflicted wound" of Brexit #r4today 
That is the project we fight to save from the small-minded, self-harming ignorance of Brexit. 
Our analysis on the risks of the Iraqi Kurdistan referendum on 25 Sept & recommendations on how to mitigate them  
Theresa May delivers speech to mostly empty United Nations - Brexit Britain, diminished, inconsequential.   
Only crowds that Theresa May can pull are protest ones. Brexit Britain - our voice is diminished, rest of the world have better things to do  
It is useful to read non-European press about brexit because it clears emotional fog and provides objective view  
About as far as a referendum bill, 2 year campaign and free vote.What a cholesterol choked bag of elasticated trousers this tool is.  
Petition: The Government must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  
Shocking that this has hardly made the news headlines:UK strikes research deal with US in run-up to Brexit -  
#ISIS has just released video statement rejecting #Kurdistan independence referendum. Embarrassing for states with similar standpoint. 
Hammond and Treasury "On Manoeuvres" Against Brexit:  
Even @R4Today yesterday talked about the possibility of food shortages post-Brexit. Think of it: A Gov acting to increase such a threat  
Just a little reminder about how the French see the leader of the ultra-Brexit cult in the Tory party.  
We need a completely new Brexit hit squad, and fast, to deliver the visionary deal we require. Dyson, Farage, JR-M! 
Spain rejects Scottish Government statement on Catalonian referendum  
We are a divided nation where nationalism & right wing hatred has become normalised since Brexit. Country has been changed for the worse.  
I'm an incorrigible pessimist. Woke up this morning convinced Brexit won't happen.Exit from Brexit.Say it loud, say it proud! 
ME: There is no possible way Brexit can be made any more excruciating.Newsnight: Hold my Booky Wooky  
Philip Hammond is out to subvert Brexit. That May keeps him in situ tells you all you need to know.   
That - not this sententious guff from @SteveBakerHW - is the *real* reason Govt refuses to tell its own people what it knows Brexit means /7 
Those who want the people to know the truth about what Brexit means for them can point to the study and say: 'You admit it causes harm'. /6 
May will tell Germans they won't have to pay more & Poles they won't get less as a result of Brexit Current EU budget won't need re-opening  
Just for the reference, I'm a centrist. I will never, ever, vote Conservative again, to punish you for the national disaster that is Brexit. 
Superficially, the argument is attractive: if the other side know how damaging Brexit will be it will harm our ability to negotiate. /2 
UK economy to slow rapidly in 2018 as hard #Brexit looms, OECD forecasts.  
Florence once led the world economically, but then went into steep decline. Just like Brexit Britain. So appropriate place for May's speech  
Something v quaint about notion May can do/say anything at all to avoid her eventual defenestration amid livid claims she's sold out Brexit. 
#Brexit and immigration: prioritising the rights of all workers - major report launched today by @Another_Europe  
Boris Johnson’s lawyer wife backs Hard Brexit to take the power back from Euro judges  
Dose of reality here. Canada is not in a rush to negotiate post Brexit deal with UK.  
When Ireland's UN youth delegate @_Paulitics confronted @BorisJohnson about the effect of Brexit on young people.  
The Times: "Mass protests after dawn arrests to halt Catalan referendum"  
Big Brexit speech for Theresa May this week - but is so enfeebled by cabinet war she won't be able to stand by any pledges #BrexitShambles 
This is not just about Independence, it's about DemocracyAs Catalonia Independence Referendum Nears, Madrid Escalates TensionsNYTimes  
Lucky Theresa May didn't book Ryanair or she mightn't make it back from US for her own Cabinet meeting. Talking Brexit on @GMB in a mo 
The obscure EU law that could stop Brexit  
A survey shows that EU members are adamant the U.K. must pay its Brexit bill  
Banks and startups rally behind #fintech industry post-Brexit in fresh push 
Boris Johnson thrusts himself to front of Brexit debate at worst possible time for Britain's leader  
Infograph in 1991 Armenian newspaper before Independence Referendum shows world's small countries V @m_yalanuzyan 
"The UK cannot return to its imagined pre-EU idyll, because the world has changed since 1973." 
The Spanish prime minister has stepped up efforts to prevent Catalonia’s independence referendum on Oct. 1  
Simon Kuper: Brexit is Britain’s gift to the world  
Proof of the insanity of Brexit: annual cost per household of EU, with all its advantages: £317. Cost of Brexit, with no advantages, £4200. 
#ucpldr That'd be like AB holding a referendum on the Post Office. Or the Navy. Equaliz'n is an Ottawa program using fed'l tax dollars.  
...talking about maybe they haven't put their best team forward after all. Brexit is failing because it's just a rubbish idea. Get over it 
This is so wrong! Canadians don't want this bill. They need to have a referendum and let us vote! Not shove it down our throats! 
Oops ...Toyota's future investment in UK 'at risk from Brexit uncertainty'  
Russia, which is dealing with its own separatist movements, is funding Kurds (like US), taking a wait and see approach, backing referendum  
So this U.S. Data Firm is accused of TAMPERING with the U.S.,Kenyan and now #Brexit vote. Hmm#TheResistance #CNN #MSNBC 
Brits INCREASINGLY CONCERNED C.Analytica INTERFERED with #BREXIT VOTE#TheResistance #CNN #MSNBC 
Labour leadership under pressure to support free movement after Brexit  
Theresa May to brief cabinet on Florence Brexit speech  
Manafort working on Kurdish independence referendum that Trump opposes: report  
Manafort working on a Kurdish referendum opposed by the US. His partner Phil Griffin was involved w Pro Putin Yanukovych Ukrainian schemes  
Talking to @trtworld from UN about Turkey's opposition to referendum in northern Iraq.  
What o needed money during college I worked as a waiter at Denny's. Supporting the Kurdish independence referendum never entered my mind. 
spoke with @NITV about need for Government to progress Referendum Council recommendations through proposed joint standing committee  
Referendum to do what? It’s a federal program paid for with federal revenues.  
NYT: Paul Manafort Has Been Working on a Kurdish Independence Referendum That's Opposed by the U.S., via @kenvogel  
I made a bracket for possible referendum  
Dr Evelyn Scott remembered as a fierce activist for Aboriginal rights, and a key campaigner in the 1967 referendum.  
Brexit: between rocks and a hard places - May has nowhere to go ...  #Brexit.  
Skint Manafort Working on Kurdish Referendum Opposed by US & Keeping Mum About Who's paying Him or How Much #maddow  
NYT: Paul Manafort, while under scrutiny by Mueller, is working for Kurdish independence referendum opposed by U.S. 
Mixed emotions...don't like Manafort, but think the referendum needs to happen. Should I cheer this or boo? 
Paul Manafort is working for allies of the leader of Iraq’s Kurdish region to promote a referendum opposed by the US  
More than a year after a historic referendum, Britain continues on its path toward leaving the EU....  
NYTimes: Manafort Working on Kurdish Referendum Opposed by U.S 
IKEA’s toilet brush holder inconspicuously named after ‘Brexit’ leader Nigel Farage  
Winston also says he'd put the national anthem to a referendum. No one ever sings it at the pub, he says. 
SCOOP: Manafort, struggling to pay legal bills, quietly working for Kurdish independence referendum opposed by U.S.  
Even if the Kurdish referendum fails to create an independent state in Iraq, the question is shaking up the region.  
I’m now positive @theresa_may is intentionally trying to derail Brexit. Hey @Conservatives, time to kick her out... 
Brexit creates serious harm to so many businesses .Year on @lemanoir have 50% less work applications from EU. our industry needs this skill 
Lord Heseltine tells Iain Dale Britain will one day join the Euro and Brexit may never happen.  
Brexit is a house built on sand. It will eventually collapse  
UK strikes research deal with US in run-up to Brexit - BBC News  
454 days since the referendum and still no cunning plan.Not even a stupid plan.No plan at all.  
Hammond and Treasury "On Manoeuvres" Against Brexit:  
Britain is ‘sleepwalking’ into a post-Brexit food price crisis, report claims  via @LondonEconomic 
Lib Dems keep banging on about having another referendum. They probably have a different question in mind but how about:Should the UK 
The US opposes the Iraqi Kurdistan Regional Government’s independence referendum & urges serious, sustained dialogue  
Aren't you even a little bit curious? Petition: The Government must publish its own Brexit Impact/Risk Assessments  
Nobody in politics or media who lobbied for Brexit deserves to keep their job. It's too much fuck up to retain any pretence of credibility. 
Catalonia referendum: Spain PM calls for 'escalation' to stop  
Brexit Wars the artwork by Morten Morland - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
2/ Stupefyingly pointless to ask Merkel to negotiate Brexit over Barnier's head. Illustrates, even now, total misunderstanding of EU dynamic 
*Brexit Explained*  
Dont buy into Brexit econ. forecasts. Do do warnings from freight forwarders/logistics ppl currently shi**ing themselves. Put you in touch? 
Alex Salmond's never read a book. Nicola Sturgeon doesn't know if there'll be a second independence referendum. "Journalists". 
Thousands gather to protest and defend Catalonia's right to vote on referendum  
Canadian press, sad reading; 'U.K. PM Theresa May, desperate for post-Brexit deals, plays a weak hand '  
Genuine Brexit question: When we rejoin the EU will it be called Brentrance or Brentry? 
Interesting to hear to opinions of IBEC on the consequences of #Brexit  
I'm happy to listen to the concerns raised by the Border Communities Against Brexit today  
Brexit hit squad  
Russell Brand, where do you stand on Brexit? "I source my emotional connection to politics beyond those parameters". Oh. #newsnight 
If Brexit was Apollo Neil Armstrong's capsule would currently be flying off into space. out of control and pissing out breathable air. 
Dear @UNThis right-wing, xenophobic, Brexit enabling, Trump-wannabe, doesn’t represent everyone in the UK.Thanks 
Glorious ceiling of @lyceumtheatre where I just saw What Shadows. Ian McDiarmid imperious as Enoch Powell. Brexit resonances throughout.  
Bet they showed Brexit was a fabulous thing for the country. That's why they decided to keep them secret.  
Catalan Education Minister @ClaraPonsati says the Spanish government is trying to prevent the referendum in 'undemocratic ways' #newsnight 
Pro-independence organizations call for a "long-term mobilization" to defend the referendum and ask for all arrested to be released 
"Amazing that UK’s foreign sec can publish 4,000-word article on UK’s Brexit future & NOT mention Irish border" 
Leavers seem terminally baffled as to why the EU is negotiating in the interests of its members. #Brexit #Remain #StopBrexit 
Brexit constantly conducted on some bizarre "need to know" basis.The thing is, seismic constitutional change & all that, we need to know.  
So David Davis wants Flemish leader to put a good word in. How many more times? Only we can save ourselves from a hard Brexit #newsnight 
Billionaires backed Brexit Why is labour delivering Brexit again ? 1% will benifit most 99% will have higher taxation & decades of debts   
So @DExEUgov admits to @MollyMEP it has analysed 50 sectors of economy on Brexit but refuses to publish them.  
11.30pm in Barcelona, some hundreds still protest against Spanish police raids. Almost 16 hours since anti-referendum operation started  
New #Brexit hit squad ready for action.  
Brexit will cost each household 13 times as much as being in EU. Surely no sane Labour Party/leader would want that@jeremycorbyn @UKLabour 
But only a week ago I read in Nick Timothy's column that the Cabinet was united over Brexit.   
Time isn’t on her side: Theresa May must set out her Brexit plan this week by @anandMenon1 & @jdportes in @guardian 
@Olotuit this evening! #catalonia #ref1oct #referendum #1oct #independence 
So, #Brexit is like going to the moon. But without a rocket 
The obscure EU law that could stop Brexit  
Banging pots is #Gràcia neigbourhood in #Barcelona against the Spanish gov. and acts today. #1O #referendum #viral #cassolada 
Farage Brexit, Johnson/Fox Brexit or Hammond/Starmer Brexit? Time for May to choose. Me & @anandMenon1 
Catalonia referendum: Spain PM calls for 'escalation' to stop  
Spanish Gvt continues with arrests, raids and seizures of ballot papers and referendum posters. Ships docked will house extra police.  
#Barcelona protest against Spanish repression towards a democratic referendum.We Want to Vote. That's all.  
Wonder when/if Uk will ask what Facebook content millions in #Brexit dark money was paying for, and where it came from  
The people of #Scotland stand with you #Catalunya on your journey towards your #independencia referendum#catalonia #democraciaSi #scotref 
Grenfell death toll may fall as 'fraudsters have invented missing loved ones'  via @telegraphnews 
Why, in numbers, we should fear for our democracy when Brexit makes the country poorer.  
Germany’s BIGGEST Brexit fear: Will Britain STOP buying German exports after EU exit...  
EU fears Theresa May 'will not be able to uphold Brexit pledges'  
What caused the earthquake in Mexico? A combination of Trump, Brexit & climate change. Compounded by racism. Definitely not plate tectonics. 
British patients could face drugs shortages and long delays for new medicines after #Brexit, writes Sky's @pkelso 
Author of Article 50 calls for Brexit to be halted, warning of ‘disastrous consequences’  
Read this. It is stone-cold brilliant. One for the history books. Brexit’s Irish Question  via @nybooks 
My last car was a BMW - my next will be made in the UK by a firm that believes in Britain after Brexit.  
Ah, the moon shot metaphor for Brexit! i.e we shouldn't have started the countdown before we'd built the rocket or even done the maths.  
Germany’s BIGGEST Brexit fear: Will Britain STOP buying German exports after EU exit... . We should buy British made? 
Apparently for @NicolaSturgeon only the prospect of losing another independence referendum transcends independence.  
My dad just died at 96. Liberal decorated RAF vet. Hated Trump,  Farage and the Tories and Brexit. 
Woman DEPORTED after she refuses to take off her niqab at airport security  via @Your Brexit 
We need a completely new Brexit hit squad to deliver the visionary deal we require - Allister Heath #premium 
70% of Catalonia in favour of holding an independence referendum. Spanish Govt dangerously out of touch on this. #Catalonia 
@JordiGraupera @BBCNews "The only way to stop this madness, is for the referendum on the 1st of october to happen". #1Oct #Votarem 
La CGTN (China Global Television Network):"CATALAN REFERENDUM CRISIS""Spanish police arrest Catalan official in crackdown". #1O #votarem 
EU fears Theresa May 'will not be able to uphold Brexit pledges'  
Protestors gather in Barcelona after Spanish police raid govt offices to block a referendum on the independence of the Catalan region.  
Brexit Britain plummets into economic growth slow lane as Italy overtakes UK  
Call me old fashioned,But i smell a ratRiddle deepens over Ruth Davidson & allegations of referendum election fraud  
I had to wade back out of the crowd to find some telephone coverage. There are so many people!! #Catalonia #lovedemocracy #referendum  
Today #democracy wins. The Spanish Executive played their cards all wrong. They lost.#Catalonia #CivilRights #Referendum #1O #LoveDemocracy 
2/2 @nicolasturgeon answer “I don’t know” was specifically abouttimescale for referendum not question originally published by @newstatesman 
"We wanted Brexit but we didn't want *this* Brexit. We wanted a good Brexit." Own. Your. Mistakes & Take. Responsibility. You. Motherfuckers  
No. Brexit is the product of an undemocratic EU led by 1 country reliving its desire to dominate and run other countries.  
If only you'd had a clue about how to manage a post-Brexit border when you campaigned for it, we wouldn't be having this problem, Sammy.  
The Act which provided for Brexit referendum said the vote had to take place before end of 2017.So all this could still be in future... 
Had the Article 50 notification been sent, as Corbyn demanded, in June 2016, the UK would now only have nine months left before Brexit. 
Heseltine: “Events” may give Remain-supporting Parliament a way out of #Brexit, and UK will eventually join the euro  
Unlike Nigeria, Barcelona defend Catalonia's right to hold referendum - Skyrock Daily  
LIVE on : Barcelona loves democracy #Catalonia #referendum  
A trade deal with the US would open up much of the #NHS to private companies, pleasing many leading Brexiters.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Spanish police have arrested senior Catalan officials as tensions rise over the region's independence referendum  
BREAKING: Catalan government activates a plan B to carry out the October 1st independence referendum. 
Like it or not, only the Canada model, not EEA-lite, is logically consistent with May's Brexit remarks at Lancaster House earlier this year. 
Confidence among British businesses is at the lowest level since Brexit  
WATCH | Fmr BoE chief Lord King calls on govt to prepare for 'No Deal' Brexit: "UK has to be ready to leave and trade on WTO arrangements."  
That €20bn Brexit “bill” reported by the FT today is really only bit of the overall bill. Remainder is FAR trickier. My attempt to explain:  
Brexit: Like voting for Trump, and getting Hillary. 
 No matter if Spain launches a major operation against referendum, Catalan President is sure about Oct 1 vote  . 
When will Remainers get it? Perhaps they never will! The UK will STILL be world #5 economy post-Brexit. Still a huge market. And desirable. 
So what if Brexit is difficult?  
Spain’s Guardia Civil raids Catalan government offices in big anti-referendum operation and arrests high-ranking officials  
Drugs should definitely be legalised. The stronger the better. That way we can all blott out the disaster of Brexit #FarageOnLBC @lbc 
People ask if Labour has position on Brexit and - if so - why it's so ambiguous. Here's the explainer. via @FT 
That's totally different to when the democratic Scottish Parliament voted for a second referendum but the UK government refused it, right? 
Nicola Sturgeon admits she may NEVER be able to hold a second referendum on Scottish independence  
Without Boris Johnson’s oratory and charm, Brexit wouldn’t have happened and the PM must listen to him  
#Breaking: #Iran Army deputy commander Gen. Pourdastan: we'll close our borders with #Iraq Kurdistan if they hold the referendum.  
Nigel Farage will stop paying TV licence after BBC airs comment linking him to death of Polish man  via @Your Brexit 
Brexit is a Steve Bannon/Cambridge Analytica production. It should be investigated thoroughly & exposed as invalid.  
WHATEVER the UK offers the EU bureaucrats will NEVER satisfy their greed or overcome their dogma. At some point, we'll just Brexit the EU. 
Met Catalans living in Ireland outside Leinster House protesting today's events & demanding the 1 Oct independece referendum is respected  
Fantastic News...EU set to REJECT Theresa May's £18bn #Brexit offerSo now NO excusesWTO Trade Rules here we come! 
Pleased to join SNP MSP colleagues signing this letter to @donaldtusk calling on him to intervene in #Catalonia #catalunya referendum crisis  
News of Spanish gov actions re referendum in #Catalonia is deeply worrying- EU must stand against this repression or lose all credibility! 
When forced ,  the Tory party tried to fix the referendum using every trick in the book.  
Surely that's @NicolaSturgeon doesn't know 'when' @theSNP would hold a 2nd indy referendum rather than 'if' otherwise it's a massive story!  
Right now in London. Demonstrating in favour of referendum #movilizacioncatalunaEsp 
Lord Heseltine tells @IainDale Britain will one day join the euro and Brexit may never happen  
Following @JunckerEU’s moment of honesty #Brexit is now mandatory for the survival of the UK.  
There is something familiar about #Brexit to Catalan separatists. Here a good read for those interested  
Government running scared of its own Brexit impact studies, says Green MEP | #MollyScottCato  
It's the latest Madrid-led offensive against Catalonia's proposed referendum on independence from Spain  
My speech at #LDConf on Brexit. The @LibDems will continue to lead the fight against this disaster - it is time for an #ExitFromBrexit. 
First big #Brexit meltdown. Expect similar catastrophes every month as Britain swirls the toilet bowl.   
Catalonia referendum: Protests over raids to halt vote  
For all the FibDems crying in my mentions today about Brexit (like a stuck record).... it was your idea in the first place. #YellowTories 
Spanish police raid Catalan government to halt banned referendum  
Wow - IDOX (voting software co quietly used in Brexit) owns MCLaren whose partner is top 10 Russia IT company  
."Fears that cliff-edge Brexit could ground flights as there are no historic rules to fall back on". 
"The Catalan government has no power to organize a secessionist referendum and it knows this"  
Iraqi Kurds' independence referendum slated for Sept. 25 raises fears of more chaos in Iraq and the Middle East  
Dear Leavers, do you not think it time to fess up and say maybe #Brexit is not such a good idea after all? You can't have wanted this mess. 
EU will make sure Brexit deal is NEGATIVE for Britain - ex-German envoy's shock admission. Stop buying German Cars!  
Government running scared of its own Brexit impact studies, says Green MEP | Molly Scott Cato MEP  
None of this affects the drivers of #Brexit. They're rich  and/or well-connected.But their victims aren't.The working poor will pay.  
Govt continues to block publication of its own studies into the impact of Brexit  
Brexit lies and how to fight them  
Nigel Farage warns BBC he will BOYCOTT licence fee until he gets apology for Brexit 'slur'  
Keep up the resistance @partit_pirata! - Catalonia referendum: Spain steps up raids to halt vote  
This banner hangs from the building while thousands have gathered in downtown Barcelona to protest against Spain's anti-referendum operation  
Barzani delivers emotional speech at Sulaimani referendum rally 
Should we air drop Liam in to Brexit negotiations? Yes, sir. We should, sir.  
Great meeting with & exquisite hospitality from Prime Minister @PMBarzani: Italy-KRI relations, #referendum, Erbil-Baghdad talks examined  
Important support of #Catalonia firemen @ANC_Bombers against Spain #CoupdEtat. #Referendum #independence #1oct We will vote 
Boris Johnson faces awkward 7-hour flight with PM after Brexit row  
Sold a mine for $25M bought fire trucks for $42M even if you factor inflation and brexit it’s still laughable 
Brexit? It ain't gonna happen! #CrumblingBrexit 
Theresa May's Canada trip has shown the terrifying type of Brexit we're heading toward  
The clean Brexit that the British most wisely voted for offers huge economic benefits | Professor Patrick Minford  
Ppl often talk of big events which cld break Brexit stalemate. Think there's two – one which wld push towards Remain, other towards Leave. 
Also awaiting response to #FOI on leaked study into impacts of #Brexit on #NHS, which revealed UK could be short of 40K nurses by 2026. 
'Concern' in #Brussels over #referendum raids and arrests today . 
Q. Why stage a referendum you know isn't legally binding? A. To keep a seat at the table. Renad Mansour on the Kurdish referendum in Iraq.  
Fair play to @GuyVerhofstadt taking time to see all sides and parts of Ireland and Brexit, I’ll be back over myself before long!  
Why has UK #Manufacturing gone past France into 8th in the world?  #brexit #euRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
CNN: "Catalan President blasts Madrid for 'illegal' referendum raids"   
Spanish Civil Guard arrest 12 in Barcelona in an attempt to block the Catalan independence referendum  
Govt say publishing #50SecretStudies would risk damaging UK’s negotiating position. That's code for #Brexit would be hugely damaging to UK. 
New info on the govt's #50SecretStudies on #Brexit shows it running scared of its own findings:  
Yes I imagine even Boris Johnson will be claiming he opposed Brexit it's just the newspaper printed the wrong article of the 2 he'd written!  
Comment: We are paying a high price for the Brexit farce  
Useful news aggregator (English, German, French, Spanish) for Catalan referendum by @Diplocat (tilts pro-vote):  
Video: Spanish raids over Catalan referendum  
European Parliament's Brexit co-ordinator: concern for Northern Ireland's peace process has not been "sufficiently present" in talks so far  
Sinn Féin MEP @M_AndersonSF has said the #Catalan people must be allowed to have their say in their independence referendum unhindered.  
Wee Ginger Dug: Here's why we’re going to win the next referendum  
Removing the right to freedom of movement will restore the privilege of the rich and powerful who will be completely unaffected.#Brexit 
FC Barcelona responds to Spain's armed suppression of the Catalan governments attempt to hold a referendum on Oct 1  
Catalonia referendum: Catalonian government 'de facto' suspended by Spain, President of region says 
European Parliament's chief Brexit rep says need to secure peace process hasn't been sufficiently emphasised during negotiations  
BBC 2011 - Sep 2017: "Spain Spain Spain Rajoy Spain Spanish Rajoy Rajoy Catalonia Catalonia referendum referendum Spain." BBC Sept 2017 -: 
The New York Times: As Catalonia Independence Referendum Nears, Madrid Escalates Tensions  
1. Keep Calm2. Non-violence, peaceful resistance3. We won't be provoked (some here not for referendum)4. Thanks, we'll win!#Catalonia 
As OECD  predicts UK to have slowest growth of G7 countries next year, its chief economist says 'Brexit will represent a serious shock.' 
My thoughts after meeting all the political forces in Northern Ireland involved in #Brexit here in Belfast today  
The view from your actual Canada: U.K. PM Theresa May, desperate for post-Brexit deals, plays a weak hand  
"We will win... because we fight for freedom!" - Never forget why we won this referendum, and why we must ensure the result is respected.  
FC Barcelona, among the organizations rejecting anti-referendum police operation  
Essential that the PM prepares for a No Deal Brexit now. If Heywood and co are obstacles to that, sack them now. 
Kurds in Iraq plan to hold an independence referendum despite opposition from Baghdad and neighbouring countries  
Is the Catalan secessionist conflict spinning out of control? Tensions mount as police detains referendum organizers  
A friend sent me this photo of #Kurdistan #YesKurdistan poster Kurdistan Students Union for referendum and #Peshmerga @BaxtiyarGoran 
EU moves to extend grip on financial sector after Brexit  
Over a year after the referendum and we are yet to hear any realistic & concrete proposals from the Govt  
BREAKING: Confirmation that Spanish police confiscated 10 million ballots set to have been used in Catalonia independence referendum. 
Spain (Catalonia): Police confiscates 10 million ballots. Independence Referendum was planned on Oct 1 (Diari ARA). #Catalonia #Katalonien 
Northern Ireland could stay in customs union after Brexit – Verhofstadt  
Brexit splits: what divides May, Johnson, Davis and Hammond on the big issues  
Parts of my interview for @trtworld from the #UN regarding #Turkey's oppsition to upcoming referendum in N. Iraq & President's speech  
Middle East gets even more complicated: so now Israel and Russia (tacitly) support Iraqi Kurdish referendum while Iran and US oppose it.  
Guy Verhofstadt says NI could remain in Customs Union after Brexit. The DUP must not be allowed to veto a deal.  
#Spain's government amps up attempts to prevent #Catalonia's independence referendum.  
Solution to Kashmir issue, One way one track #GoIndiaGoback . #UNGA Why india is running from Referendum in Kashmir. #ResolveKashmir #AZADI 
‘We, the undersigned, call upon HM Government to give the people of this country the final say on the Brexit deal’  
Support southern #Kurdistan's independence referendum! #Twitterkurds #Rojhelat #Basur 
.@proftommullen on last night's @scotlandtonight discussing potential Brexit 'power grab' by Westminster:  3:30-7:30 
Gabriel Rufián is the key Catalan secessionists need to succeed in their referendum  
"An illegal referendum". Making democratic votes illegal is the beginning of a slippery slope 
1994 Swedish and Norwegian EU Referendum Results By Municipality  
Spain's foreign affairs minister says he wants "clarity" about what Britain really want from Brexit  
Thousands-strong peaceful demonstration continues in front of Catalonia's Dpt of Economy in response to anti-referendum operation.  
'A vote for freedom': Jacob Rees-Mogg joins Lionel Shriver and Matt Haig in Brexit anthology  
Spain are up to some serious gowl acting with the Catalonian independence referendum. They've just arrested the Government of Catalan 
#Brexit: "The peace process and Good Friday Agreement must be secured. There can be no hard border in Ireland," @GuyVerhofstadt in Belfast 
Meeting @StephenFarryMLA & @DavidFordMLA in Belfast to hear opinion on Ireland issue #Brexit  
"Catalan referendum to go ahead despite Spain's totalitarian attitude"  
.@afneil Some political presenters report actual growth figures even if they are bad for Brexit. @faisalislam 
Official Statement by the President on the Spanish state's anti-referendum operation  
It is bizarre that it has been left to Boris Johnson to explain what the benefits of Brexit are, writes Lord Lawson  
Tony Blair says there's 30% chance Brexit won't happen - Politics live  
N.Ireland Brexit approaches:May: Ignore issue & hope it all works out.Verhofstadt: Try to find solutions by talking with the people.  
Danes are demanding we let them plunder our fisheries after Brexit - who do they think they are?!  
Not sure Standard readers are getting the best Brexit analysis…  
If EU wants to assert democratic credibility over Brexit, & not just be a competing elite to UK ones, time to step the fuck up on Catalonia. 
You’d think by now you’d have learned to take brexit-related growth forecasts with a pinch of salt.  
Brexit Britain plummets into economic growth slow lane as even Italy overtakes UK in latest forecast 
First photo of the new Brexit Custom System:  
You don't have to agree with @Nigel_Farage on Brexit to expect the BBC to report FACTS not lies about who is responsible for a man's death.  
UK economy to grow slower than any G7 country - and it's being linked to Brexit  
Roger Bootle: A post-Brexit Britain could be ‘more open, less protectionist and more competitive’  
Incredible situation in Catalonia, with Spanish police arresting public servants, seizing posters and ballot boxes to stop referendum. 
Bonkers Vince Cable compares Brexit to the deaths of hundreds of British soldiers - someone get him off the gin  
A Brexit solution for NI must be part of UK-wide solution. DUP will not countenance outcome erecting barriers to trade within UK market. 3/3 
Banner in #Slêmanî referendum festival: I fought for the world & the world turned its back on me. #KurdistanIndependence #twitterkurds 
What is happening in Catalonia right now should concern everyone. I support the Catalan's right to have their referendum. #CatalanReferendum 
Catalonia referendum: Spain steps up raids to halt vote - BBC News  
Was asked what May could do tomorrow to get the best Brexit. Short of inventing a time machine, it's hard to answer:  
.@moneillsf makes case for Brexit alternative for North  
Biggest threat to  UK industry after 2019?"Lack of #migration"- @BankofAmericaDo you laugh? Or do you cry?#Brexit 
The 'Will of the People' is a slogan used by dictators & demagogues to portray opponents as the 'enemies of the people'.#Remain #Brexit /1 
If Brexit takes us back to the 70s again I def want more Club biscuits this time round and Spangles. 
Why hasn't UK govt & UK Parliament been holding these meetings weekly, pre-referendum and post-referendum?Where the hell is the leadership??  
Spanish police arrest Catalan government officials ahead of 'illegal' referendum  
Remind me which party fought the 2010 election promising "a REAL referendum" on leaving the EU.  
President Puigdemont denounces a coup d'état in Catalonia but announces that this won't stop the referendum. Where is the @EU_Commission? 
#BREAKING: Barzani says negotiations with Baghdad could take one or two years with Baghdad after referendum#KurdistanVotes #Sulaimani 
Oppose Kurdish independence referendum:- Iraq- Turkey- Iran- US- UK- Spain- Germany- UN Secretary GeneralSupport:- Israel 
The great Brexit bus delusion  
UK economy to grow slower than any G7 country - and it's being linked to Brexit 
In 18 months' time, Brexit will be like the Iraq War. You'll be hard pressed to find anyone who admits to supporting it #stopbrexit 
Vodafone Orange and Movistar the 3 big telecom companies in Spain are blocking referendum websites 
HAVE YOUR SAY: Togo is to hold a referendum on a bill that will limit presidents to two terms in power. How would you vote and why? 
How will people react when full impact of Brexit becomes clear? They will say "you are our elected MPs - how did you allow this to happen?" 
I support the right of the Catalan people to choose theirfuture in a referendum & call on UK Govt to make clear it will respect thevote 
.@MBuhari again?  - Catalonia referendum: Spain steps up raids to halt vote  
'Remove your filthy hands from Catalan institutions' - Catalan PM blasts referendum raids  
To hell with Mrs May and her weakness. Give us a hard brexit and lets deal under WTO rules and retain a little pride. 
Retail sales may have risen, but UK debt is explosive – and it only needs a spark to light the fuse #Brexit #Remain 
Is 'peace' in NI threatened by Brexit? Yes- if we consider peace as the presence of justice and not just the absence of violence. 
Spanish police seizes 9 million ballots in major anti-referendum operation . 
Longest pending matter at the #UN after Palestine#Kashmir is a legal international dispute waiting for UN  referendum pic.twitter.com/A2FHWtEzXj 
This by @rowenamason is a terrifically useful Brexit exercise  
Final deal referendum petition now at 103k in just over a week! Let's keep it rolling! #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
This might be just about legal, but it's as immoral as it gets.#Brexit #StopBrexit #RemainInTheEU  
To those who continue to attack "no" vote proponents instead of the proposition, you do realise you are setting us up for a Brexit result? 
Mervyn King: "It doesn't make sense to say we're going to leave but stay in the single market and customs union"  
"We Are In A State Of Siege": Spanish Police Arrest Top Catalan Officials In Referendum Raids  
'Brexit presents a massive opportunity for our domestic industry.’ Listen to @LeaveMnsLeave board member @OwenPaterson on @BBCr4today 
Feels awfully like Brexit being used to attempt to re-impose a unitary state vision of UK. Politically that seems like a pretty bad idea 
Uncertainty around Brexit "makes life extremely difficult," WPP CEO Martin Sorrell says  
Brexit has potential to bring about significant economic gains for the UK  
Met with extremely informed Guy Verhofstadt who was very clear that NI having no Executive or policy during Brexit is problematic & bizarre  
In the finals days of the historic Kurdistan referendum bid, KDP & PUK meet in Slemani. Everyone looks so happy.  
SPAIN: Authorities arrest Catalan Minister as they continue in attempt to block independence referendum.  
.@moneillsf meeting @GuyVerhofstadt at Stormont today alongside @M_AndersonSF and @NiallSF to discuss impact of Brexit and special status  
“10,000 UK finance jobs affected in #Brexit's first wave” - will hit tax revenue too!A look behind the headlines: 
Government has formally responded to critical @LordsEUCom report on Brexit and devolution.  Response worth reading:  
Telegraph:Anger in Barcelona after Spanish police arrest Catalan minister and 12 officials in raids over referendum  
Not a single Nigel born in 2016. The year of Brexit. Sad! 
Anna Soubry Tells May: ‘I’ll Quit Tories Over Hard Brexit’ The majority of her constituents should deselect her!  
Right of vote prohibited in Catalonia: 9 millions of ballots to vote in the referendum have been seized by the Guardia Civil near Barcelona pic.twitter.com/fvSKz8YPMG 
Me when someone is mansplaining Germany's position on #Brexit to me. (My favourite.)  
As tensions rise, I'm reposting this via @thespainreport. What's happening in Catalonia is nearer to Trump & Brexit than Mandela & Gandhi.  
I'm meeting Arlene Foster and Diane Dodds to hear points of view on the Ireland issue #Brexit  
I've got news for Remainers: Leavers never cared about the Brexit bus, says Brendan O'Neill  
Comment: We are paying a high price for the Brexit farce  
Let's understand the true impact of Brexit. If these show milk, honey and sunlit uplands, maybe I'll come on board!  
In Stormont hearing all political forces involved in finding a workable solution for the Ireland issue in #Brexit talks 
Spain Has Hit Back At The Scottish Government After It Backed A Catalonian Referendum  via @JamieRoss7 
'Despite Brexit'  
#Prayfromdemocraci please help Catalonia to make democratic referendum  
Here's a really clear-eyed Guardian column about tensions in the May cabinet over Brexit.   
.@TiceRichard on @SkyNews: 'We need to accelerate the Brexit negotiations - we know exactly where we want to go'  
Spain has hit back at the Scottish government after it backed a Catalonian referendum  
Warning over food import delays if no Brexit deal  
Delighted our proposal for a referendum on public ownership of water is being accepted by the Government.  
OECD growth forecasts for 2018:Germany 2.1%France 1.6%Italy 1.2%UK 1%Thanks to #Brexit, Britain is trailing the field.#StopBrexit. 
After meet w/ @GuyVerhofstadt - @moneillsf says "At least he'd manners to come and hear concerns about Brexit...unlike any British minister"  
2 photos of the SAME Spanish @guardiacivil military police car in #BCN: Before & after trying to stop #Catalonia's #independence #referendum  
Sky News are reporting likely medicine shortages after Brexit... Should Children & Remainers get what is available?  
Canada ready to make a seamless post-Brexit trade deal with the UK. Predictions of UK pariah status wide of the mark  
#brexit backup plan  
Former BoE Governor Mervyn King says he doesn't think Brexit can be reversed without another referendum  
#BREAKING: Catalan president steadfast on Oct 1 referendum despite Spain's Guardia Civil raids and arrests  
The official govt position is that Brexit will cost more than it saves (source @PJTheEconomist) Why is anyone denying this? Lunacy. 
Tsk, look at Rihanna, pointing and laughing at Brexit Britain, talking the country down. Just get behind it and make it work, RiRi.  
#Brexit Coordinator @GuyVerhofstadt meeting with DUP and Sinn Féin leaders and MEPs in Stormont this morning. More @  
EU leaders are expecting Theresa May to offer €20bn for the so-called Brexit divorce bill, according to reports  
Leaving the customs union to make our way in the world through free trade is one of our key Brexit opportunities   
Peacefull concentration #brussels asking @JunckerEU @EuropeanCommiss What will EC do? #handsoffcatalonia #referendum #votarem we will vote!! 
U.K. PM Theresa May, desperate for post-Brexit deals, plays a weak hand  
Outrage all over #Catalonia for detentions of high-ranking Catalan government officials to block referendum #Tortosa 
Remember when the Remainers told us European investment would dry up because of the #Brexit vote?  
Michelle O'Neill with the Sinn Féin delegation preparing to meet EU Parliament Brexit Co-ordinator @GuyVerhofstadt this morning 
Peacefull concentration #brussels @EuropeanCommiss   What will EC do? Spain commits coup d'etat on Catalonia #handsoffcatalonia #referendum  
Illegalities of Brexit referendum are many: one is this - 'emails seen by openDemocracy show how Vote Leave gave a student £675,000 – ' 
At 12.30 today, President @KRLS will give an official statement on the Spanish government's aggressive anti-referendum operation. Stay tuned 
Spanish police storm Catalan government buildings to stop independence referendum  #MovilizaciónCataluñaESP 
We originally proposed this referendum in 2014 and are delighted to see the govt going ahead with a vote #ourwater  
Just 5 men paid for 61% of Leave campaign. Together with off-shore owned press Brexit was victory of the rich, for the rich, by the rich  
Why Brexit will die on the vine...By the time things crystalise the reasons for leaving will be forgotten & the compromises will be silly  
“Civil rights can not be suspended,” says Podemos leader Pablo Iglesias referring to anti-referendum operation . 
This morning, officers of the @guardiacivil raided Government buildings as part of @interiorgob's anti-referendum operation 
Major survey by @fsb_policy . #SmallBusiness pessimism. Worst since #Brexit #referendum. 1 in 8 plan downsize or close. Are we surprised? 
Support Catalonia's right to an independence referendum. Demo at the Spanish Consulate in Edinburgh, 1 October. 
Thousands in streets after Spain's military police arrests top officials over independence referendum. GALLERY -->  
LATEST: Spain's crackdown on Catalonia's referendum has intensified. #CatalonianReferendum 
Is a £18 billion Brexit bill too high? 
The real saboteurs are the Tory fantasists backing hard Brexit | Rafael Behr  
Before his exhibition opens here nxt  week #GraysonPerry talks Brexit, masculinity & gentrification with @bristol247  
This week's issue: Brexit wars  
Spanish police storm Catalan government buildings to stop independence referendum  
#UPDATE Spain's Guardia Civil police arrest 13 Catalan government high-officials and raid 22 buildings in major anti-referendum operation  
International Media on NA 120 Referendum!  
'Good news keeps coming!' Sadiq Khan SAVAGED for 'Remoaner' views in HEATED Brexit clash  
In @BBCWorld "Catalonia referendum: Spanish police target Catalan government" 
UPDATE: Our reporter in Catalonia: Police looking for "evidence of support by regional government of the referendum" 
Ara a The @guardian "Catalan government officials arrested amid referendum row" 
V pleased to present new fortnightly @theipaper column: How Tory WhatsApp explains the Brexit gap they can't bridge  
None of this was ever spelt out. Brexit was sold on undeliverable vague soundbites like take back control 
Thousands of people are protesting against the Guardia Civil coup d'ètat outside Catalan Ministry of Economy in Barcelona #referendum  
Brexit? What Brexit? Foreign investors have been investing big time in London office space  
REASONS FOR SUPPORTING BREXIT 2016 TO 2017  
'The next financial crisis is coming. Corbyn in combination with Brexit would pretty much guarantee it' #premium 
Read Colin Harvey's 'explainer' on Brexit and N.Ireland: #lovequblaw 
Yeah, the Trump/Russia investigation is going to come to a head. And when he goes down, Brexit Britain goes with him. #AlternativeWar 
Turkey's Erdogan warns of possible sanctions over Iraqi Kurdish referendum  
To get a sense of how quickly Brexit sights are falling, watch them celebrate Canada allowing us to replicate an EU trade deal. 
Nicola Sturgeon and Carwyn Jones demand Theresa May alters Brexit Bill to protect devolution.  
ICYMI: Vince Cable at #LDConf says "Brexit is being managed by people who would struggle to get their heads around a toddlers’ lego set." 
Really smart and assured piece on Brexit lies from @ProfKMorrell 
Wow Spanish police have arrested a Catalan junior minister over the #oct1 referendum. This is getting hot quickly  
Looking forward to speaking at @UK_Music's event on Brexit & music at #Lab17 in Brighton. Pls do come along for what will be an imp debate! 
Let's not forget citizens' rights for Florence speech.If there are logjams on cash and Ireland then that is other current big Brexit issue. 
Verhofstadt isn't a "Brexit negotiator". Has no official standing in #EU Brexit team & is just making mischief.NI should show him the door.  
Catalonia referendum: Spanish police target Catalan government  
Catalan govt holds extraordinary meeting after Spain's Guardia Civil raids against referendum in 9 Catalan executive buildings  
No expert like but you being a racist pisshead philanderer has probably caused them more misery? 
When @BorisJohnson talks about 'split allegiances' he's dividing the country along the lines of nationalist hate and paranoia. #Brexit 
JACOB REES-MOGG was on Sky given his positive vision of Brexit! Watch Now!   
BBC again accused of undermining Britain with anti-Brexit coverage  
#Labour will trash the country,#tories think it's ok to ignore #brexit vote! I have no one to vote for in my country! 
#BREAKING #Catalonia: Map of offices of Catalan Government raided by Spanish militarised police at the moment. #democracy #1o #referendum  
Anna Soubry Tells May: ‘I’ll Quit Tories Over Hard Brexit’  BETTER IF YOU QUIT NOW 
Sorry. PM may is working out ways to tell the public how she is going 2 pay £billions to the undemocratic EU & keep paying after Brexit.  
The British people should get the final say on any Brexit deal in a referendum. Agree? Add your name:  
Iraq's rulings against Kurdistan's referendum - insisting it's unconstitutional, makes it impossible to entertain a postponement. 
Spain’s Guardia Civil raids Catalan government HQ amid referendum row  
 MP Gabriel Rufián : "For each one (elected officials) of us you take, there are 100's ready to take our place."#Catalonia #Referendum   
Lib Dem Leader: "Cancel Trump visit!" "Hold Second EU Referendum!"Can somebody break it to him that they lost?  
This is a very risky move - #Catalonia referendum - Spanish police target Catalan government  
It's almost like brexit was never about role of EU in our lives, but capacity of debate to kill or promote Tory leader contenders...  
Brexit talks going extremely well. Theresa May's just hammered out an excellent deal with Boris Johnson. C'mon Britain, we can do this! 
People didn't vote for "the great unknown", they voted for a free, painless #Brexit that unfortunately never actually existed  
BBC News - Catalonia referendum: Spanish police target Catalan government  
#UPDATE Spain's Guardia Civil police arrest 12 #Catalan high-ranking officials in big anti-referendum operation . 
Why is the OBR's £300m weekly cost of Brexit not being widely reported? Boris' incorrect figures were wall to wall. 
No. Brexit is the product of 17.4 million Brits voting for freedom.  
Edinburgh solidarity demonstration planned for the day of the Catalan independence referendum  
Spanish police arrest Catalan junior economy minister in morning raids as referendum row grows 
The centrist vote will to go to the Libs I'm afraid. May has totally ignored the 48% with her divisive Brexit plans. She's blown it. 
Problem is that when studies published, the impact will make #brexit indefensible in national interest. 
We're in this #Brexit mess because the Hard Right tightened their grip on the Conservative party.One nation Toryism has run for cover  
V clear public interest in @DExEUgov publishing its analysis of Brexit impact on 50+ sectors. Refusal to do so shouldn't stand under FOI Act 
Spanish police target Catalan government buildings as crackdown on referendum intensifies. #1Oct #Catalonia  
Spain’s Guardia Civil raid Catalan government HQ amid referendum row  
Deutsche Bank, supposedly going to leave due to Brexit, just signed a lease for 25 yrs for a major Eu HQ in EC2.  
Spanish police storm Catalan government buildings to stop independence referendum  
Demonstrators gather around officices of Catalan government to protest ongoing police operation against referendum on independence  
UPDATE: Citizens gather in the department of Economy to protest against anti-referendum operation  . 
Catalonia referendum: Spanish raid government buildings  
#Brexit could force businesses and QEQM hospital to shut without deal over EU migrant workers, Kent MP claims. 
Confidence among British businesses is at the lowest level since Brexit  
#Government splits mean it can't choose between the 2 unpalatble #Brexit options - both are bad in different ways: 
May's Brexit offer of 2 years payments of €10bn, as we + FT reported, is not without problems/1 
Calling himself a 'proud saboteur' of #Brexit, Lib Dem's Cable appeals for help to stop EU exit  via @WJames_Reuters 
Owen Paterson is just another of those arrogant and deluded Brexit fools who say they "don't agree" when presented with cast-iron evidence. 
HoC petition on 2nd ref on Brexit deal passes 100k! Parlt MUST consider debate. Keep signing to add moral impetus.   
Anna Soubry Tells May: ‘I’ll Quit Tories Over Hard Brexit’ – PIPO NEWS  
Police breaks in Catalan Ministries of Economy, Foreign Affairs, Labor and Social Affairs and others to seize referendum's documentation!  
Sovereignty belongs to the people. We the Indigenous People of Biafra have made our demands clear,All we want is Referendum,Peaceful Exit.  
#BREAKING: One high-ranking official of the Catalonian government arrested by #Spain’s civil guard amid referendum row.  
Alan Duncan, asked if he has any thoughts on Brexit divorce bill: "I don't have thoughts at 8 O'clock in the morning of that sort." #r4today 
#BREAKING Guardia Civil police arrests Catalan Secretary General of Economy Ministry in big anti-referendum operation 
If Brexit is such a fragile project that it can be ruined by journalists discussing it, perhaps we shouldn’t do it. 
#Spain threatens to cut the electricity in polling places in Catalonia ahead of the independence referendum according to local news outlets.  
#UPDATE Spain's Guardia Civil raids 3 Catalan govt departments in a big anti-referendum operation: Economy, Foreign Affairs, Social Affairs 
'No warrant, no problem!' How @marianorajoy's gov is fighting dirty to squash Catalonia's dream of a democratic referendum on independence  
Science after Brexit will be weaker all round  
Unfortunately I see very few of these values in the Tweets of Brexit supporters.  
Kurdish President @Masoud_Barzani gives #Baghdad three days to provide an alternative to the independence referendum.  
#BREAKING Spanish police search Catalan government headquarters amid referendum row:  official 
Owen Paterson is so out of touch of reality... The price of food has already gone up since the vote for Brexit #r4today 
Reports police are raiding the headquarters of the Catalan government in the latest offensive against the Oct1 referendum on independence 
BREXIT: Boris stays in Cabinet but May looks set to pay billions to Brussels during transitional Brexit. 
BREAKING: Spanish military police raiding several ministries of the Catalan government in an operation against the referendum. 
#BREAKING Spain's Guardia Civil enters Catalan govt's Ministries of Economy and Foreign Affairs in another effort to stop indy referendum  
NA-120 by-election seen as referendum on Nawaz: NYT  
The obscure EU law that could stop Brexit  
Saw this at the West End Green busstop. @tulipsiddiq can you help? #remain #brexit  
Tony Blair says there’s a 30% chance of Brexit being reversed  
There's no surer way for Conservatives to surrender power to Corbyn's Labour Party than by leaving Brexit voters feeling... betrayed.  
Problem in gov that only people who focus on practical detail of how to Brexit are the ones who didn't vote for it.  
10,000 UK #Finance jobs affected in #Brexit's first wave (creating huge loss in tax revenue). @Reuters survey 
While we wrangle over a stupid Brexit, this is the real crisis facing the country  
Briefing War on who won May-Johnson war. Both damaged. He's guilty of blond ambition but she'll no longer be able to ignore him on Brexit 
Oh the irony #Brexit causes inflation so poorer Brits spend more in German supermarkets. No #Brexit bonus here. @EK_EuropeanMove @Labour4EU 
Trump said 'I am Brexit' in an election rally. How true: a dangerous fantasist, crude, stupid, thoughtless, destructive & retrogressive. 
Spain takes control of Catalonia's finances to block independence referendum  
Tory Gov. Minister admits “Scots Indy Referendum was rigged”  
The real saboteurs are the Tory fantasists backing hard Brexit | Rafael Behr  
The Big Story | The #AgeLimit Debate: Should we have a referendum or not? Share your views using #MorningAtNTV 
This is brexit in a nutshell.  
Boris Johnson opens up about quitting UK cabinet over Brexit  
This flippancy about something as serious as the #Irish border post #Brexit is reckless & shameful but of course #Ireland 'over there' 
People putting up Catalan referendum posters in Blanes #WeVoteToBeFree #empaperem 
I am Kurdish and I proudly support the referendum for an independent Kurdistan happening Sept…  
How to stage an illegal referendum on independence from Spain: secret ballots and encrypted messages  
Kurdish referendum: Turkey's Erdogan demands vote be called off  
A poet for the age of Brexit: revisiting the work of A. E. Housman, by Adam Kirsch  
Colin Firth on his roots in India,his rootedness 2 England post Brexit,&why MrDarcy/Harry Hart aren't real #Kingsman  
The Kurdish Referendum and Barzani’s ‘Fate’@burhanduran 
Catalan mayors exercise right to remain silent in referendum questioning  
Morning @Jacob_Rees_Mogg when your butler wakes you with tea, egg & soldiers take a good look at what you've done! 
Thanks! Not a ring leader. But I'd luv to know if you all find anything of interest on Brexit and it's use of IDOX tabulation software :-) 
The Iraqi president withdrew from UNGA to address the Kurdish referendum:  
The only living Beatle who hasn't endorsed Brexit   
Funny how @UCDSU's pinned tweet is for #repealthe8th and showing support after the referendum yet Katie Ascough is forcing her own views  
#inners HRC says Trump/Brexit/Kenya all linked to Mercer owned Cambridge Analytica  
Time to put an end to the waste and get taxes down to 2015 levels..this election is a referendum on taxes at City Hall. #sjpoli #nlpoli #yyt 
We need Biafra referendum, Biafra must be free from the oppressors. 
Interesting letter from Belgian Tax official to #FT on implications for all of Ireland of a post #Brexit UK leaving SM & CU @robheiveld pic.twitter.com/3PGJa2WXAm 
What a joke. There has been nothing but criticism and negativity about Brexit across all media platforms since June 2016  
You don't live in Scotland & you spout BOT linesDo me a favour & take your sad Imperialist Rule Britannia schtick & shove it up your Brexit  
Another Brexit benefit, for somewhere else. Way to go Brexshiters, way to go! Brafuckingvo.  
The British people should get the final say on any Brexit deal in a referendum. Agree? Add your name:  
In a world where raising Q's on #Brexit is somehow only ever "Remoaning", helps to have Leavers doing grilling too  
When the poster boy for Brexit is Boris, you know you are fishing at the shallow end of the gene pool 
Today Jacob Rees-Mogg used 2015 manufacturing figures to argue the Brexit vote of 2016 made manufacturing stronger. Such an intellectual. 
The Kurdish Peshmerga special forces deployed to Kurdish oil rich city Kerkuk to secure the independence referendum  
The Wee Ginger Dug - "Scotland’s second independence referendum is going to produce a Yes vote."#ScotRef #VoteYES 
Calling @UKLabour MPs & members attending the Brighton conference. You know #Brexit will damage Britain, time to put country before party. 
Vince, we are leaving. Change the record. Sly attempts to derail Brexit & thus jeopardise our future to suit your pro- EU agenda will fail.  
"I want all the benefits of society but only for myself" also closely related to the spirit of brexit 
Another one moving out because of Brexit. Anyone keeping a list? 
Ireland, Brexit and the problem of a crude & naive reborn English nationalism #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
What this graph indicates is that, contrary to #LeaveLies, EU immigration does not hit wages paid to native Britons. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
This is the official Guarda Civil website gloating it is seizing Catalan referendum material. This is not democracy. This is repression.  
Images here quite painful to look at: police scuffling with referendum supporters as clampdown intensifies  
HMG Brexit forecast: UK will lose £50m per week not gain £350m and subsidies for Agrig and Science would be extra 
Catalan mayors exercise right to remain silent in referendum questioning  
Petition for a 2nd referendum based on the actual facts of a deal just passed 100k: retweet and sign to #StopBrexit  
Flemish MPs denounce Spain's "increasing repression" and support #1Oct #referendum  
Repression on Terrassa city: this is what demonstrators providing support to #1Oct referendum have got from Spanish police  
Post-Brexit deal with Canada will be BETTER than Brussels' agreement - leading economist  
This is utter bollocks. In point of fact, Boris has large support among the Tory grassroots due to his Brexit stance. What revolt?!  
Your reminder that reaching a deal with the EU is not a condition of Brexit. We leave March 2019. We can even stop talking to them. 
Wednesday's Times: "Johnson to back off in Brexit deal with May"  #BBCPapers (via @MsHelicat) 
Update: this petition has topped 100k. Govt must now consider idea of referendum on final deal for parliamentary debate.  
.@FedericaMog on the proposed Kurdish referendum in #Iraq 
I see Brexit negotiations are progressing nicely  
Climbdown? Boris steps back from resigning after accepting the PM’s new cash plan to break Brexit deadlock; 
Unfortunately bringing facts and reasoned argument to a Brexit debate is like bringing a sponge to a knife fight. A Victoria sponge. 
Shame on @PPopular! Spanish Parliament does not support the government actions against the Catalan referendum  
This his how post truth works. Jacob Rees Mogg completely distorts a report to claim Brexit is a success >1200RTs. The rebuttal get 22RTs!  
Join us in standing in solidarity with Catalonia in support of their independence referendum. #CataloniaIsNotSpain @CatalansForYes @ANC_USA 
Off for short break & going try not to tweet. Imagine a regular stream of tweets saying Brexit/Trump/Tories are bad and you won't miss me. x  
Lloyd’s of London firm moves European base to Dublin over Brexit  
#Brexit is the imposition of xenophobic racist English nationalism on the whole of the UK through a strategy of lies told by liars.  
Brexit : EU Budget is just 1% Public Expenditure. But EU Accounts for 40% our export markets. So to save 1% we risk 40% UK exports = Stupid 
It used to be called realism, not hubris. Brexit doesn't matter that much for Germany. Why should it care? It's mainly a domestic UK problem 
What did the EEF - whose report Rees-Mogg is furiously spinning - have to say about Brexit? Only 5% of its members supported it. /3  
Senior source from Catalan government says "everything is going forward". B-plans activated to guarantee referendum  
A high Brexit price tag: Theresa May is preparing to offer the EU at least €20bn to fill its post-Brexit budget hole  
Breaking scoop: May prepares €20bn EU budget offer to break Brexit logjam  via @FT 
Some heroic spinning by Eton-educated, Brexit supporting Hedge Fund manager @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. But what's the real story? /1 
Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal - Just 500 more signatures to reach 100,000! Nearly there!  
Belfast supporting Catalan Independence Referendum. Spain out of Catalonia. Britain out of Ireland. #UnityRef 
The Establishment may not want a Canada-plus Brexit, but it'd most certainly suit the British people 
Agreed Hilary. But when this shambles of a government finally comes up with a Brexit deal why not let the British people have the final say?  
 if @BBCNews want more diversity they should find a presenter who supports Brexit 
Reminder: When he thought #Leave were going to lose, Farage wanted a 2nd referendum, a straight replay of the first.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
A Kurdish tenth-grader writes to @realDonaldTrump ahead of the referendum, asking: Is democracy the wrong path?  
Lloyd’s of London firm moves European base to Dublin over Brexit  
La @guardiacivil  requisa en Unipost  notificaciones de las mesas electorales del referéndum  
Talks with PM @Theresa_May at #UNGA. We agreed to meet in London Tuesday next week to discuss #Brexit.  
Bexit Undefined - new tee from People's March for Europe. Show the world what you th8ink of Brexit #rethinkbrexit  
On my way to Belfast, Dublin & the border for meetings w/ all the political forces involved to discuss #Brexit. Updates will follow  
Liberal Democrat leader Sir Vince Cable has called on "political grown-ups" from all parties to stop #Brexit  
Interesting @xtophercook piece on what gov wld be doing (and isn't) if were seriously pondering no-deal-Brexit  
Tomorrow @ScotNational Wee Ginger Dug @weegingerdug on why we will win the next indy referendum  
Brexit a result "of fraudulent, frivolous campaign led by 2 groups of silly public school boys reliving dormitory pillow fights"~Vince Cable 
Guess who is gonna stop Brexit!  
Well that should make her mind up if nothing else. #brexit 
As the author of this piece, I would like to point out these are 2015 figures, so this really has zero to do with Brexit 
98,804 signatures! Let's try for 100k before midnight!Petition for a final deal referendum #StopBrexit #Brexit 
UK Left trying to undo Brexit is no diff than Dems/media trying to destroy Trump. Resentment & conceit rule them, screw the will of the ppl. 
Catalonia referendum: Spanish raid on Unipost deals blow to vote  
If the #Brexit referendum had followed the same voting rules as the Scottish Indyref of 2014, #Remain would have easily won. #StopBrexit 
I met a few city folks today who were (genuinely) more anxious about the economic effects of a Corbyn government than Brexit  
HRC says Trump/Brexit/Kenya all linked by Mercer owned Cambridge Analytica Need to stop Mercer Election interference 
Old voters tended to vote #Leave but there’s a substantial flip to back towards #Remain amongst the oldest. #Brexit 
Scottish Government publishes list of 111 post-Brexit powers under threat from the UK  
#EUref result will soon turn into the equivalent of Hillary Clinton's emails. No matter how bad #Brexit gets: "But the referendum result!" 
If #Brexit is divorce what's going on in Spain with Catalonia is domestic abuse of the extremist kindDo we stand by and watch?#Catalunya 
Was it the UK or Scot gov that excluded "bloody immigrants" from a major referendum vote? Surely the guilty one is the most nationalist. 
'Good news keeps coming!' @SadiqKhan SAVAGED for 'Remoaner' views in HEATED Brexit clash  
People singing #elssegadors in front of the Spanish Police in their registry to #unipost #terrassa searching printed papers of #referendum  
Tonight's topics. 1. Trump 2. Germany and Brexit 3. France and Islam  
First appearances at prosecution offices of #Catalan mayors charged with collaborating with the referendum . 
Erdoğan at #UNGA : I call on KRG to cancel the planned referendum which could easily destabilize Iraq even more  
Macron: France won’t stand against Kurdistan referendum 
Erdogan says KRG’s independence referendum could spark new conflicts in the region  
How the UK Government overlooked Scotland's legal system in the Brexit Bill.  
Let's be clear. Norway model and Canada model are not 2 different bases for Brexit. The former is a type of associate membership. 
Think you're right. Let's just leave the #EU now as we are entitled to do under Article 50 and use WTO trade rules - job done!#Brexit  
I have written on why I think what govt is doing doesn't match what it says on Brexit:  
BREAKING: Hundreds protest against Spanish police officers who are raiding a messenger service in Terrassa looking for referendum material.  
CJ Maraga: If leaders are tired of having a strong and independent Judiciary they should call for a referendum and abolish it #KTNPrime 
Then stand up to them, Hilary, and oppose Brexit. It's a pig's ear, there's no silk purse available. 
Even on the basis of a rigged #Brexit electoral franchise, demographics alone will eliminate the #Leave majority by late 2019.#StopBrexit 
John Major on the Tory Brexiters: "The NHS is about as safe with them as a pet hamster would be with a hungry python."#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Theresa May says Cabinet - including Boris Johnson - is 'absolutely united' on Brexit. Johnson says the cabinet is a nest of singing birds  
The Catalan branch of Podemos has voted to call on the public to take part in the Oct 1 independence #referendum . 
BBC again accused of undermining Britain with anti-Brexit coverage  
#BREAKING: French Pres. Emmanuel Macron says #France won't oppose referendum, urges Barzani to include all #Kurdistan Region's components. 
Wow, Spanish Parliament votes against initiative to support Spanish Govt actions against the #referendum because PSOE votes against  
Michelle O’Neill to meet Europe’s top Brexit official  @moneillsf 
.The car makers are in revolt against Brexit. 
UKIP support was lowest in the areas of highest immigration.One could say that familiarity breeds content. #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
Well Done Brexidiots: Lloyds of London to become Lloyds of Dublin because of Brexit  
Furious Maraga demands an end to judicial lynching by politicians,dares them on anti-judiciary referendum #TheBigQuestion w/@HusseinMohamedg 
Kurdish FM: Iraq’s judiciary doesn’t function, Supreme Court ruling suspending referendum won’t affect Region  
Nigel.If you refuse to pay the BBC license fee I guarantee many people will follow. We are all sickened by their biased anti brexit news. 
This is worst thing about Brexit. Means we have to lose a decent section of our working lives talking about trade arrangements. 
After referendum, told a Swiss journalist that I figured there'd be some work covering Brexit for at least 2 years. He laughed. "Try 15!" 
In a report about Brexit, BBC Reporting Scotland's Brian Taylor just referred to Scotland and Wales as "the devolved territories" 
Genuinely feel pity for those bored by Brexit. Most don't even know it's all they'll hear about for next ten years. 
Does Britain know what it wants from Brexit? @jennirsl and @IainDale debate 
One of Lloyd’s of London’s largest insurance syndicates is to move its European HQs to Dublin because of Brexit 
Togo 'will hold referendum on presidential limit' after thousands join continued protests across the country  
So Boris is/isn't/is happy with May's approach to Brexit and isn't/is/isn't considering resigning. He is/is/is a bufoon. 
."Experts say these 52 words could be enough to keep Britain in the single market & even scupper Brexit entirely". 
Brexit raises doubts over Britain's fintech future  
Self serving journos make up crap just to keep themselves in jobs. I know. I've worked with them. #Brexit 
Johnson is holding May to ransom, preventing #Brexit breakthrough & next stage talks & risking cliff edge chaos. She should sack him. 
.@jeremycorbyn supporting Brexit is a political choice you have made which will affect people's lives across our country.  
Referendum for a Free Kurdistan must be held as scheduled. The world must see their generations long sacrifices and support their freedom. 
97.5k signatures! Let's try to get past 100k this evening!Petition for a final deal referendum #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Revealed: Labour MPs plot to remain in customs union and agree a Brexit deal at any cost  
Nobody is calling for him to resign.Except the anti-British, anti-Brexit, whingers in the UK propaganda machine they call 'media'.  
#BREAKING The Catalan branch of left-wing Podemos to call supporters to vote in Oct 1 referendum 
This is the EU deal with Canada from which the UK will benefit from Thursday, then lose if there's a Brexit, & have to renegotiate.  
O look, Brexit is a disaster. 
The most pathetic thing about Brexit is the negotiations with the EU. The most exciting thing the negotiations with the 38 other countries. 
For those still confused by the £350m a week Brexit row - I've put this together, based on the 2016 ONS pink book:  
'SNP isn't pushing for #indyref2, we want to see what this #Brexit deal will be, although we fear it'll be a disaster' - @glasgowcathcart 
Jacob Rees Mogg on Brexit... "there has been too much Eeyore and not enough Red Rum". 
Jacob Rees Mogg on Brexit debate: "There's been too much eye-ore, we need a bit more Red Rum." 
One of Lloyd’s largest insurance syndicates to move European HQ to Dublin over Brexit, Irish PM announces  
Photo of the Day: Lebanese Kurds demonstrate in support of Iraqi Kurdish independence referendum, Martyrs' Square, Beirut, Lebanon, Sept. 17  
Theresa May can use Boris Johnson to strengthen her hand in the Brexit negotiations, says @AndrewGimson 
The Brexit pretext is being used to rip up devolution and centralise power around the Tories. We all need to work together to fight it.  
After the past few days, it is very hard to avoid the conclusion that the Government is in a complete shambles over Brexit. 
Lloyds of London to become Lloyds of Dublin because: Brexit  
Protesters with posters of #Catalonia's #independence #referendum face Spanish military police in search of mail #indyref docs in #Terrassa 
The Establishment may not want a Canada-plus Brexit, but it'd most certainly suit the British people - By Patrick Minford  
More than a dozen companies have chosen Ireland for their ops post #Brexit incl. @XLCatlin - View the Infographic - 
As fallout from Boris Johnson #Brexit comments continues, Theresa May insists government is united  
I simply don't accept the premise of the question. Brexit must be stopped. 
The UK Government EU Referendum postal voting guide showed you where to mark your ballot paper! pic.twitter.com/yXdb8clD6I 
Would people who voted for #Brexit mind paying an additional £300 million a week in taxes please? Asking for 48 million friends... 
WATCH: Angela Merkel gets BLASTED by hecklers at rally screaming ‘MERKEL MUST GO’  via @Your Brexit 
Lloyd’s of London firm XL Group moves European base to Dublin over Brexit  
"Vince Cable" says "Government couldn't assemble a #LEGO set let alone #Brexit" Leave it to the European experts!  LEGO AGAINST BREXIT!  
Post-Brexit trade is one of the biggest opportunities of Brexit, with exports up a massive 11.4% since the EU Ref!   
Catalan mayor of Moià orders the local police to put back the referendum posters that they took down, or face prosecution.  
It's worth remembering that preparation for "no deal" Brexit requires vast expensive infrastructure works. No such plans are being made. 
The UK Govt gave the people a Referendum on the EU then forced the people to pay £9m for propaganda telling us we needed to Remain in it. pic.twitter.com/xs5rqlIX1J 
Protesters sitting down to prevent Civil Guard to leave the search area looking for #1oct referendum material. #Catalonia #Terrassa 
Let us be clear: we would like to deny in the most categorical terms that our plans for Brexit are in disarray.We’d really like that. Yes. 
‘What could Theresa May do in her big bumper Brexit speech in Florence this Friday? Seven options.’ A thread.1/ 
Broadcasters are letting us down over Brexit. They should credit us with a bit more intelligence:  
I do not support Brexit in any form. 
"Civil Guard started the search of Unipost without an official warrant; they held up envelopes to the light to see if related to referendum"  
Obviously doesn't think much of the intelligence of 17.4 million UK citizens who considered the evidence & their experience & voted Brexit. 
And the boys of the Jacob Rees-Mogg ChoirStill singing: “We won’t pay!”“Not a brass farthing from us!”“It’s Brexit Day!” 
Bent banana's fight back against brexit. #bananasforEU #Fightback 'We feel misrepresented" they said in a Daily mail interview 
Better get used to it. This is what Brexit looks like. The OBR says it will cost £15bn pa. That money must be found.  
Vince Cable has used his Lib Dem party conference speech to warn that Brexit is a 'looming disaster'.  
Brexit prompts XL Group to move European base to Dublin  
When we know what Brexit means, the people should get the choice. The Government deal or an #ExitFromBrexit 
If Mark Carney was CFO of a private company & he spoke down the company way he does the UK economy, he would be sacked on the spot.#Brexit 
Brexit is the product of a fraudulent, frivolous campaign led by 2 groups of silly public school boys reliving their dormitory pillow fights 
Tony Blair says there’s a 30% chance of Brexit being reversed  
Bank of England Mark Carney:WRONG about UK economy & interest ratesWRONG to reduce interest rates last yearWRONG for further QE#Brexit  
The SNP has been warned not to “sow division” on Brexit: 
#BorisJohnson , the  #nhs  and the #Government divisions, chaos, contradictions & confusion on #Brexit  
Motion passed at 2016 conference  "the option of retaining EU membership should be retained." JC had it dropped, to push hard Brexit 
UK will GIVE Brussels £20.475bn in NET EU BUDGET CONTRIBUTIONS between now and when we're scheduled to Brexit at the end of March 2019.OBR 
WATCH: Brexiteer lashes Remainers attempt to hand British cash to Brussels  via @Your Brexit 
The idea that a bus swung the referendum has become one of the great myths of the Brexit era.  
Now. President Barzani in Soran. If we don't have a guaranteed alternative to secure independence, will not delay Referendum. Vote YES  
If this hastens the end of this incompetent Brexit government, so much the better. Time for Remainers to get their act together!  
Brexit is not a divorce & we are not seeking a share of the assets or alimony. It is the building of a new & good partnership with friends. 
A really busy couple of hours at Ploughing Championships. Sinn Féin tent packed. Big focus on Brexit.  
Should he stay or should he go now?If he goes, there will be troubleIf he stays, it will be double#Boris #Brexit 
It is very striking that the most fervent apostles of Brexit are climate change deniers. 
Vince Cable right to demand "first referendum on the facts", rather than "second referendum" on Brexit. 
Only way to run a Brexit referendum on the facts is to put Boris into a sound-proofed room and lock the door for the duration  
Boris Johnson has reminded Britain why it was right to vote for Brexit, says @johnredwood 
CJ Maraga STERNLY warns Jubilee regime against SAVAGE attacks on judiciary. Tells Jubilee to organize referendum to ABOLISH courts instead. 
Boris Johnson could resign if Theresa May opts for 'Swiss-style' Brexit  
So the Boris Gossip is that he knows it is not possible to negotiate a good Brexit deal so he wants Gov to flounce so they don't get blame 
.@LibDems leader Vince Cable asks @jeremycorbyn to join him in the "People's Anti-Brexit Liberation Front" #LDConf 
Vince Cable says he doesn't want a second Brexit referendum. He wants a "first referendum on the facts".  #LDConf2017 
It would be a LOT cheaper to build an island for the most prominent hard Brexit proponents than have hard Brexit. We can call it Xenophobia  
"Quite simply, Brexit Britain will be poorer and weaker than if we had decided to stay in Europe" @vincecable #ldconf 
CJ MARAGA asks those against independent Judiciary to call for referendum to abolish it.That's democracy . I love my country 
Clean Brexit is a myth. The only option available is Shat-Your-Pants Brexit.  
CatalanPresident @KRLS says police action won't halt referendum  via @catalannews 
Transformative indeed: the repeal of the Corn Laws led to trade barriers coming down, Brexit will put them up.  
First Rolls Royce, now Aston Martin. Flagship car firms threaten to leave because of Brexit.  
Dear @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour Did you know that damage even of soft Brexit will cost each household in the UK almost £4,000 every year?  
Brexit Labour can't win a general election without taking Scotland. They'd need a coalition. But all possible coalition partners are Remain.  
Oops another Brexit success story  
Patrick Minford backs Boris Johnson in his fight against a Swiss-style Brexit and in favour of "Canada-plus"  
Cambridge Analytica's link to Trump, Brexit and Kenya is finally making headlines after Clinton spoke about it with NPR's Terry Gross.  
OBR also says Brexit = £15bn/year hit to fiscal position -- or £300m/week. Again, government accepts these figures. 2/2. 
The Scottish and Welsh governments have proposed 38 amendments to the UK Gov's Brexit Bill to halt 'power grab'  
A year ago @vincecable said another EU referendum would be "seriously disrespectful" and "utterly counterproductive"  
#Retweet: Please sign this #Petition: #Leave the #EU immediately  #BREXIT #UKIP #TORY #USA #US #NEWS #BBC #SKY #UK 
Florence turns out to support safeguards for Brits & EU27 citizens as Theresa May comes out Fri. for #Brexit speech 
Tired? Call referendum to abolish judiciary, CJ Maraga dares critics  via @NancyAgutu 
Vince Cable: Lib Dem leader to warn of looming Brexit 'disaster'  
CJ @Dkmaraga"We are prepared to pay ultimate price to protect the rule of law.If leaders are tired of Independent judiciary call referendum" 
And to think that part of the point of the Florence speech was to avoid Conservative party conference being overshadowed by Brexit. 
Looks like Boris Johnson may be about run away from the mess he's made while pointing the finger at everyone else. #Brexit 
The Foreign secretary just threatened to resign over #brexit if PM doesn't listen to him.I think that about sums up the UK.  
BREAKING: Spanish military police searching cars on the highway to Barcelona looking for referendum material. 
The 111 powers #Brexit brings back to UK that @nicolasturgeon says should be automatically devolved 
Chief Justice Maraga: If the -leaders-government is tired of having a strong judiciary, let it call a referendum and have it abolished. 
 #Live: We're in Soran area covering mass rallies as people demand a referendum on independence on 25/9. #KurdistanVotes 
May should use a Boris resignation as opportunity to disband @DExEUgov, and hand Brexit over to @foreignoffice and @cabinetofficeuk. 
CJ MARAGA asks those against independent Judiciary to call for referendum to abolish it, urge its staff to discharge mandate without fear.  
This is not about stopping Brexit, it is about protecting the interests of the people of Wales & Scotland. More here  
Tories are in chaos over Brexit.Labour are in chaos over Brexit.Because Brexit = Chaos  
Who actually says to themselves "I simply couldn't live with a Swiss style Brexit". 
This Government's own figures clearly show that EU membership is good value for money. There is simply no economic justification for Brexit. 
Which brings me back to my new legal maxim for Brexit: there is no duty to uphold a deception.  
So @BorisJohnson will quit if Theresa May refuses to screw the country with an insane hard Brexit. Great - win/win. Narcissistic brat 
If Uhuru is tired of the judiciary, he can call referendum to abolish it. Wow! Revolutionary comrade David Maraga! Where is @WMutunga? 
CJ Maraga: if jubilee is tired of the judiciary,  they should call a referendum and abolish it all together. 
Maraga to Uhuru: If you are tired of a strong and independent judiciary; proceed to call a referendum to abolish it altogether!  
#Brexit FFS still every bloody day Brexit bashing !!! Give it a rest boring us all to death   We voted 17 million voted leave understand  
But but... muh Brexit apocalypse?  
I see an obvious problem here, in the shape of it not really being clear what his Brexit demands are.  
Exclusive: Boris Johnson 'will resign before weekend' if Theresa May goes against his Brexit demands #premium  
Ryanair cancellations because of 'pilot flying hours being harmonised with EU rules'. O'Leary told MEPs Brexit would stop all his flights. 
#Live: Huge rally in #Kurdistan Region’s soran area as thousands come out in support of independence referendum.  
So to be clear, somebody useless is threatening to resign from a useless cabinet who are pursuing a useless agenda? 
Because Brexit makes no sense. 
The people must have the last say on Brexit, so let's have a referendum on the final deal - @tomholder blogs  
Talk of Brexit back-seat drivers is wrong. Real horror is we are in a driverless car. 
#BREAKING: Boris Johnson 'will resign before weekend' if Theresa May goes against his Brexit demands#premium 
Nigel Lawson: Britain has NOTHING to fear from no #Brexit deal“too much time & energy is being wasted” on the issue 
British manufacturing now eighth largest in the world  via @CityAM Nice to hear good economic news despite #Brexit 
13 Tory MPs. Not one of them representing interests of the 62% of Scots who voted Yes to Europe #Brexit #betrayal 
This minor problem will be fixed in the near future by instructing the OBR that it must be more patriotic about Brexit. #BrexitShambles 
Serious question. Has anybody read/heard any positive #Brexit stories? Surely out of 17M voters somebody must have benefitted in some way? 
Lord Lawson: Theresa May’s silence on the benefits of Brexit frustrates  
Cambridge Analytica influence campaigns for Cruz, Brexit, Trump, Kenya, Mexico... where else? Follow the data.  
Weatherspoon's sign in Manchester suitably redecorated with some 1st of October Anti Brexit march stickers....Nice they sell Italian coffee  
No, @jeremycorbyn.You made political choices on Brexit which will lead to greater austerity. You have one final chance to stop disaster.  
Contrary to received wisdom, the cabinet level Brexit split is wholly healthy. It is prising open the options, salutary both for UK and EU. 
1/ What is the BIG LIE of hard Brexit?  
Hillary is right. The Trump-Kenya-Brexit-Cambridge Analytica connection stinks to high heaven  
And to think Theresa May said in an interview last week that there was no suggestion of outside interference in the #Brexit referendum.  
A Labour MP just suggested that because of Brexit people might need to start growing carrots in their garden. We are losing our minds #bbcdp 
German trade chief says Brexit is FANTASY and WON’T happen  
Philip Hammond and Amber Rudd are reported to be teaming up to push for a "Swiss-style soft Brexit"  
" Brexit is not going to happen" - @jameschappers tells @Citywire's own @ElliotMarcSmith. Here's your @standardnews splash @George_Osborne 
So, this is pretty extraordinary. Hillary links Kenya, Trump & Brexit. Says all "projects" of Cambridge Analytica  
Boris said Brexit would reclaim £350m a week, in reality it will cost us £300m a week. Per year, Vote Leave's figures were out by £33.8bn.  
"No majority in Commons, let alone Lords, for leaving single market, so Brexit is not going to happen" #article127 
This health care bill is a referendum on who gets to live. And who gets a cure. And who we don't want around.  Who we want to die off. 
Boris Johnson is now the shining light in the Cabinet for a real Brexit.  
Ken Clarke thinks Boris should be “sacked in normal circumstances” for articulating a positive vision of Brexit UK!!  
I wrote this on how Brexit doomed David Cameron's one good policy.  
Brexit would cost the UK £300m a week - what the OBR figures show.  
I do not care if Brexit destroys the government, the Tories and Labour. Brexit must be stopped, for the sake of the UK. 
Hague calls Brexit Britain's "biggest challenge since 1945" in Telegraph. Could've added and the biggest disaster  
We've heard David & Samantha Cameron are really cut up over Brexit so here's Nigel Farage playing the world's smallest violin, just for you.  
Tories - incl Cameron,  May, Johnson - driven by their own personal interests & ignoring public interest are leading us to disaster #Brexit 
Former F.A. Minister Margallo: "the Catalan referendum is worst than a coup d'état". Surprised? Don't. PP has never condemned Francoism.  
No one knows who drafted the 1983 referendum #repealthe8th 2/3 
#Brexit coordinator @GuyVerhofstadt on a fact-finding mission to Belfast, Dublin and the Irish border this week →  
British photojournalist Andrew Spreadbury sends message of solidarity to #Kurds as independence referendum approaches. #KurdistanVotes 
Police Guardia Civil holding now letters against the light to see if something is related to #referendum #Catalonia#incredible but #true!  
This is valid concern. Given pace at which Brexit falling apart, it's something which should be discussed by Remainers & Soft Brexiters now.  
.@philmcraig @BBCr4today PM must drive a #Brexit consensus that puts the economy first & unites sensible Leavers & responsible Remainers 
First of many seamless new trade deals with existing partners, with Brexit offering a whole host of new opportunities around the world!   
So here's another Brexit minister hiding the truth because he wants to pretend it will be better later  
No need to panic, say the Kurds about their independence referendum, as everyone panics. Good rundown by @TamerELG 
#Brexit Department head Oliver Robbins leaves, throwing government plans into chaos  
Apparently a bad Brexit will kill indy, and a good Brexit will also kill indy. Bummer.  
Paul Johnson drives a stake through the heart of the £350m/NHS myth. It's time for anyone who cares about the reality of #Brexit to drop it.  
Catalonia, Spain:Socialist mayors are systematically being bullied for refusing to co-operate with the referendum farce. This must stop now.  
The real problem in the UK isn't Brexit, its the the staggering lack of self belief, identity & confidence of her people. Get it together. 
For those who bat away legitimate criticism of the £350m a week Boris & leave campaign lie, read this #Brexit  
Last  hours in the UK #Brexit is a mess 
Govt has promised "exact same benefits" as single market in post-Brexit trade deal. That is how we must judge them #StopBrexit 
All for rebels but let's not pretended Ken Clarke would be attacking Boris if he had broken ranks to call for a softer Brexit....  
Brexit boost as Canadian PM Justin Trudeau promises a "seamless" UK-Canada trade deal after Brexit  
Boris Johnson has revived the romantic vision of Brexit we so desperately need, writes @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Spain’s Guardia Civil has raided two delivery service plants near BCN searching for referendum material  . 
Public finances downgraded by 300m per week as a result of Brexit.(IFS)Stick that on a bus. 
Freedom from EU shackles will allow Britain to become a global force, says leading economist   #Brexit 
May's Brexit tactics are as awful as her election strategy  
'Boris Johnson's Brexit outburst has betrayed how the Tory Party will destroy itself'  
We've updated our #Brexit reading list with new publications from Parliament and the Devolved Assemblies:  
Kurdish Pres insists 25 Sept referendum on independence will go ahead;  Iraqi Supreme Court says it shdn't. Danger of serious instability? 
I'm not "Brexophobic"; phobias are irrational. My utter contempt for Brexit and those who peddle it is entirely evidence-based. 
.@timfarron warns that “no-one in the right mind” will choose to move to the UK if #Brexit goes ahead.It started.  
Deglobalisation: the process of diminishing interdependence and integration between States #brexit  
Cabinet is being frozen out of Brexit... Heywood has the responsibility to tell the PM this is unconstitutional.  
The first Brexit was theological, writes Jerry Brotton:  
Brexit is like a Bosch painting. Gaze at any part of it & new horrors are revealed. 
Brexit is like an M. Night Shyamalan film. We all knew what was going to happen from the moment it started and no one's enjoying it. 
Vince Cable will today call on rival MPs to join together to stop Brexit:  #ldfconf 
Aston Martin wants clarity on Brexit negotiations within six months  
They told us the EU referendum was to end that Tory civil war over EU. Now a weakened, damaged zombie govt limps on.  
Genuinely concerning that Tory Cabinet Ministers are looking to Varoufakis for tips on how to negotiate Brexit  
In which I revisit my advice to the UK on how to approach Brexit negotiations. (Spoiler: they didn't listen.)  
Today's @thetimes cartoon. #Brexit #Ryanair #TheresaMay 
Beautifully put, but 'it's easier to fool people than to convince them that they have been fooled'. Brexit is all about emotion now 
Boris Johnson wrong because Brexit likely to generate 'net fiscal loss', says IFS - Politics live  
Theresa May’s frustrating silence on the benefits of Brexit - Nigel Lawson in today's @FT  
Do you support Britain paying a "Brexit divorce bill" to the EU?  
Pennywise : I got a fresh and spicy-hot take from Tony Blair on Brexit/migration/the Middle East down here!  
Most senior official from David Davis' Brexit team Oliver Robbins quits to become Theresa May's EU Advisor.More divisions in #BrexitShambles 
#TelegraphLetters: Boris Johnson’s critics fail to see Brexit means regaining full control over national spending  
Watching Tom Bradby & Robert Peston on ITV News, both must have been to RADA recently for Thespian image. Contempt for BREXIT so obvious! 
UKGOV accused of having 'no idea' how to implement its own customs plans. Sky News on Brexit  
Brexit: Boris Johnson labelled a ‘nationalist liar’ by European newspapers after reviving £350m claim  
Reuters: First of 740 Catalan mayors (75%) appear before prosecutors in Spain's attempt to crush referendum vote  
Ryanair complained Brexit would cock-up its flights, but it only has itself to blame for this week's disaster  
Daily Briefing:- Spain-Catalonia stand-off deepens- May tries to tighten Brexit grip- Turkey faces NATO test 
DELUSIONAL: German trade chief insists 'Brexit is just talk so far, doubt it will happen'.  
Official numbers/forecasts adopted by govt suggest net fiscal loss from Brexit – not a gain of £350m p/w. IFS Carl Emmerson in @thetimes 
Brexiters promised #Brexit would bring:- Unity- Sovereignty - Control- Freedom- Stability In reality, Brexit means we are losing them. 
Boris Johnson would have been sacked over his Brexit article in 'normal times', says Ken Clarke  
We have a FS who lies about figures, a HS in contempt of court and a PM who u-turns on a whim. And this is the most critical time for Brexit  
If Leave had gone to the country with let's take £50m pw from the NHS to Brexit, how would that have gone? 
Shia #Turkmen Hashd Shaabi unit that is allied to Baghdads central government entered #Kirkuk against #Peshmerga and #Kurdish #referendum.  
Brexit will cost us £15bn a year. That's the government's own forecast.  
Willie Rennie.Supports a second EU referendum, but not a Scottish one.THE MAN IS A FOOL AND A HYPOCRITE!#ScotRef 
Ken Clarke:"If you jump off a cliff and spread your wings, you'll find yourself flying into the blue yonder. That's not a policy."#Brexit 
Huge rally held in #Kirkuk, supporting Kurdistan Region's upcoming independence referendum. #KurdistanVotes 
75,000 British jobs created from Foreign Direct Investment (post-EU referendum)  #jobs #Investment #confidence  
Canadian PM promises 'seamless' trade deal with UK - Read all the Brexit news here  
Boris Johnson deserves to be sacked for his Brexit disloyalty, says Ken Clarke - Politics live  
I suspect we'll soon see a weekly Cabinet meeting just on Brexit. Focus being on preparing for No Deal scenario 
"Brexit means Brexit" "Boris is Boris"Therefore, Brexit and Boris mean the same thing - Lack of clarity, duplicitous, shambolic, foolish. 
Cut this out & put it in your wallet. Here are the grim fiscal basics of Brexit.  
You wanted hard #brexit. At least have the balls to own the consequences rather than blaming others  
David Davis' Brexit paper says terror risk will rise if UK leaves EU with no deal. Losing access to Europol is a big issue #BrexitShambles 
Theresa May​ says the Gov't is "driven from the front" & Boris Johnson​ believes "there's one driver in the car". So who is driving Brexit?  
A week in Boris:-let's be upbeat about Brexit-let's have another look at that bus-sorry about bus thing-Brexit talks are doomed to fail 
.@theresa_may is going to Florence for a big Brexit speech. We asked @bbclaurak, @adamfleming, @BBCkatyaadler and @jreybbc why. 
"Mundell's admission of less post-Brexit powers for Scotland branded a complete betrayal"  
The Kenyan election was a project of Cambridge Analytica, the data company that was instrumental in the Brexit vote. #Hillary Clinton 
Boris is Boris. Brexit is Brexit. Theresa May has a great ability to recognise that things are themselves. 
Brexit boost for the UK as billionaire plans to build 25,000 new Land Rover Defenders a YEAR in Britain  
The government has an official position on fiscal effects of Brexit. This is it.  
That's only because of the complete lack of courage of the Labour Party, if they'd opposed Brexit this would already be behind us. 
Senior Whitehall sources say Brexit divorce bill will have to be £40-45bn - and Boris allies are not ruling this out, reports @nicholaswatt 
8 thousand more signatures and they are obliged to debate a referendum on the outcome. Once more unto the breach.  
1846 transformed the economy - if Brexit is a success then 2019 could be the same says @DrGerardLyons 
This is appalling from Dominic Cummings - threatening more lies, should a Ref be held on terms of Brexit. Electoral Commission must act  
BREXIT:We must not "sleepwalk" into a Remainer-friendly compromise; a pseudo-membership keeping us shackled to EU rules & court judgements.  
Petition: Hold a referendum on the final #Brexit deal, 92,000 have signed. Only 8,000 needed!  
There will be a public enquiry one day. The leaders of Brexit will *never* remove the stain of subverting democracy  
Britain making a huge mistake in Brexit negotiations,  Ireland's foreign minister says  
BREXIT:As Remainers spread gloom, James Dyson brims with confidence & Jim Ratcliffe invests £650m into building a Defender replacement.  
.Irish-American awakens to the dangers that Brexit poses to the peace in Ireland 
SNP ministers to publish list of 111 Brexit "power grab" casualties today  
Tony Blair has a plan to exit from Brexit  
One of my little monologuey things, about Brexit and stuff, is on Youtube somehow  
Why do Remoaners get so upset about Brexit?  Is the EU gravy train even bigger and longer than we think? 
"Not only will we not regain control of £350 million weekly as a result of Brexit, we are likely to make a net fiscal loss from it."  
O'Leary claimed #Brexit would ground #Ryanair flights. He managed to do it himself. Should he resign? Vote & Retweet. #RyanairCancellations 
'We won't be free from Brussels!' Nigel Farage RAGES against 'softening Brexit' threat  
Referendum is not just a legal issue but also an ethical one. Pak must stop hiding behind UN Resolutions. Include Balochistan, too.  
Cable calls on Lib Dems to put aside "tribal differences" and work with others to reverse Brexit  
Vote Leave can't hide their responsibility for the Brexit mess  
Fifteen months after the EU referendum, the country and the cabinet are still deeply divided over Brexit  
Spain forbids the postal service from delivering mail relating to the referendum. Catalans respond by posting on the post vans.  
...the Earth was flat, it would still be round.  If the benefits of Brexit v. EU membership were evenly matched then there might have... 
Vince Cable to warn 'disaster looms' with Brexit in first major speech as Liberal Democrat leader  ' Bring it on ' 
...more people want Brexit or not is irrelevant, it's objectively a bad idea, popularity can't make a bad idea good.  If 52% voted that... 
Nothing can shift blame from those who, like Hoey, campaigned and voted for Brexit. They, and they alone, own it.  
Spanish authorities ban referendum leaflets and posters. Catalan traders respond with special offers.  
Why did the US choose to oppose the #Kurdish referendum? A look @Jerusalem_Post  
#Brexit : Boris Johnson labelled a ‘nationalist liar’ by European newspapers after reviving £350m claim 
Brexit: Lord Hague warns over Tory infighting  
Should read 'Boris Johnson tells friends he doesn't want to be blamed for sinking Brexit ship that he was instrumental in launching'  
There are encouraging signs some of those 'political adults' in other parties are moving to back a referendum on the Brexit deal v Remain  
.@BBC won't tell you what is happening in Catalunya, so try this:  #Independence #Referendum 
Ole Miss student gov't announces "Landshark Referendum" seeking to change mascot from Rebel Black Bear to Landshark  
If there will be a referendum by United Nations, I believe 90% of Baloch will vote for freedom: Mir Suleman Dawood Jan, Khan of Kalat  
He calls for undivided loyalty behind 'glorious Brexit' then says this. Where's cabinet collective responsibility gone. Alice in Wonderland!  
Brexit to bring weaker economy and higher inflation, Bank of England warns  So much for Glorious Brexit sunlit upland 
Trading with the Commonwealth after Brexit won't be as simple as Leavers think  
via @paulstpancras. Just outstanding analysis from @FabianZuleeg of where Brexit negotiations are right now, and what the EU27 should do.  
'Disaster looms,' says head of UK's anti-Brexit party  
The Geopolitical Earthquake Of The Looming Kurdistan Referendum  
3 years ago Alex Salmond's double top secret Canadian pollsters said he was on course to win the referendum.#SNPlies 
Oh so you're going to blame the people telling you it's a terrible idea when it turns out to be a terrible idea? Genius. 
Theresa May rebukes Boris Johnson over his 4,000-word article on Brexit 
Brexit: coup and counter coup - the revolution cometh?  . 
This is the map of towns/cities are giving support to @govern for referendum in Catalunya@washingtonpost@KRLS 
Your whataboutery argument, (lies on both sides) is an excellent reason to have another more honest rerun of the referendum. 
Brexit's a shambles. Incompetence vanity and arrogance leading the most complex negotiations since Versailles and just as disastrous. 
Only Iraqi forgeifb minister for 10 years & diplomatic face of referendum can offend a Kurdish ally and an entire sect in one single tweet  
Love PGW. This quote from him could describe Brexit talks;"Unseen in the background, Fate was quietly slipping lead into the boxing-glove." 
Tho @vincecable will urge x-party coop to limit hard Brexit, he'll also reassert @LibDems 'as the party of #Remain' 
.@vincecable: 'Jeremy, join us in the Anti-Brexit People’s Liberation Front'  
Err, we live in a free country cupcake so we can fight brexit protected by UK law. What part of democracy don't you understand? Brexitears  
Why do we need 'foreign government permission' like the Edinburgh agreement, to hold a referendum. It's 'SELF' determination for a reason.  
If you've got some good news about Brexit to share with us I'm sure we'd all love to hear it. 
Brexit is undermining the country, and the government that you are supporting is ransacking it 
Yes the BBC have one goal, since they lost the vote to do all they can to depress anyone who had the nerve to vote #Brexit #Newsnight 
Great video - Sadiq Khan getting told some of the good #Brexit news, against his will. Watch and enjoy -  
What really irritates me is them clowns who are STILL all for Brexit... Even though the true picture of it has come to light  
Aston Martin's CEO calls for some Brexit clarity within 6 months  
Lib Dem activists singing Tony Blair can 'fuck off and die' - the centrist alliance to stop Brexit's going well then.  
Boris Johnson 2016: Vote Brexit its good.Boris Johnson 2017: Brexit will fail.       Don't know whether to laugh or cry 
"How dare they talk down Brexit. It's like they want the UK to fail." 
1/ what's stunning is that the whole Brexit argument is conducted through personal rivalries and conflicts played out in national media... 
Boris Johnson to tell Theresa May that £30bn Brexit Bill is UNACCEPTABLE  via @Your Brexit 
Vince Cable calls for 'political adults' to work together against hard Brexit  
Brexit means UK can TAKE A STAND against farm animal cruelty, campaigner declares  
SHE selected her Cabinet! May to offer EU £30bn Brexit ‘Divorce Bill’ with ‘almost unanimous’ Cabinet support.  
Tried to get May to sack him, but now talking of junping. Just desperate to distance himself from responsibility for failure that is BREXIT? 
The people who led the Leave campaign are warning that Brexit talks doomed to fail  
1. I don't buy the "will of the people" mantra with #Brexit. People were lied to and subjected to remorseless xenophobic brainwashing. 
Brexit to bring weaker economy and higher inflation, Bank of England warns - Sky News  
Iraq top court rules to suspend Kurdish referendum  
Hadn't realised until this evening that in September 1997 Ian Paisley had called for a referendum (NI border poll) on the Union. 
Rees-Mogg wants a romantic version of #Brexit. Here it is .... Sorry I should have mentioned the sick bag. #StopBrexit 
The Telegraph helpfully placing all the worst things on the planet into a few square inches here #brexit #trump #Boris #toryparty 
.At last, Irish-America is wakening up to the dangers of Brexit to the peace in Ireland! 
Every politician who treats the #Brexit mandate as sacrosanct is legitimising the campaign of hate & lies that won the vote.#StopBrexit 
Winston Churchill would have hated Brexit. He was the original Remainer.  
Another huge blow for brexit, and specifically David Davis. Brexit is toxic. No one wants to touch it.  
Had interview w @WSJ's @PaulSonne on #KurdistanReferendum & why Int'l Community needs to offer an alternative as strong as referendum itself  
Nigel Farage believes Theresa May is "softening" towards a Norway-style Brexit deal  
Brexit is the world's slowest motion car crash. 
"Vote Leave can't hide their responsibility for the Brexit mess" | v.good piece by @stephenkb 
Boris Johnson has reminded Britain why it was right to vote for Brexit - @johnredwood #premium 
'Disaster looms' Scheming Remainers plot to join forces with rivals to STOP BREXIT  
Lost in this never ending stream of effluent from Johnson.Before referendum: everything’ll be fine.After: EU always wins at negotiations 
This is a big week for Brexit. It's not going well  
So Boris now saying no deal inevitable, because you can’t beat EU at negotiations. He struck a rather different tone b4 #EUref! #Brexit  
Seriously: this is crazy. Future of millions in limbo, being destroyed by Brexit, and these two *insert desired descriptor*play tantrum...  
Evening! Tory Brexit Ward & Ryanair fiasco dominating tonight's @SkyNews papers. No @toryboypierce. He's visiting a tax haven. Seriously 
Politicians who blame immigrants for Britain's ills are scum who deserve neither wealth, comfort or liberty.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
After O'Leary claiming Brexit would ground flights, he's managed to do it himself through his own incompetence!  
Vince Cable: Lib Dem leader to warn of looming Brexit 'disaster'  
'Attention! This is not a referendum poster because if it were - YES - it would be illegal to read it' @ercmataro :) 
10 o'clock BBC news leading with yet more Boris. I would say this, but would much rather that some focus on stories like this #Brexit  
Nigel Lawson: There are many benefits to Brexit – Theresa May should talk about them  
#Brexit boost for @Theresa_May as @JustinTrudeau promises 'seamless' trade deal 
The SNP has never come to terms with its defeat in the independence referendum: a thread. 1/ 
Boris' article struck an optimistic tone which has recently been lost. Brexit is not just a challenge, but a huge opportunity.  
BBC News - Brexit: Gove confirms foreign access to UK fishing grounds  
Brexit looks like a crap policy, it smells like a crap policy & it's gone splat like a crap policy, but still v few MPs will dare to say it. 
Local councillor gets denounced by local police in L'Hospitalet for not removing a referendum poster yesterday."We defend the right to vote"  
Lies destroy democracy, they render debate impossible & give cynical leaders every reason to target scapegoats when policies fail.#Brexit 
Thanks to @joannaccherry for answer - DexEU didn't consult Scottish government on today's paper on Brexit and criminal justice.  
Scotland's farmers to lose £2,000,000,000 in #EU support after #Brexit. There's still time to stop #Article50 
Amazing how Leavers seem completely incapable of grasping that the EU will negotiate in the interests of its members. #Brexit  
The referendum was not democratic, for it excluded the EU citizens who are resident in the UK.  
Maple syrup'll be 8% cheaperSince Brexit the £'s 12.6% weakerWhen I go to the shopThe price is still upPancakes are now tasting bleaker  
One killed 2 got wounded after a Turkoman party headquarter guards opened fire against Kurdish youth campaigning for referendum, NRT 
If the UK can't improve on agreements made by a 27-nation bloc that is no stranger to protectionism... something is wrong. #trade #Brexit  
Brexit boost for Theresa May as Justin Trudeau promises 'seamless' trade deal - The Independent  
IF You seriously believe the Establishment has your best interests at heart Than you're delusional 
Fear in Kirkuk, skepticism in Sulaimani, and panic in Baghdad - one week to Kurdish independence referendum, and to potential new conflict 
Here's another one - arguably even better! #Leeds #Brexit #AntiBrexitBride 
I'll be on @BBCNewsnight this evening, debating Boris, Brexit, Olly Robbins and no doubt much more with Jenny Russell & Evan Davis. 
Theresa May says Boris is Boris. And Brexit is Brexit. Someone should explain to her that bullshit is bullshit. 
A “No Deal” Brexit is the best Brexit outcome. Stop begging the EU from crumbs from OUR table.  
Brexit to bring weaker economy and higher inflation, Bank of England warns  
Is that same Liberals who want a second EU referendum cos Brexit is a disaster but say Scotland can NEVER have another one! #Consistency 
Yes Brexit-Wankers, you read that right.  
#Brexit means...  
91,000+ almost there!!!!!Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Theresa May is softening towards the idea of a Norway-style Brexit, @Nigel_Farage says  
A positive vision for Brexit is exactly what Britain needs   
Religious leaders call for referendum on presidential age limit. #NTVNEWS  
Nigel Lawson: Boris Johnson is right to talk about the benefits of Brexit. Theresa May should be doing so too.  
#UselessMay - Wants to negotiate #Brexit with 27 Eu countries and then over 100 new trade deals but can't control buffoon Boris#MayMustGo 
European Union members DON'T CARE about Brexit, European Commissioner reveals  
Referendum can be postponed only with guarantees on independence: Barzani  
Brexit power play: Boris Johnson v Philip Hammond - and the key Brexit battle lines examined  
Stating the bl**ding obvious! City A.M: Impact of Brexit will be dependent on trade deals says Mark Carney. 
'Boris is Boris', 'Brexit means Brexit', 'Strong and stable'; Theresa May PM of banalities & little substance driving but not steering 
Just bought a two bedroom house, on the Tube line - with a man cave [loft conversion] an office pod and two toilets... Screw you, Brexit.  
Another #Brexit issue they kept quiet about: British #Expats face 'cliff edge' in pensions&insurance#BrexitShambles 
If you vote Lib Dem & they form a coalition with the Tories (if GE before 2019) u can be sure they'll be cheerleading a hard Brexit in days.  
Brexit + copying EU trade deals = we are outside the EU, trying to get back to square one but not in the room/influencing actual trade deals 
Brexit means UK can TAKE A STAND against farm animal cruelty, campaigner declares  
Carney: Brexit will remain inflationary & damage trade & productivity  via @FT 
Nick Clegg says all MPs should be encouraged to vote against Brexit deal next October if final deal doesn't match promises made in campaign 
"With Boris trying to grab the tiller of HMS Brexit, it's little wonder the crew are jumping ship." @vincecable  
Whatever happened to that mythical "immediate impact"? Since the vote to leave, unemployment has been at its lowest since 1975. #brexit  
Did I really call you the C word? Ps we didn't say no to second referendum. I said we should stop talking about it   
The guy has little credence. His post Brexit actions caused spike in personal debt ( see Sentance comments) everything is Brexit to him  
#Labour used to be the party of the working class. Now it's nothing more than the seed of the communist ideal, and mass immigration. #Brexit 
10,000 UK finance jobs affected in first Brexit wave to leave Britain pic.twitter.com/EQIlUbqfhr 
This genius discovered the perfect metaphor for Brexit  
if they get rid of salt and vinegar for lime and black pepper i will fucking riot, this is all because of brexit i can tell 
Brexit Department head Oliver Robbins leaves, throwing government plans into chaos He exits from Brexit 
Is May really in the Brexit driving seat?  
No to Brexit! We do NOT need it in any shape or form! 
#Boris is set to tell #TheresaMay that her £30bn #Brexit surrender is unacceptable. Finally some common sense!   #BBC 
When you talk about losing workers' rights after #Brexit but forget your pilots are entitled to annual leave..  #Ryanair! #BBC #SKY #UK #EU 
Brexit in German election --woman asks Schulz in town hall what to do b/c people moving from London to Frankfurt. Driving up home prices. 
This week's Panelbase poll has SNP increase vote share & regain recently lost seats as the anti-Brexit vote coalesces.  
John Smith would have been horrified by Brexit, campaigned against it and made sure Labour fought to stay in the EU:  
Who do you think is driving Brexit? @Nigel_Farage is live on LBC #FarageOnLBC 
According to Theresa May, 'Boris is Boris' and 'Brexit means Brexit'. And bullshit is bullshit. 
The Turkish army flexes its muscles against the upcoming Iraqi Kurdish referendum  
Latest story for @Almonitor is out: "Turkey sends anti-referendum message w/ military exercises"   via @TurkeyPulse 
'It's time to get out' Wetherspoons boss mocks transitional deal and calls for Brexit NOW  
90k signatures in exit referendum petition. 10k more & government must debate it. Come on people - own your future!  
Tomorrow @ScotNational Michael Fry on why we must protect Scots law from Brexit  
Not one single positive Brexit voice in @SkyNews 'Belfast' report.Didn't even interview an NI politician, stuck to Irish.#Propaganda. 
Boris is Boris and Theresa is Theresa. I wouldn't trust feeble May to open a village fete never mind negotiate a decent Brexit deal 
'Our standards must not be compromised and #agriculture must not be the sacrificial lamb in #Brexit deal' Minette Batters #foodandfarming 
Brexit trade@HMcEntee, Ireland's Europe minister, says #Brexit border could pose greater challenge to smaller firms  
I went back to school today. Seven months of language classes for immigrants ahead of me. Got to beat #Brexit and get a Finnish  passport!  
Trade between the UK and Canada is worth £15.2bn a year, with more than 10,000 British companies exporting goods to Canada. #Brexit  
Wow, this is an awesome spot for the Catalan referendum. "The power is you. The referendum is all of us." #MilionsdeReferèndums 
."Someone has found an exit from BrexitUnfortunately it's the civil servant who was meant to be leading it". 
Brexit is putting the Great back into Great Britain!!   
*Brexit Explained*  
Time to raise the white flag. #Brexit should surrender. Lost cause. Lost. We'll get over it. 
#Ali_Babir: Now is not the time for the referendum on independence Yes you are right, now the time to the 4th wife.  
On the third anniversary of our Referendum, we support the right of the people of #Catalonia to decide their own future.   
90k signatures! Let's get the petition for a final deal referendum over 100k and force a debate #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Maybe O'Leary should spend less time moaning about Brexit and more time trying to competently run his business.  
A very welcome step, Conservative MEP @CharlesTannock moves to support a referendum on the Brexit Deal vs Remain.  
When I was young politicians debated withdrawing from east of Suez, now Britain is about to withdraw from east of Dover.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Simple, effective, getting on with the job.Don't let UK media fool you, this Tory govt is delivering #Brexit.  
“UK and Canada have a strong and growing economic relationship,” says @theresa_may. Outlining post-Brexit trade negotiation with PM Trudeau.  
Money should go to the NHS after Brexit but I have never supported the £350m figure. Again, will you retract?  
Who will be 100,000th person to sign petition calling for referendum on #Brexit deal? >With option to remain in EU  
Justin Trudeau tells reporters that CETA will provide a smooth transition to post-Brexit UK-Canada trade but can find "improvements" 
All Theresa May has been able to deliver in more than a year is to utter "Brexit means Brexit" and "Boris is Boris" pic.twitter.com/Ac6ohBHK7n 
I cannot fucking say strongly enough how fucking fucked off I fucking am with fucking Brexit and all the fuckwits who fucking support it. 
.Brexit - "It is the battle cry of the mean-spirited. It MUST be defeated.". 
Statement: Scotland's @Radical_Indy campaign calls October 1st demo in solidarity with Catalonia, coinciding with their referendum day.  
Brexit means Brexit,Boris is Boris. TM really has a way with words. When will we hear Cancelled means Cancelled ? #StopBrexit 
It soon became clear that the driver of Brexit was not Theresa May or Boris Johnson, but Wayne Rooney  
Boris has gotten the Foreign Office into shape for Brexit - others in Cabinet could do with his vision  
Brexit means BrexitBoris is BorisBut£350m doesn't really mean £350m.  
Theresa May confirms Canada's free trade agreement with the EU will be transferred over to the UK with 'smooth transition' post-Brexit @GMB 
#BREXIT  about so much more than £350m-controlling our borders escaping the cats cradle of red tape and  trading with the rest of the world 
When you are willing to destroy the country through a #brexit based on lies; it isn't #BorisIsBoris but absolute power corrupts absolutely. 
NEW EU-Canada trade deal (Ceta) will be "swiftly transitioned" to the UK after Brexit, says Theresa May in Ottawa 
Theresa May 'driving from front' on Brexit after Boris Johnson row.Emergency services attending...  
If you never read another thing on this #BrexitShambles make sure you read this... 
Oh jeez. The indomitable @PeterKGeoghegan and @AdamRamsay have dug up *even more* Leave funding shenanigans. #brexit  
This Professor explains how Boris's Brexit figures do add up [unlike Corbyn's or Diane Abbott's]  
Boris Brexit shambles comes to Canada. See May live at  in a minute or two 
Vote Leave chief attacks David Davis over Brexit 'shambles'  
Appointing Boris Johnson to that post, especially in the era of Brexit, is about as smart as stripping naked and then bear-hugging a cactus.  
NB 'Brexit CD'VE BEEN AMAZING but fools in govt ruined it' only works as an excuse if it was impossible to foresee govt might contain fools 
6/10 CFO Mini Plant tells me key point modern car making is very low levels of stock - Brexit contingencies incl 50% inc in stocks to 4 days  
Theresa May: "Brexit means Brexit"; "Boris is Boris"; "Gurning, empty  shell of a person clinging to office is a gurning, empty shell etc." 
On margins of #UNGA updated #British @FCO Middle East Minister @AlistairBurtUK on latest developments on Referendum &discussed #KRG-#UK ties 
On the sidelines of #UNGA2017, met with #Turkish FM @MevlutCavusoglu & had open discussion on #KRG-#Turkey relations & latest on Referendum.  
Dominic Cummings complaining about the delivery of Brexit is like the Captain of the Titanic complaining about the existence of icebergs. 
1/ Some thoughts on the latest UK government Brexit paper on criminal law matters, which is available here:  
Ross, I am a pro-union, centre-right voter. Your Quitling lies on Brexit have disenfranchised me. I would vote for indy2 now. 
One upside of Brexit is we won't need to build that third runway at Heathrow. No one will want to come here. 
The @EA_CoR Group is organising a lunchtime briefing (21/09) on: #Catalan Referendum of #SelfDetermination with @aaltafaj -details below: 
Tommy Robinson wins court case against police over football ban  # via @HuffPostUKWELL DONE TOMMY ROBINSON  
90,000 people have signed this petition to #AddDemocracy to Brexit by having a vote on the final deal. 100K Go!Go!  
So according to dear Theresa 'Boris is Boris.' Which sounds like 'Brexit means Brexit'. And not unlike 'Syphilis is syphilis.' 
Show your solidarity to Catalan people & their right have Independence Referendum. Tuesday 19th 6.00pm Front of Belfast City Hall. Bígí Linn  
Carney warns of Brexit-related incipient inflation so interest rates will rise. But he's buggering off back to Canada so it's our prob! 
The UK does not legally owe the EU any money whatsoever.We must demand our share of EU assets we paid for.May should not pay a brexit bill  
Sobering analysis by @FabianZuleeg: help the UK and prepare for the worst #brexit 
1/10 Long Read seeks to see how modern car manuf can function post Brexit -this is Just-In-Time arrival of right front of MINI to right body  
How to explain why you're raising rates while also saying Brexit means UK econ is in trouble. Annotated Mark Carney:  
Fall in migration after Brexit could lead to labour shortages and push up inflation,says Bank of England Mark Carney  
"Brexit means Brexit"... "Boris is Boris"... so glad we have such an insightful PM/ government 
#honestpoll Should Boris Johnson face legal action over £350mn #nhs #brexit promise? Pls RT for inclusivity. Comments welcome @JolyonMaugham 
Why doesn't the UK government publish its #Brexit risk assessments? Please sign the petition to allow us to see them  
IMPORTANT MILESTONE: my #Brexit binder is... full!   
Brexit’s best-kept secret: UK is the world’s 8th largest manufacturer, and growing  
Support for Scottish independence rebounds three years after referendum | CommonSpace  
First she gave us 'Brexit means Brexit', now 'Boris is Boris.' What other existential nuggets has Maybot got to share? 
An appeal to the people of Florence from UK. Pls wave your EU flags for Theresa May. We don't want brexit @RaiNews @LaStampa @Agenzia_Ansa 
All UK has managed in a year is to go from "Brexit is Brexit" to "Boris is Boris". 
A good Brexit, like a Communist paradise, exists only in the minds of True Believers.  
Many remainers are able to jump on a plane to Rome on a Friday evening while many leavers do not have passports, @GoodwinMJ on Brexit vote  
Ryanair CEO was too busy trying to get his face on TV to bash Brexit whilst his business was going down the pan. He has little credibility. 
"Boris is Boris" Piffle is Piffle. Brexit is Brexit. Stupidity is Stupidity.  
Brexit pay master gags feeble  Mayhem, as treacherous foreign secretary Boris is Boris can do no wrong #BrexitShambles 
Electoral Commission found "unusual" Leave spending but didn't investigate #Brexit  
When the West tells #Kurdistan Region it's not right time to hold independence referendum. #YesKurdistan #TwitterKurds 
This Brexit government is desperately trying to duplicate what we already have as a member of the EU. Pointless! 
Hard Brexit like religious fundamentalism, says Welsh first minister  
British food producers may need to invest much more heavily in robots after the loss of migrant labour after Brexit  
We have a Gov (and an Opp) who voted to trigger Art 50 with no plan, no clue, and no understanding of how to actually make Brexit happen 
Susan Glasser and Tony Blair at #Concordia17. Blair says Brexit is like agreeing to "a house swap when you haven't seen the other house."  
The freak show called #Brexit continues to chew up civil servants and spit them out. Where will this end? 
"Brexit means Brexit""Boris is Boris"Inspiring quotes from our Prime Minster for the ages. 
We are excited to announce the new Landshark Referendum. Please read the statement below regarding the upcoming campus wide vote!  
"Boris is Boris" ? No Boris is Alexander Boris de Pfeffel Johnson. He is a product of immigration into Britain from Europe. #Brexit 
"Boris is Boris"  Shouldn't that have been "Boris means Boris". Followed by, "I want a hard Boris"? #Brexit 
Brexit means Brexit. Boris is Boris. Bullshit is bullshit. 
Paper factory Chief Exec: I'm extremely happy about Brexit, it will support us. #BecauseOfBrexit 
If Theresa May had Trump's political guts, Brexit be done & ME imm restricted. But she is so cowardly pc she can only join chorus ag Trump. 
O'Leary "Brexit will leave tourists stranded"O'Leary"Hold my Guinness"  
SNP Youth delegation will head to Catalonia before independence referendum 
Good job today by our news team. So our readers get the latest on Brexit we've now got a full-time Brussels correspondent, Sarah Collins  
NCA statement following Government proposals on security and #LawEnforcement post-#Brexit. Read the paper in full:  
Boris Johnson finds himself isolated from rest of cabinet over Brexit plans, mainly because he has one. 
Want 2 hear what Brighton Pavilion MP & .@greenparty co-leader .@CarolineLucas has 2 say re #Brexit? Join us Sunday 
Remoaners at the highest levels of government are colluding to force a soft Brexit - they must be resisted  
We have told the Secretary of State that people here must be represented at the Joint Ministerial Council. Our voice must be heard on Brexit  
Due to a high employee turnover at @DExEUgov, we are happy to help the PM to write the Brexit #FlorenceSpeech focused on #citizensrights. 
"Boris is Boris""Brexit is Brexit""£350m a week is a figure you'll need to check for yourself, about which I have no view"  
One of many LibDem absurdities; people have the right to change their mind in a 2nd Brexit referendum but can't be allowed a 2nd #IndyRef 
Former Vote Leave campaign director says government's handling of Brexit a 'shambles' - Politics live  
Lib Dems double down on ‘exit from Brexit’ vote pledge:  #LDConf 
David Davis (who's supposed to be in charge of #Brexit) has now lost a string of Ministers & now his top civil servant #Brexitshambles 
Iraqi Supreme Court halts Kurdish independence referendum that was scheduled for next week, citing two lawsuits  
Boris Johnson called £300,000 for writing a couple of hours a week "chicken feed". Hard Brexit won't harm him but would destroy jobs & lives  
The Spatial Dimension of Online Echo Chambers  by @toledobastos @DanMercea & @a_baronca Geography Matters! #Brexit  
Europhiles despise @BorisJohnson because he's irrepressibly cheerful about Brexit says @DanielJHannan 
There is no Commons majority for Boris Johnson's low tax, low regulation Brexit, says @georgeeaton  
David Mundell's admission of less post-Brexit powers for Scotland is a complete betrayal.  
Met my anti-Brexit twitter hero today at #LibDemConference - @jameschappers is truly a legend! 
How many headlines, buses, posters, claims do you lot need in order to admit that you "won" under false pretences?Go, now, and stop Brexit  
A tragic & bitterly regretted Harlow death brought false claims, then shame & now silence from anti-Brexit spinners  
Middle East is the most peaceful oasis on earth and the Kurds would disturb these peaceful atmosphere with an independence referendum #joke 
Unemployment falls, optimism rises in the EU a year after Brexit vote  
There is no Commons majority for Boris Johnson's low tax, low regulation Brexit.  
My argument on why A50 should not have been the method used in Brexit.Part of my "How to Brexit" post at @FT:  
And obviously there is no referendum mandate on leaving the Single Market. It wasn't a question.Ouch. 
Iraqi Supreme Court suspends Kurdish region's independence referendum  
Exclusive: 10,000 UK finance jobs affected in Brexit's first wave - Reuters survey  
My thread on the gestation of (yet another) unforced error on Brexit by May.  
It's a wonder the little sh1te isn't blaming Brexit as usual   
Increasingly feeling that 'Brexit' does for the word 'negotiations' what 'Mc-' does for the name of a food. 
UK asking every country with which it has deal as member of EU to adopt same terms post #brexit 'because I'm pwetty'  
MULTICULTURALISM Has been so good for Britain 
Spanish police seize pro-Catalan referendum pamphlets  
Disarray in Brexit government. Lead civil servant pulled from DExEU to Cabinet Office  
Why does Ross so firmly believe that the people of Scotland should be listened to in terms of the Indy result, but not Brexit? Strange.  
"With Boris trying to grab the tiller of HMS Brexit, it's little wonder the crew are jumping ship." @vincecable  
Will the last person to leave the Brexit Department please turn out the lights?  
Backseat driving.........#Boris #Brexit #bbcpm #newsnight #c4news #skynews #bbcdp 
Boris is right - Brexit does mean taking back full control of £350 million per week | Professor David Paton  
Tories sliding on #Brexit. Labour have new policy each week. Lib Dems want 2nd ref. Only #UKIP can speak for 17.4m.  
Has Brexit made the UK less attractive to high-skilled EU migrants? New evidence. #citizensrights needed ASAP. 
Iraqi Kurdish referendum must be suspended - Iraqi PM  
Crime Of #Biafrans Was Bcos They Asked for #Referendum To Determine Their Future &Nigerian Army Killed Them As If Their Lives Doesn't Matter  
Great and worrying  thread from Vote Leave boss Dominic Cummings about how DDavis handling Brexit  
So if you're thinking of getting annoyed with the guy who led the campaign for Brexit, don't. He had NOTHING to do with where we are. 
'Two allies of Johnson said he is prepared to walk out of the Cabinet if May bows to pressure for a “soft” #Brexit.' #borisjohnson 
BRAZEN: There is a level of delusion among Mail writers and readers about Boris’ £350m Brexit lie that is truly astonishing.  
My @bbc piece on the Kurdish referendum, breaking down will it happen, why now, what likely result, what next?  
I'm not totally sure this Brexit thing is a good idea. 
The man leading our Brexit negotiations has lost his Chief of Staff, Perm Sec and 2 Ministers this summer. Not even Wenger is that bad  
The PM is in Canada today to discuss plans for a post-Brexit trade deal. The  Conservatives are working to build a truly Global Britain.  
Theresa May tightens grip on Brexit by hiring David Davis's right hand man Things are hotting up!  
Challenging Sadiq Khan with the good Brexit economic news which you wont hear on the BBC  
Anyone who attributed Arjadiusz Jozwik's killing in Harlow to Brexit should hang their heads in shame.  
Spanish military police back at Catalan newspaper for another 'visit', since they published an ad for the Catalan independenc referendum  
Now is a good time for Theresa May to call a General Election and allow Jeremy Corbyn to govern and deal with the Brexit mess. #bbcdp 
Reuters survey: 10,000 UK finance jobs affected in Brexit's first wave  
“Rule Britannia!” @mrjamesob tries his hand at being more “patriotic” while reporting on a Brexit story…  
The claim that Britain turned racist and violent after Brexit is built on myth and lies. Brendan O'Neill in The Sun.  
Boris Johnson savaged as ‘nationalist liar’ in European newspapers - after reviving £350m claim  #Brexit #EU #toast 
And get this: "Theresa May doesn't want #Brexit to define her premiership."#wato#ToriesOut#Brexitshambles 
Britain to pay for Europol post-Brexit? Are there any other foreign police forces who we pay for their cooperation? 
Boris Johnson’s Brexit ‘vision’ is divisive, nasty, and a reminder he was never a very accurate journalist  
If Theresa May rejects Boris Johnson's advice on Brexit, a lot of Tory voters will be taking a new look at UKIP. 
John Redwood raises an important point - there is no legal basis for the EU Brexit Bill extortion  
Boris Johnson has revived the romantic vision of Brexit we so desperately need says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Blood stirring Boris is just the tonic we need and why Bojo's upbeat Brexit vision will succeed  
What will be #TheresaMay's downfall is that her arrogant incompetence ensures that even the rich will suffer from her #Brexit. 
As Boris Johnson throws in the £350m NHS lie again, I'm discussing Tory Brexit chaos LIVE - get involved! >>  
This is the whole point of Brexit Britain. Good to see.  
How Brexit turned Boris Johnson from political honey to Marmite- my analysis  
3 years to the day since #Indyref. 3 years of broken promises, Brexit fiasco, austerity, lies and WM bullshit. Well done to the '55.  
GLOBAL: Liam Fox in South Africa, Theresa May heading to Canada in bid to boost Brexit Britain trade.  
Glad someone found an exit from Brexit. Unfortunately for May it's the civil servant who was meant to be leading it 
Whenever they come to write the book about Brexit, it will be called 'Unforced errors'.  
The sequence of unforced errors by May on Brexit is now so long, a genuine saboteur could not have done any better or worse./ends 
Today, clear @DExEUgov has hit the wall of reality. Will not be the last.And the fault not with Brexit vote but with May's unforced errors. 
The top official in charge of Brexit plans just quit, throwing Govt plans into chaos  #SinkingShip #Brexit 
Yet another senior civil servant abandons the sinking #Brexit ship. #Brexitshambles  
Moving key individuals at this critical time adds a whole new dimension to govt's chaotic approach to Brexit.  
And even if UK could, most sensible countries would want to see what the Brexit deal looked like first in any case.  Pointless. 
Approaching 90,000 lets get it to 100k to raise in parliament. Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Both sides extremely clear during EU Ref: vote to Leave meant leaving Single Market. #LibDemconf should recognise will of voters #Brexit  
The idea was to create two new Whitehall departments, from scratch and at speed, to deal with Brexit. They were @DExEUgov and @tradegovuk 
Iraq's supreme court issued a verdict to stop the independence referendum in Kurdistan region  
Where we are on the main Cabinet Brexit split this lunchtime:  
Three years since Mi5 successfully rigged the Scottish independence referendum. WAKE UP, SHEEPLE! 
LISTEN: MP @DavidTCDavies defends Boris Johnson and attacks Jean-Claude Juncker over #Brexit on @juliaHB1's show  
Now do you see why I just adore @jameschappers He really is the rationale behind this horror that we have become to despise, called Brexit.  
The Yoon lads on #HappyUnionDay who call Scotland 'North Britain' all look like they're hoping marrying livestock becomes legal after Brexit 
Ex Treasury perm sect here sees Brexit shake-up as return of power on Brexit to cabinet office and number 10. DEXU stuffed. Trumpian chaos.  
Bloody hell. Iain Duncan Smith doubling down on the traitor/allegiance #Brexit bullshit. Tories now dominated by Enoch Powellites  
Gov't faces revolt from carmakers in Britain unhappy at slow pace of clarity over post-Brexit customs arrangements  
'It's time to get out' Wetherspoons boss mocks transitional deal and calls for Brexit NOW  
Lord Sugar says Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be in prison over Brexit 'lies'  
People in Sne (Sanandaj) openly supports southern Kurdistan's independence with a banner that reads: Yes to the referendum. #Twitterkurds 
Brexit: UK sets out details of proposed new EU security deal  
Canada is just one of 105 countries that have stated interest in a post-Brexit trade deal with the UK #GlobalBritain 
Brexit 'chaos' as top official Oliver Robbins quits after one year in the job 
May should remember Boris and Gove won the referendum, not Hammond, Heywood and Robbins…  
Politician responsible for shambles of the #CSAInquiry, and losing general election, is now to taking "more control" of Brexit negotiations.  
Brexit so far  
The CEO of Scotland in Union Pamela Nash, reminds us all why we should not have another divisive Scottish referendum.  
People who know the chaos #Brexit will unleash on UK are not prepared to persist in the madness. Thanks to @jameschappers @OllyRobbins 
Iraq's Supreme Court issues temporary ban on Kurdish region's referendum on independence scheduled for next week.  
WATCH | "It's time to get out the back, Jack!" @JDWtweet boss, Tim Martin says 'No' to any transitional deal after Brexit. Well said, Tim!  
Top British Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins has left DEXEU as Permanent Secretary and will now perform his role from Number 10:  
Of course if there's a Brexit "no deal" Britain automatically defaults to WTF trade rules 
Two petitioners file case at High Court seeking referendum leading to autonomy of Western Kenya; sue govts of Uganda, Britain and Kenya. 
Boris Johnson's tiff is an early indicator of how much you're going to hear "well if only we'd done a *real* Brexit" post-2019 
Here we go: UK Brexit negotiations plunged into deeper disarray as consequences of Whitehall incompetence/timidity become clear.  
"Even by his own test, the £350m figure is not the right one" says @HetanShah of @RoyalStatSoc on Boris Johnson #Brexit bus claims #bbcdp 
The top official in charge of Brexit just quit  
Gina Miller and her legal challenge delayed Brexit by 9 months, which is costing us an extra £9billion as a result.  
First Chief of Staff @jameschappers, now the Permanent Secretary leaves the Brexit Department. It’s only a year old! #brexitshambles 
Nothing on this account has been critical of the civil servants and government lawyers charged with Brexit. Issue is political leadership. 
Hard Brexit like religious fundamentalism, says Welsh first minister  
Theresa May will offer the EU £30billion in 'divorce payment' to break deadlock on post-Brexit trade deal  
Sick and tired of the negativity surrounding Brexit from the media The public chose this - It's happening You look infantile .. #Brexit 
How do you get Daily Mail to change position on Brexit? Change its editor to @George_Osborne, says @jameschappers #ldconf 
EXCLUSIVE Brexit 'chaos' as top official quits Brexit dept after one year in the job  
It's troubling how closely May's election cock-ups resemble her Brexit cock-ups  
"I can't believe my scapegoating of the EU/migrants for years and calling a referendum for party reasons went wrong"  
How Brexit turned Boris Johnson from political honey to Marmite  
"When you treat as sacrosanct a result secured by lies you encourage liars": @JolyonMaugham on the EU referendum  
Powerful, clear call from @jameschappers at #LDConf - #brexit won't happen and it is up to all of us to ensure it doesn't 
Do you back Boris' bold vision for #Brexit? 
James Chapman @jameschappers speaking 'succinctly and with verve' at #LDConf : 'Brexit isn't going to happen'.  
"Brexit isn't going to happen" @jameschappers 
"We can't go out and then come back in - it's not the hokey cokey" - @jameschappers on #brexit #LDConf 
Iraqi PM @HaiderAlAbadi says he ordered suspension of Kurdistan referendum, will not allow any province or region to separate from #Iraq. 
Extraordinary foolishness of Brexit neatly summarised. Car industry aghast at govt lack of prep for customs changes  
What we need to do is overthrow the referendum result, stop Brexit and remain in the European Union - bold statement @jameschappers #LDConf 
Breaking News: “The ‘people of Biafra’ have every right to request for a referendum” – EU…  
RT @AJENews: Iraq's Supreme Court orders suspension of Kurdistan referendum. More soon on  
Theresa May's spokeswoman says Boris Johnson is united behind the Government's Brexit plan and the Prime Minister values his contribution 
Farron really lays into Boris for lying to get Brexit and Corbyn for lacking courage to oppose him. Good passionate stuff 
// @carolynleckie: Catalan's  referendum story has been all but ignored by most of the mainstream media.  
.@AdamBoultonSKY IDS knows very well there's going to be diminished tax revenues due to Brexit which will more than wipe out our EU payments  
When a Minister of State openly lies to the public it's a 'sideshow' in Brexit Britain. New toxic normal. For now.  
Why is the foreign secretary lying not deemed news? Maybe that's what got us into this Brexit mess. Weird post  
The biggest Cabinet Brexit split: EEA minus v CETA plus. On this, Boris and Gove totally aligned   
"If he was my boss during WW1, I would be happy to go over the top with him" one reader writes about Boris Johnson after his Brexit piece  
My article for @Lg_on_the_Move on language and diversity in the Trump/Brexit era  
"Nothing makes negotiations harder than an unpredictable partner who doesn't know what he wants" < Brexit view of a pro-biz, pro-UK paper  
#BREAKING: The Iraqi Supreme Court has ordered the suspension of #Kurdistan’s referendum.  
This is how every UK concession from payments to FoM will be pitched by Brexit backers. As the mighty UK doing a puny EU a favour.  
BREAKING: #Iraq's Supreme Court rules to halt independence referendum in #Kurdistan - TV  #KurdistanReferendum 
Remember - if they were happy winners, confident that their 'proper Brexit' is coming, they wouldn't still be fighting you on Twitter. 
The PM marks the 20th anniversary of the referendum on devolution in Wales in today’s Western Mail @Number10Gov #DevoRef20 
BREAKING: Iraq's supreme court rules that Iraqi Kurdistan independence referendum cannot take place 
#BREAKING Iraq supreme court orders suspension of #Kurdistan referendum 
8/10 annoyance that Govt overclaims car investments as Brexit strategy endorsement, minister refused permission to conduct interviews onsite 
Thousands mark the three years that have passed since the independence referendum. #indyref 
4/10 JLR boss tells @Skynews its investment in a massive facility in Slovakia has now become a "de facto hedge" against post-Brexit concerns 
Iraqi #Kurdistan @PMBarzani : Kurds sacrificed enough for independence, Baghdad won’t stop the referendum  
Anyone not willing to except the result of the Brexit Referendum is a threat to democracy 
BREAKING: 1,300 scientists sign a letter backing a Yes vote in the upcoming Catalan independence referendum. 
Er....but Isn't "re-fighting referendum" what Boris did by reviving £350m figure ...?  
'Brexit means we can take a stand against poor animal welfare in the livestock trade' says @ciwf More:  
EP #Brexit coordinator @GuyVerhofstadt to visit Belfast and Dublin this week 
It's September 18th. How would you vote if a Scottish independence referendum were held today? 
Boris Johnson is absolutely correct to say that Brexit will bring £350 million a week back under British control. Fact. Incontrovertible. 
READ | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg: 'Boris Johnson has revived the romantic vision of Brexit we so desperately need.'  
The EU does not prevent such moves, so Brexit is irrelevant. EU nations have very different corporation tax schemes on dividends 
So, the alleged Brexit power "bonanza" for Scotland is actually us losing powers? Thanks, Tories. You lying shits.  pic.twitter.com/XU5ynLKnYQ 
debate should be forward looking on how to make most of life outside EU - not refighting referendum 
Theresa May visits Canada for post-Brexit trade talks  
FLORENCE SPEECH: Dear EU, this weekend's display by Boris exposes the fundamental fraud at the heart of Brexit.  It is all a great mistake. 
Rees-Mogg: Boris Johnson has the romantic vision of BrexitKilling the country is about as romantic as Fred & Rosemary West.  
Government faces Brexit revolt from unhappy car makers over customs  
While Boris Johnson's lies about £350m got most people's juices flowing, I was intrigued but this claim in his Brexit "essay"  
.. First Brexit Forensics is about to debut on All Out Politics - Car industry 
Today we launch Brexit Forensics - a deep dive into some of the issues and sectoral changes thrown up by EU Withdrawal - starting with Cars 
1. Germany's @handelsblatt on BJ intervention:"British gov't still has no #Brexit strategy. The EU will watch Tory civil war in horror."  
Jacob R-M: "Boris has revived the romantic vision of Brexit we so desperately need".  Who needs reality, when fantasy is so much better? 
There you have it - it's official: Brexit means Scotland gets screwed - again.  
Tricky for Boris Johnson's Brexit apologists: Here's a photo of the serial liar with Liam Fox and a £350m Fake News referendum poster  
Prime Minister Theresa May will fly to Canada to "prepare the ground" for a post-Brexit trade deal  
Three years to the day since the Scottish independence referendum, in what has become the most celebrated defeat since Celtic in Seville 
Retail may be approaching a perfect storm Store openings dive bombs 84% as Brexit jitters kick in - Retail Gazette  
2 RESIDENTS OF western Kenya sue governments of Kenya, Uganda, Britain in secession bid; want High Court to allow them to hold a referendum.  
This poll also showing a pattern emerging - we have reached "Peak Davidson" - the Scots Tories look glum as Brexit shambles discredits them 
60% of Catalans say they'll vote on October 1 in Independence Referendum, and Yes will win. #votarem 
John Redwood's grasp of figures, Brexit and the truth on par with his knowledge of the Welsh national anthem #r4today #neverforget 
Our editorial today tries really hard to take Boris Johnson's vision of Brexit seriously.  
MP warns Brexit threatens expats pensions  
Official HoC petition for referendum on #Brexit deal now at 88k! At 100k Parlt must consider debate. Add your name:  
With the Brexit "divorce bill" debate renewed, reupping this on what makes leaving the EU so expensive:  
The Brexit apocalypse hasn't happened. Why can't the Bank of England admit it?  
.@Conservatives are working to get the best Brexit for Britain so we can build a truly Global Britain  
“Actually, there is one thing that the UK and the EU agree on completely ... Boris IS a pillock!”#Brexit  
Given how much this country stands to lose from reduced trade under hard Brexit, the fixation on the £350m figure is just sad and laughable. 
Utterly astonishing. Repay child benefit? @DanielJHannan you never tire of saying brexit won't affect those legally here.Your comments pls 
Because it is literally his job. To expose inaccurate use of government statistics.#brexit  
IK said #NA120 contest is a referendum on SC's disqualification of NS n it's popularity, voters beat heavy odds/voted against IK's narrative  
July 2017: David Mundell states #Brexit means a "power bonanza" for the Scottish Parliament.September 2017:   
Dear @MichelBarnier Please protect the current EU rights of all citizens in the UK post Brexit.It seems the UK govt has no such intention. 
Reluctantly come to conclusion a 3rd Referendum on EU is required to settle this mess & utter shambles. Please sign  
#r4today John Redwood, the man who couldn't be bothered learning the words to Welsh national anthem, proving hasn't a clue on Brexit either. 
Reminder, Farage & some Tory Brexiters wanted a 2nd referendum if #Leave lost. 
International community's bizarre and misguided focus on stopping #Kurdish referendum is unprecedented and odd considering it's just a vote 
Once Brexit policies are finally in place, the UK economy promises to grow significantly faster | Patrick Minford  
Theresa May visits Canada for post-Brexit trade talks - Why, when we already have a free trade deal through the EU?  
A wealthy #Brexit backing Tory supporter paid £160,000 for dinner with Theresa May Most people call this corruption! 
Theresa May flies to Canada today to “prepare the ground” for a post-Brexit trade deal.  
Boris Johnson hits back at UK statistics chief over '£350m Brexit payments' claim | Theresa May flies to Canada  
John Redwood on Boris: 'Politicians like him mustn't be held to account for lying about statistics' = lying is ok.#r4today #brexit 
There is no Brexit cheque. Hard WTO Brexit wipes out £100bn per annum of UK GDP and robs the exchequer of £38bn a year.  
& being relentlessly attacked for it by our scumbag msm &his own lacklustre party. They seem to forget Brexit was the decision of the people 
Reading @BorisJohnson's vision for Brexit cheered me up. Someone in government is finally being positive about what we voted for.  
Boris Johnson's contribution to debate is welcome - there are many reasons to be positive about Brexit & we need to ensure we do it right 
Today we highlight yet more benefits of Brexit as we seek to replicate not only our existing arrangements with EU and Japan, but also Canada 
QUENTIN LETTS on why Bojo's upbeat Brexit vision will succeed   via @MailOnline 
Now John Redwood another guilty man & fellow Brexit bungler is dragged on to repeat the lie without a hint of apology @BBCr4today 
Spanish police confiscated more referendum material this morning in Sabadell  
READ | Boris is set to tell Theresa May that her £30bn Brexit surrender is unacceptable. Finally some common sense! 
The row about Boris & £350m is extraordinary but it's a sideshow compared to the Brexit row splitting the Cabinet 1/4 
Leavers say Britain is full. How come then that many of the most crowded places in Britain voted #Remain?#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Today it is 20 years since #WalesSaidYes in the devolution referendum. Here are some examples of what has been achieved since then  
How the international community #thinkAssad's crimes? Fine.Burma's attack on Rohingya? Shrug.Kurdish referendum? NO. Oh No! MUST cancel! 
The rabid Tories are going to make a dog’s dinner of Brexit  
#UN rejects Kurdish independence referendum  #Iraq #Kurdistan 
On this historic anniversary, a few thoughts from me...Brexit poses fresh problems for Welsh devolution  
British business leaders urge Theresa May to seek a 3-year transitional period after Brexit  
Jacob Rees-Mogg BACKS Boris Johnson Brexit pledges and SLAMS his ‘noisy’ Remoaner critics  
Damned Brexit. We're doomed.Britain climbs to world’s 8th largest industrial nation, finds report  via @bdaily 
*Found* at last!A #Brexit benefit - it's the Canada-EU trade deal announced by Number 10!Er... hang on. ...it says *EU* trade deal here  
#Brexit to #trade with rest of world?On the contrary,we'll need tough negotiations just to keep deals we had via EU: 
Spanish military police ready to deploy tanks in Catalunya ahead of October 1 referendum.  
3yrs ago today had Scotland won its independence, rUK would have been spared trade barrier raising #Brexit. More prosperous all round. 
Letters in The Times. 'Pros and cons of staying on course for Brexit' - where pros seem very thin on the ground.Do we just keep digging?  
At least Boris Johnson gives us regular reminders that Brexit was built on lies. 
When people like Dyson say we should just hard Brexit they don't care that people will be pushed into food poverty  
Is Britain a laughing stock due to Brexit? 
Pundits bored with Brexit process stories try to trigger Tory leadership fight. Can't find one.  
20 years ago a referendum was held in #Wales on whether there was support for a devolved assembly -  
Hard Brexit like religious fundamentalism, says Welsh first minister  
Every family has its secrets... but few choose to reveal them on @SkyNews. #Brexit #Smuggling 
David Mundell signals not all powers will be devolved to Holyrood post Brexit 
£2bn worth of UK exports to Canada could be in jeopardy after Brexit, May is warned  
A 12th century map of the world by Al-Idrisi with Britain on the far right, alone and at the bottom. I'll just leave this here. #Brexit  
Was Boris just "rolling the pitch" for May speech on Brexit? If so, it was sabotage like Headingley in 1975  via @FT 
Jeremy Hunt Jeremy Hunt Jeremy Hunt Jeremy Hunt Jeremy Hunt Boris JohnsonJeremy Hunt #NHS #Brexit  
To the point: @UKStatsAuth describes post-Brexit £350M as a "clear misuse of official statistics"  
Mr Jozwik died after an alcohol-fuelled confrontation with a youth. It wasn't a "Brexit murder" nor act of Leave-fuelled xenophobic hatred.  
Far too late. Why can't these checks be done & amended at the time of such ridiculous claims being made. Instead headlong into Brexit. #NHS 
The Tories have refused to publish its sector-by-sector analyses of #Brexit impact. What is avail shows UK much better off staying in EU...  
Jacob Rees-Mogg BACKS Boris Johnson Brexit pledges and SLAMS his ‘noisy’ Remoaner critics  
Portuguese PM on Brexit: “The truth is that it has strengthened the unity of the 27 and that’s very important for the future of Europe" 
Theresa Barnum and Boris Bailey Brexit what a Circus  
QUENTIN LETTS on why Bojo's upbeat Brexit vision will succeed   @MailOnline 
Morning! Talking Brexit and Innumerate fibber Boris Johnson's brutal treachery on @GMB in a mo. Et tu, Boris? Yes 
This genius discovered the perfect metaphor for Brexit  
Theresa May visits Canada for post-Brexit trade talks  
UN chief urges Kurds in Iraq to scrap referendum, arguing it would detract from the fight against ISIL  
Hard Brexit like religious fundamentalism, says Welsh first minister  
Turkey’s Erdogan, Iraq’s Abadi to discuss planned Kurdistan referendum  
Brexit fuels smuggling fears on the Irish border  
In the belly of the beast #Brexit  
Brexit could leave British expatriates without their pensions  
Influencing voters in US election and Brexit with Cambridge Analytica, @facebook, Mercer, Bannon (8-10 minute read)  
Why wouldn't we have a vote on the Brexit exit deal? They promised us a lot. If it's not delivered why would we agree?  
Cable says LibDems are "Party of Remain". So please no more equivocation between hard, soft and extreme Brexit. BE AGAINST BREXIT FULL STOP! 
Boris Johnson row threatens to overshadow Theresa May's Brexit talks in Canada  
That awkward moment when you realise the UK's Brexit plan is written on the back of a fag packet.  
Brexit: timewasting from Johnson - what a waste of space that man is ...  #Brexit.  
John le Carré on Brexit, the British, and saying 'no' to knighthood.  
Spain's prosecutor warns over Catalonia referendum as leaflets seized  
History will judge @David_Cameron badly. The inept gambling PM who was responsible for Brexit & ultimately break up of UK. #Shambles 
BREAKING: UN Secretary General rejects #Kurdistan independence referendum, maintaining that all of the UN it respects unity of Iraq  
Iraq, Iran, Turkey, USA, UK and now UN reject Kurdistan referendum. Is KRG going to commit national suicide and go ahead regardless? 
International experts: high turnout will legitimise referendum  
‘If No wins the Catalan referendum we’ll shut up, if it’s Yes the conflict will continue‘  
Message from @UN to the #Kurds on the upcoming referendum. Ignoring UN charter article 1, right to self-determination. #TwitterKurds 
School was well #brexit - I decided to take control and skip lessons, who needs teachers  
Spain (Catalonia): Independence Referendum, Celeste Tel poll:Yes: 66%No: 34%#Catalonia #CatalanReferendum #Spain #Espana 
Lord Ashcroft says Norway model is not Brexit. Wrong. They speak for themselves at the WTO, aren't subject to ECJ, not part of cap, CFSP.  
."More than £2,000,000,000 worth of UK exports to Canada could be in jeopardy after Brexit". 
This genius discovered the perfect metaphor for Brexit  
Let's call it "Project Hide". ☞ Whitehall must publish its Brexit impact assessments  
EU is more concerned for us than our own government!☟Frustrated EU fears Britain is ‘heading for the Brexit rocks’  
Municipalities supporting the Catalan referendum. This is democracy in action.  
Oh dear #Brexit Tory lies & incompetence continue to hasten Scottish independence!  
He failed Britain by calling the wretched referendum. It has divided society, James the economy and legitimised xenophobia. 
#JacobReesMogg: @BorisJohnson has revived the romantic vision of Brexit we so desperately need... 
Well that's not a surprise. What's the stupid catchphrase gonna be this time? As it's in Florence, my bet is ... "Renaissance Brexit" !!!  
I've signed and I urge you all to sign and retweet. Don't you want to know how much brexit is already costing you?  
THE TIMES FRONT PAGE: “Johnson cut adrift after Brexit ploy backfires” #skypapers 
David and Samantha Cameron are "utterly, utterly, utterly broken over Brexit" claims their friend @KirstieMAllsopp in The Times magazine 
Brexit: Boris Johnson accused of 'misusing' statistics. Really? Who's surprised? - & what are the repercussions?  
Jennifer Oriel is even madder than usual today. "Trump rode into office on the back of Brexit." Doesn't anybody sub this crap ? 
'Impossible to stem the tide': Catalan president gives instructions on Twitter after referendum website blocked  
Hardly any Brexiters mention non-tariff barriers because they know that eliminating them means trading away sovereignty.#Remain #Brexit 
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: “Johnson in ‘distortion’ row after £350m Brexit claims” #skypapers 
Much like their bizarre brexit bill, that lets a minority tory gov write laws without consulting parliament. Destroying vital structures.  
Nationalism belongs with Communism as a collectivist dogma used by the powerful to suppress individual rights & liberties#Brexit 
Praise for Labour’s Dennis Skinner after he DEFIES CORBYN and votes for EU Withdrawal Bill  via @Your Brexit 
Brexit is utter lunacy. And do not let anybody tell you otherwise  via @wordpressdotcom 
The rabid Tories are going to make a dog’s dinner of Brexit as they savage each other like pit bulls in a fight  
When you talk about losing workers' rights after Brexit but forget your pilots are entitled to annual leave...  @Ryanair 
Monday's THE TIMES: Johnson cut adrift after Brexit ploy backfires #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Brexit in a nutshell: it always was about Tory infighting. UK forever changed, a different place, just because of internal party politics.  
ENEMIES OF THE PEOPLE: Fury as UK Statistics Authority attempt to thwart the success of YOUR Brexit with political attack on beloved Boris.  
Who owns the flag? My @theipaper column on Boris Johnson & his attack on 'unpatriotic' young voters opposing Brexit  
Already 796 municipalities collaborate for the Oct 1 referendum, 84% of all in Catalonia and representing more than 85% of the population.  
Some pictures at the Washington DC celebration to support the #referendum of Kurdistan.  
After Brexit, I will send 350 Million Shits directly to Boris Johnson. 
What a disgrace Theresa May's Brexit government is. It's so weak she can't sack this notorious liar.  
'£50bn divorce bill will be catastrophic' EU payout to WIPE OUT jobs in Brexit stronghold  
Brave Spanish police finally manage to capture... a million referendum posters and flyers.  
UK foreign minister criticized for resurrecting 'Brexit benefit' mantra  
Spain's prosecutor warns over Catalonia referendum as leaflets seized  
How many voted for what?52% Brexit 201643% LAB 199742% CON 201742% CON 198742% CON 198342% CON 197942% CON 199241% LAB 2001 
If Theresa May sacked Boris for his £350m pw lie she would have to stop Brexit for the same reason.  
1) stating the obvious but #Brexit tightrope doesn't cut it for Gov.Going to steal an analogy here from a friend 
This comment by a Guardian reader is on the money about the baying Brexit mob.  
@UN lends Megaphone 2 @MBuhari- Bruce Fein@antonioguterres Kurdish referendum's set!What's with d world & muslims?! 
A senior Brit statisticianRebuked a UK politicianWhose lie about BrexitFalls down when one checks itBut furthers his own blond ambition. 
Just checking. Has any Remainer been convinced today that actually Brexit is a good thing? Anyone? 
The most curious piece of economic self harm was so many farmers voting Brexit last year then Tory in June.  
Because Johnson is lying, Fraser. What is a statistical authority for if nobody cares whether numbers ar right, or wrong #brexit 
‘No one EVER regrets liberty!’ Jacob Rees-Mogg condemns Juncker’s claim UK will rue Brexit  
BMW boss in the Sunday Times warning he could move jobs out of the UK in the event of hard Brexit  
Horrible feeling he's TRYING to get fired. In today's post-truth world the Brexiters will still believe him. That way when Brexit fails…  
Theresa May: "Some people think Brexit was about turning inwards - it wasn't. It's about ensuring we control our laws, money & our borders"  
U.K. overseas territories, some reeling from hurricane damage, may lose funding after Brexit  
Third backtrack by Labour since #GE2017.#Brexit, tuition fees / student-debt, & now public sector pay.Ever been had, Corbynistas?  
I'm not blowing my trumpet, or looking for sympathy; just trying to show how deeply corrupt UK is. It will not get better after Brexit. 
 Spain considers arresting Catalan president to stop October 1 referendum.  
Tomorrow's front page @ScotNational Fleeced: Scottish farmers to lose£2 billion in EU funding after Brexit  
After Brexit, there will have to be a full inquiry into standards of behaviour in politics. We can and must do better than this. Never again 
"We have been waiting for this day for years."Iraqi Kurds are preparing for independence referendum#KurdistanReferendum#twitterkurds 
Boris Johnson breaks with Theresa May and says UK should still send £350m to NHS after Brexit  
#Scotref Terms of BREXIT. 65% Scots now pro EU.  
#Bournemouth beach today  #ExitFromBrexit #EU #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain #LDConf @LibDems @GuyVerhofstadt @Theresa_May @TheNewEuropean 
The @Conservatives civil war is a grave danger to the UK in general. #Brexit is but the latest manifestation of it.#Boris.#borisjohnson 
FT View: Boris Johnson’s naked power play on Brexit  
'People won't vote for you' BBC host rips into ashdown in 'SORE LOSERS' Brexit swipe  @paddyashdown working4EUnotUK 
Bias of media is apparent when they lend credence to Vince Cable's preposterous suggestion that he could be next PM & wants 2nd referendum. 
A "reckless" "leap in the dark". Where else have we heard that argument against independence and liberty? #Brexit #1776  
Britain's Boris Johnson accused of Brexit 'backseat driving'  
Been down this road before with the "weekend effect" Lie continued unabated. No shame whatsoever and there won't be now. #Brexit #NHS 
Also hacks bored with Brexit negotiations keen to jump start Tory leadership election to escape monotony of technical story public ignoring.  
FT View: Catalonia’s referendum is no basis for statehood  
Boris Johnson slammed by UK statistics chief for repeating debunked #Brexit claim  
Britain's proposed immigration curbs after Brexit are unworkable, Dixons CEO says  
Independence referendum rally kicks off in Washington D.C. by Kurdish diaspora  
I'm a Brexit voter but can't endorse the lie our Foreign Secretary has made . It's time for him to go .  
Faced with a determined Catalan government, Spain has multiplied its efforts to crack down on the referendum  
#LDConf passed an amended F17A: Opposing Brexit motion. The LDs are the only party that want an #exitfrombrexit. 
If the Spanish government & Guardia Civil continue to impede the Catalans from having a referendum, the result will be a resounding Sí  
Please internet spread this! Fake politicians!#Brexit#boris 
Kulsoom Nawaz has won election in #NA120 with a lead of nearly 15K. Imran Khan had said it wil b a referendum on SC's disqualification of NS 
#StopBrexitHourPetition: Require HMRC to separate out the cost of Brexit on personal tax statements.  
Statistics Authority boss is "disappointed" Boris Johnson has revived claim £350m could go to NHS after Brexit  
#TheresaMay approach to #Brexit only backed by #Conservatives (& not even all of them).Will #florencespeech see a U-turn? Don't count on it! 
Spain's Attorney General says he would consider arresting Catalan #PresidentPuigdemont to stop the independence #Referendum #1O @krls 
#BREAKING:Kurdistan refuses current US-backed alternative to referendum, vote goes ahead, statement 
We can't let the Brexit fundamentalist destroy our great nation. It's our duty to fight back for a better future inside the EU. #StopBrexit 
Sir Humphrey getting huffy that ministers don't read slavishly from their script.  Brexit working already  
Dear @GuyVerhofstadt Millions of British people would like to remain EU citizens after Brexit.Please can you arrange this?Kind regards  
Brexit is as divisive as Trump. I'll post ( and sing ) what I feel.  Have no problem with disagreement, only when it's abusive. 
Petition: Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal. Now 84,000 signatures. Please spread the word  
Hundreds of people in Madrid supporting Catalan referendum. Spain is full of sensible people who don't support the government's witchhunt  
Brexit: Boris Johnson accused of 'misusing' statistics  
Thank you England for #Brexit. Roll on a united Ireland & an independent Scotland!  
.@paddyashdown says the Lib Dems will keep campaigning to remain in EU, regardless of the Brexit vote "It's what we believe in" #bbcsp 
Brexit: Japanese companies set to leave London  
'A voice for true Leavers!' Farage salutes Boris' intervention for saving the Brexit dream  
Theresa May's entire premiership will be defined by the effectiveness of the clear and clean Brexit that occurs. The country voted to Leave. 
Theresa May vows to see Brexit through as PM - but stopped short of committing to fighting the next general election  
Davis claims #Brexit divorce bill £60B. £3,500 for each #Leave voter. Please send him your address to invoice you 
Spain's prosecutor warns over Catalonia referendum as leaflets seized  
Has Boris Johnson finally hoisted Brexit by its own petard?Twitter is on fire tweeting against him.  
Militarised police Guardia Civil now confiscates 1.300.000 flyers and posters for the referendum campaign. Remember, we're on alarm level 4.  
A Polish migrant is killed in Harlow, Essex, and our sneering elite turns it into a Brexit lie |  
Whitehall must publish its Brexit impact assessments via @FT 
With the £350m pw for the NHS promise proving to be a lie, the economy now tanking & Brexit inflation who would win an informed EU ref? 
Do you believe #Catalan citizens should have the democratic right on 1 Oct to decide INDEPENDENCE question by referendum?RT if you say YES  
Can't be done. #Brexit is toxic. Brexit's leaders are wreckers and looters. If you deliver their selfish vision you will split the country.  
Oh yes, this, absolutely!  Petition: Require HMRC to separate out the cost of Brexit on personal tax statements.  
Boris Johnson 'misused' figures with £350m Brexit ‘surprising and disappointing’ claim, UK statistics chief says 
Impact of Brexit will be more profound than expected, ex-Barclays boss Bob Diamond says  
The Brexiters always said that the German car industry was pivotal in Brexit ... is this what they meant?  
Two cheeks of the same arse #Brexit  
Alison.@Number10gov is sitting on 50+ #brexit impact reports .@UKLabour going  2 challenge government @ get them released .@jameschappers 
Catalonia independence vote: Spain threatens to arrest 700 mayors cooperating with the region's referendum 
Following a meeting w/ US Amb, VP Maliki says #Iraq will not tolerate “another Israel” with Kurdistan referendum.  
"Glorious" .... Brexit will limit opportunities for the young and is already destroying the lives of millions. Some kind of glorious, that.  
We support the Catalan independence referendum on October 1st. Do you? RT your support.  #TáYesSí 
If the Foreign Secretary can't write a piece on Brexit, who can? About time the Foreign Office found its voice.  
'Soft Brexit unobtainable & single market benefits wildly overstated' say @liamhalligan @drgerardlyons in new book 
Jean-Claude Juncker’s dream shows us Brexit was inevitable' [AND that the EU is unreformable| via @telegraph 
The final curtain on #Brexit will be swift, firm, and absolutely correct. Much raging & gnashing of teeth by rabid extremists and xenophobes 
Why Brexit is putting the EU's digital future at risk  @IBGC_Fletcher 
We have a government that doesn't & can't govern, mired in the ridiculous & damaging mess of a would-be Brexit. Let's junk both together. 
Boris Johnson 'misused' figures with £350m Brexit claim, UK statistics chief says  
Dear Spain. The 1-O referendum will not "go away" (and nor should it). PM @marianorajoy is now an international joke. Do something about it. 
Scots voted decisively against Brexit. The delusional Tory cluelessness driving this disaster means even more against now.  
Minister: "Boris was the only one who protested at the length of the transition and he is the most paranoid that Brexit just won't happen."  
 A thousand people gather in #Madrid to support the #Catalan referendum #MadridConElReferendum 
Johnson is just not going to stop lying, is he? #Brexit has destroyed decency and honour in public life and normalised lying.  
@BorisJohnson Will you now amend your statements and apologise to the electorate for misrepresenting facts during referendum? 
More anti Tory anti brexit anti austerity left wing lies exposed.  
"Scholar upon scholar" said no Brexit and no Trump too. I do my own analysis with my own methods. I'm comfortable with it.  
More hateful media anti #Brexit lies exposed over a tragic death of a Polish immigrant. #RIP #TypicalGuardian 
Barzanis stance for Kurdistan referendum has won him many hearts. Even if this will be his end he doesn't back down.Thats a real leader. 
Britain's Boris Johnson accused of Brexit 'backseat driving'  
Very statesmanlike perf by @theSNP @scotgov #brexit Minister Mike Russell @Feorlean on  @Sun_Pol_Scot question is can @ScotTories match it? 
Poll: Scots’ support for remaining in EU up 4% since January #Brexit  
#BREAKING#Kurdistan Referendum will not be postponed - Statement 
Take us back from the Brexit cliff edge, pleads CBI director-general Carolyn Fairbairn  
For those who want #brexit to rid Britain of EU migrants it's wise to remember Polish & Czech migrant pilots who helped win #BattleofBritain 
Great idea @GuyVerhofstadt , to let UK citizens keep their EU citizenship after Brexit.Can this be arranged by the EU alone, without UK? 
Kurdish-British woman from #Kirkuk says Kurdistan Region’s referendum is a thousand-year-long dream.  
Despite Brexit ....  so much for that bogus media narrative about Britain becoming more insular  
Scottish electorate's anti-Brexit stance hardens. Economic cliff-edge, loss of EU funding, free movement & threats to jobs drive opinion.  
Theresa May: I will stay on to see Brexit through  
Spanish police find another million referendum posters. No drug dealers, murderers, corrupt govts, terrorists... today though. Too busy.  
Why don't we test that theory out with a referendum  
I keep being told that Brexit marked the defeat of the elite. By people who worship Rees-Mogg, Leadsom. Johnson and Farage. 
Hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal - Petitions - let's make it 90,000 signatures by tonight!  
#Breaking The UK Statistics Authority chairman has written to Boris Johnson over his pledge for £350m a week extra for the NHS after Brexit 
UK statistics watchdog censures Boris Johnson for repeating £350m for NHS Brexit claim. "Clear misuse of statistics"  
Today is a test for DeShone Kizer, not a referendum. 
#BREAKING Spanish Guardia Civil seizes more than 1.3 million referendum posters and leaflets 
Good debate & outcome. @LibDems confirm they want an #ExitFromBrexit and a referendum on Brexit Deal v Remain.  
Spain Home Office shows seized #referendum posters in twitter like they would if they were drugs or illegal weapons!  
This is for everyone.  #Harryslaststand #GhostOfChristmasYetToCome #Brexit #Trump #RefugeeCrisis #SaveTheNHS 
BREAKING: Spanish police seizes 1,3 million posters in favor of the Catalan independence referendum in an operation across Catalonia. 
Given that his piffle paffle article did nothing to enlighten us as to benefits of #Brexit, it's time we all RT'd this request to #Boris PRT 
In what strange surreal universe have I woken up in where it is contemplated that either of these two individuals could become PM.. #Brexit  
Perhaps the biggest problem with Soft Brexit is that it is unobtainable, writes @LiamHalligan and @DrGerardLyons 
The Sun is right! Without Boris's oratory and charm, Brexit wouldn’t have happened and the PM must listen to him  
Guess who has given his support to Boris? Farage, the man that thinks that it's acceptable to use race hate to win a referendum. #StopBrexit 
Timeline of steps towards a disputed referendum on Catalonian independence pic.twitter.com/5dlWmoXGAu 
#LibDemConf: Should a referendum be held on the terms of final Brexit deal? @EmmaVardyTV took the moodbox to Bournemouth to find out #bbcsp 
May is so, so weak not to be able to sack Johnson when he seriously undermines her at such a critical time for Britain & #Brexit 
British-Kurds and allies stage pro-independence referendum rally in #London. #KurdistanVotes 
With Brexit, there's a 0.0001% chance of a big win for Britain.With Wenger, there's a 0.0000% chance of a big win for Arsenal.  
Brexit Britain: boldly looking to the future. .....and basing it on 1851.  
How did he vote in the referendum? He mumbles: “I was on holiday.”  
Case for Boris, summarised: Brexit used to be fun, but it's now complicated, boring and a bit depressing.  
Brexit is so farcical now, such an obviously terrible idea that if Labour and the unions officially got behind Remain, it would be over. 
Delighted that @LibDems conference just voted to confirm policy of having referendum on #brexit deal and campaign to remain in EU 
Wales will NOT surrender its right to claim EU laws after Brexit.  This is our country and our parliament. #SeneddChain 
Nigel: I'm glad Boris has reintroduced a pure Brexit voice to the cabinet  
We'll organise and fight to make sure Tories don't use Brexit as excuse to grab powers from Wales. #SeneddChain Join us. 
Arsenal saying no to racism with that line upThe front line is blackThe Defence is say no to brexitThe Midfield is pro-Albania in the EU 
Michael Gove & Priti Patel back Boris Johnson's Brexit vision to ignore all negatives, poor & inequality while letting the rich profiteer...  
I wonder if any pundits (or radio presenters) will now apologise for linking the death in Harlow of Polish man Arkadiusz Jozwik to Brexit. 
"Poundland Donald Tump" Boris Johnson repeats false £350m a week pledge for NHS post-Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
On Brexit The Country is divided thus the Party is divided thus we need firm resolute leadership to resolve this huge difficulty #Inherhands 
Britain and the EU made no movement in areas under discussion, according to key Brexit negotiator  
Boris always said that Brexit would be just like pushing stuff through an open door!  
Brexit has turned the UK into a global embarrassment.  
In a severe case of irony, Rolls Royce cars may now be made in Germany due to Brexit  
The problem for the Lib Dems is that demanding a 2nd EU referendum while opposing a 2nd indyref doesn't make sense. 
Willie Rennie wants Nicola Sturgeon to get on with the day job while he wants... another referendum on the EU.Right-oh. 
Tomorrow will be 20 years since #WalesSaidYes in the devolution referendum. Here are some examples of what has been achieved since then  
Andrew Grimson argues Boris is just the man we need to fight for Brexit: dynamic, creative and fearless. 
The damaging fiasco of Brexit and the insane mess of Trump in office SHOULD teach Brits & others to not listen to extremists. #Cabinet 
'Sorry-I'll read what you said last year' Marr ROASTS Treacherous Remainiac @vincecable over 2nd referendum dream  
‘If No wins the Catalan referendum we’ll shut up, if it’s Yes the conflict will continue‘  
Mike Russell, SNP Brexit Minister, "to leave single market do ENORMOUS damage to Scots' economy" BUT to leave UK, worth 4xEU, "nae problem" 
Street of @teatrobarrio in Madrid full of people, giving suport to Catalunya's referendum of autodetermination@washingtonpost@guardian 
Brexit Britain 'wields most influence in Europe and is second only to US worldwide'' | via @telegraph 
Staggering that 15 months after the referendum, the Home Secretary is tasked to confirm the PM is in charge, not the Foreign Secretary.  
So, all those programmes we going to continue to pay into post-Brexit will be even more expensive than when we were in the EU. Bravo, Boris.  
The level of ineptitude from the Conservatives on Brexit (making the EU look rock solid) would be impressive if it wasn't so damaging. 
Spanish prosecutor doesn't rule out ordering the arrest of Catalan President @KRLS before or after the referendum  
The view of Johnson article from Tory high command is that it was "exuberant"Tories are in meltdown. Is Johnson or PM running Brexit policy?  
Brexit  
Lebanese Kurds and supporters alike gather in #Beirut in show of solidarity with Kurdistan Region’s upcoming independence referendum.  
Opinium/Observer (Net approvals):MAY -11 (+6)CORBYN -7 (-2)MAY BREXIT -12 (+7)Fieldwork start 12th SepN~2,000 
Wow. You're a charmer, aren't you. No wonder Brexit's going sooooo well. 
12 days after shameful & xenophobic Tory immigration papers @UKLabour response to another failed Brexit test needed 
‘We should walk away!’ Sir James Dyson calls for NO Brexit trade deal with EU  
"I think our Brexit negotiating team would end up paying full price on a DFS Sofa"- Frankie Boyle 
A weak PM, cabinet splits, a Brexit team going nowhere and the NHS in crisis - it is time for another election  
Liberal Democrat MP Norman Lamb has warned his party that Brexit voters felt they were treating them like "idiots"  
Spanish prosecutor does not rule out DETAINING the #CatalanPresident over independence referendum  
Spain's Attorney General says he would consider arresting #Catalan president to stop the independence #referendum 
Waiting to be called in #Europe motion to support vote on #Brexit deal, votes for 16/17yrs and Expats included. 
Western countries: "we support democracy"Kurds and Catalans: "we want to vote on a referendum"Western countries: "well, hold on a minute" 
Talk of civil war erupts over Barzani's referendum.  Like Syria 2.0 - with foreign powers backing either side? #Iraq  
Most MSM failing public on Brexit: let's support honourable exceptions @danbloom1 @faisalislam @GeorgeWParker @elliotttimes @carolynquinncq 
Will Boris Johnson be sacked over his Brexit comments? "No, he isn't" @DamianGreen tells @skynewsniall #Paterson 
Friends! Nor me!And apart from a tiny handful of 17,410,742 bigots - who represent nobody but themselves - no-one voted for Brexit anyway.  
Remainers whine they were misled in the referendum but they they voted remain so were not misled. Brexiteers have not complained so why moan 
Iraq army 'to intervene' if Kurds' referendum escalates, says Iraqi Prime Minister Haider al-Abadi  
30,000 Basques take to the streets supporting Catalan's right to hold independence referendum. Madrid threaten arrests & stop democratic REF  
Just fell up the stairs on my way to empty a potty full of piss. #brexit 
Why are journalists not asking our Brexit negotiators questions about their incompetence to respond to sensible negotiation requests.  
Families. Businesses. Tax collectors. Law-makers. The EU. No-one can plan because, 15 months on, the Govt still can't say what Brexit means.  
The EU’s Juncker says Europe’s economy and confidence are bouncing back  #SOTEU 
Desperate news editors trying to justify #brexit - funny if not so devastating for our future  
Boris's article makes Tory civil war the instant consequence of the PM's Brexit speech. And it makes her look like the Betrayer of the Cause 
13/ Tories meanwhile sitting on stagnant economy with all "Brexit bonuses" advertised by Johnson illusory and not available for 5 years 
Ironic that Brexit, supposedly a reaction to an undemocratic, controlling, over-powerful EU, was also the choice of authoritarians  
This is a quote from a Cabinet Minister in today's Sunday Times, on the state of the #Brexit negotiations ...  
View in Boris camp is that PM was being overly influenced by Hammond, Rudd et al on Brexit process - and he had to speak out 
Cameron said referendum would clear the air and stop people 'banging on about Europe'. That went well. How's the view from the shed, Dave? 
Why do all our Gov Brexit papers seek to have an arrangement that replicates what we have now but outside the EU? Utterly pointless. 
Senior Tories turn on Johnson as they start to split ahead of conference over Brexit with back seat driver quip  
Bravo. Brilliant article on Brexit that slices through Remainer "cliff edge" hype.  
Nigel Farage, the jerk who sold Britain to get a seat at Trump's dinner table. #Brexit is the opposite of patriotism #StopBrexit 
Conservative cabinet splitting live on air with @AmberRuddHR saying Boris Johnson should not "manage" Brexit process 1/~ 
Q: What is Vince thinking when says "It's perfectly plausible I'll be PM"? A: "After Brexit, Trump, Corbyn ...etc anything is possible" 
Brexit: Boris Johnson warned against being 'back-seat driver'  
Isn't it time we started listening not to politicians on Brexit, but to the people who employ and potentially sack us?  
Johnson once told me he worried Brexit might send "a negative signal to friends and partners in other countries".  
Canadians think it is a delusion to see CETA as a model for #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
#FFS! Brexit Fan Andrew Marr is aggressively asserting to Vince Cable how well the economy is doing. It's tanking & we haven't even left yet  
She declines to add "though obviously I made a date rape joke about him during the referendum"  
Memo to Vince Cable. Brexit means EXIT. Which part of EXIT don't you understand, you insufferable bore? #Marr 
Truth about Brexit is nobody really knows what will happen when we leave. But I do know this.. positivity is vital now we're doing it. 
Hope everyone at #StopBrexit in Bournemouth has a great day :)Show the Lib Dems that anything less than stopping brexit is a compromise!  
I'm not a fan of referendums, Vince Cable says - the man who wants another referendum on Brexit 
Boris backs full, clean Brexit - and Tory Remoaners ain't liking it! #Marr 
Never mind that she lost the referendum and Boris won it...  
Remoaners’ dream of a second referendum ‘is stone dead’ thanks to EU’s arrogance - Farage  
"You could call it backseat driving" - Amber Rudd reacts to Boris Johnson comments on #Brexit #marr  
Govnt must publish its Brexit impact assessments - MPs and public remain in dark about Govnt’s internal analysis @FT 
Rudd: Boris adds "enthusiasm, energy and sometimes entertainment" to Cabinet ... but isn't managing the Brexit process 
RIP Conservative party unity over Brexit June 2017 - September 2017 #marr 
Brutal from Home Secretary:.. Boris Johnson trying "back seat driving" on Brexit, & Ruth Davidson "has a point" on bad timing of his article 
Boris getting lots of hostility from the BBC because he seeks a positive #Brexit. BBC agenda is to advance a useless Brexit #Marr 
More than a year after the EU referendum, the Tories still can't agree what Brexit means. 
.@AmberRuddHR demolishes "backseat driver" Boris in best way possible: revealing she hasn't even read his disgraceful Brexit manifesto #marr 
More than 100 firms sign letter to @DavidDavisMP and @MichelBarnier ahead of next round of #Brexit talks  
One Cabinet minister has called @BorisJohnson a "moron" over his Brexit article, Amanda Platell tells @AndrewMarr9. Seems a bit generous. 
EU officials doubt Theresa May's speech in Florence will break deadlock in Brexit negotiations  
IRAQ: Prime Minister calls Kurdish independence referendum a 'hostile move' 
Ireland planning to block UK beginning Brexit trade talks until issues of Ireland, citizen rights & divorce bill are further advanced.  
The LIBLABCONS Are the ones to blame for the mess this country is in today 
We appear to have two Tory visions on Brexit,we have the Johnson view and next week we will have the PM view on Brexit.Tories in such a mess 
Excellent to hear that the invidious European Arrest Warrant to end post Brexit. 
Post Brexit our global influence will continue to grow.  
Agreed. But Boris has done a service to those of us working to reverse this Brexit madness by exposing it as a complete fraud  
British business people have made their positions very clear about Brexit. But who do you trust? 
 #Live: Pro-independence rallies in Beirut, #Lebanon for Kurdistan Region’s upcoming independence referendum.  
Never let a few simple facts stand in the way of good Brexit propaganda. His use of term 'glorious Brexit' says it all! Ludicrous hyperbole! 
Scotland  can save itself from #Brexit Brit-Unionists will try to drag us down with them . Cut the cord.   
Pleased to meet with Polish community in #Perth to discuss their #Brexit concerns and to visit @Sobotnia_Szkola 
'There will be NO Scottish independence referendum when I'm leader.It's important we send a strong message to the Catalonian separatists'  
My cartoon - #Brexit denial syndrome  
There's not been a single apology from the reporters,columnists, anti-brexit elites for propagating this lie  
Toyota first major withdrawal from hard Brexit UK? Explosive ripple across industry. Looks like major industry Job losses? Scary for workers  
In wake of Parsons Green attack, pol editors received calls enquiring whether there would still be space for Brexit coverage. Grotesque.  
Appears Boris Johnson has been taking lessons from Karl Rove - creating his own "reality" of #Brexit  
Boris is right. Corbyn 'has chickened out', betraying students and Labour Brexit supporters in the process. 
Blair said we should join the Euro. He said Iraq had WMD. He opened the borders. He now campaigns against Brexit. Wrong then, wrong now.  
Strange World: Tory #Brexit liar being called out by a Lib Dem Student Fees liar. #Hypocrisy 
Yes, there will be a vote in 2018, to establish an independence referendum on November 3, 2020 -- the day of the next presidential election.  
It looks like the new EU London financial centre will be Frankfurt. #brexit - making Germany great  
There are many good reasons why researchers across Europe will continue scientific collaboration with UK partners post-Brexit.  
Frustrated EU fears Britain is ‘heading for the Brexit rocks’  
Worth remembering as the charlatans reprise their lying refrain #Brexit  
The biggest problem with Soft Brexit is that it's not attainable -  Liam Halligan & Gerard Lyons  
3. are impossible in 18 months. The port of Dover has a capacity of 20% of the full Brexit load & that probably applies to every UK port ... 
If you haven't yet read #AlternativeWar, on Trump, Brexit, Big Data, the Far-Right, and Russia. You must. Worldwide.  
Is Britain about to SPLIT the EU on Brexit? May speech could spark pandemonium in Brussels  
By refusing to join Labour’s campaign to wreck Brexit, Dennis Skinner has proved himself a champion of democracy and the working class.  
UK proposes new treaty on security with EU after #Brexit....or  UK could just stay in EU 
Iraq is prepared to intervene militarily if the Kurdish region's planned independence referendum results in violence  
Brexit negotiations were meant to take place next week. They've been postponed  
Same with Brexit over here.It's all in #AlternativeWar by @J_amesp - check it out - headlines confirm it daily 
They're such liars they lie about their lies. The £8bn was promised in the Tories' 2015 Manifesto. Before there was even a Referendum.  
“For them to call for only the Kurds to vote," says Iraq prime minister on referendum, "this is a hostile move."  
Kurdish Americans rallied in front of the @UN to support independence referendum #KurdishReferendum 
Wonderful PR job by the Spanish Government in support of the referendum these last few days. #1oct 
It's kind of Malaysian businessman James Dyson to offer advice to British taxpayers about Brexit. An outsider's perspective can be useful. 
On GPS tomorrow at 10a/1p ET on CNN: Discussing #NorthKorea, #Myanmar + #Brexit with @anneapplebaum, @FraserNelson and @FT’s Martin Wolf 
Another proof that #altright #Trump etc support is artificial internet hype made by #Russia/n trolls and their friends... ping #Brexit  
.@RCArmitage says he came to S2 apologizing to everyone for Brexit. He wasn't in favor of it. #PaleyFest #BerlinStation 
How Brexit could harm African economies that trade with the UK and disrupt regional integration  
“For them to call for only the Kurds to vote," says Iraq prime minister on referendum, "this is a hostile move."  
Breaking News: Telegraph to publish correction, as Boris meant the NHS would get an extra £3.50 per week post Brexit. 
Join the fun at the Kurdistan Referendum rally & support the hope &dream of millions. Stand w/Kurdistan. Stand on the right side of history.  
"Brexit means that for Scotland the latter - being part of Europe - is no longer possible without the former - independence."  
U.K. proposes treaty with EU to ensure cooperation on security and law enforcement after Brexit  
I wonder how many times the BBC called Brexit supporters "Separatists"?  
Iraqi Prime Minister Warns Against Kurdish Referendum   
‘If No wins the Catalan referendum we’ll shut up, if it’s Yes the conflict will continue‘  
Why do they say these things when any Brit who's been on holiday abroad this year knows it's a total falsehood. Brexit=nothing but lies. 
1. Brexit is an issue so broad in scope that to be informed you have to listen to voices you do not agree with. 
Funny, in all the reporting of #Brexit I've never heard it described as a separatist movement. Masterfully subtle manipulation from the BBC. 
& frankly our Govt's detroying our democracy day by day in forcing thru an unmandated #Brexit posing a greater threat 2 it than the EU! 
UK could need '5,000 more customs officials after Brexit'  
Funny the #Brexit vote and the @realDonaldTrump win TRIGGERS the same leftist hate and similar agenda of attacking free speech. @jongaunt 
'We will vote' say 700 Catalan mayors in referendum protest  
Cable urges 'exit from Brexit' referendum. Only sane political leader we have, it seems.   
Questions like public financing; spending and donation limits; and of course the PR alternatives and the referendum question. Critical. 
former governor of the Bank of England @bankofengland Mervyn King: I'm not terribly impressed by Brexit negotiations 
Agreed. Should have had high water mark in Uk referendum also. But we did not. Remain campaign was poor. Complacency? 
@DebbieLesko so is this a guarantee that you will not repeal #sb1431 and will allow the referendum to be on the ballot in 2018? #NoProp305 
I liked a @YouTube video  Referendum Threat: Madrid threatens to strip Catalonia of its budget over referendum 
Boris Johnson.. i like biscuits.  #conservative #tory #foreignsecratery #mp #brexit 61 
Turkey says northern Iraqi referendum an issue of national security  
Brexit uncertainty could jeopardise Toyota's UK investment, executive warns  
I can  testify  indeed  for the rise  of  xenophobia post referendum  
This morning in Barcelona: More than 700 mayors from towns and cities around #Catalonia chanting "We will vote!". #votarem #Referendum  
Cable urges 'exit from Brexit' referendum - BBC News much as I applaud your words it's too late we need to move on   
Exactly! EU standards are accepted by everyone the EU deals with. Right now we have a say in those standards. That stops after Brexit.  
The Tories love to divide people & it's what @BorisJohnson is doing again here. Reality is #Brexit will never affect him- always privileged.  
Brexit will start to push these figs up and down I suspect. If Brexit is bad I expect more of this. Most people don't grasp Indy is worse. 
Frustrated EU fears Britain is ‘heading for the Brexit rocks’  
Poll takers were split about the upcoming referendum to fund a replacement fire hall and pool. 
United Kingdom: Immediate Economic And Political Consequences Of Brexit $FB $TWTR $LNKD  
Two Starbucks grande mochas = $8. The monthly tax impact of the referendum on the average Bloomington homeowner = $8  
.@VinceCable on a Brexit Transition Deal: "kicking can down the road" -  
Brexit is 13415 hours away. #brexit 
#GoodNews inc on #Brexit #GBmfg positive about UK rather than forecasts of doom 

